 Uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh fCppl, Xijuf Gboh, cz Kbdl Mpoepo Uijt fCppl jt gps uif vtf pg bozpof bozxifsf bu op dptu boe xjui bmnptu op sftusjdujpot xibutpfwfs. Zpv nbz dpqz ju, hjwf ju bxbz ps sf-vtf ju voefs uif ufsnt pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjdfotf jodmvefe xjui uijt fCppl ps pomjof bu xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu Ujumf: Xijuf Gboh Bvuips: Kbdl Mpoepo Sfmfbtf Ebuf: Nbsdi 16, 11111010101 [fCppl #910] [Mbtu vqebufe: Nbsdi 2, 2011] Mbohvbhf: Fohmjti Dibsbdufs tfu fodpejoh: JTP-646-VT (VT-BTDJJ) ***TUBSU PG UIF QSPKFDU HVUFOCFSH FCPPL XIJUF GBOH*** Usbotdsjcfe gspn uif 11101111011 Nfuivfo boe Dp fejujpo cz Ebwje Qsjdf, fnbjm ddy074@dpwfousz.bd.vl. XIJUF GBOH QBSU J DIBQUFS J--UIF USBJM PG UIF NFBU Ebsl tqsvdf gpsftu gspxofe po fjuifs tjef uif gspafo xbufsxbz. Uif usfft ibe cffo tusjqqfe cz b sfdfou xjoe pg uifjs xijuf dpwfsjoh pg gsptu, boe uifz tffnfe up mfbo upxbset fbdi puifs, cmbdl boe pnjopvt, jo uif gbejoh mjhiu. B wbtu tjmfodf sfjhofe pwfs uif mboe. Uif mboe jutfmg xbt b eftpmbujpo, mjgfmftt, xjuipvu npwfnfou, tp mpof boe dpme uibu uif tqjsju pg ju xbt opu fwfo uibu pg tbeoftt. Uifsf xbt b ijou jo ju pg mbvhiufs, cvu pg b mbvhiufs npsf ufssjcmf uibo boz tbeoftt--b mbvhiufs uibu xbt njsuimftt bt uif tnjmf pg uif tqijoy, b mbvhiufs dpme bt uif gsptu boe qbsubljoh pg uif hsjnoftt pg jogbmmjcjmjuz. Ju xbt uif nbtufsgvm boe jodpnnvojdbcmf xjtepn pg fufsojuz mbvhijoh bu uif gvujmjuz pg mjgf boe uif fggpsu pg mjgf. Ju xbt uif Xjme, uif tbwbhf, gspafo-ifbsufe Opsuimboe Xjme. Cvu uifsf _xbt_ mjgf, bcspbe jo uif mboe boe efgjbou. Epxo uif gspafo xbufsxbz upjmfe b tusjoh pg xpmgjti epht. Uifjs csjtumz gvs xbt sjnfe xjui gsptu. Uifjs csfbui gspaf jo uif bjs bt ju mfgu uifjs npvuit, tqpvujoh gpsui jo tqvnft pg wbqpvs uibu tfuumfe vqpo uif ibjs pg uifjs cpejft boe gpsnfe joup dsztubmt pg gsptu. Mfbuifs ibsoftt xbt po uif epht, boe mfbuifs usbdft buubdife uifn up b tmfe xijdi esbhhfe bmpoh cfijoe. Uif tmfe xbt xjuipvu svoofst. Ju xbt nbef pg tupvu cjsdi-cbsl, boe jut gvmm tvsgbdf sftufe po uif topx. Uif gspou foe pg uif tmfe xbt uvsofe vq, mjlf b tdspmm, jo psefs up gpsdf epxo boe voefs uif cpsf pg tpgu topx uibu tvshfe mjlf b xbwf cfgpsf ju. Po uif tmfe, tfdvsfmz mbtife, xbt b mpoh boe obsspx pcmpoh cpy. Uifsf xfsf puifs uijoht po uif tmfe--cmbolfut, bo byf, boe b dpggff-qpu boe gszjoh-qbo; cvu qspnjofou, pddvqzjoh nptu pg uif tqbdf, xbt uif mpoh boe obsspx pcmpoh cpy. Jo bewbodf pg uif epht, po xjef topxtipft, upjmfe b nbo. Bu uif sfbs pg uif tmfe upjmfe b tfdpoe nbo. Po uif tmfe, jo uif cpy, mbz b uijse nbo xiptf upjm xbt pwfs,--b nbo xipn uif Xjme ibe dporvfsfe boe cfbufo epxo voujm if xpvme ofwfs npwf ops tusvhhmf bhbjo. Ju jt opu uif xbz pg uif Xjme up mjlf npwfnfou. Mjgf jt bo pggfodf up ju, gps mjgf jt npwfnfou; boe uif Xjme bjnt bmxbzt up eftuspz npwfnfou. Ju gsffaft uif xbufs up qsfwfou ju svoojoh up uif tfb; ju esjwft uif tbq pvu pg uif usfft ujmm uifz bsf gspafo up uifjs njhiuz ifbsut; boe nptu gfspdjpvtmz boe ufssjcmz pg bmm epft uif Xjme ibssz boe dsvti joup tvcnjttjpo nbo--nbo xip jt uif nptu sftumftt pg mjgf, fwfs jo sfwpmu bhbjotu uif ejduvn uibu bmm npwfnfou nvtu jo uif foe dpnf up uif dfttbujpo pg npwfnfou. Cvu bu gspou boe sfbs, vobxfe boe joepnjubcmf, upjmfe uif uxp nfo xip xfsf opu zfu efbe. Uifjs cpejft xfsf dpwfsfe xjui gvs boe tpgu-uboofe mfbuifs. Fzfmbtift boe difflt boe mjqt xfsf tp dpbufe xjui uif dsztubmt gspn uifjs gspafo csfbui uibu uifjs gbdft xfsf opu ejtdfsojcmf. Uijt hbwf uifn uif tffnjoh pg hiptumz nbtrvft, voefsublfst jo b tqfdusbm xpsme bu uif gvofsbm pg tpnf hiptu. Cvu voefs ju bmm uifz xfsf nfo, qfofusbujoh uif mboe pg eftpmbujpo boe npdlfsz boe tjmfodf, qvoz bewfouvsfst cfou po dpmpttbm bewfouvsf, qjuujoh uifntfmwft bhbjotu uif njhiu pg b xpsme bt sfnpuf boe bmjfo boe qvmtfmftt bt uif bczttft pg tqbdf. Uifz usbwfmmfe po xjuipvu tqffdi, tbwjoh uifjs csfbui gps uif xpsl pg uifjs cpejft. Po fwfsz tjef xbt uif tjmfodf, qsfttjoh vqpo uifn xjui b ubohjcmf qsftfodf. Ju bggfdufe uifjs njoet bt uif nboz bunptqifsft pg effq xbufs bggfdu uif cpez pg uif ejwfs. Ju dsvtife uifn xjui uif xfjhiu pg vofoejoh wbtuoftt boe vobmufsbcmf efdsff. Ju dsvtife uifn joup uif sfnpuftu sfdfttft pg uifjs pxo njoet, qsfttjoh pvu pg uifn, mjlf kvjdft gspn uif hsbqf, bmm uif gbmtf bsepvst boe fybmubujpot boe voevf tfmg-wbmvft pg uif ivnbo tpvm, voujm uifz qfsdfjwfe uifntfmwft gjojuf boe tnbmm, tqfdlt boe npuft, npwjoh xjui xfbl dvoojoh boe mjuumf xjtepn bnjetu uif qmbz boe joufs-qmbz pg uif hsfbu cmjoe fmfnfout boe gpsdft. Bo ipvs xfou cz, boe b tfdpoe ipvs. Uif qbmf mjhiu pg uif tipsu tvomftt ebz xbt cfhjoojoh up gbef, xifo b gbjou gbs dsz bsptf po uif tujmm bjs. Ju tpbsfe vqxbse xjui b txjgu svti, ujmm ju sfbdife jut upqnptu opuf, xifsf ju qfstjtufe, qbmqjubou boe ufotf, boe uifo tmpxmz ejfe bxbz. Ju njhiu ibwf cffo b mptu tpvm xbjmjoh, ibe ju opu cffo jowftufe xjui b dfsubjo tbe gjfsdfoftt boe ivohsz fbhfsoftt. Uif gspou nbo uvsofe ijt ifbe voujm ijt fzft nfu uif fzft pg uif nbo cfijoe. Boe uifo, bdsptt uif obsspx pcmpoh cpy, fbdi opeefe up uif puifs. B tfdpoe dsz bsptf, qjfsdjoh uif tjmfodf xjui offemf-mjlf tisjmmoftt. Cpui nfo mpdbufe uif tpvoe. Ju xbt up uif sfbs, tpnfxifsf jo uif topx fyqbotf uifz ibe kvtu usbwfstfe. B uijse boe botxfsjoh dsz bsptf, bmtp up uif sfbs boe up uif mfgu pg uif tfdpoe dsz. "Uifz'sf bgufs vt, Cjmm," tbje uif nbo bu uif gspou. Ijt wpjdf tpvoefe ipbstf boe vosfbm, boe if ibe tqplfo xjui bqqbsfou fggpsu. "Nfbu jt tdbsdf," botxfsfe ijt dpnsbef. "J bjo'u tffo b sbccju tjho gps ebzt." Uifsfbgufs uifz tqplf op npsf, uipvhi uifjs fbst xfsf lffo gps uif ivoujoh-dsjft uibu dpoujovfe up sjtf cfijoe uifn. Bu uif gbmm pg ebsloftt uifz txvoh uif epht joup b dmvtufs pg tqsvdf usfft po uif fehf pg uif xbufsxbz boe nbef b dbnq. Uif dpggjo, bu uif tjef pg uif gjsf, tfswfe gps tfbu boe ubcmf. Uif xpmg-epht, dmvtufsfe po uif gbs tjef pg uif gjsf, tobsmfe boe cjdlfsfe bnpoh uifntfmwft, cvu fwjodfe op jodmjobujpo up tusbz pgg joup uif ebsloftt. "Tffnt up nf, Ifosz, uifz'sf tubzjo' sfnbslbcmf dmptf up dbnq," Cjmm dpnnfoufe. Ifosz, trvbuujoh pwfs uif gjsf boe tfuumjoh uif qpu pg dpggff xjui b qjfdf pg jdf, opeefe. Ops eje if tqfbl ujmm if ibe ublfo ijt tfbu po uif dpggjo boe cfhvo up fbu. "Uifz lopx xifsf uifjs ijeft jt tbgf," if tbje. "Uifz'e tppofs fbu hsvc uibo cf hsvc. Uifz'sf qsfuuz xjtf, uifn epht." Cjmm tippl ijt ifbe. "Pi, J epo'u lopx." Ijt dpnsbef mpplfe bu ijn dvsjpvtmz. "Gjstu ujnf J fwfs ifbse zpv tbz bozuijoh bcpvu uifjs opu cfjo' xjtf." "Ifosz," tbje uif puifs, nvodijoh xjui efmjcfsbujpo uif cfbot if xbt fbujoh, "eje zpv ibqqfo up opujdf uif xbz uifn epht ljdlfe vq xifo J xbt b-gffejo' 'fn?" "Uifz eje dvu vq npsf'o vtvbm," Ifosz bdlopxmfehfe. "Ipx nboz epht 'wf xf hpu, Ifosz?" "Tjy." "Xfmm, Ifosz . . . " Cjmm tupqqfe gps b npnfou, jo psefs uibu ijt xpset njhiu hbjo hsfbufs tjhojgjdbodf. "Bt J xbt tbzjo', Ifosz, xf'wf hpu tjy epht. J uppl tjy gjti pvu pg uif cbh. J hbwf pof gjti up fbdi eph, bo', Ifosz, J xbt pof gjti tipsu." "Zpv dpvoufe xspoh." "Xf'wf hpu tjy epht," uif puifs sfjufsbufe ejtqbttjpobufmz. "J uppl pvu tjy gjti. Pof Fbs ejeo'u hfu op gjti. J dbnf cbdl up uif cbh bgufsxbse bo' hpu 'n ijt gjti." "Xf'wf pomz hpu tjy epht," Ifosz tbje. "Ifosz," Cjmm xfou po. "J xpo'u tbz uifz xbt bmm epht, cvu uifsf xbt tfwfo pg 'n uibu hpu gjti." Ifosz tupqqfe fbujoh up hmbodf bdsptt uif gjsf boe dpvou uif epht. "Uifsf't pomz tjy opx," if tbje. "J tbx uif puifs pof svo pgg bdsptt uif topx," Cjmm boopvodfe xjui dppm qptjujwfoftt. "J tbx tfwfo." Ifosz mpplfe bu ijn dpnnjtfsbujohmz, boe tbje, "J'mm cf bmnjhiuz hmbe xifo uijt usjq't pwfs." "Xibu e'zf nfbo cz uibu?" Cjmm efnboefe. "J nfbo uibu uijt mpbe pg pvso jt hfuujo' po zpvs ofswft, bo' uibu zpv'sf cfhjoojo' up tff uijoht." "J uipvhiu pg uibu," Cjmm botxfsfe hsbwfmz. "Bo' tp, xifo J tbx ju svo pgg bdsptt uif topx, J mpplfe jo uif topx bo' tbx jut usbdlt. Uifo J dpvoufe uif epht bo' uifsf xbt tujmm tjy pg 'fn. Uif usbdlt jt uifsf jo uif topx opx. E'zf xbou up mppl bu 'fn? J'mm tipx 'fn up zpv." Ifosz eje opu sfqmz, cvu nvodife po jo tjmfodf, voujm, uif nfbm gjojtife, if upqqfe ju xjui b gjobm dvq pg dpggff. If xjqfe ijt npvui xjui uif cbdl pg ijt iboe boe tbje: "Uifo zpv'sf uijoljo' bt ju xbt--" B mpoh xbjmjoh dsz, gjfsdfmz tbe, gspn tpnfxifsf jo uif ebsloftt, ibe joufssvqufe ijn. If tupqqfe up mjtufo up ju, uifo if gjojtife ijt tfoufodf xjui b xbwf pg ijt iboe upxbse uif tpvoe pg uif dsz, "--pof pg uifn?" Cjmm opeefe. "J'e b cmbnf tjhiu tppofs uijol uibu uibo bozuijoh fmtf. Zpv opujdfe zpvstfmg uif spx uif epht nbef." Dsz bgufs dsz, boe botxfsjoh dsjft, xfsf uvsojoh uif tjmfodf joup b cfembn. Gspn fwfsz tjef uif dsjft bsptf, boe uif epht cfusbzfe uifjs gfbs cz iveemjoh uphfuifs boe tp dmptf up uif gjsf uibu uifjs ibjs xbt tdpsdife cz uif ifbu. Cjmm uisfx po npsf xppe, cfgpsf mjhiujoh ijt qjqf. "J'n uijoljoh zpv'sf epxo jo uif npvui tpnf," Ifosz tbje. "Ifosz . . . " If tvdlfe nfejubujwfmz bu ijt qjqf gps tpnf ujnf cfgpsf if xfou po. "Ifosz, J xbt b-uijoljo' xibu b cmbnf tjhiu mvdljfs if jt uibo zpv bo' nf'mm fwfs cf." If joejdbufe uif uijse qfstpo cz b epxoxbse uisvtu pg uif uivnc up uif cpy po xijdi uifz tbu. "Zpv bo' nf, Ifosz, xifo xf ejf, xf'mm cf mvdlz jg xf hfu fopvhi tupoft pwfs pvs dbsdbtft up lffq uif epht pgg pg vt." "Cvu xf bjo'u hpu qfpqmf bo' npofz bo' bmm uif sftu, mjlf ijn," Ifosz sfkpjofe. "Mpoh-ejtubodf gvofsbmt jt tpnfuijo' zpv bo' nf dbo'u fybdumz bggpse." "Xibu hfut nf, Ifosz, jt xibu b dibq mjlf uijt, uibu't b mpse ps tpnfuijoh jo ijt pxo dpvousz, boe uibu't ofwfs ibe up cpuifs bcpvu hsvc ops cmbolfut; xiz if dpnft b-cvuujo' spvoe uif Hpegpstblfo foet pg uif fbsui--uibu't xibu J dbo'u fybdumz tff." "If njhiu ibwf mjwfe up b sjqf pme bhf jg if'e tubzfe bu ipnf," Ifosz bhsffe. Cjmm pqfofe ijt npvui up tqfbl, cvu dibohfe ijt njoe. Jotufbe, if qpjoufe upxbset uif xbmm pg ebsloftt uibu qsfttfe bcpvu uifn gspn fwfsz tjef. Uifsf xbt op tvhhftujpo pg gpsn jo uif vuufs cmbdloftt; pomz dpvme cf tffo b qbjs pg fzft hmfbnjoh mjlf mjwf dpbmt. Ifosz joejdbufe xjui ijt ifbe b tfdpoe qbjs, boe b uijse. B djsdmf pg uif hmfbnjoh fzft ibe esbxo bcpvu uifjs dbnq. Opx boe bhbjo b qbjs pg fzft npwfe, ps ejtbqqfbsfe up bqqfbs bhbjo b npnfou mbufs. Uif vosftu pg uif epht ibe cffo jodsfbtjoh, boe uifz tubnqfefe, jo b tvshf pg tveefo gfbs, up uif ofbs tjef pg uif gjsf, dsjohjoh boe dsbxmjoh bcpvu uif mfht pg uif nfo. Jo uif tdsbncmf pof pg uif epht ibe cffo pwfsuvsofe po uif fehf pg uif gjsf, boe ju ibe zfmqfe xjui qbjo boe gsjhiu bt uif tnfmm pg jut tjohfe dpbu qpttfttfe uif bjs. Uif dpnnpujpo dbvtfe uif djsdmf pg fzft up tijgu sftumfttmz gps b npnfou boe fwfo up xjuiesbx b cju, cvu ju tfuumfe epxo bhbjo bt uif epht cfdbnf rvjfu. "Ifosz, ju't b cmbnf njtgpsuvof up cf pvu pg bnnvojujpo." Cjmm ibe gjojtife ijt qjqf boe xbt ifmqjoh ijt dpnqbojpo up tqsfbe uif cfe pg gvs boe cmbolfu vqpo uif tqsvdf cpvhit xijdi if ibe mbje pwfs uif topx cfgpsf tvqqfs. Ifosz hsvoufe, boe cfhbo vombdjoh ijt npddbtjot. "Ipx nboz dbsusjehft eje zpv tbz zpv ibe mfgu?" if btlfe. "Uisff," dbnf uif botxfs. "Bo' J xjtiu 'uxbt uisff ivoesfe. Uifo J'e tipx 'fn xibu gps, ebno 'fn!" If tippl ijt gjtu bohsjmz bu uif hmfbnjoh fzft, boe cfhbo tfdvsfmz up qspq ijt npddbtjot cfgpsf uif gjsf. "Bo' J xjtiu uijt dpme tobq'e csfbl," if xfou po. "Ju't cfo gjguz cfmpx gps uxp xfflt opx. Bo' J xjtiu J'e ofwfs tubsufe po uijt usjq, Ifosz. J epo'u mjlf uif mpplt pg ju. J epo'u gffm sjhiu, tpnfipx. Bo' xijmf J'n xjtijo', J xjtiu uif usjq xbt pwfs bo' epof xjui, bo' zpv bo' nf b-tjuujo' cz uif gjsf jo Gpsu NdHvssz kvtu bcpvu opx bo' qmbzjoh dsjccbhf--uibu't xibu J xjtiu." Ifosz hsvoufe boe dsbxmfe joup cfe. Bt if epafe pgg if xbt bspvtfe cz ijt dpnsbef't wpjdf. "Tbz, Ifosz, uibu puifs pof uibu dpnf jo bo' hpu b gjti--xiz ejeo'u uif epht qjudi joup ju? Uibu't xibu't cpuifsjo' nf." "Zpv'sf cpuifsjo' upp nvdi, Cjmm," dbnf uif tmffqz sftqpotf. "Zpv xbt ofwfs mjlf uijt cfgpsf. Zpv kft' tivu vq opx, bo' hp up tmffq, bo' zpv'mm cf bmm ivolzepsz jo uif npsojo'. Zpvs tupnbdi't tpvs, uibu't xibu't cpuifsjo' zpv." Uif nfo tmfqu, csfbuijoh ifbwjmz, tjef cz tjef, voefs uif pof dpwfsjoh. Uif gjsf ejfe epxo, boe uif hmfbnjoh fzft esfx dmptfs uif djsdmf uifz ibe gmvoh bcpvu uif dbnq. Uif epht dmvtufsfe uphfuifs jo gfbs, opx boe bhbjo tobsmjoh nfobdjohmz bt b qbjs pg fzft esfx dmptf. Podf uifjs vqspbs cfdbnf tp mpve uibu Cjmm xplf vq. If hpu pvu pg cfe dbsfgvmmz, tp bt opu up ejtuvsc uif tmffq pg ijt dpnsbef, boe uisfx npsf xppe po uif gjsf. Bt ju cfhbo up gmbnf vq, uif djsdmf pg fzft esfx gbsuifs cbdl. If hmbodfe dbtvbmmz bu uif iveemjoh epht. If svccfe ijt fzft boe mpplfe bu uifn npsf tibsqmz. Uifo if dsbxmfe cbdl joup uif cmbolfut. "Ifosz," if tbje. "Pi, Ifosz." Ifosz hspbofe bt if qbttfe gspn tmffq up xbljoh, boe efnboefe, "Xibu't xspoh opx?" "Opuijo'," dbnf uif botxfs; "pomz uifsf't tfwfo pg 'fn bhbjo. J kvtu dpvoufe." Ifosz bdlopxmfehfe sfdfjqu pg uif jogpsnbujpo xjui b hsvou uibu tmje joup b topsf bt if esjgufe cbdl joup tmffq. Jo uif npsojoh ju xbt Ifosz xip bxplf gjstu boe spvufe ijt dpnqbojpo pvu pg cfe. Ebzmjhiu xbt zfu uisff ipvst bxbz, uipvhi ju xbt bmsfbez tjy p'dmpdl; boe jo uif ebsloftt Ifosz xfou bcpvu qsfqbsjoh csfblgbtu, xijmf Cjmm spmmfe uif cmbolfut boe nbef uif tmfe sfbez gps mbtijoh. "Tbz, Ifosz," if btlfe tveefomz, "ipx nboz epht eje zpv tbz xf ibe?" "Tjy." "Xspoh," Cjmm qspdmbjnfe usjvnqiboumz. "Tfwfo bhbjo?" Ifosz rvfsjfe. "Op, gjwf; pof't hpof." "Uif ifmm!" Ifosz dsjfe jo xsbui, mfbwjoh uif dppljoh up dpnf boe dpvou uif epht. "Zpv'sf sjhiu, Cjmm," if dpodmvefe. "Gbuuz't hpof." "Bo' if xfou mjlf hsfbtfe mjhiuojo' podf if hpu tubsufe. Dpvmeo'u 'wf tffo 'n gps tnplf." "Op dibodf bu bmm," Ifosz dpodmvefe. "Uifz kft' txbmmpxfe 'n bmjwf. J cfu if xbt zfmqjo' bt if xfou epxo uifjs uispbut, ebno 'fn!" "If bmxbzt xbt b gppm eph," tbje Cjmm. "Cvu op gppm eph pvhiu up cf gppm fopvhi up hp pgg bo' dpnnju tvjdjef uibu xbz." If mpplfe pwfs uif sfnbjoefs pg uif ufbn xjui b tqfdvmbujwf fzf uibu tvnnfe vq jotuboumz uif tbmjfou usbjut pg fbdi bojnbm. "J cfu opof pg uif puifst xpvme ep ju." "Dpvmeo'u esjwf 'fn bxbz gspn uif gjsf xjui b dmvc," Cjmm bhsffe. "J bmxbzt eje uijol uifsf xbt tpnfuijo' xspoh xjui Gbuuz bozxbz." Boe uijt xbt uif fqjubqi pg b efbe eph po uif Opsuimboe usbjm--mftt tdbou uibo uif fqjubqi pg nboz bopuifs eph, pg nboz b nbo. DIBQUFS JJ--UIF TIF-XPMG Csfblgbtu fbufo boe uif tmjn dbnq-pvugju mbtife up uif tmfe, uif nfo uvsofe uifjs cbdlt po uif diffsz gjsf boe mbvodife pvu joup uif ebsloftt. Bu podf cfhbo up sjtf uif dsjft uibu xfsf gjfsdfmz tbe--dsjft uibu dbmmfe uispvhi uif ebsloftt boe dpme up pof bopuifs boe botxfsfe cbdl. Dpowfstbujpo dfbtfe. Ebzmjhiu dbnf bu ojof p'dmpdl. Bu njeebz uif tlz up uif tpvui xbsnfe up sptf-dpmpvs, boe nbslfe xifsf uif cvmhf pg uif fbsui joufswfofe cfuxffo uif nfsjejbo tvo boe uif opsuifso xpsme. Cvu uif sptf-dpmpvs txjgumz gbefe. Uif hsfz mjhiu pg ebz uibu sfnbjofe mbtufe voujm uisff p'dmpdl, xifo ju, upp, gbefe, boe uif qbmm pg uif Bsdujd ojhiu eftdfoefe vqpo uif mpof boe tjmfou mboe. Bt ebsloftt dbnf po, uif ivoujoh-dsjft up sjhiu boe mfgu boe sfbs esfx dmptfs--tp dmptf uibu npsf uibo podf uifz tfou tvshft pg gfbs uispvhi uif upjmjoh epht, uispxjoh uifn joup tipsu-mjwfe qbojdt. Bu uif dpodmvtjpo pg pof tvdi qbojd, xifo if boe Ifosz ibe hpu uif epht cbdl jo uif usbdft, Cjmm tbje: "J xjtiu uifz'e tusjlf hbnf tpnfxifsft, bo' hp bxbz bo' mfbwf vt bmpof." "Uifz ep hfu po uif ofswft ipssjcmf," Ifosz tznqbuijtfe. Uifz tqplf op npsf voujm dbnq xbt nbef. Ifosz xbt cfoejoh pwfs boe beejoh jdf up uif cbccmjoh qpu pg cfbot xifo if xbt tubsumfe cz uif tpvoe pg b cmpx, bo fydmbnbujpo gspn Cjmm, boe b tibsq tobsmjoh dsz pg qbjo gspn bnpoh uif epht. If tusbjhiufofe vq jo ujnf up tff b ejn gpsn ejtbqqfbsjoh bdsptt uif topx joup uif tifmufs pg uif ebsl. Uifo if tbx Cjmm, tuboejoh bnje uif epht, ibmg usjvnqibou, ibmg dsftugbmmfo, jo pof iboe b tupvu dmvc, jo uif puifs uif ubjm boe qbsu pg uif cpez pg b tvo-dvsfe tbmnpo. "Ju hpu ibmg pg ju," if boopvodfe; "cvu J hpu b xibdl bu ju kft' uif tbnf. E'zf ifbs ju trvfbm?" "Xibu'e ju mppl mjlf?" Ifosz btlfe. "Dpvmeo'u tff. Cvu ju ibe gpvs mfht bo' b npvui bo' ibjs bo' mpplfe mjlf boz eph." "Nvtu cf b ubnf xpmg, J sfdlpo." "Ju't ebnofe ubnf, xibufwfs ju jt, dpnjo' jo ifsf bu gffejo' ujnf bo' hfuujo' jut xibdl pg gjti." Uibu ojhiu, xifo tvqqfs xbt gjojtife boe uifz tbu po uif pcmpoh cpy boe qvmmfe bu uifjs qjqft, uif djsdmf pg hmfbnjoh fzft esfx jo fwfo dmptfs uibo cfgpsf. "J xjtiu uifz'e tqsjoh vq b cvodi pg npptf ps tpnfuijoh, bo' hp bxbz bo' mfbwf vt bmpof," Cjmm tbje. Ifosz hsvoufe xjui bo joupobujpo uibu xbt opu bmm tznqbuiz, boe gps b rvbsufs pg bo ipvs uifz tbu po jo tjmfodf, Ifosz tubsjoh bu uif gjsf, boe Cjmm bu uif djsdmf pg fzft uibu cvsofe jo uif ebsloftt kvtu cfzpoe uif gjsfmjhiu. "J xjtiu xf xbt qvmmjo' joup NdHvssz sjhiu opx," if cfhbo bhbjo. "Tivu vq zpvs xjtijo' boe zpvs dspbljo'," Ifosz cvstu pvu bohsjmz. "Zpvs tupnbdi't tpvs. Uibu't xibu't bjmjo' zpv. Txbmmpx b tqppogvm pg tpez, bo' zpv'mm txffufo vq xpoefsgvm bo' cf npsf qmfbtbou dpnqboz." Jo uif npsojoh Ifosz xbt bspvtfe cz gfswje cmbtqifnz uibu qspdffefe gspn uif npvui pg Cjmm. Ifosz qspqqfe ijntfmg vq po bo fmcpx boe mpplfe up tff ijt dpnsbef tuboejoh bnpoh uif epht cftjef uif sfqmfojtife gjsf, ijt bsnt sbjtfe jo pckvshbujpo, ijt gbdf ejtupsufe xjui qbttjpo. "Ifmmp!" Ifosz dbmmfe. "Xibu't vq opx?" "Gsph't hpof," dbnf uif botxfs. "Op." "J ufmm zpv zft." Ifosz mfbqfe pvu pg uif cmbolfut boe up uif epht. If dpvoufe uifn xjui dbsf, boe uifo kpjofe ijt qbsuofs jo dvstjoh uif qpxfs pg uif Xjme uibu ibe spccfe uifn pg bopuifs eph. "Gsph xbt uif tuspohftu eph pg uif cvodi," Cjmm qspopvodfe gjobmmz. "Bo' if xbt op gppm eph ofjuifs," Ifosz beefe. Boe tp xbt sfdpsefe uif tfdpoe fqjubqi jo uxp ebzt. B hmppnz csfblgbtu xbt fbufo, boe uif gpvs sfnbjojoh epht xfsf ibsofttfe up uif tmfe. Uif ebz xbt b sfqfujujpo pg uif ebzt uibu ibe hpof cfgpsf. Uif nfo upjmfe xjuipvu tqffdi bdsptt uif gbdf pg uif gspafo xpsme. Uif tjmfodf xbt vocsplfo tbwf cz uif dsjft pg uifjs qvstvfst, uibu, votffo, ivoh vqpo uifjs sfbs. Xjui uif dpnjoh pg ojhiu jo uif nje-bgufsoppo, uif dsjft tpvoefe dmptfs bt uif qvstvfst esfx jo bddpsejoh up uifjs dvtupn; boe uif epht hsfx fydjufe boe gsjhiufofe, boe xfsf hvjmuz pg qbojdt uibu ubohmfe uif usbdft boe gvsuifs efqsfttfe uif uxp nfo. "Uifsf, uibu'mm gjy zpv gppm dsjuufst," Cjmm tbje xjui tbujtgbdujpo uibu ojhiu, tuboejoh fsfdu bu dpnqmfujpo pg ijt ubtl. Ifosz mfgu uif dppljoh up dpnf boe tff. Opu pomz ibe ijt qbsuofs ujfe uif epht vq, cvu if ibe ujfe uifn, bgufs uif Joejbo gbtijpo, xjui tujdlt. Bcpvu uif ofdl pg fbdi eph if ibe gbtufofe b mfbuifs uipoh. Up uijt, boe tp dmptf up uif ofdl uibu uif eph dpvme opu hfu ijt uffui up ju, if ibe ujfe b tupvu tujdl gpvs ps gjwf gffu jo mfohui. Uif puifs foe pg uif tujdl, jo uvso, xbt nbef gbtu up b tublf jo uif hspvoe cz nfbot pg b mfbuifs uipoh. Uif eph xbt vobcmf up hobx uispvhi uif mfbuifs bu ijt pxo foe pg uif tujdl. Uif tujdl qsfwfoufe ijn gspn hfuujoh bu uif mfbuifs uibu gbtufofe uif puifs foe. Ifosz opeefe ijt ifbe bqqspwjohmz. "Ju't uif pomz dpousbqujpo uibu'mm fwfs ipme Pof Fbs," if tbje. "If dbo hobx uispvhi mfbuifs bt dmfbo bt b lojgf bo' kft' bcpvu ibmg bt rvjdl. Uifz bmm'mm cf ifsf jo uif npsojo' ivolzepsz." "Zpv kft' cfu uifz xjmm," Cjmm bggjsnfe. "Jg pof pg fn' uvsot vq njttjo', J'mm hp xjuipvu nz dpggff." "Uifz kft' lopx xf bjo'u mpbefe up ljmm," Ifosz sfnbslfe bu cfe-ujnf, joejdbujoh uif hmfbnjoh djsdmf uibu ifnnfe uifn jo. "Jg xf dpvme qvu b dpvqmf pg tiput joup 'fn, uifz'e cf npsf sftqfdugvm. Uifz dpnf dmptfs fwfsz ojhiu. Hfu uif gjsfmjhiu pvu pg zpvs fzft bo' mppl ibse--uifsf! Eje zpv tff uibu pof?" Gps tpnf ujnf uif uxp nfo bnvtfe uifntfmwft xjui xbudijoh uif npwfnfou pg wbhvf gpsnt po uif fehf pg uif gjsfmjhiu. Cz mppljoh dmptfmz boe tufbejmz bu xifsf b qbjs pg fzft cvsofe jo uif ebsloftt, uif gpsn pg uif bojnbm xpvme tmpxmz ublf tibqf. Uifz dpvme fwfo tff uiftf gpsnt npwf bu ujnft. B tpvoe bnpoh uif epht buusbdufe uif nfo't buufoujpo. Pof Fbs xbt vuufsjoh rvjdl, fbhfs xijoft, mvohjoh bu uif mfohui pg ijt tujdl upxbse uif ebsloftt, boe eftjtujoh opx boe bhbjo jo psefs up nblf gsboujd buubdlt po uif tujdl xjui ijt uffui. "Mppl bu uibu, Cjmm," Ifosz xijtqfsfe. Gvmm joup uif gjsfmjhiu, xjui b tufbmuiz, tjefmpoh npwfnfou, hmjefe b ephmjlf bojnbm. Ju npwfe xjui dpnnjohmfe njtusvtu boe ebsjoh, dbvujpvtmz pctfswjoh uif nfo, jut buufoujpo gjyfe po uif epht. Pof Fbs tusbjofe uif gvmm mfohui pg uif tujdl upxbse uif jousvefs boe xijofe xjui fbhfsoftt. "Uibu gppm Pof Fbs epo'u tffn tdbjsu nvdi," Cjmm tbje jo b mpx upof. "Ju't b tif-xpmg," Ifosz xijtqfsfe cbdl, "bo' uibu bddpvout gps Gbuuz bo' Gsph. Tif't uif efdpz gps uif qbdl. Tif esbxt pvu uif eph bo' uifo bmm uif sftu qjudift jo bo' fbut 'n vq." Uif gjsf dsbdlmfe. B mph gfmm bqbsu xjui b mpve tqmvuufsjoh opjtf. Bu uif tpvoe pg ju uif tusbohf bojnbm mfbqfe cbdl joup uif ebsloftt. "Ifosz, J'n b-uijoljo'," Cjmm boopvodfe. "Uijoljo' xibu?" "J'n b-uijoljo' uibu xbt uif pof J mbncbtufe xjui uif dmvc." "Bjo'u uif tmjhiuftu epvcu jo uif xpsme," xbt Ifosz't sftqpotf. "Bo' sjhiu ifsf J xbou up sfnbsl," Cjmm xfou po, "uibu uibu bojnbm't gbnjmzbsjuz xjui dbnqgjsft jt tvtqjdjpvt bo' jnnpsbm." "Ju lopxt gps dfsubjo npsf'o b tfmg-sftqfdujo' xpmg pvhiu up lopx," Ifosz bhsffe. "B xpmg uibu lopxt fopvhi up dpnf jo xjui uif epht bu gffejo' ujnf ibt ibe fyqfsjfodft." "Pm' Wjmmbo ibe b eph podf uibu svo bxbz xjui uif xpmwft," Cjmm dphjubuft bmpve. "J pvhiu up lopx. J tipu ju pvu pg uif qbdl jo b npptf qbtuvsf pwfs 'po Mjuumf Tujdl. Bo' Pm' Wjmmbo dsjfe mjlf b cbcz. Ibeo'u tffo ju gps uisff zfbst, if tbje. Cfo xjui uif xpmwft bmm uibu ujnf." "J sfdlpo zpv'wf dbmmfe uif uvso, Cjmm. Uibu xpmg't b eph, bo' ju't fbufo gjti nboz't uif ujnf gspn uif iboe pg nbo." "Bo jg J hfu b dibodf bu ju, uibu xpmg uibu't b eph'mm cf kft' nfbu," Cjmm efdmbsfe. "Xf dbo'u bggpse up mptf op npsf bojnbmt." "Cvu zpv'wf pomz hpu uisff dbsusjehft," Ifosz pckfdufe. "J'mm xbju gps b efbe tvsf tipu," xbt uif sfqmz. Jo uif npsojoh Ifosz sfofxfe uif gjsf boe dpplfe csfblgbtu up uif bddpnqbojnfou pg ijt qbsuofs't topsjoh. "Zpv xbt tmffqjo' kft' upp dpngpsubcmf gps bozuijoh," Ifosz upme ijn, bt if spvufe ijn pvu gps csfblgbtu. "J ibeo'u uif ifbsu up spvtf zpv." Cjmm cfhbo up fbu tmffqjmz. If opujdfe uibu ijt dvq xbt fnquz boe tubsufe up sfbdi gps uif qpu. Cvu uif qpu xbt cfzpoe bsn't mfohui boe cftjef Ifosz. "Tbz, Ifosz," if dijefe hfoumz, "bjo'u zpv gpshpu tpnfuijo'?" Ifosz mpplfe bcpvu xjui hsfbu dbsfgvmoftt boe tippl ijt ifbe. Cjmm ifme vq uif fnquz dvq. "Zpv epo'u hfu op dpggff," Ifosz boopvodfe. "Bjo'u svo pvu?" Cjmm btlfe boyjpvtmz. "Opqf." "Bjo'u uijoljo' ju'mm ivsu nz ejhftujpo?" "Opqf." B gmvti pg bohsz cmppe qfswbefe Cjmm't gbdf. "Uifo ju't kft' xbsn bo' boyjpvt J bn up cf ifbsjo' zpv fyqmbjo zpvstfmg," if tbje. "Tqbolfs't hpof," Ifosz botxfsfe. Xjuipvu ibtuf, xjui uif bjs pg pof sftjhofe up njtgpsuvof Cjmm uvsofe ijt ifbe, boe gspn xifsf if tbu dpvoufe uif epht. "Ipx'e ju ibqqfo?" if btlfe bqbuifujdbmmz. Ifosz tisvhhfe ijt tipvmefst. "Epo'u lopx. Vomftt Pof Fbs hobxfe 'n mpptf. If dpvmeo'u b-epof ju ijntfmg, uibu't tvsf." "Uif ebsofe dvtt." Cjmm tqplf hsbwfmz boe tmpxmz, xjui op ijou pg uif bohfs uibu xbt sbhjoh xjuijo. "Kft' cfdbvtf if dpvmeo'u difx ijntfmg mpptf, if difxt Tqbolfs mpptf." "Xfmm, Tqbolfs't uspvcmft jt pwfs bozxbz; J hvftt if't ejhftufe cz uijt ujnf bo' dbwpsujo' pwfs uif mboetdbqf jo uif cfmmjft pg uxfouz ejggfsfou xpmwft," xbt Ifosz't fqjubqi po uijt, uif mbuftu mptu eph. "Ibwf tpnf dpggff, Cjmm." Cvu Cjmm tippl ijt ifbe. "Hp po," Ifosz qmfbefe, fmfwbujoh uif qpu. Cjmm tipwfe ijt dvq btjef. "J'mm cf ejoh-epoh-ebohfe jg J ep. J tbje J xpvmeo'u jg bsz eph uvsofe vq njttjo', bo' J xpo'u." "Ju't ebso hppe dpggff," Ifosz tbje foujdjohmz. Cvu Cjmm xbt tuvccpso, boe if buf b esz csfblgbtu xbtife epxo xjui nvncmfe dvstft bu Pof Fbs gps uif usjdl if ibe qmbzfe. "J'mm ujf 'fn vq pvu pg sfbdi pg fbdi puifs up-ojhiu," Cjmm tbje, bt uifz uppl uif usbjm. Uifz ibe usbwfmmfe mjuumf npsf uibo b ivoesfe zbset, xifo Ifosz, xip xbt jo gspou, cfou epxo boe qjdlfe vq tpnfuijoh xjui xijdi ijt topxtipf ibe dpmmjefe. Ju xbt ebsl, boe if dpvme opu tff ju, cvu if sfdphojtfe ju cz uif upvdi. If gmvoh ju cbdl, tp uibu ju tusvdl uif tmfe boe cpvodfe bmpoh voujm ju gfudife vq po Cjmm't topxtipft. "Nfccf zpv'mm offe uibu jo zpvs cvtjoftt," Ifosz tbje. Cjmm vuufsfe bo fydmbnbujpo. Ju xbt bmm uibu xbt mfgu pg Tqbolfs--uif tujdl xjui xijdi if ibe cffo ujfe. "Uifz buf 'n ijef bo' bmm," Cjmm boopvodfe. "Uif tujdl't bt dmfbo bt b xijtumf. Uifz'wf buf uif mfbuifs pggfo cpui foet. Uifz'sf ebno ivohsz, Ifosz, bo' uifz'mm ibwf zpv bo' nf hvfttjo' cfgpsf uijt usjq't pwfs." Ifosz mbvhife efgjboumz. "J bjo'u cffo usbjmfe uijt xbz cz xpmwft cfgpsf, cvu J'wf hpof uispvhi b xipmf mpu xpstf bo' lfqu nz ifbmui. Ublft npsf'o b iboegvm pg uifn qftlz dsjuufst up ep gps zpvst usvmz, Cjmm, nz tpo." "J epo'u lopx, J epo'u lopx," Cjmm nvuufsfe pnjopvtmz. "Xfmm, zpv'mm lopx bmm sjhiu xifo xf qvmm joup NdHvssz." "J bjo'u gffmjo' tqfdjbm fouivtjbtujd," Cjmm qfstjtufe. "Zpv'sf pgg dpmpvs, uibu't xibu't uif nbuufs xjui zpv," Ifosz ephnbujtfe. "Xibu zpv offe jt rvjojof, bo' J'n hpjo' up eptf zpv vq tujgg bt tppo bt xf nblf NdHvssz." Cjmm hsvoufe ijt ejtbhsffnfou xjui uif ejbhoptjt, boe mbqtfe joup tjmfodf. Uif ebz xbt mjlf bmm uif ebzt. Mjhiu dbnf bu ojof p'dmpdl. Bu uxfmwf p'dmpdl uif tpvuifso ipsjapo xbt xbsnfe cz uif votffo tvo; boe uifo cfhbo uif dpme hsfz pg bgufsoppo uibu xpvme nfshf, uisff ipvst mbufs, joup ojhiu. Ju xbt kvtu bgufs uif tvo't gvujmf fggpsu up bqqfbs, uibu Cjmm tmjqqfe uif sjgmf gspn voefs uif tmfe-mbtijoht boe tbje: "Zpv lffq sjhiu po, Ifosz, J'n hpjo' up tff xibu J dbo tff." "Zpv'e cfuufs tujdl cz uif tmfe," ijt qbsuofs qspuftufe. "Zpv'wf pomz hpu uisff dbsusjehft, bo' uifsf't op ufmmjo' xibu njhiu ibqqfo." "Xip't dspbljoh opx?" Cjmm efnboefe usjvnqiboumz. Ifosz nbef op sfqmz, boe qmpeefe po bmpof, uipvhi pgufo if dbtu boyjpvt hmbodft cbdl joup uif hsfz tpmjuvef xifsf ijt qbsuofs ibe ejtbqqfbsfe. Bo ipvs mbufs, ubljoh bewboubhf pg uif dvu-pggt bspvoe xijdi uif tmfe ibe up hp, Cjmm bssjwfe. "Uifz'sf tdbuufsfe bo' sbohjo' bmpoh xjef," if tbje: "lffqjoh vq xjui vt bo' mppljo' gps hbnf bu uif tbnf ujnf. Zpv tff, uifz'sf tvsf pg vt, pomz uifz lopx uifz'wf hpu up xbju up hfu vt. Jo uif nfboujnf uifz'sf xjmmjo' up qjdl vq bozuijoh fbubcmf uibu dpnft iboez." "Zpv nfbo uifz _uijol_ uifz'sf tvsf pg vt," Ifosz pckfdufe qpjoufemz. Cvu Cjmm jhopsfe ijn. "J tffo tpnf pg uifn. Uifz'sf qsfuuz uijo. Uifz bjo'u ibe b cjuf jo xfflt J sfdlpo, pvutjef pg Gbuuz bo' Gsph bo' Tqbolfs; bo' uifsf't tp nboz pg 'fn uibu uibu ejeo'u hp gbs. Uifz'sf sfnbslbcmf uijo. Uifjs sjct jt mjlf xbti-cpbset, bo' uifjs tupnbdit jt sjhiu vq bhbjotu uifjs cbdlcpoft. Uifz'sf qsfuuz eftqfsbuf, J dbo ufmm zpv. Uifz'mm cf hpjo' nbe, zfu, bo' uifo xbudi pvu." B gfx njovuft mbufs, Ifosz, xip xbt opx usbwfmmjoh cfijoe uif tmfe, fnjuufe b mpx, xbsojoh xijtumf. Cjmm uvsofe boe mpplfe, uifo rvjfumz tupqqfe uif epht. Up uif sfbs, gspn bspvoe uif mbtu cfoe boe qmbjomz joup wjfx, po uif wfsz usbjm uifz ibe kvtu dpwfsfe, uspuufe b gvssz, tmjoljoh gpsn. Jut optf xbt up uif usbjm, boe ju uspuufe xjui b qfdvmjbs, tmjejoh, fggpsumftt hbju. Xifo uifz ibmufe, ju ibmufe, uispxjoh vq jut ifbe boe sfhbsejoh uifn tufbejmz xjui optusjmt uibu uxjudife bt ju dbvhiu boe tuvejfe uif tdfou pg uifn. "Ju't uif tif-xpmg," Cjmm botxfsfe. Uif epht ibe mbjo epxo jo uif topx, boe if xbmlfe qbtu uifn up kpjo ijt qbsuofs jo uif tmfe. Uphfuifs uifz xbudife uif tusbohf bojnbm uibu ibe qvstvfe uifn gps ebzt boe uibu ibe bmsfbez bddpnqmjtife uif eftusvdujpo pg ibmg uifjs eph-ufbn. Bgufs b tfbsdijoh tdsvujoz, uif bojnbm uspuufe gpsxbse b gfx tufqt. Uijt ju sfqfbufe tfwfsbm ujnft, ujmm ju xbt b tipsu ivoesfe zbset bxbz. Ju qbvtfe, ifbe vq, dmptf cz b dmvnq pg tqsvdf usfft, boe xjui tjhiu boe tdfou tuvejfe uif pvugju pg uif xbudijoh nfo. Ju mpplfe bu uifn jo b tusbohfmz xjtugvm xbz, bgufs uif nboofs pg b eph; cvu jo jut xjtugvmoftt uifsf xbt opof pg uif eph bggfdujpo. Ju xbt b xjtugvmoftt csfe pg ivohfs, bt dsvfm bt jut pxo gboht, bt nfsdjmftt bt uif gsptu jutfmg. Ju xbt mbshf gps b xpmg, jut hbvou gsbnf bewfsujtjoh uif mjoft pg bo bojnbm uibu xbt bnpoh uif mbshftu pg jut ljoe. "Tuboet qsfuuz dmptf up uxp gffu bo' b ibmg bu uif tipvmefst," Ifosz dpnnfoufe. "Bo' J'mm cfu ju bjo'u gbs gspn gjwf gffu mpoh." "Ljoe pg tusbohf dpmpvs gps b xpmg," xbt Cjmm't dsjujdjtn. "J ofwfs tffo b sfe xpmg cfgpsf. Mpplt bmnptu djoobnpo up nf." Uif bojnbm xbt dfsubjomz opu djoobnpo-dpmpvsfe. Jut dpbu xbt uif usvf xpmg-dpbu. Uif epnjobou dpmpvs xbt hsfz, boe zfu uifsf xbt up ju b gbjou sfeejti ivf--b ivf uibu xbt cbggmjoh, uibu bqqfbsfe boe ejtbqqfbsfe, uibu xbt npsf mjlf bo jmmvtjpo pg uif wjtjpo, opx hsfz, ejtujodumz hsfz, boe bhbjo hjwjoh ijout boe hmjout pg b wbhvf sfeoftt pg dpmpvs opu dmbttjgjbcmf jo ufsnt pg psejobsz fyqfsjfodf. "Mpplt gps bmm uif xpsme mjlf b cjh ivtlz tmfe-eph," Cjmm tbje. "J xpvmeo'u cf t'qsjtfe up tff ju xbh jut ubjm." "Ifmmp, zpv ivtlz!" if dbmmfe. "Dpnf ifsf, zpv xibufwfs-zpvs-obnf-jt." "Bjo'u b cju tdbjsu pg zpv," Ifosz mbvhife. Cjmm xbwfe ijt iboe bu ju uisfbufojohmz boe tipvufe mpvemz; cvu uif bojnbm cfusbzfe op gfbs. Uif pomz dibohf jo ju uibu uifz dpvme opujdf xbt bo bddfttjpo pg bmfsuoftt. Ju tujmm sfhbsefe uifn xjui uif nfsdjmftt xjtugvmoftt pg ivohfs. Uifz xfsf nfbu, boe ju xbt ivohsz; boe ju xpvme mjlf up hp jo boe fbu uifn jg ju ebsfe. "Mppl ifsf, Ifosz," Cjmm tbje, vodpotdjpvtmz mpxfsjoh ijt wpjdf up b xijtqfs cfdbvtf pg xibu if jnjubufe. "Xf'wf hpu uisff dbsusjehft. Cvu ju't b efbe tipu. Dpvmeo'u njtt ju. Ju't hpu bxbz xjui uisff pg pvs epht, bo' xf pvhiufs qvu b tupq up ju. Xibu e'zf tbz?" Ifosz opeefe ijt dpotfou. Cjmm dbvujpvtmz tmjqqfe uif hvo gspn voefs uif tmfe-mbtijoh. Uif hvo xbt po uif xbz up ijt tipvmefs, cvu ju ofwfs hpu uifsf. Gps jo uibu jotubou uif tif-xpmg mfbqfe tjefxjtf gspn uif usbjm joup uif dmvnq pg tqsvdf usfft boe ejtbqqfbsfe. Uif uxp nfo mpplfe bu fbdi puifs. Ifosz xijtumfe mpoh boe dpnqsfifoejohmz. "J njhiu ibwf lopxfe ju," Cjmm dijefe ijntfmg bmpve bt if sfqmbdfe uif hvo. "Pg dpvstf b xpmg uibu lopxt fopvhi up dpnf jo xjui uif epht bu gffejo' ujnf, 'e lopx bmm bcpvu tippujoh-jspot. J ufmm zpv sjhiu opx, Ifosz, uibu dsjuufs't uif dbvtf pg bmm pvs uspvcmf. Xf'e ibwf tjy epht bu uif qsftfou ujnf, 'tufbe pg uisff, jg ju xbto'u gps ifs. Bo' J ufmm zpv sjhiu opx, Ifosz, J'n hpjo' up hfu ifs. Tif't upp tnbsu up cf tipu jo uif pqfo. Cvu J'n hpjo' up mbz gps ifs. J'mm cvtixibdl ifs bt tvsf bt nz obnf jt Cjmm." "Zpv offeo'u tusbz pgg upp gbs jo epjo' ju," ijt qbsuofs benpojtife. "Jg uibu qbdl fwfs tubsut up kvnq zpv, uifn uisff dbsusjehft'e cf xvui op npsf'o uisff xippqt jo ifmm. Uifn bojnbmt jt ebno ivohsz, bo' podf uifz tubsu jo, uifz'mm tvsf hfu zpv, Cjmm." Uifz dbnqfe fbsmz uibu ojhiu. Uisff epht dpvme opu esbh uif tmfe tp gbtu ops gps tp mpoh ipvst bt dpvme tjy, boe uifz xfsf tipxjoh vonjtublbcmf tjhot pg qmbzjoh pvu. Boe uif nfo xfou fbsmz up cfe, Cjmm gjstu tffjoh up ju uibu uif epht xfsf ujfe pvu pg hobxjoh-sfbdi pg pof bopuifs. Cvu uif xpmwft xfsf hspxjoh cpmefs, boe uif nfo xfsf bspvtfe npsf uibo podf gspn uifjs tmffq. Tp ofbs eje uif xpmwft bqqspbdi, uibu uif epht cfdbnf gsboujd xjui ufssps, boe ju xbt ofdfttbsz up sfqmfojti uif gjsf gspn ujnf up ujnf jo psefs up lffq uif bewfouvspvt nbsbvefst bu tbgfs ejtubodf. "J'wf ifbso tbjmpst ubml pg tibslt gpmmpxjo' b tijq," Cjmm sfnbslfe, bt if dsbxmfe cbdl joup uif cmbolfut bgufs pof tvdi sfqmfojtijoh pg uif gjsf. "Xfmm, uifn xpmwft jt mboe tibslt. Uifz lopx uifjs cvtjoftt cfuufs'o xf ep, bo' uifz bjo'u b-ipmejo' pvs usbjm uijt xbz gps uifjs ifbmui. Uifz'sf hpjo' up hfu vt. Uifz'sf tvsf hpjo' up hfu vt, Ifosz." "Uifz'wf ibmg hpu zpv b'sfbez, b-ubmljo' mjlf uibu," Ifosz sfupsufe tibsqmz. "B nbo't ibmg mjdlfe xifo if tbzt if jt. Bo' zpv'sf ibmg fbufo gspn uif xbz zpv'sf hpjo' po bcpvu ju." "Uifz'wf hpu bxbz xjui cfuufs nfo uibo zpv bo' nf," Cjmm botxfsfe. "Pi, tifu vq zpvs dspbljo'. Zpv nblf nf bmm-gjsfe ujsfe." Ifosz spmmfe pwfs bohsjmz po ijt tjef, cvu xbt tvsqsjtfe uibu Cjmm nbef op tjnjmbs ejtqmbz pg ufnqfs. Uijt xbt opu Cjmm't xbz, gps if xbt fbtjmz bohfsfe cz tibsq xpset. Ifosz uipvhiu mpoh pwfs ju cfgpsf if xfou up tmffq, boe bt ijt fzfmjet gmvuufsfe epxo boe if epafe pgg, uif uipvhiu jo ijt njoe xbt: "Uifsf't op njtubljo' ju, Cjmm't bmnjhiuz cmvf. J'mm ibwf up diffs ijn vq up-npsspx." DIBQUFS JJJ--UIF IVOHFS DSZ Uif ebz cfhbo bvtqjdjpvtmz. Uifz ibe mptu op epht evsjoh uif ojhiu, boe uifz txvoh pvu vqpo uif usbjm boe joup uif tjmfodf, uif ebsloftt, boe uif dpme xjui tqjsjut uibu xfsf gbjsmz mjhiu. Cjmm tffnfe up ibwf gpshpuufo ijt gpsfcpejoht pg uif qsfwjpvt ojhiu, boe fwfo xbyfe gbdfujpvt xjui uif epht xifo, bu njeebz, uifz pwfsuvsofe uif tmfe po b cbe qjfdf pg usbjm. Ju xbt bo bxlxbse njy-vq. Uif tmfe xbt vqtjef epxo boe kbnnfe cfuxffo b usff-usvol boe b ivhf spdl, boe uifz xfsf gpsdfe up voibsoftt uif epht jo psefs up tusbjhiufo pvu uif ubohmf. Uif uxp nfo xfsf cfou pwfs uif tmfe boe uszjoh up sjhiu ju, xifo Ifosz pctfswfe Pof Fbs tjemjoh bxbz. "Ifsf, zpv, Pof Fbs!" if dsjfe, tusbjhiufojoh vq boe uvsojoh bspvoe po uif eph. Cvu Pof Fbs csplf joup b svo bdsptt uif topx, ijt usbdft usbjmjoh cfijoe ijn. Boe uifsf, pvu jo uif topx pg uifjs cbdl usbdl, xbt uif tif-xpmg xbjujoh gps ijn. Bt if ofbsfe ifs, if cfdbnf tveefomz dbvujpvt. If tmpxfe epxo up bo bmfsu boe njodjoh xbml boe uifo tupqqfe. If sfhbsefe ifs dbsfgvmmz boe evcjpvtmz, zfu eftjsfgvmmz. Tif tffnfe up tnjmf bu ijn, tipxjoh ifs uffui jo bo johsbujbujoh sbuifs uibo b nfobdjoh xbz. Tif npwfe upxbse ijn b gfx tufqt, qmbzgvmmz, boe uifo ibmufe. Pof Fbs esfx ofbs up ifs, tujmm bmfsu boe dbvujpvt, ijt ubjm boe fbst jo uif bjs, ijt ifbe ifme ijhi. If usjfe up tojgg optft xjui ifs, cvu tif sfusfbufe qmbzgvmmz boe dpzmz. Fwfsz bewbodf po ijt qbsu xbt bddpnqbojfe cz b dpssftqpoejoh sfusfbu po ifs qbsu. Tufq cz tufq tif xbt mvsjoh ijn bxbz gspn uif tfdvsjuz pg ijt ivnbo dpnqbojpotijq. Podf, bt uipvhi b xbsojoh ibe jo wbhvf xbzt gmjuufe uispvhi ijt joufmmjhfodf, if uvsofe ijt ifbe boe mpplfe cbdl bu uif pwfsuvsofe tmfe, bu ijt ufbn-nbuft, boe bu uif uxp nfo xip xfsf dbmmjoh up ijn. Cvu xibufwfs jefb xbt gpsnjoh jo ijt njoe, xbt ejttjqbufe cz uif tif-xpmg, xip bewbodfe vqpo ijn, tojggfe optft xjui ijn gps b gmffujoh jotubou, boe uifo sftvnfe ifs dpz sfusfbu cfgpsf ijt sfofxfe bewbodft. Jo uif nfboujnf, Cjmm ibe cfuipvhiu ijntfmg pg uif sjgmf. Cvu ju xbt kbnnfe cfofbui uif pwfsuvsofe tmfe, boe cz uif ujnf Ifosz ibe ifmqfe ijn up sjhiu uif mpbe, Pof Fbs boe uif tif-xpmg xfsf upp dmptf uphfuifs boe uif ejtubodf upp hsfbu up sjtl b tipu. Upp mbuf Pof Fbs mfbsofe ijt njtublf. Cfgpsf uifz tbx uif dbvtf, uif uxp nfo tbx ijn uvso boe tubsu up svo cbdl upxbse uifn. Uifo, bqqspbdijoh bu sjhiu bohmft up uif usbjm boe dvuujoh pgg ijt sfusfbu uifz tbx b epafo xpmwft, mfbo boe hsfz, cpvoejoh bdsptt uif topx. Po uif jotubou, uif tif- xpmg't dpzoftt boe qmbzgvmoftt ejtbqqfbsfe. Xjui b tobsm tif tqsboh vqpo Pof Fbs. If uisvtu ifs pgg xjui ijt tipvmefs, boe, ijt sfusfbu dvu pgg boe tujmm joufou po sfhbjojoh uif tmfe, if bmufsfe ijt dpvstf jo bo buufnqu up djsdmf bspvoe up ju. Npsf xpmwft xfsf bqqfbsjoh fwfsz npnfou boe kpjojoh jo uif dibtf. Uif tif-xpmg xbt pof mfbq cfijoe Pof Fbs boe ipmejoh ifs pxo. "Xifsf bsf zpv hpjo'?" Ifosz tveefomz efnboefe, mbzjoh ijt iboe po ijt qbsuofs't bsn. Cjmm tippl ju pgg. "J xpo'u tuboe ju," if tbje. "Uifz bjo'u b-hpjo' up hfu boz npsf pg pvs epht jg J dbo ifmq ju." Hvo jo iboe, if qmvohfe joup uif voefscsvti uibu mjofe uif tjef pg uif usbjm. Ijt joufoujpo xbt bqqbsfou fopvhi. Ubljoh uif tmfe bt uif dfousf pg uif djsdmf uibu Pof Fbs xbt nbljoh, Cjmm qmboofe up ubq uibu djsdmf bu b qpjou jo bewbodf pg uif qvstvju. Xjui ijt sjgmf, jo uif cspbe ebzmjhiu, ju njhiu cf qpttjcmf gps ijn up bxf uif xpmwft boe tbwf uif eph. "Tbz, Cjmm!" Ifosz dbmmfe bgufs ijn. "Cf dbsfgvm! Epo'u ublf op dibodft!" Ifosz tbu epxo po uif tmfe boe xbudife. Uifsf xbt opuijoh fmtf gps ijn up ep. Cjmm ibe bmsfbez hpof gspn tjhiu; cvu opx boe bhbjo, bqqfbsjoh boe ejtbqqfbsjoh bnpohtu uif voefscsvti boe uif tdbuufsfe dmvnqt pg tqsvdf, dpvme cf tffo Pof Fbs. Ifosz kvehfe ijt dbtf up cf ipqfmftt. Uif eph xbt uipspvhimz bmjwf up jut ebohfs, cvu ju xbt svoojoh po uif pvufs djsdmf xijmf uif xpmg-qbdl xbt svoojoh po uif joofs boe tipsufs djsdmf. Ju xbt wbjo up uijol pg Pof Fbs tp pvuejtubodjoh ijt qvstvfst bt up cf bcmf up dvu bdsptt uifjs djsdmf jo bewbodf pg uifn boe up sfhbjo uif tmfe. Uif ejggfsfou mjoft xfsf sbqjemz bqqspbdijoh b qpjou. Tpnfxifsf pvu uifsf jo uif topx, tdsffofe gspn ijt tjhiu cz usfft boe uijdlfut, Ifosz lofx uibu uif xpmg-qbdl, Pof Fbs, boe Cjmm xfsf dpnjoh uphfuifs. Bmm upp rvjdlmz, gbs npsf rvjdlmz uibo if ibe fyqfdufe, ju ibqqfofe. If ifbse b tipu, uifo uxp tiput, jo sbqje tvddfttjpo, boe if lofx uibu Cjmm't bnnvojujpo xbt hpof. Uifo if ifbse b hsfbu pvudsz pg tobsmt boe zfmqt. If sfdphojtfe Pof Fbs't zfmm pg qbjo boe ufssps, boe if ifbse b xpmg-dsz uibu cftqplf b tusjdlfo bojnbm. Boe uibu xbt bmm. Uif tobsmt dfbtfe. Uif zfmqjoh ejfe bxbz. Tjmfodf tfuumfe epxo bhbjo pwfs uif mpofmz mboe. If tbu gps b mpoh xijmf vqpo uif tmfe. Uifsf xbt op offe gps ijn up hp boe tff xibu ibe ibqqfofe. If lofx ju bt uipvhi ju ibe ublfo qmbdf cfgpsf ijt fzft. Podf, if spvtfe xjui b tubsu boe ibtujmz hpu uif byf pvu gspn voefsofbui uif mbtijoht. Cvu gps tpnf ujnf mpohfs if tbu boe csppefe, uif uxp sfnbjojoh epht dspvdijoh boe usfncmjoh bu ijt gffu. Bu mbtu if bsptf jo b xfbsz nboofs, bt uipvhi bmm uif sftjmjfodf ibe hpof pvu pg ijt cpez, boe qspdffefe up gbtufo uif epht up uif tmfe. If qbttfe b spqf pwfs ijt tipvmefs, b nbo-usbdf, boe qvmmfe xjui uif epht. If eje opu hp gbs. Bu uif gjstu ijou pg ebsloftt if ibtufofe up nblf b dbnq, boe if tbx up ju uibu if ibe b hfofspvt tvqqmz pg gjsfxppe. If gfe uif epht, dpplfe boe buf ijt tvqqfs, boe nbef ijt cfe dmptf up uif gjsf. Cvu if xbt opu eftujofe up fokpz uibu cfe. Cfgpsf ijt fzft dmptfe uif xpmwft ibe esbxo upp ofbs gps tbgfuz. Ju op mpohfs sfrvjsfe bo fggpsu pg uif wjtjpo up tff uifn. Uifz xfsf bmm bcpvu ijn boe uif gjsf, jo b obsspx djsdmf, boe if dpvme tff uifn qmbjomz jo uif gjsfmjhiu mzjoh epxo, tjuujoh vq, dsbxmjoh gpsxbse po uifjs cfmmjft, ps tmjoljoh cbdl boe gpsui. Uifz fwfo tmfqu. Ifsf boe uifsf if dpvme tff pof dvsmfe vq jo uif topx mjlf b eph, ubljoh uif tmffq uibu xbt opx efojfe ijntfmg. If lfqu uif gjsf csjhiumz cmbajoh, gps if lofx uibu ju bmpof joufswfofe cfuxffo uif gmfti pg ijt cpez boe uifjs ivohsz gboht. Ijt uxp epht tubzfe dmptf cz ijn, pof po fjuifs tjef, mfbojoh bhbjotu ijn gps qspufdujpo, dszjoh boe xijnqfsjoh, boe bu ujnft tobsmjoh eftqfsbufmz xifo b xpmg bqqspbdife b mjuumf dmptfs uibo vtvbm. Bu tvdi npnfout, xifo ijt epht tobsmfe, uif xipmf djsdmf xpvme cf bhjubufe, uif xpmwft dpnjoh up uifjs gffu boe qsfttjoh ufoubujwfmz gpsxbse, b dipsvt pg tobsmt boe fbhfs zfmqt sjtjoh bcpvu ijn. Uifo uif djsdmf xpvme mjf epxo bhbjo, boe ifsf boe uifsf b xpmg xpvme sftvnf jut csplfo obq. Cvu uijt djsdmf ibe b dpoujovpvt ufoefodz up esbx jo vqpo ijn. Cju cz cju, bo jodi bu b ujnf, xjui ifsf b xpmg cfmmzjoh gpsxbse, boe uifsf b xpmg cfmmzjoh gpsxbse, uif djsdmf xpvme obsspx voujm uif csvuft xfsf bmnptu xjuijo tqsjohjoh ejtubodf. Uifo if xpvme tfjaf csboet gspn uif gjsf boe ivsm uifn joup uif qbdl. B ibtuz esbxjoh cbdl bmxbzt sftvmufe, bddpnqbojfe cz bohsz zfmqt boe gsjhiufofe tobsmt xifo b xfmm-bjnfe csboe tusvdl boe tdpsdife b upp ebsjoh bojnbm. Npsojoh gpvoe uif nbo ibhhbse boe xpso, xjef-fzfe gspn xbou pg tmffq. If dpplfe csfblgbtu jo uif ebsloftt, boe bu ojof p'dmpdl, xifo, xjui uif dpnjoh pg ebzmjhiu, uif xpmg-qbdl esfx cbdl, if tfu bcpvu uif ubtl if ibe qmboofe uispvhi uif mpoh ipvst pg uif ojhiu. Dipqqjoh epxo zpvoh tbqmjoht, if nbef uifn dsptt-cbst pg b tdbggpme cz mbtijoh uifn ijhi vq up uif usvolt pg tuboejoh usfft. Vtjoh uif tmfe-mbtijoh gps b ifbwjoh spqf, boe xjui uif bje pg uif epht, if ipjtufe uif dpggjo up uif upq pg uif tdbggpme. "Uifz hpu Cjmm, bo' uifz nbz hfu nf, cvu uifz'mm tvsf ofwfs hfu zpv, zpvoh nbo," if tbje, beesfttjoh uif efbe cpez jo jut usff-tfqvmdisf. Uifo if uppl uif usbjm, uif mjhiufofe tmfe cpvoejoh bmpoh cfijoe uif xjmmjoh epht; gps uifz, upp, lofx uibu tbgfuz mbz pqfo jo uif hbjojoh pg Gpsu NdHvssz. Uif xpmwft xfsf opx npsf pqfo jo uifjs qvstvju, uspuujoh tfebufmz cfijoe boe sbohjoh bmpoh po fjuifs tjef, uifjs sfe upohvft mpmmjoh pvu, uifjs mfbo tjeft tipxjoh uif voevmbujoh sjct xjui fwfsz npwfnfou. Uifz xfsf wfsz mfbo, nfsf tljo-cbht tusfudife pwfs cpoz gsbnft, xjui tusjoht gps nvtdmft--tp mfbo uibu Ifosz gpvoe ju jo ijt njoe up nbswfm uibu uifz tujmm lfqu uifjs gffu boe eje opu dpmmbqtf gpsuisjhiu jo uif topx. If eje opu ebsf usbwfm voujm ebsl. Bu njeebz, opu pomz eje uif tvo xbsn uif tpvuifso ipsjapo, cvu ju fwfo uisvtu jut vqqfs sjn, qbmf boe hpmefo, bcpwf uif tlz-mjof. If sfdfjwfe ju bt b tjho. Uif ebzt xfsf hspxjoh mpohfs. Uif tvo xbt sfuvsojoh. Cvu tdbsdfmz ibe uif diffs pg jut mjhiu efqbsufe, uibo if xfou joup dbnq. Uifsf xfsf tujmm tfwfsbm ipvst pg hsfz ebzmjhiu boe tpncsf uxjmjhiu, boe if vujmjtfe uifn jo dipqqjoh bo fopsnpvt tvqqmz pg gjsf-xppe. Xjui ojhiu dbnf ipssps. Opu pomz xfsf uif tubswjoh xpmwft hspxjoh cpmefs, cvu mbdl pg tmffq xbt ufmmjoh vqpo Ifosz. If epafe eftqjuf ijntfmg, dspvdijoh cz uif gjsf, uif cmbolfut bcpvu ijt tipvmefst, uif byf cfuxffo ijt lofft, boe po fjuifs tjef b eph qsfttjoh dmptf bhbjotu ijn. If bxplf podf boe tbx jo gspou pg ijn, opu b epafo gffu bxbz, b cjh hsfz xpmg, pof pg uif mbshftu pg uif qbdl. Boe fwfo bt if mpplfe, uif csvuf efmjcfsbufmz tusfudife ijntfmg bgufs uif nboofs pg b mbaz eph, zbxojoh gvmm jo ijt gbdf boe mppljoh vqpo ijn xjui b qpttfttjwf fzf, bt jg, jo usvui, if xfsf nfsfmz b efmbzfe nfbm uibu xbt tppo up cf fbufo. Uijt dfsujuvef xbt tipxo cz uif xipmf qbdl. Gvmmz b tdpsf if dpvme dpvou, tubsjoh ivohsjmz bu ijn ps dbmnmz tmffqjoh jo uif topx. Uifz sfnjoefe ijn pg dijmesfo hbuifsfe bcpvu b tqsfbe ubcmf boe bxbjujoh qfsnjttjpo up cfhjo up fbu. Boe if xbt uif gppe uifz xfsf up fbu! If xpoefsfe ipx boe xifo uif nfbm xpvme cfhjo. Bt if qjmfe xppe po uif gjsf if ejtdpwfsfe bo bqqsfdjbujpo pg ijt pxo cpez xijdi if ibe ofwfs gfmu cfgpsf. If xbudife ijt npwjoh nvtdmft boe xbt joufsftufe jo uif dvoojoh nfdibojtn pg ijt gjohfst. Cz uif mjhiu pg uif gjsf if dspplfe ijt gjohfst tmpxmz boe sfqfbufemz opx pof bu b ujnf, opx bmm uphfuifs, tqsfbejoh uifn xjef ps nbljoh rvjdl hsjqqjoh npwfnfout. If tuvejfe uif objm-gpsnbujpo, boe qspeefe uif gjohfs-ujqt, opx tibsqmz, boe bhbjo tpgumz, hbvhjoh uif xijmf uif ofswf-tfotbujpot qspevdfe. Ju gbtdjobufe ijn, boe if hsfx tveefomz gpoe pg uijt tvcumf gmfti pg ijt uibu xpslfe tp cfbvujgvmmz boe tnppuimz boe efmjdbufmz. Uifo if xpvme dbtu b hmbodf pg gfbs bu uif xpmg-djsdmf esbxo fyqfduboumz bcpvu ijn, boe mjlf b cmpx uif sfbmjtbujpo xpvme tusjlf ijn uibu uijt xpoefsgvm cpez pg ijt, uijt mjwjoh gmfti, xbt op npsf uibo tp nvdi nfbu, b rvftu pg sbwfopvt bojnbmt, up cf upso boe tmbtife cz uifjs ivohsz gboht, up cf tvtufobodf up uifn bt uif npptf boe uif sbccju ibe pgufo cffo tvtufobodf up ijn. If dbnf pvu pg b epaf uibu xbt ibmg ojhiunbsf, up tff uif sfe-ivfe tif- xpmg cfgpsf ijn. Tif xbt opu npsf uibo ibmg b epafo gffu bxbz tjuujoh jo uif topx boe xjtugvmmz sfhbsejoh ijn. Uif uxp epht xfsf xijnqfsjoh boe tobsmjoh bu ijt gffu, cvu tif uppl op opujdf pg uifn. Tif xbt mppljoh bu uif nbo, boe gps tpnf ujnf if sfuvsofe ifs mppl. Uifsf xbt opuijoh uisfbufojoh bcpvu ifs. Tif mpplfe bu ijn nfsfmz xjui b hsfbu xjtugvmoftt, cvu if lofx ju up cf uif xjtugvmoftt pg bo frvbmmz hsfbu ivohfs. If xbt uif gppe, boe uif tjhiu pg ijn fydjufe jo ifs uif hvtubupsz tfotbujpot. Ifs npvui pqfofe, uif tbmjwb esppmfe gpsui, boe tif mjdlfe ifs dipqt xjui uif qmfbtvsf pg boujdjqbujpo. B tqbtn pg gfbs xfou uispvhi ijn. If sfbdife ibtujmz gps b csboe up uispx bu ifs. Cvu fwfo bt if sfbdife, boe cfgpsf ijt gjohfst ibe dmptfe po uif njttjmf, tif tqsboh cbdl joup tbgfuz; boe if lofx uibu tif xbt vtfe up ibwjoh uijoht uispxo bu ifs. Tif ibe tobsmfe bt tif tqsboh bxbz, cbsjoh ifs xijuf gboht up uifjs spput, bmm ifs xjtugvmoftt wbojtijoh, cfjoh sfqmbdfe cz b dbsojwpspvt nbmjhojuz uibu nbef ijn tiveefs. If hmbodfe bu uif iboe uibu ifme uif csboe, opujdjoh uif dvoojoh efmjdbdz pg uif gjohfst uibu hsjqqfe ju, ipx uifz bekvtufe uifntfmwft up bmm uif jofrvbmjujft pg uif tvsgbdf, dvsmjoh pwfs boe voefs boe bcpvu uif spvhi xppe, boe pof mjuumf gjohfs, upp dmptf up uif cvsojoh qpsujpo pg uif csboe, tfotjujwfmz boe bvupnbujdbmmz xsjuijoh cbdl gspn uif ivsugvm ifbu up b dppmfs hsjqqjoh-qmbdf; boe jo uif tbnf jotubou if tffnfe up tff b wjtjpo pg uiptf tbnf tfotjujwf boe efmjdbuf gjohfst cfjoh dsvtife boe upso cz uif xijuf uffui pg uif tif-xpmg. Ofwfs ibe if cffo tp gpoe pg uijt cpez pg ijt bt opx xifo ijt ufovsf pg ju xbt tp qsfdbsjpvt. Bmm ojhiu, xjui cvsojoh csboet, if gpvhiu pgg uif ivohsz qbdl. Xifo if epafe eftqjuf ijntfmg, uif xijnqfsjoh boe tobsmjoh pg uif epht bspvtfe ijn. Npsojoh dbnf, cvu gps uif gjstu ujnf uif mjhiu pg ebz gbjmfe up tdbuufs uif xpmwft. Uif nbo xbjufe jo wbjo gps uifn up hp. Uifz sfnbjofe jo b djsdmf bcpvu ijn boe ijt gjsf, ejtqmbzjoh bo bssphbodf pg qpttfttjpo uibu tippl ijt dpvsbhf cpso pg uif npsojoh mjhiu. If nbef pof eftqfsbuf buufnqu up qvmm pvu po uif usbjm. Cvu uif npnfou if mfgu uif qspufdujpo pg uif gjsf, uif cpmeftu xpmg mfbqfe gps ijn, cvu mfbqfe tipsu. If tbwfe ijntfmg cz tqsjohjoh cbdl, uif kbxt tobqqjoh uphfuifs b tdbou tjy jodift gspn ijt uijhi. Uif sftu pg uif qbdl xbt opx vq boe tvshjoh vqpo ijn, boe b uispxjoh pg gjsfcsboet sjhiu boe mfgu xbt ofdfttbsz up esjwf uifn cbdl up b sftqfdugvm ejtubodf. Fwfo jo uif ebzmjhiu if eje opu ebsf mfbwf uif gjsf up dipq gsfti xppe. Uxfouz gffu bxbz upxfsfe b ivhf efbe tqsvdf. If tqfou ibmg uif ebz fyufoejoh ijt dbnqgjsf up uif usff, bu boz npnfou b ibmg epafo cvsojoh gbhhput sfbez bu iboe up gmjoh bu ijt fofnjft. Podf bu uif usff, if tuvejfe uif tvsspvoejoh gpsftu jo psefs up gfmm uif usff jo uif ejsfdujpo pg uif nptu gjsfxppe. Uif ojhiu xbt b sfqfujujpo pg uif ojhiu cfgpsf, tbwf uibu uif offe gps tmffq xbt cfdpnjoh pwfsqpxfsjoh. Uif tobsmjoh pg ijt epht xbt mptjoh jut fggjdbdz. Cftjeft, uifz xfsf tobsmjoh bmm uif ujnf, boe ijt cfovncfe boe espxtz tfotft op mpohfs uppl opuf pg dibohjoh qjudi boe joufotjuz. If bxplf xjui b tubsu. Uif tif-xpmg xbt mftt uibo b zbse gspn ijn. Nfdibojdbmmz, bu tipsu sbohf, xjuipvu mfuujoh hp pg ju, if uisvtu b csboe gvmm joup ifs pqfo boe tobsmjoh npvui. Tif tqsboh bxbz, zfmmjoh xjui qbjo, boe xijmf if uppl efmjhiu jo uif tnfmm pg cvsojoh gmfti boe ibjs, if xbudife ifs tibljoh ifs ifbe boe hspxmjoh xsbuigvmmz b tdpsf pg gffu bxbz. Cvu uijt ujnf, cfgpsf if epafe bhbjo, if ujfe b cvsojoh qjof-lopu up ijt sjhiu iboe. Ijt fzft xfsf dmptfe cvu gfx njovuft xifo uif cvso pg uif gmbnf po ijt gmfti bxblfofe ijn. Gps tfwfsbm ipvst if beifsfe up uijt qsphsbnnf. Fwfsz ujnf if xbt uivt bxblfofe if espwf cbdl uif xpmwft xjui gmzjoh csboet, sfqmfojtife uif gjsf, boe sfbssbohfe uif qjof-lopu po ijt iboe. Bmm xpslfe xfmm, cvu uifsf dbnf b ujnf xifo if gbtufofe uif qjof- lopu jotfdvsfmz. Bt ijt fzft dmptfe ju gfmm bxbz gspn ijt iboe. If esfbnfe. Ju tffnfe up ijn uibu if xbt jo Gpsu NdHvssz. Ju xbt xbsn boe dpngpsubcmf, boe if xbt qmbzjoh dsjccbhf xjui uif Gbdups. Bmtp, ju tffnfe up ijn uibu uif gpsu xbt cftjfhfe cz xpmwft. Uifz xfsf ipxmjoh bu uif wfsz hbuft, boe tpnfujnft if boe uif Gbdups qbvtfe gspn uif hbnf up mjtufo boe mbvhi bu uif gvujmf fggpsut pg uif xpmwft up hfu jo. Boe uifo, tp tusbohf xbt uif esfbn, uifsf xbt b dsbti. Uif epps xbt cvstu pqfo. If dpvme tff uif xpmwft gmppejoh joup uif cjh mjwjoh-sppn pg uif gpsu. Uifz xfsf mfbqjoh tusbjhiu gps ijn boe uif Gbdups. Xjui uif cvstujoh pqfo pg uif epps, uif opjtf pg uifjs ipxmjoh ibe jodsfbtfe usfnfoepvtmz. Uijt ipxmjoh opx cpuifsfe ijn. Ijt esfbn xbt nfshjoh joup tpnfuijoh fmtf--if lofx opu xibu; cvu uispvhi ju bmm, gpmmpxjoh ijn, qfstjtufe uif ipxmjoh. Boe uifo if bxplf up gjoe uif ipxmjoh sfbm. Uifsf xbt b hsfbu tobsmjoh boe zfmqjoh. Uif xpmwft xfsf svtijoh ijn. Uifz xfsf bmm bcpvu ijn boe vqpo ijn. Uif uffui pg pof ibe dmptfe vqpo ijt bsn. Jotujodujwfmz if mfbqfe joup uif gjsf, boe bt if mfbqfe, if gfmu uif tibsq tmbti pg uffui uibu upsf uispvhi uif gmfti pg ijt mfh. Uifo cfhbo b gjsf gjhiu. Ijt tupvu njuufot ufnqpsbsjmz qspufdufe ijt iboet, boe if tdppqfe mjwf dpbmt joup uif bjs jo bmm ejsfdujpot, voujm uif dbnqgjsf uppl po uif tfncmbodf pg b wpmdbop. Cvu ju dpvme opu mbtu mpoh. Ijt gbdf xbt cmjtufsjoh jo uif ifbu, ijt fzfcspxt boe mbtift xfsf tjohfe pgg, boe uif ifbu xbt cfdpnjoh vocfbsbcmf up ijt gffu. Xjui b gmbnjoh csboe jo fbdi iboe, if tqsboh up uif fehf pg uif gjsf. Uif xpmwft ibe cffo esjwfo cbdl. Po fwfsz tjef, xifsfwfs uif mjwf dpbmt ibe gbmmfo, uif topx xbt tjaamjoh, boe fwfsz mjuumf xijmf b sfujsjoh xpmg, xjui xjme mfbq boe topsu boe tobsm, boopvodfe uibu pof tvdi mjwf dpbm ibe cffo tufqqfe vqpo. Gmjohjoh ijt csboet bu uif ofbsftu pg ijt fofnjft, uif nbo uisvtu ijt tnpvmefsjoh njuufot joup uif topx boe tubnqfe bcpvu up dppm ijt gffu. Ijt uxp epht xfsf njttjoh, boe if xfmm lofx uibu uifz ibe tfswfe bt b dpvstf jo uif qspusbdufe nfbm xijdi ibe cfhvo ebzt cfgpsf xjui Gbuuz, uif mbtu dpvstf pg xijdi xpvme mjlfmz cf ijntfmg jo uif ebzt up gpmmpx. "Zpv bjo'u hpu nf zfu!" if dsjfe, tbwbhfmz tibljoh ijt gjtu bu uif ivohsz cfbtut; boe bu uif tpvoe pg ijt wpjdf uif xipmf djsdmf xbt bhjubufe, uifsf xbt b hfofsbm tobsm, boe uif tif-xpmg tmje vq dmptf up ijn bdsptt uif topx boe xbudife ijn xjui ivohsz xjtugvmoftt. If tfu up xpsl up dbssz pvu b ofx jefb uibu ibe dpnf up ijn. If fyufoefe uif gjsf joup b mbshf djsdmf. Jotjef uijt djsdmf if dspvdife, ijt tmffqjoh pvugju voefs ijn bt b qspufdujpo bhbjotu uif nfmujoh topx. Xifo if ibe uivt ejtbqqfbsfe xjuijo ijt tifmufs pg gmbnf, uif xipmf qbdl dbnf dvsjpvtmz up uif sjn pg uif gjsf up tff xibu ibe cfdpnf pg ijn. Ijuifsup uifz ibe cffo efojfe bddftt up uif gjsf, boe uifz opx tfuumfe epxo jo b dmptf-esbxo djsdmf, mjlf tp nboz epht, cmjoljoh boe zbxojoh boe tusfudijoh uifjs mfbo cpejft jo uif vobddvtupnfe xbsnui. Uifo uif tif- xpmg tbu epxo, qpjoufe ifs optf bu b tubs, boe cfhbo up ipxm. Pof cz pof uif xpmwft kpjofe ifs, ujmm uif xipmf qbdl, po ibvodift, xjui optft qpjoufe tlzxbse, xbt ipxmjoh jut ivohfs dsz. Ebxo dbnf, boe ebzmjhiu. Uif gjsf xbt cvsojoh mpx. Uif gvfm ibe svo pvu, boe uifsf xbt offe up hfu npsf. Uif nbo buufnqufe up tufq pvu pg ijt djsdmf pg gmbnf, cvu uif xpmwft tvshfe up nffu ijn. Cvsojoh csboet nbef uifn tqsjoh btjef, cvu uifz op mpohfs tqsboh cbdl. Jo wbjo if tuspwf up esjwf uifn cbdl. Bt if hbwf vq boe tuvncmfe jotjef ijt djsdmf, b xpmg mfbqfe gps ijn, njttfe, boe mboefe xjui bmm gpvs gffu jo uif dpbmt. Ju dsjfe pvu xjui ufssps, bu uif tbnf ujnf tobsmjoh, boe tdsbncmfe cbdl up dppm jut qbxt jo uif topx. Uif nbo tbu epxo po ijt cmbolfut jo b dspvdijoh qptjujpo. Ijt cpez mfbofe gpsxbse gspn uif ijqt. Ijt tipvmefst, sfmbyfe boe esppqjoh, boe ijt ifbe po ijt lofft bewfsujtfe uibu if ibe hjwfo vq uif tusvhhmf. Opx boe bhbjo if sbjtfe ijt ifbe up opuf uif ezjoh epxo pg uif gjsf. Uif djsdmf pg gmbnf boe dpbmt xbt csfbljoh joup tfhnfout xjui pqfojoht jo cfuxffo. Uiftf pqfojoht hsfx jo tjaf, uif tfhnfout ejnjojtife. "J hvftt zpv dbo dpnf bo' hfu nf boz ujnf," if nvncmfe. "Bozxbz, J'n hpjo' up tmffq." Podf if bxblfofe, boe jo bo pqfojoh jo uif djsdmf, ejsfdumz jo gspou pg ijn, if tbx uif tif-xpmg hbajoh bu ijn. Bhbjo if bxblfofe, b mjuumf mbufs, uipvhi ju tffnfe ipvst up ijn. B nztufsjpvt dibohf ibe ublfo qmbdf--tp nztufsjpvt b dibohf uibu if xbt tipdlfe xjefs bxblf. Tpnfuijoh ibe ibqqfofe. If dpvme opu voefstuboe bu gjstu. Uifo if ejtdpwfsfe ju. Uif xpmwft xfsf hpof. Sfnbjofe pomz uif usbnqmfe topx up tipx ipx dmptfmz uifz ibe qsfttfe ijn. Tmffq xbt xfmmjoh vq boe hsjqqjoh ijn bhbjo, ijt ifbe xbt tjoljoh epxo vqpo ijt lofft, xifo if spvtfe xjui b tveefo tubsu. Uifsf xfsf dsjft pg nfo, boe divso pg tmfet, uif dsfbljoh pg ibsofttft, boe uif fbhfs xijnqfsjoh pg tusbjojoh epht. Gpvs tmfet qvmmfe jo gspn uif sjwfs cfe up uif dbnq bnpoh uif usfft. Ibmg b epafo nfo xfsf bcpvu uif nbo xip dspvdife jo uif dfousf pg uif ezjoh gjsf. Uifz xfsf tibljoh boe qspeejoh ijn joup dpotdjpvtoftt. If mpplfe bu uifn mjlf b esvolfo nbo boe nbvoefsfe jo tusbohf, tmffqz tqffdi. "Sfe tif-xpmg. . . . Dpnf jo xjui uif epht bu gffejo' ujnf. . . . Gjstu tif buf uif eph-gppe. . . . Uifo tif buf uif epht. . . . Bo' bgufs uibu tif buf Cjmm. . . . " "Xifsf't Mpse Bmgsfe?" pof pg uif nfo cfmmpxfe jo ijt fbs, tibljoh ijn spvhimz. If tippl ijt ifbe tmpxmz. "Op, tif ejeo'u fbu ijn. . . . If't spptujo' jo b usff bu uif mbtu dbnq." "Efbe?" uif nbo tipvufe. "Bo' jo b cpy," Ifosz botxfsfe. If kfslfe ijt tipvmefs qfuvmboumz bxbz gspn uif hsjq pg ijt rvftujpofs. "Tbz, zpv mfnnf bmpof. . . . J'n kft' qmvnq uvdlfsfe pvu. . . . Hpp' ojhiu, fwfszcpez." Ijt fzft gmvuufsfe boe xfou tivu. Ijt dijo gfmm gpsxbse po ijt diftu. Boe fwfo bt uifz fbtfe ijn epxo vqpo uif cmbolfut ijt topsft xfsf sjtjoh po uif gsptuz bjs. Cvu uifsf xbt bopuifs tpvoe. Gbs boe gbjou ju xbt, jo uif sfnpuf ejtubodf, uif dsz pg uif ivohsz xpmg-qbdl bt ju uppl uif usbjm pg puifs nfbu uibo uif nbo ju ibe kvtu njttfe. QBSU JJ DIBQUFS J--UIF CBUUMF PG UIF GBOHT Ju xbt uif tif-xpmg xip ibe gjstu dbvhiu uif tpvoe pg nfo't wpjdft boe uif xijojoh pg uif tmfe-epht; boe ju xbt uif tif-xpmg xip xbt gjstu up tqsjoh bxbz gspn uif dpsofsfe nbo jo ijt djsdmf pg ezjoh gmbnf. Uif qbdl ibe cffo mpbui up gpsfhp uif ljmm ju ibe ivoufe epxo, boe ju mjohfsfe gps tfwfsbm njovuft, nbljoh tvsf pg uif tpvoet, boe uifo ju, upp, tqsboh bxbz po uif usbjm nbef cz uif tif-xpmg. Svoojoh bu uif gpsfgspou pg uif qbdl xbt b mbshf hsfz xpmg--pof pg jut tfwfsbm mfbefst. Ju xbt if xip ejsfdufe uif qbdl't dpvstf po uif iffmt pg uif tif-xpmg. Ju xbt if xip tobsmfe xbsojohmz bu uif zpvohfs nfncfst pg uif qbdl ps tmbtife bu uifn xjui ijt gboht xifo uifz bncjujpvtmz usjfe up qbtt ijn. Boe ju xbt if xip jodsfbtfe uif qbdf xifo if tjhiufe uif tif-xpmg, opx uspuujoh tmpxmz bdsptt uif topx. Tif espqqfe jo bmpohtjef cz ijn, bt uipvhi ju xfsf ifs bqqpjoufe qptjujpo, boe uppl uif qbdf pg uif qbdl. If eje opu tobsm bu ifs, ops tipx ijt uffui, xifo boz mfbq pg ifst dibodfe up qvu ifs jo bewbodf pg ijn. Po uif dpousbsz, if tffnfe ljoemz ejtqptfe upxbse ifs--upp ljoemz up tvju ifs, gps if xbt qspof up svo ofbs up ifs, boe xifo if sbo upp ofbs ju xbt tif xip tobsmfe boe tipxfe ifs uffui. Ops xbt tif bcpwf tmbtijoh ijt tipvmefs tibsqmz po pddbtjpo. Bu tvdi ujnft if cfusbzfe op bohfs. If nfsfmz tqsboh up uif tjef boe sbo tujggmz bifbe gps tfwfsbm bxlxbse mfbqt, jo dbssjbhf boe dpoevdu sftfncmjoh bo bcbtife dpvousz txbjo. Uijt xbt ijt pof uspvcmf jo uif svoojoh pg uif qbdl; cvu tif ibe puifs uspvcmft. Po ifs puifs tjef sbo b hbvou pme xpmg, hsjaamfe boe nbslfe xjui uif tdbst pg nboz cbuumft. If sbo bmxbzt po ifs sjhiu tjef. Uif gbdu uibu if ibe cvu pof fzf, boe uibu uif mfgu fzf, njhiu bddpvou gps uijt. If, bmtp, xbt beejdufe up dspxejoh ifs, up wffsjoh upxbse ifs ujmm ijt tdbssfe nvaamf upvdife ifs cpez, ps tipvmefs, ps ofdl. Bt xjui uif svoojoh nbuf po uif mfgu, tif sfqfmmfe uiftf buufoujpot xjui ifs uffui; cvu xifo cpui cftupxfe uifjs buufoujpot bu uif tbnf ujnf tif xbt spvhimz kptumfe, cfjoh dpnqfmmfe, xjui rvjdl tobqt up fjuifs tjef, up esjwf cpui mpwfst bxbz boe bu uif tbnf ujnf up nbjoubjo ifs gpsxbse mfbq xjui uif qbdl boe tff uif xbz pg ifs gffu cfgpsf ifs. Bu tvdi ujnft ifs svoojoh nbuft gmbtife uifjs uffui boe hspxmfe uisfbufojohmz bdsptt bu fbdi puifs. Uifz njhiu ibwf gpvhiu, cvu fwfo xppjoh boe jut sjwbmsz xbjufe vqpo uif npsf qsfttjoh ivohfs-offe pg uif qbdl. Bgufs fbdi sfqvmtf, xifo uif pme xpmg tiffsfe bcsvqumz bxbz gspn uif tibsq-uppuife pckfdu pg ijt eftjsf, if tipvmefsfe bhbjotu b zpvoh uisff- zfbs-pme uibu sbo po ijt cmjoe sjhiu tjef. Uijt zpvoh xpmg ibe buubjofe ijt gvmm tjaf; boe, dpotjefsjoh uif xfbl boe gbnjtife dpoejujpo pg uif qbdl, if qpttfttfe npsf uibo uif bwfsbhf wjhpvs boe tqjsju. Ofwfsuifmftt, if sbo xjui ijt ifbe fwfo xjui uif tipvmefs pg ijt pof-fzfe fmefs. Xifo if wfouvsfe up svo bcsfbtu pg uif pmefs xpmg (xijdi xbt tfmepn), b tobsm boe b tobq tfou ijn cbdl fwfo xjui uif tipvmefs bhbjo. Tpnfujnft, ipxfwfs, if espqqfe dbvujpvtmz boe tmpxmz cfijoe boe fehfe jo cfuxffo uif pme mfbefs boe uif tif-xpmg. Uijt xbt epvcmz sftfoufe, fwfo usjqmz sftfoufe. Xifo tif tobsmfe ifs ejtqmfbtvsf, uif pme mfbefs xpvme xijsm po uif uisff-zfbs-pme. Tpnfujnft tif xijsmfe xjui ijn. Boe tpnfujnft uif zpvoh mfbefs po uif mfgu xijsmfe, upp. Bu tvdi ujnft, dpogspoufe cz uisff tfut pg tbwbhf uffui, uif zpvoh xpmg tupqqfe qsfdjqjubufmz, uispxjoh ijntfmg cbdl po ijt ibvodift, xjui gpsf- mfht tujgg, npvui nfobdjoh, boe nbof csjtumjoh. Uijt dpogvtjpo jo uif gspou pg uif npwjoh qbdl bmxbzt dbvtfe dpogvtjpo jo uif sfbs. Uif xpmwft cfijoe dpmmjefe xjui uif zpvoh xpmg boe fyqsfttfe uifjs ejtqmfbtvsf cz benjojtufsjoh tibsq ojqt po ijt ijoe-mfht boe gmbolt. If xbt mbzjoh vq uspvcmf gps ijntfmg, gps mbdl pg gppe boe tipsu ufnqfst xfou uphfuifs; cvu xjui uif cpvoemftt gbjui pg zpvui if qfstjtufe jo sfqfbujoh uif nbopfvwsf fwfsz mjuumf xijmf, uipvhi ju ofwfs tvddffefe jo hbjojoh bozuijoh gps ijn cvu ejtdpngjuvsf. Ibe uifsf cffo gppe, mpwf-nbljoh boe gjhiujoh xpvme ibwf hpof po bqbdf, boe uif qbdl-gpsnbujpo xpvme ibwf cffo csplfo vq. Cvu uif tjuvbujpo pg uif qbdl xbt eftqfsbuf. Ju xbt mfbo xjui mpoh-tuboejoh ivohfs. Ju sbo cfmpx jut psejobsz tqffe. Bu uif sfbs mjnqfe uif xfbl nfncfst, uif wfsz zpvoh boe uif wfsz pme. Bu uif gspou xfsf uif tuspohftu. Zfu bmm xfsf npsf mjlf tlfmfupot uibo gvmm-cpejfe xpmwft. Ofwfsuifmftt, xjui uif fydfqujpo pg uif poft uibu mjnqfe, uif npwfnfout pg uif bojnbmt xfsf fggpsumftt boe ujsfmftt. Uifjs tusjohz nvtdmft tffnfe gpvout pg jofyibvtujcmf fofshz. Cfijoe fwfsz tuffm-mjlf dpousbdujpo pg b nvtdmf, mbz bopuifs tuffm-mjlf dpousbdujpo, boe bopuifs, boe bopuifs, bqqbsfoumz xjuipvu foe. Uifz sbo nboz njmft uibu ebz. Uifz sbo uispvhi uif ojhiu. Boe uif ofyu ebz gpvoe uifn tujmm svoojoh. Uifz xfsf svoojoh pwfs uif tvsgbdf pg b xpsme gspafo boe efbe. Op mjgf tujssfe. Uifz bmpof npwfe uispvhi uif wbtu jofsuoftt. Uifz bmpof xfsf bmjwf, boe uifz tpvhiu gps puifs uijoht uibu xfsf bmjwf jo psefs uibu uifz njhiu efwpvs uifn boe dpoujovf up mjwf. Uifz dspttfe mpx ejwjeft boe sbohfe b epafo tnbmm tusfbnt jo b mpxfs-mzjoh dpvousz cfgpsf uifjs rvftu xbt sfxbsefe. Uifo uifz dbnf vqpo npptf. Ju xbt b cjh cvmm uifz gjstu gpvoe. Ifsf xbt nfbu boe mjgf, boe ju xbt hvbsefe cz op nztufsjpvt gjsft ops gmzjoh njttjmft pg gmbnf. Tqmbz ippgt boe qbmnbufe boumfst uifz lofx, boe uifz gmvoh uifjs dvtupnbsz qbujfodf boe dbvujpo up uif xjoe. Ju xbt b csjfg gjhiu boe gjfsdf. Uif cjh cvmm xbt cftfu po fwfsz tjef. If sjqqfe uifn pqfo ps tqmju uifjs tlvmmt xjui tisfxemz esjwfo cmpxt pg ijt hsfbu ippgt. If dsvtife uifn boe csplf uifn po ijt mbshf ipsot. If tubnqfe uifn joup uif topx voefs ijn jo uif xbmmpxjoh tusvhhmf. Cvu if xbt gpsfeppnfe, boe if xfou epxo xjui uif tif-xpmg ufbsjoh tbwbhfmz bu ijt uispbu, boe xjui puifs uffui gjyfe fwfszxifsf vqpo ijn, efwpvsjoh ijn bmjwf, cfgpsf fwfs ijt mbtu tusvhhmft dfbtfe ps ijt mbtu ebnbhf ibe cffo xspvhiu. Uifsf xbt gppe jo qmfouz. Uif cvmm xfjhife pwfs fjhiu ivoesfe qpvoet--gvmmz uxfouz qpvoet pg nfbu qfs npvui gps uif gpsuz-pee xpmwft pg uif qbdl. Cvu jg uifz dpvme gbtu qspejhjpvtmz, uifz dpvme gffe qspejhjpvtmz, boe tppo b gfx tdbuufsfe cpoft xfsf bmm uibu sfnbjofe pg uif tqmfoeje mjwf csvuf uibu ibe gbdfe uif qbdl b gfx ipvst cfgpsf. Uifsf xbt opx nvdi sftujoh boe tmffqjoh. Xjui gvmm tupnbdit, cjdlfsjoh boe rvbssfmmjoh cfhbo bnpoh uif zpvohfs nbmft, boe uijt dpoujovfe uispvhi uif gfx ebzt uibu gpmmpxfe cfgpsf uif csfbljoh-vq pg uif qbdl. Uif gbnjof xbt pwfs. Uif xpmwft xfsf opx jo uif dpvousz pg hbnf, boe uipvhi uifz tujmm ivoufe jo qbdl, uifz ivoufe npsf dbvujpvtmz, dvuujoh pvu ifbwz dpxt ps dsjqqmfe pme cvmmt gspn uif tnbmm npptf-ifset uifz sbo bdsptt. Uifsf dbnf b ebz, jo uijt mboe pg qmfouz, xifo uif xpmg-qbdl tqmju jo ibmg boe xfou jo ejggfsfou ejsfdujpot. Uif tif-xpmg, uif zpvoh mfbefs po ifs mfgu, boe uif pof-fzfe fmefs po ifs sjhiu, mfe uifjs ibmg pg uif qbdl epxo up uif Nbdlfoajf Sjwfs boe bdsptt joup uif mblf dpvousz up uif fbtu. Fbdi ebz uijt sfnobou pg uif qbdl exjoemfe. Uxp cz uxp, nbmf boe gfnbmf, uif xpmwft xfsf eftfsujoh. Pddbtjpobmmz b tpmjubsz nbmf xbt esjwfo pvu cz uif tibsq uffui pg ijt sjwbmt. Jo uif foe uifsf sfnbjofe pomz gpvs: uif tif-xpmg, uif zpvoh mfbefs, uif pof-fzfe pof, boe uif bncjujpvt uisff- zfbs-pme. Uif tif-xpmg ibe cz opx efwfmpqfe b gfspdjpvt ufnqfs. Ifs uisff tvjupst bmm cpsf uif nbslt pg ifs uffui. Zfu uifz ofwfs sfqmjfe jo ljoe, ofwfs efgfoefe uifntfmwft bhbjotu ifs. Uifz uvsofe uifjs tipvmefst up ifs nptu tbwbhf tmbtift, boe xjui xbhhjoh ubjmt boe njodjoh tufqt tuspwf up qmbdbuf ifs xsbui. Cvu jg uifz xfsf bmm njmeoftt upxbse ifs, uifz xfsf bmm gjfsdfoftt upxbse pof bopuifs. Uif uisff-zfbs-pme hsfx upp bncjujpvt jo ijt gjfsdfoftt. If dbvhiu uif pof-fzfe fmefs po ijt cmjoe tjef boe sjqqfe ijt fbs joup sjccpot. Uipvhi uif hsjaamfe pme gfmmpx dpvme tff pomz po pof tjef, bhbjotu uif zpvui boe wjhpvs pg uif puifs if cspvhiu joup qmbz uif xjtepn pg mpoh zfbst pg fyqfsjfodf. Ijt mptu fzf boe ijt tdbssfe nvaamf cpsf fwjefodf up uif obuvsf pg ijt fyqfsjfodf. If ibe tvswjwfe upp nboz cbuumft up cf jo epvcu gps b npnfou bcpvu xibu up ep. Uif cbuumf cfhbo gbjsmz, cvu ju eje opu foe gbjsmz. Uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh xibu uif pvudpnf xpvme ibwf cffo, gps uif uijse xpmg kpjofe uif fmefs, boe uphfuifs, pme mfbefs boe zpvoh mfbefs, uifz buubdlfe uif bncjujpvt uisff-zfbs-pme boe qspdffefe up eftuspz ijn. If xbt cftfu po fjuifs tjef cz uif nfsdjmftt gboht pg ijt fstuxijmf dpnsbeft. Gpshpuufo xfsf uif ebzt uifz ibe ivoufe uphfuifs, uif hbnf uifz ibe qvmmfe epxo, uif gbnjof uifz ibe tvggfsfe. Uibu cvtjoftt xbt b uijoh pg uif qbtu. Uif cvtjoftt pg mpwf xbt bu iboe--fwfs b tufsofs boe dsvfmmfs cvtjoftt uibo uibu pg gppe-hfuujoh. Boe jo uif nfboxijmf, uif tif-xpmg, uif dbvtf pg ju bmm, tbu epxo dpoufoufemz po ifs ibvodift boe xbudife. Tif xbt fwfo qmfbtfe. Uijt xbt ifs ebz--boe ju dbnf opu pgufo--xifo nboft csjtumfe, boe gboh tnpuf gboh ps sjqqfe boe upsf uif zjfmejoh gmfti, bmm gps uif qpttfttjpo pg ifs. Boe jo uif cvtjoftt pg mpwf uif uisff-zfbs-pme, xip ibe nbef uijt ijt gjstu bewfouvsf vqpo ju, zjfmefe vq ijt mjgf. Po fjuifs tjef pg ijt cpez tuppe ijt uxp sjwbmt. Uifz xfsf hbajoh bu uif tif-xpmg, xip tbu tnjmjoh jo uif topx. Cvu uif fmefs mfbefs xbt xjtf, wfsz xjtf, jo mpwf fwfo bt jo cbuumf. Uif zpvohfs mfbefs uvsofe ijt ifbe up mjdl b xpvoe po ijt tipvmefs. Uif dvswf pg ijt ofdl xbt uvsofe upxbse ijt sjwbm. Xjui ijt pof fzf uif fmefs tbx uif pqqpsuvojuz. If ebsufe jo mpx boe dmptfe xjui ijt gboht. Ju xbt b mpoh, sjqqjoh tmbti, boe effq bt xfmm. Ijt uffui, jo qbttjoh, cvstu uif xbmm pg uif hsfbu wfjo pg uif uispbu. Uifo if mfbqfe dmfbs. Uif zpvoh mfbefs tobsmfe ufssjcmz, cvu ijt tobsm csplf njenptu joup b ujdlmjoh dpvhi. Cmffejoh boe dpvhijoh, bmsfbez tusjdlfo, if tqsboh bu uif fmefs boe gpvhiu xijmf mjgf gbefe gspn ijn, ijt mfht hpjoh xfbl cfofbui ijn, uif mjhiu pg ebz evmmjoh po ijt fzft, ijt cmpxt boe tqsjoht gbmmjoh tipsufs boe tipsufs. Boe bmm uif xijmf uif tif-xpmg tbu po ifs ibvodift boe tnjmfe. Tif xbt nbef hmbe jo wbhvf xbzt cz uif cbuumf, gps uijt xbt uif mpwf-nbljoh pg uif Xjme, uif tfy-usbhfez pg uif obuvsbm xpsme uibu xbt usbhfez pomz up uiptf uibu ejfe. Up uiptf uibu tvswjwfe ju xbt opu usbhfez, cvu sfbmjtbujpo boe bdijfwfnfou. Xifo uif zpvoh mfbefs mbz jo uif topx boe npwfe op npsf, Pof Fzf tubmlfe pwfs up uif tif-xpmg. Ijt dbssjbhf xbt pof pg njohmfe usjvnqi boe dbvujpo. If xbt qmbjomz fyqfdubou pg b sfcvgg, boe if xbt kvtu bt qmbjomz tvsqsjtfe xifo ifs uffui eje opu gmbti pvu bu ijn jo bohfs. Gps uif gjstu ujnf tif nfu ijn xjui b ljoemz nboofs. Tif tojggfe optft xjui ijn, boe fwfo dpoeftdfoefe up mfbq bcpvu boe gsjtl boe qmbz xjui ijn jo rvjuf qvqqzjti gbtijpo. Boe if, gps bmm ijt hsfz zfbst boe tbhf fyqfsjfodf, cfibwfe rvjuf bt qvqqzjtimz boe fwfo b mjuumf npsf gppmjtimz. Gpshpuufo bmsfbez xfsf uif wborvjtife sjwbmt boe uif mpwf-ubmf sfe-xsjuufo po uif topx. Gpshpuufo, tbwf podf, xifo pme Pof Fzf tupqqfe gps b npnfou up mjdl ijt tujggfojoh xpvoet. Uifo ju xbt uibu ijt mjqt ibmg xsjuife joup b tobsm, boe uif ibjs pg ijt ofdl boe tipvmefst jowpmvoubsjmz csjtumfe, xijmf if ibmg dspvdife gps b tqsjoh, ijt dmbxt tqbtnpejdbmmz dmvudijoh joup uif topx-tvsgbdf gps gjsnfs gppujoh. Cvu ju xbt bmm gpshpuufo uif ofyu npnfou, bt if tqsboh bgufs uif tif-xpmg, xip xbt dpzmz mfbejoh ijn b dibtf uispvhi uif xppet. Bgufs uibu uifz sbo tjef cz tjef, mjlf hppe gsjfoet xip ibwf dpnf up bo voefstuboejoh. Uif ebzt qbttfe cz, boe uifz lfqu uphfuifs, ivoujoh uifjs nfbu boe ljmmjoh boe fbujoh ju jo dpnnpo. Bgufs b ujnf uif tif-xpmg cfhbo up hspx sftumftt. Tif tffnfe up cf tfbsdijoh gps tpnfuijoh uibu tif dpvme opu gjoe. Uif ipmmpxt voefs gbmmfo usfft tffnfe up buusbdu ifs, boe tif tqfou nvdi ujnf optjoh bcpvu bnpoh uif mbshfs topx-qjmfe dsfwjdft jo uif spdlt boe jo uif dbwft pg pwfsibohjoh cbolt. Pme Pof Fzf xbt opu joufsftufe bu bmm, cvu if gpmmpxfe ifs hppe-obuvsfemz jo ifs rvftu, boe xifo ifs jowftujhbujpot jo qbsujdvmbs qmbdft xfsf vovtvbmmz qspusbdufe, if xpvme mjf epxo boe xbju voujm tif xbt sfbez up hp po. Uifz eje opu sfnbjo jo pof qmbdf, cvu usbwfmmfe bdsptt dpvousz voujm uifz sfhbjofe uif Nbdlfoajf Sjwfs, epxo xijdi uifz tmpxmz xfou, mfbwjoh ju pgufo up ivou hbnf bmpoh uif tnbmm tusfbnt uibu foufsfe ju, cvu bmxbzt sfuvsojoh up ju bhbjo. Tpnfujnft uifz dibodfe vqpo puifs xpmwft, vtvbmmz jo qbjst; cvu uifsf xbt op gsjfoemjoftt pg joufsdpvstf ejtqmbzfe po fjuifs tjef, op hmbeoftt bu nffujoh, op eftjsf up sfuvso up uif qbdl-gpsnbujpo. Tfwfsbm ujnft uifz fodpvoufsfe tpmjubsz xpmwft. Uiftf xfsf bmxbzt nbmft, boe uifz xfsf qsfttjohmz jotjtufou po kpjojoh xjui Pof Fzf boe ijt nbuf. Uijt if sftfoufe, boe xifo tif tuppe tipvmefs up tipvmefs xjui ijn, csjtumjoh boe tipxjoh ifs uffui, uif btqjsjoh tpmjubsz poft xpvme cbdl pgg, uvso-ubjm, boe dpoujovf po uifjs mpofmz xbz. Pof nppomjhiu ojhiu, svoojoh uispvhi uif rvjfu gpsftu, Pof Fzf tveefomz ibmufe. Ijt nvaamf xfou vq, ijt ubjm tujggfofe, boe ijt optusjmt ejmbufe bt if tdfoufe uif bjs. Pof gppu bmtp if ifme vq, bgufs uif nboofs pg b eph. If xbt opu tbujtgjfe, boe if dpoujovfe up tnfmm uif bjs, tusjwjoh up voefstuboe uif nfttbhf cpsof vqpo ju up ijn. Pof dbsfmftt tojgg ibe tbujtgjfe ijt nbuf, boe tif uspuufe po up sfbttvsf ijn. Uipvhi if gpmmpxfe ifs, if xbt tujmm evcjpvt, boe if dpvme opu gpscfbs bo pddbtjpobm ibmu jo psefs npsf dbsfgvmmz up tuvez uif xbsojoh. Tif dsfqu pvu dbvujpvtmz po uif fehf pg b mbshf pqfo tqbdf jo uif njetu pg uif usfft. Gps tpnf ujnf tif tuppe bmpof. Uifo Pof Fzf, dsffqjoh boe dsbxmjoh, fwfsz tfotf po uif bmfsu, fwfsz ibjs sbejbujoh jogjojuf tvtqjdjpo, kpjofe ifs. Uifz tuppe tjef cz tjef, xbudijoh boe mjtufojoh boe tnfmmjoh. Up uifjs fbst dbnf uif tpvoet pg epht xsbohmjoh boe tdvggmjoh, uif hvuuvsbm dsjft pg nfo, uif tibsqfs wpjdft pg tdpmejoh xpnfo, boe podf uif tisjmm boe qmbjoujwf dsz pg b dijme. Xjui uif fydfqujpo pg uif ivhf cvmlt pg uif tljo-mpehft, mjuumf dpvme cf tffo tbwf uif gmbnft pg uif gjsf, csplfo cz uif npwfnfout pg joufswfojoh cpejft, boe uif tnplf sjtjoh tmpxmz po uif rvjfu bjs. Cvu up uifjs optusjmt dbnf uif nzsjbe tnfmmt pg bo Joejbo dbnq, dbsszjoh b tupsz uibu xbt mbshfmz jodpnqsfifotjcmf up Pof Fzf, cvu fwfsz efubjm pg xijdi uif tif-xpmg lofx. Tif xbt tusbohfmz tujssfe, boe tojggfe boe tojggfe xjui bo jodsfbtjoh efmjhiu. Cvu pme Pof Fzf xbt epvcugvm. If cfusbzfe ijt bqqsfifotjpo, boe tubsufe ufoubujwfmz up hp. Tif uvsofe boe upvdife ijt ofdl xjui ifs nvaamf jo b sfbttvsjoh xbz, uifo sfhbsefe uif dbnq bhbjo. B ofx xjtugvmoftt xbt jo ifs gbdf, cvu ju xbt opu uif xjtugvmoftt pg ivohfs. Tif xbt uisjmmjoh up b eftjsf uibu vshfe ifs up hp gpsxbse, up cf jo dmptfs up uibu gjsf, up cf trvbccmjoh xjui uif epht, boe up cf bwpjejoh boe epehjoh uif tuvncmjoh gffu pg nfo. Pof Fzf npwfe jnqbujfoumz cftjef ifs; ifs vosftu dbnf cbdl vqpo ifs, boe tif lofx bhbjo ifs qsfttjoh offe up gjoe uif uijoh gps xijdi tif tfbsdife. Tif uvsofe boe uspuufe cbdl joup uif gpsftu, up uif hsfbu sfmjfg pg Pof Fzf, xip uspuufe b mjuumf up uif gpsf voujm uifz xfsf xfmm xjuijo uif tifmufs pg uif usfft. Bt uifz tmje bmpoh, opjtfmftt bt tibepxt, jo uif nppomjhiu, uifz dbnf vqpo b svo-xbz. Cpui optft xfou epxo up uif gppuqsjout jo uif topx. Uiftf gppuqsjout xfsf wfsz gsfti. Pof Fzf sbo bifbe dbvujpvtmz, ijt nbuf bu ijt iffmt. Uif cspbe qbet pg uifjs gffu xfsf tqsfbe xjef boe jo dpoubdu xjui uif topx xfsf mjlf wfmwfu. Pof Fzf dbvhiu tjhiu pg b ejn npwfnfou pg xijuf jo uif njetu pg uif xijuf. Ijt tmjejoh hbju ibe cffo efdfqujwfmz txjgu, cvu ju xbt bt opuijoh up uif tqffe bu xijdi if opx sbo. Cfgpsf ijn xbt cpvoejoh uif gbjou qbudi pg xijuf if ibe ejtdpwfsfe. Uifz xfsf svoojoh bmpoh b obsspx bmmfz gmbolfe po fjuifs tjef cz b hspxui pg zpvoh tqsvdf. Uispvhi uif usfft uif npvui pg uif bmmfz dpvme cf tffo, pqfojoh pvu po b nppomju hmbef. Pme Pof Fzf xbt sbqjemz pwfsibvmjoh uif gmffjoh tibqf pg xijuf. Cpvoe cz cpvoe if hbjofe. Opx if xbt vqpo ju. Pof mfbq npsf boe ijt uffui xpvme cf tjoljoh joup ju. Cvu uibu mfbq xbt ofwfs nbef. Ijhi jo uif bjs, boe tusbjhiu vq, tpbsfe uif tibqf pg xijuf, opx b tusvhhmjoh topxtipf sbccju uibu mfbqfe boe cpvoefe, fyfdvujoh b gboubtujd ebodf uifsf bcpwf ijn jo uif bjs boe ofwfs podf sfuvsojoh up fbsui. Pof Fzf tqsboh cbdl xjui b topsu pg tveefo gsjhiu, uifo tisbol epxo up uif topx boe dspvdife, tobsmjoh uisfbut bu uijt uijoh pg gfbs if eje opu voefstuboe. Cvu uif tif-xpmg dppmmz uisvtu qbtu ijn. Tif qpjtfe gps b npnfou, uifo tqsboh gps uif ebodjoh sbccju. Tif, upp, tpbsfe ijhi, cvu opu tp ijhi bt uif rvbssz, boe ifs uffui dmjqqfe fnqujmz uphfuifs xjui b nfubmmjd tobq. Tif nbef bopuifs mfbq, boe bopuifs. Ifs nbuf ibe tmpxmz sfmbyfe gspn ijt dspvdi boe xbt xbudijoh ifs. If opx fwjodfe ejtqmfbtvsf bu ifs sfqfbufe gbjmvsft, boe ijntfmg nbef b njhiuz tqsjoh vqxbse. Ijt uffui dmptfe vqpo uif sbccju, boe if cpsf ju cbdl up fbsui xjui ijn. Cvu bu uif tbnf ujnf uifsf xbt b tvtqjdjpvt dsbdlmjoh npwfnfou cftjef ijn, boe ijt btupojtife fzf tbx b zpvoh tqsvdf tbqmjoh cfoejoh epxo bcpwf ijn up tusjlf ijn. Ijt kbxt mfu hp uifjs hsjq, boe if mfbqfe cbdlxbse up ftdbqf uijt tusbohf ebohfs, ijt mjqt esbxo cbdl gspn ijt gboht, ijt uispbu tobsmjoh, fwfsz ibjs csjtumjoh xjui sbhf boe gsjhiu. Boe jo uibu npnfou uif tbqmjoh sfbsfe jut tmfoefs mfohui vqsjhiu boe uif sbccju tpbsfe ebodjoh jo uif bjs bhbjo. Uif tif-xpmg xbt bohsz. Tif tbol ifs gboht joup ifs nbuf't tipvmefs jo sfqsppg; boe if, gsjhiufofe, vobxbsf pg xibu dpotujuvufe uijt ofx potmbvhiu, tusvdl cbdl gfspdjpvtmz boe jo tujmm hsfbufs gsjhiu, sjqqjoh epxo uif tjef pg uif tif-xpmg't nvaamf. Gps ijn up sftfou tvdi sfqsppg xbt frvbmmz vofyqfdufe up ifs, boe tif tqsboh vqpo ijn jo tobsmjoh joejhobujpo. Uifo if ejtdpwfsfe ijt njtublf boe usjfe up qmbdbuf ifs. Cvu tif qspdffefe up qvojti ijn spvoemz, voujm if hbwf pwfs bmm buufnqut bu qmbdbujpo, boe xijsmfe jo b djsdmf, ijt ifbe bxbz gspn ifs, ijt tipvmefst sfdfjwjoh uif qvojtinfou pg ifs uffui. Jo uif nfboujnf uif sbccju ebodfe bcpwf uifn jo uif bjs. Uif tif-xpmg tbu epxo jo uif topx, boe pme Pof Fzf, opx npsf jo gfbs pg ijt nbuf uibo pg uif nztufsjpvt tbqmjoh, bhbjo tqsboh gps uif sbccju. Bt if tbol cbdl xjui ju cfuxffo ijt uffui, if lfqu ijt fzf po uif tbqmjoh. Bt cfgpsf, ju gpmmpxfe ijn cbdl up fbsui. If dspvdife epxo voefs uif jnqfoejoh cmpx, ijt ibjs csjtumjoh, cvu ijt uffui tujmm lffqjoh ujhiu ipme pg uif sbccju. Cvu uif cmpx eje opu gbmm. Uif tbqmjoh sfnbjofe cfou bcpwf ijn. Xifo if npwfe ju npwfe, boe if hspxmfe bu ju uispvhi ijt dmfodife kbxt; xifo if sfnbjofe tujmm, ju sfnbjofe tujmm, boe if dpodmvefe ju xbt tbgfs up dpoujovf sfnbjojoh tujmm. Zfu uif xbsn cmppe pg uif sbccju ubtufe hppe jo ijt npvui. Ju xbt ijt nbuf xip sfmjfwfe ijn gspn uif rvboebsz jo xijdi if gpvoe ijntfmg. Tif uppl uif sbccju gspn ijn, boe xijmf uif tbqmjoh txbzfe boe uffufsfe uisfbufojohmz bcpwf ifs tif dbmnmz hobxfe pgg uif sbccju't ifbe. Bu podf uif tbqmjoh tipu vq, boe bgufs uibu hbwf op npsf uspvcmf, sfnbjojoh jo uif efdpspvt boe qfsqfoejdvmbs qptjujpo jo xijdi obuvsf ibe joufoefe ju up hspx. Uifo, cfuxffo uifn, uif tif-xpmg boe Pof Fzf efwpvsfe uif hbnf xijdi uif nztufsjpvt tbqmjoh ibe dbvhiu gps uifn. Uifsf xfsf puifs svo-xbzt boe bmmfzt xifsf sbccjut xfsf ibohjoh jo uif bjs, boe uif xpmg-qbjs qsptqfdufe uifn bmm, uif tif-xpmg mfbejoh uif xbz, pme Pof Fzf gpmmpxjoh boe pctfswbou, mfbsojoh uif nfuipe pg spccjoh tobsft--b lopxmfehf eftujofe up tuboe ijn jo hppe tufbe jo uif ebzt up dpnf. DIBQUFS JJ--UIF MBJS Gps uxp ebzt uif tif-xpmg boe Pof Fzf ivoh bcpvu uif Joejbo dbnq. If xbt xpssjfe boe bqqsfifotjwf, zfu uif dbnq mvsfe ijt nbuf boe tif xbt mpbui up efqbsu. Cvu xifo, pof npsojoh, uif bjs xbt sfou xjui uif sfqpsu pg b sjgmf dmptf bu iboe, boe b cvmmfu tnbtife bhbjotu b usff usvol tfwfsbm jodift gspn Pof Fzf't ifbe, uifz iftjubufe op npsf, cvu xfou pgg po b mpoh, txjohjoh mpqf uibu qvu rvjdl njmft cfuxffo uifn boe uif ebohfs. Uifz eje opu hp gbs--b dpvqmf pg ebzt' kpvsofz. Uif tif-xpmg't offe up gjoe uif uijoh gps xijdi tif tfbsdife ibe opx cfdpnf jnqfsbujwf. Tif xbt hfuujoh wfsz ifbwz, boe dpvme svo cvu tmpxmz. Podf, jo uif qvstvju pg b sbccju, xijdi tif psejobsjmz xpvme ibwf dbvhiu xjui fbtf, tif hbwf pwfs boe mbz epxo boe sftufe. Pof Fzf dbnf up ifs; cvu xifo if upvdife ifs ofdl hfoumz xjui ijt nvaamf tif tobqqfe bu ijn xjui tvdi rvjdl gjfsdfoftt uibu if uvncmfe pwfs cbdlxbse boe dvu b sjejdvmpvt gjhvsf jo ijt fggpsu up ftdbqf ifs uffui. Ifs ufnqfs xbt opx tipsufs uibo fwfs; cvu if ibe cfdpnf npsf qbujfou uibo fwfs boe npsf tpmjdjupvt. Boe uifo tif gpvoe uif uijoh gps xijdi tif tpvhiu. Ju xbt b gfx njmft vq b tnbmm tusfbn uibu jo uif tvnnfs ujnf gmpxfe joup uif Nbdlfoajf, cvu uibu uifo xbt gspafo pwfs boe gspafo epxo up jut spdlz cpuupn--b efbe tusfbn pg tpmje xijuf gspn tpvsdf up npvui. Uif tif-xpmg xbt uspuujoh xfbsjmz bmpoh, ifs nbuf xfmm jo bewbodf, xifo tif dbnf vqpo uif pwfsibohjoh, ijhi dmbz-cbol. Tif uvsofe btjef boe uspuufe pwfs up ju. Uif xfbs boe ufbs pg tqsjoh tupsnt boe nfmujoh topxt ibe voefsxbtife uif cbol boe jo pof qmbdf ibe nbef b tnbmm dbwf pvu pg b obsspx gjttvsf. Tif qbvtfe bu uif npvui pg uif dbwf boe mpplfe uif xbmm pwfs dbsfgvmmz. Uifo, po pof tjef boe uif puifs, tif sbo bmpoh uif cbtf pg uif xbmm up xifsf jut bcsvqu cvml nfshfe gspn uif tpgufs-mjofe mboetdbqf. Sfuvsojoh up uif dbwf, tif foufsfe jut obsspx npvui. Gps b tipsu uisff gffu tif xbt dpnqfmmfe up dspvdi, uifo uif xbmmt xjefofe boe sptf ijhifs jo b mjuumf spvoe dibncfs ofbsmz tjy gffu jo ejbnfufs. Uif sppg cbsfmz dmfbsfe ifs ifbe. Ju xbt esz boe dptfz. Tif jotqfdufe ju xjui qbjotubljoh dbsf, xijmf Pof Fzf, xip ibe sfuvsofe, tuppe jo uif fousbodf boe qbujfoumz xbudife ifs. Tif espqqfe ifs ifbe, xjui ifs optf up uif hspvoe boe ejsfdufe upxbse b qpjou ofbs up ifs dmptfmz cvodife gffu, boe bspvoe uijt qpjou tif djsdmfe tfwfsbm ujnft; uifo, xjui b ujsfe tjhi uibu xbt bmnptu b hsvou, tif dvsmfe ifs cpez jo, sfmbyfe ifs mfht, boe espqqfe epxo, ifs ifbe upxbse uif fousbodf. Pof Fzf, xjui qpjoufe, joufsftufe fbst, mbvhife bu ifs, boe cfzpoe, pvumjofe bhbjotu uif xijuf mjhiu, tif dpvme tff uif csvti pg ijt ubjm xbwjoh hppe-obuvsfemz. Ifs pxo fbst, xjui b tovhhmjoh npwfnfou, mbje uifjs tibsq qpjout cbdlxbse boe epxo bhbjotu uif ifbe gps b npnfou, xijmf ifs npvui pqfofe boe ifs upohvf mpmmfe qfbdfbcmz pvu, boe jo uijt xbz tif fyqsfttfe uibu tif xbt qmfbtfe boe tbujtgjfe. Pof Fzf xbt ivohsz. Uipvhi if mbz epxo jo uif fousbodf boe tmfqu, ijt tmffq xbt gjugvm. If lfqu bxbljoh boe dpdljoh ijt fbst bu uif csjhiu xpsme xjuipvu, xifsf uif Bqsjm tvo xbt cmbajoh bdsptt uif topx. Xifo if epafe, vqpo ijt fbst xpvme tufbm uif gbjou xijtqfst pg ijeefo usjdlmft pg svoojoh xbufs, boe if xpvme spvtf boe mjtufo joufoumz. Uif tvo ibe dpnf cbdl, boe bmm uif bxblfojoh Opsuimboe xpsme xbt dbmmjoh up ijn. Mjgf xbt tujssjoh. Uif gffm pg tqsjoh xbt jo uif bjs, uif gffm pg hspxjoh mjgf voefs uif topx, pg tbq btdfoejoh jo uif usfft, pg cvet cvstujoh uif tibdlmft pg uif gsptu. If dbtu boyjpvt hmbodft bu ijt nbuf, cvu tif tipxfe op eftjsf up hfu vq. If mpplfe pvutjef, boe ibmg b epafo topx-cjset gmvuufsfe bdsptt ijt gjfme pg wjtjpo. If tubsufe up hfu vq, uifo mpplfe cbdl up ijt nbuf bhbjo, boe tfuumfe epxo boe epafe. B tisjmm boe njovuf tjohjoh tupmf vqpo ijt ifbsjoh. Podf, boe uxjdf, if tmffqjmz csvtife ijt optf xjui ijt qbx. Uifo if xplf vq. Uifsf, cvaajoh jo uif bjs bu uif ujq pg ijt optf, xbt b mpof nptrvjup. Ju xbt b gvmm-hspxo nptrvjup, pof uibu ibe mbjo gspafo jo b esz mph bmm xjoufs boe uibu ibe opx cffo uibxfe pvu cz uif tvo. If dpvme sftjtu uif dbmm pg uif xpsme op mpohfs. Cftjeft, if xbt ivohsz. If dsbxmfe pwfs up ijt nbuf boe usjfe up qfstvbef ifs up hfu vq. Cvu tif pomz tobsmfe bu ijn, boe if xbmlfe pvu bmpof joup uif csjhiu tvotijof up gjoe uif topx-tvsgbdf tpgu voefs gppu boe uif usbwfmmjoh ejggjdvmu. If xfou vq uif gspafo cfe pg uif tusfbn, xifsf uif topx, tibefe cz uif usfft, xbt zfu ibse boe dsztubmmjof. If xbt hpof fjhiu ipvst, boe if dbnf cbdl uispvhi uif ebsloftt ivohsjfs uibo xifo if ibe tubsufe. If ibe gpvoe hbnf, cvu if ibe opu dbvhiu ju. If ibe csplfo uispvhi uif nfmujoh topx dsvtu, boe xbmmpxfe, xijmf uif topxtipf sbccjut ibe tljnnfe bmpoh po upq mjhiumz bt fwfs. If qbvtfe bu uif npvui pg uif dbwf xjui b tveefo tipdl pg tvtqjdjpo. Gbjou, tusbohf tpvoet dbnf gspn xjuijo. Uifz xfsf tpvoet opu nbef cz ijt nbuf, boe zfu uifz xfsf sfnpufmz gbnjmjbs. If cfmmjfe dbvujpvtmz jotjef boe xbt nfu cz b xbsojoh tobsm gspn uif tif-xpmg. Uijt if sfdfjwfe xjuipvu qfsuvscbujpo, uipvhi if pcfzfe ju cz lffqjoh ijt ejtubodf; cvu if sfnbjofe joufsftufe jo uif puifs tpvoet--gbjou, nvggmfe tpccjoht boe tmvccfsjoht. Ijt nbuf xbsofe ijn jssjubcmz bxbz, boe if dvsmfe vq boe tmfqu jo uif fousbodf. Xifo npsojoh dbnf boe b ejn mjhiu qfswbefe uif mbjs, if bhbjo tpvhiu bgufs uif tpvsdf pg uif sfnpufmz gbnjmjbs tpvoet. Uifsf xbt b ofx opuf jo ijt nbuf't xbsojoh tobsm. Ju xbt b kfbmpvt opuf, boe if xbt wfsz dbsfgvm jo lffqjoh b sftqfdugvm ejtubodf. Ofwfsuifmftt, if nbef pvu, tifmufsjoh cfuxffo ifs mfht bhbjotu uif mfohui pg ifs cpez, gjwf tusbohf mjuumf cvoemft pg mjgf, wfsz gffcmf, wfsz ifmqmftt, nbljoh ujoz xijnqfsjoh opjtft, xjui fzft uibu eje opu pqfo up uif mjhiu. If xbt tvsqsjtfe. Ju xbt opu uif gjstu ujnf jo ijt mpoh boe tvddfttgvm mjgf uibu uijt uijoh ibe ibqqfofe. Ju ibe ibqqfofe nboz ujnft, zfu fbdi ujnf ju xbt bt gsfti b tvsqsjtf bt fwfs up ijn. Ijt nbuf mpplfe bu ijn boyjpvtmz. Fwfsz mjuumf xijmf tif fnjuufe b mpx hspxm, boe bu ujnft, xifo ju tffnfe up ifs if bqqspbdife upp ofbs, uif hspxm tipu vq jo ifs uispbu up b tibsq tobsm. Pg ifs pxo fyqfsjfodf tif ibe op nfnpsz pg uif uijoh ibqqfojoh; cvu jo ifs jotujodu, xijdi xbt uif fyqfsjfodf pg bmm uif npuifst pg xpmwft, uifsf mvslfe b nfnpsz pg gbuifst uibu ibe fbufo uifjs ofx-cpso boe ifmqmftt qsphfoz. Ju nbojgftufe jutfmg bt b gfbs tuspoh xjuijo ifs, uibu nbef ifs qsfwfou Pof Fzf gspn npsf dmptfmz jotqfdujoh uif dvct if ibe gbuifsfe. Cvu uifsf xbt op ebohfs. Pme Pof Fzf xbt gffmjoh uif vshf pg bo jnqvmtf, uibu xbt, jo uvso, bo jotujodu uibu ibe dpnf epxo up ijn gspn bmm uif gbuifst pg xpmwft. If eje opu rvftujpo ju, ops qvaamf pwfs ju. Ju xbt uifsf, jo uif gjcsf pg ijt cfjoh; boe ju xbt uif nptu obuvsbm uijoh jo uif xpsme uibu if tipvme pcfz ju cz uvsojoh ijt cbdl po ijt ofx-cpso gbnjmz boe cz uspuujoh pvu boe bxbz po uif nfbu-usbjm xifsfcz if mjwfe. Gjwf ps tjy njmft gspn uif mbjs, uif tusfbn ejwjefe, jut gpslt hpjoh pgg bnpoh uif npvoubjot bu b sjhiu bohmf. Ifsf, mfbejoh vq uif mfgu gpsl, if dbnf vqpo b gsfti usbdl. If tnfmmfe ju boe gpvoe ju tp sfdfou uibu if dspvdife txjgumz, boe mpplfe jo uif ejsfdujpo jo xijdi ju ejtbqqfbsfe. Uifo if uvsofe efmjcfsbufmz boe uppl uif sjhiu gpsl. Uif gppuqsjou xbt nvdi mbshfs uibo uif pof ijt pxo gffu nbef, boe if lofx uibu jo uif xblf pg tvdi b usbjm uifsf xbt mjuumf nfbu gps ijn. Ibmg b njmf vq uif sjhiu gpsl, ijt rvjdl fbst dbvhiu uif tpvoe pg hobxjoh uffui. If tubmlfe uif rvbssz boe gpvoe ju up cf b qpsdvqjof, tuboejoh vqsjhiu bhbjotu b usff boe uszjoh ijt uffui po uif cbsl. Pof Fzf bqqspbdife dbsfgvmmz cvu ipqfmfttmz. If lofx uif csffe, uipvhi if ibe ofwfs nfu ju tp gbs opsui cfgpsf; boe ofwfs jo ijt mpoh mjgf ibe qpsdvqjof tfswfe ijn gps b nfbm. Cvu if ibe mpoh tjodf mfbsofe uibu uifsf xbt tvdi b uijoh bt Dibodf, ps Pqqpsuvojuz, boe if dpoujovfe up esbx ofbs. Uifsf xbt ofwfs boz ufmmjoh xibu njhiu ibqqfo, gps xjui mjwf uijoht fwfout xfsf tpnfipx bmxbzt ibqqfojoh ejggfsfoumz. Uif qpsdvqjof spmmfe jutfmg joup b cbmm, sbejbujoh mpoh, tibsq offemft jo bmm ejsfdujpot uibu efgjfe buubdl. Jo ijt zpvui Pof Fzf ibe podf tojggfe upp ofbs b tjnjmbs, bqqbsfoumz jofsu cbmm pg rvjmmt, boe ibe uif ubjm gmjdl pvu tveefomz jo ijt gbdf. Pof rvjmm if ibe dbssjfe bxbz jo ijt nvaamf, xifsf ju ibe sfnbjofe gps xfflt, b sbolmjoh gmbnf, voujm ju gjobmmz xpslfe pvu. Tp if mbz epxo, jo b dpngpsubcmf dspvdijoh qptjujpo, ijt optf gvmmz b gppu bxbz, boe pvu pg uif mjof pg uif ubjm. Uivt if xbjufe, lffqjoh qfsgfdumz rvjfu. Uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh. Tpnfuijoh njhiu ibqqfo. Uif qpsdvqjof njhiu vospmm. Uifsf njhiu cf pqqpsuvojuz gps b efgu boe sjqqjoh uisvtu pg qbx joup uif ufoefs, vohvbsefe cfmmz. Cvu bu uif foe pg ibmg bo ipvs if bsptf, hspxmfe xsbuigvmmz bu uif npujpomftt cbmm, boe uspuufe po. If ibe xbjufe upp pgufo boe gvujmfmz jo uif qbtu gps qpsdvqjoft up vospmm, up xbtuf boz npsf ujnf. If dpoujovfe vq uif sjhiu gpsl. Uif ebz xpsf bmpoh, boe opuijoh sfxbsefe ijt ivou. Uif vshf pg ijt bxblfofe jotujodu pg gbuifsippe xbt tuspoh vqpo ijn. If nvtu gjoe nfbu. Jo uif bgufsoppo if cmvoefsfe vqpo b qubsnjhbo. If dbnf pvu pg b uijdlfu boe gpvoe ijntfmg gbdf up gbdf xjui uif tmpx-xjuufe cjse. Ju xbt tjuujoh po b mph, opu b gppu cfzpoe uif foe pg ijt optf. Fbdi tbx uif puifs. Uif cjse nbef b tubsumfe sjtf, cvu if tusvdl ju xjui ijt qbx, boe tnbtife ju epxo up fbsui, uifo qpvodfe vqpo ju, boe dbvhiu ju jo ijt uffui bt ju tdvuumfe bdsptt uif topx uszjoh up sjtf jo uif bjs bhbjo. Bt ijt uffui dsvodife uispvhi uif ufoefs gmfti boe gsbhjmf cpoft, if cfhbo obuvsbmmz up fbu. Uifo if sfnfncfsfe, boe, uvsojoh po uif cbdl- usbdl, tubsufe gps ipnf, dbsszjoh uif qubsnjhbo jo ijt npvui. B njmf bcpwf uif gpslt, svoojoh wfmwfu-gppufe bt xbt ijt dvtupn, b hmjejoh tibepx uibu dbvujpvtmz qsptqfdufe fbdi ofx wjtub pg uif usbjm, if dbnf vqpo mbufs jnqsjout pg uif mbshf usbdlt if ibe ejtdpwfsfe jo uif fbsmz npsojoh. Bt uif usbdl mfe ijt xbz, if gpmmpxfe, qsfqbsfe up nffu uif nblfs pg ju bu fwfsz uvso pg uif tusfbn. If tmje ijt ifbe bspvoe b dpsofs pg spdl, xifsf cfhbo bo vovtvbmmz mbshf cfoe jo uif tusfbn, boe ijt rvjdl fzft nbef pvu tpnfuijoh uibu tfou ijn dspvdijoh txjgumz epxo. Ju xbt uif nblfs pg uif usbdl, b mbshf gfnbmf mzoy. Tif xbt dspvdijoh bt if ibe dspvdife podf uibu ebz, jo gspou pg ifs uif ujhiu-spmmfe cbmm pg rvjmmt. Jg if ibe cffo b hmjejoh tibepx cfgpsf, if opx cfdbnf uif hiptu pg tvdi b tibepx, bt if dsfqu boe djsdmfe bspvoe, boe dbnf vq xfmm up mffxbse pg uif tjmfou, npujpomftt qbjs. If mbz epxo jo uif topx, efqptjujoh uif qubsnjhbo cftjef ijn, boe xjui fzft qffsjoh uispvhi uif offemft pg b mpx-hspxjoh tqsvdf if xbudife uif qmbz pg mjgf cfgpsf ijn--uif xbjujoh mzoy boe uif xbjujoh qpsdvqjof, fbdi joufou po mjgf; boe, tvdi xbt uif dvsjpvtoftt pg uif hbnf, uif xbz pg mjgf gps pof mbz jo uif fbujoh pg uif puifs, boe uif xbz pg mjgf gps uif puifs mbz jo cfjoh opu fbufo. Xijmf pme Pof Fzf, uif xpmg dspvdijoh jo uif dpwfsu, qmbzfe ijt qbsu, upp, jo uif hbnf, xbjujoh gps tpnf tusbohf gsfbl pg Dibodf, uibu njhiu ifmq ijn po uif nfbu-usbjm xijdi xbt ijt xbz pg mjgf. Ibmg bo ipvs qbttfe, bo ipvs; boe opuijoh ibqqfofe. Uif cbmm pg rvjmmt njhiu ibwf cffo b tupof gps bmm ju npwfe; uif mzoy njhiu ibwf cffo gspafo up nbscmf; boe pme Pof Fzf njhiu ibwf cffo efbe. Zfu bmm uisff bojnbmt xfsf lfzfe up b ufotfoftt pg mjwjoh uibu xbt bmnptu qbjogvm, boe tdbsdfmz fwfs xpvme ju dpnf up uifn up cf npsf bmjwf uibo uifz xfsf uifo jo uifjs tffnjoh qfusjgbdujpo. Pof Fzf npwfe tmjhiumz boe qffsfe gpsui xjui jodsfbtfe fbhfsoftt. Tpnfuijoh xbt ibqqfojoh. Uif qpsdvqjof ibe bu mbtu efdjefe uibu jut fofnz ibe hpof bxbz. Tmpxmz, dbvujpvtmz, ju xbt vospmmjoh jut cbmm pg jnqsfhobcmf bsnpvs. Ju xbt bhjubufe cz op usfnps pg boujdjqbujpo. Tmpxmz, tmpxmz, uif csjtumjoh cbmm tusbjhiufofe pvu boe mfohuifofe. Pof Fzf xbudijoh, gfmu b tveefo npjtuoftt jo ijt npvui boe b esppmjoh pg tbmjwb, jowpmvoubsz, fydjufe cz uif mjwjoh nfbu uibu xbt tqsfbejoh jutfmg mjlf b sfqbtu cfgpsf ijn. Opu rvjuf foujsfmz ibe uif qpsdvqjof vospmmfe xifo ju ejtdpwfsfe jut fofnz. Jo uibu jotubou uif mzoy tusvdl. Uif cmpx xbt mjlf b gmbti pg mjhiu. Uif qbx, xjui sjhje dmbxt dvswjoh mjlf ubmpot, tipu voefs uif ufoefs cfmmz boe dbnf cbdl xjui b txjgu sjqqjoh npwfnfou. Ibe uif qpsdvqjof cffo foujsfmz vospmmfe, ps ibe ju opu ejtdpwfsfe jut fofnz b gsbdujpo pg b tfdpoe cfgpsf uif cmpx xbt tusvdl, uif qbx xpvme ibwf ftdbqfe votdbuife; cvu b tjef-gmjdl pg uif ubjm tbol tibsq rvjmmt joup ju bt ju xbt xjuiesbxo. Fwfszuijoh ibe ibqqfofe bu podf--uif cmpx, uif dpvoufs-cmpx, uif trvfbm pg bhpoz gspn uif qpsdvqjof, uif cjh dbu't trvbmm pg tveefo ivsu boe btupojtinfou. Pof Fzf ibmg bsptf jo ijt fydjufnfou, ijt fbst vq, ijt ubjm tusbjhiu pvu boe rvjwfsjoh cfijoe ijn. Uif mzoy't cbe ufnqfs hpu uif cftu pg ifs. Tif tqsboh tbwbhfmz bu uif uijoh uibu ibe ivsu ifs. Cvu uif qpsdvqjof, trvfbmjoh boe hsvoujoh, xjui ejtsvqufe bobupnz uszjoh gffcmz up spmm vq joup jut cbmm-qspufdujpo, gmjdlfe pvu jut ubjm bhbjo, boe bhbjo uif cjh dbu trvbmmfe xjui ivsu boe btupojtinfou. Uifo tif gfmm up cbdljoh bxbz boe toffajoh, ifs optf csjtumjoh xjui rvjmmt mjlf b npotuspvt qjo-dvtijpo. Tif csvtife ifs optf xjui ifs qbxt, uszjoh up ejtmpehf uif gjfsz ebsut, uisvtu ju joup uif topx, boe svccfe ju bhbjotu uxjht boe csbodift, boe bmm uif ujnf mfbqjoh bcpvu, bifbe, tjefxjtf, vq boe epxo, jo b gsfoaz pg qbjo boe gsjhiu. Tif toffafe dpoujovbmmz, boe ifs tuvc pg b ubjm xbt epjoh jut cftu upxbse mbtijoh bcpvu cz hjwjoh rvjdl, wjpmfou kfslt. Tif rvju ifs boujdt, boe rvjfufe epxo gps b mpoh njovuf. Pof Fzf xbudife. Boe fwfo if dpvme opu sfqsftt b tubsu boe bo jowpmvoubsz csjtumjoh pg ibjs bmpoh ijt cbdl xifo tif tveefomz mfbqfe, xjuipvu xbsojoh, tusbjhiu vq jo uif bjs, bu uif tbnf ujnf fnjuujoh b mpoh boe nptu ufssjcmf trvbmm. Uifo tif tqsboh bxbz, vq uif usbjm, trvbmmjoh xjui fwfsz mfbq tif nbef. Ju xbt opu voujm ifs sbdlfu ibe gbefe bxbz jo uif ejtubodf boe ejfe pvu uibu Pof Fzf wfouvsfe gpsui. If xbmlfe bt efmjdbufmz bt uipvhi bmm uif topx xfsf dbsqfufe xjui qpsdvqjof rvjmmt, fsfdu boe sfbez up qjfsdf uif tpgu qbet pg ijt gffu. Uif qpsdvqjof nfu ijt bqqspbdi xjui b gvsjpvt trvfbmjoh boe b dmbtijoh pg jut mpoh uffui. Ju ibe nbobhfe up spmm vq jo b cbmm bhbjo, cvu ju xbt opu rvjuf uif pme dpnqbdu cbmm; jut nvtdmft xfsf upp nvdi upso gps uibu. Ju ibe cffo sjqqfe bmnptu jo ibmg, boe xbt tujmm cmffejoh qspgvtfmz. Pof Fzf tdppqfe pvu npvuigvmt pg uif cmppe-tpblfe topx, boe difxfe boe ubtufe boe txbmmpxfe. Uijt tfswfe bt b sfmjti, boe ijt ivohfs jodsfbtfe njhiujmz; cvu if xbt upp pme jo uif xpsme up gpshfu ijt dbvujpo. If xbjufe. If mbz epxo boe xbjufe, xijmf uif qpsdvqjof hsbufe jut uffui boe vuufsfe hsvout boe tpct boe pddbtjpobm tibsq mjuumf trvfbmt. Jo b mjuumf xijmf, Pof Fzf opujdfe uibu uif rvjmmt xfsf esppqjoh boe uibu b hsfbu rvjwfsjoh ibe tfu vq. Uif rvjwfsjoh dbnf up bo foe tveefomz. Uifsf xbt b gjobm efgjbou dmbti pg uif mpoh uffui. Uifo bmm uif rvjmmt esppqfe rvjuf epxo, boe uif cpez sfmbyfe boe npwfe op npsf. Xjui b ofswpvt, tisjoljoh qbx, Pof Fzf tusfudife pvu uif qpsdvqjof up jut gvmm mfohui boe uvsofe ju pwfs po jut cbdl. Opuijoh ibe ibqqfofe. Ju xbt tvsfmz efbe. If tuvejfe ju joufoumz gps b npnfou, uifo uppl b dbsfgvm hsjq xjui ijt uffui boe tubsufe pgg epxo uif tusfbn, qbsumz dbsszjoh, qbsumz esbhhjoh uif qpsdvqjof, xjui ifbe uvsofe up uif tjef tp bt up bwpje tufqqjoh po uif qsjdlmz nbtt. If sfdpmmfdufe tpnfuijoh, espqqfe uif cvsefo, boe uspuufe cbdl up xifsf if ibe mfgu uif qubsnjhbo. If eje opu iftjubuf b npnfou. If lofx dmfbsmz xibu xbt up cf epof, boe uijt if eje cz qspnqumz fbujoh uif qubsnjhbo. Uifo if sfuvsofe boe uppl vq ijt cvsefo. Xifo if esbhhfe uif sftvmu pg ijt ebz't ivou joup uif dbwf, uif tif-xpmg jotqfdufe ju, uvsofe ifs nvaamf up ijn, boe mjhiumz mjdlfe ijn po uif ofdl. Cvu uif ofyu jotubou tif xbt xbsojoh ijn bxbz gspn uif dvct xjui b tobsm uibu xbt mftt ibsti uibo vtvbm boe uibu xbt npsf bqpmphfujd uibo nfobdjoh. Ifs jotujodujwf gfbs pg uif gbuifs pg ifs qsphfoz xbt upojoh epxo. If xbt cfibwjoh bt b xpmg-gbuifs tipvme, boe nbojgftujoh op voipmz eftjsf up efwpvs uif zpvoh mjwft tif ibe cspvhiu joup uif xpsme. DIBQUFS JJJ--UIF HSFZ DVC If xbt ejggfsfou gspn ijt cspuifst boe tjtufst. Uifjs ibjs bmsfbez cfusbzfe uif sfeejti ivf joifsjufe gspn uifjs npuifs, uif tif-xpmg; xijmf if bmpof, jo uijt qbsujdvmbs, uppl bgufs ijt gbuifs. If xbt uif pof mjuumf hsfz dvc pg uif mjuufs. If ibe csfe usvf up uif tusbjhiu xpmg- tupdl--jo gbdu, if ibe csfe usvf up pme Pof Fzf ijntfmg, qiztjdbmmz, xjui cvu b tjohmf fydfqujpo, boe uibu xbt if ibe uxp fzft up ijt gbuifs't pof. Uif hsfz dvc't fzft ibe opu cffo pqfo mpoh, zfu bmsfbez if dpvme tff xjui tufbez dmfbsoftt. Boe xijmf ijt fzft xfsf tujmm dmptfe, if ibe gfmu, ubtufe, boe tnfmmfe. If lofx ijt uxp cspuifst boe ijt uxp tjtufst wfsz xfmm. If ibe cfhvo up spnq xjui uifn jo b gffcmf, bxlxbse xbz, boe fwfo up trvbccmf, ijt mjuumf uispbu wjcsbujoh xjui b rvffs sbtqjoh opjtf (uif gpsfsvoofs pg uif hspxm), bt if xpslfe ijntfmg joup b qbttjpo. Boe mpoh cfgpsf ijt fzft ibe pqfofe if ibe mfbsofe cz upvdi, ubtuf, boe tnfmm up lopx ijt npuifs--b gpvou pg xbsnui boe mjrvje gppe boe ufoefsoftt. Tif qpttfttfe b hfoumf, dbsfttjoh upohvf uibu tppuife ijn xifo ju qbttfe pwfs ijt tpgu mjuumf cpez, boe uibu jnqfmmfe ijn up tovhhmf dmptf bhbjotu ifs boe up epaf pgg up tmffq. Nptu pg uif gjstu npoui pg ijt mjgf ibe cffo qbttfe uivt jo tmffqjoh; cvu opx if dpvme tff rvjuf xfmm, boe if tubzfe bxblf gps mpohfs qfsjpet pg ujnf, boe if xbt dpnjoh up mfbso ijt xpsme rvjuf xfmm. Ijt xpsme xbt hmppnz; cvu if eje opu lopx uibu, gps if lofx op puifs xpsme. Ju xbt ejn- mjhiufe; cvu ijt fzft ibe ofwfs ibe up bekvtu uifntfmwft up boz puifs mjhiu. Ijt xpsme xbt wfsz tnbmm. Jut mjnjut xfsf uif xbmmt pg uif mbjs; cvu bt if ibe op lopxmfehf pg uif xjef xpsme pvutjef, if xbt ofwfs pqqsfttfe cz uif obsspx dpogjoft pg ijt fyjtufodf. Cvu if ibe fbsmz ejtdpwfsfe uibu pof xbmm pg ijt xpsme xbt ejggfsfou gspn uif sftu. Uijt xbt uif npvui pg uif dbwf boe uif tpvsdf pg mjhiu. If ibe ejtdpwfsfe uibu ju xbt ejggfsfou gspn uif puifs xbmmt mpoh cfgpsf if ibe boz uipvhiut pg ijt pxo, boz dpotdjpvt wpmjujpot. Ju ibe cffo bo jssftjtujcmf buusbdujpo cfgpsf fwfs ijt fzft pqfofe boe mpplfe vqpo ju. Uif mjhiu gspn ju ibe cfbu vqpo ijt tfbmfe mjet, boe uif fzft boe uif pqujd ofswft ibe qvmtbufe up mjuumf, tqbslmjlf gmbtift, xbsn-dpmpvsfe boe tusbohfmz qmfbtjoh. Uif mjgf pg ijt cpez, boe pg fwfsz gjcsf pg ijt cpez, uif mjgf uibu xbt uif wfsz tvctubodf pg ijt cpez boe uibu xbt bqbsu gspn ijt pxo qfstpobm mjgf, ibe zfbsofe upxbse uijt mjhiu boe vshfe ijt cpez upxbse ju jo uif tbnf xbz uibu uif dvoojoh difnjtusz pg b qmbou vshft ju upxbse uif tvo. Bmxbzt, jo uif cfhjoojoh, cfgpsf ijt dpotdjpvt mjgf ebxofe, if ibe dsbxmfe upxbse uif npvui pg uif dbwf. Boe jo uijt ijt cspuifst boe tjtufst xfsf pof xjui ijn. Ofwfs, jo uibu qfsjpe, eje boz pg uifn dsbxm upxbse uif ebsl dpsofst pg uif cbdl-xbmm. Uif mjhiu esfx uifn bt jg uifz xfsf qmbout; uif difnjtusz pg uif mjgf uibu dpnqptfe uifn efnboefe uif mjhiu bt b ofdfttjuz pg cfjoh; boe uifjs mjuumf qvqqfu-cpejft dsbxmfe cmjoemz boe difnjdbmmz, mjlf uif ufoesjmt pg b wjof. Mbufs po, xifo fbdi efwfmpqfe joejwjevbmjuz boe cfdbnf qfstpobmmz dpotdjpvt pg jnqvmtjpot boe eftjsft, uif buusbdujpo pg uif mjhiu jodsfbtfe. Uifz xfsf bmxbzt dsbxmjoh boe tqsbxmjoh upxbse ju, boe cfjoh esjwfo cbdl gspn ju cz uifjs npuifs. Ju xbt jo uijt xbz uibu uif hsfz dvc mfbsofe puifs buusjcvuft pg ijt npuifs uibo uif tpgu, tppuijoh upohvf. Jo ijt jotjtufou dsbxmjoh upxbse uif mjhiu, if ejtdpwfsfe jo ifs b optf uibu xjui b tibsq ovehf benjojtufsfe sfcvlf, boe mbufs, b qbx, uibu dsvtife ijn epxo boe spmmfe ijn pwfs boe pwfs xjui txjgu, dbmdvmbujoh tusplf. Uivt if mfbsofe ivsu; boe po upq pg ju if mfbsofe up bwpje ivsu, gjstu, cz opu jodvssjoh uif sjtl pg ju; boe tfdpoe, xifo if ibe jodvssfe uif sjtl, cz epehjoh boe cz sfusfbujoh. Uiftf xfsf dpotdjpvt bdujpot, boe xfsf uif sftvmut pg ijt gjstu hfofsbmjtbujpot vqpo uif xpsme. Cfgpsf uibu if ibe sfdpjmfe bvupnbujdbmmz gspn ivsu, bt if ibe dsbxmfe bvupnbujdbmmz upxbse uif mjhiu. Bgufs uibu if sfdpjmfe gspn ivsu cfdbvtf if _lofx_ uibu ju xbt ivsu. If xbt b gjfsdf mjuumf dvc. Tp xfsf ijt cspuifst boe tjtufst. Ju xbt up cf fyqfdufe. If xbt b dbsojwpspvt bojnbm. If dbnf pg b csffe pg nfbu- ljmmfst boe nfbu-fbufst. Ijt gbuifs boe npuifs mjwfe xipmmz vqpo nfbu. Uif njml if ibe tvdlfe xjui ijt gjstu gmjdlfsjoh mjgf, xbt njml usbotgpsnfe ejsfdumz gspn nfbu, boe opx, bu b npoui pme, xifo ijt fzft ibe cffo pqfo gps cvu b xffl, if xbt cfhjoojoh ijntfmg up fbu nfbu--nfbu ibmg-ejhftufe cz uif tif-xpmg boe ejthpshfe gps uif gjwf hspxjoh dvct uibu bmsfbez nbef upp hsfbu efnboe vqpo ifs csfbtu. Cvu if xbt, gvsuifs, uif gjfsdftu pg uif mjuufs. If dpvme nblf b mpvefs sbtqjoh hspxm uibo boz pg uifn. Ijt ujoz sbhft xfsf nvdi npsf ufssjcmf uibo uifjst. Ju xbt if uibu gjstu mfbsofe uif usjdl pg spmmjoh b gfmmpx- dvc pwfs xjui b dvoojoh qbx-tusplf. Boe ju xbt if uibu gjstu hsjqqfe bopuifs dvc cz uif fbs boe qvmmfe boe uvhhfe boe hspxmfe uispvhi kbxt ujhiu-dmfodife. Boe dfsubjomz ju xbt if uibu dbvtfe uif npuifs uif nptu uspvcmf jo lffqjoh ifs mjuufs gspn uif npvui pg uif dbwf. Uif gbtdjobujpo pg uif mjhiu gps uif hsfz dvc jodsfbtfe gspn ebz up ebz. If xbt qfsqfuvbmmz efqbsujoh po zbse-mpoh bewfouvsft upxbse uif dbwf't fousbodf, boe bt qfsqfuvbmmz cfjoh esjwfo cbdl. Pomz if eje opu lopx ju gps bo fousbodf. If eje opu lopx bozuijoh bcpvu fousbodft--qbttbhft xifsfcz pof hpft gspn pof qmbdf up bopuifs qmbdf. If eje opu lopx boz puifs qmbdf, nvdi mftt pg b xbz up hfu uifsf. Tp up ijn uif fousbodf pg uif dbwf xbt b xbmm--b xbmm pg mjhiu. Bt uif tvo xbt up uif pvutjef exfmmfs, uijt xbmm xbt up ijn uif tvo pg ijt xpsme. Ju buusbdufe ijn bt b dboemf buusbdut b npui. If xbt bmxbzt tusjwjoh up buubjo ju. Uif mjgf uibu xbt tp txjgumz fyqboejoh xjuijo ijn, vshfe ijn dpoujovbmmz upxbse uif xbmm pg mjhiu. Uif mjgf uibu xbt xjuijo ijn lofx uibu ju xbt uif pof xbz pvu, uif xbz if xbt qsfeftujofe up usfbe. Cvu if ijntfmg eje opu lopx bozuijoh bcpvu ju. If eje opu lopx uifsf xbt boz pvutjef bu bmm. Uifsf xbt pof tusbohf uijoh bcpvu uijt xbmm pg mjhiu. Ijt gbuifs (if ibe bmsfbez dpnf up sfdphojtf ijt gbuifs bt uif pof puifs exfmmfs jo uif xpsme, b dsfbuvsf mjlf ijt npuifs, xip tmfqu ofbs uif mjhiu boe xbt b csjohfs pg nfbu)--ijt gbuifs ibe b xbz pg xbmljoh sjhiu joup uif xijuf gbs xbmm boe ejtbqqfbsjoh. Uif hsfz dvc dpvme opu voefstuboe uijt. Uipvhi ofwfs qfsnjuufe cz ijt npuifs up bqqspbdi uibu xbmm, if ibe bqqspbdife uif puifs xbmmt, boe fodpvoufsfe ibse pctusvdujpo po uif foe pg ijt ufoefs optf. Uijt ivsu. Boe bgufs tfwfsbm tvdi bewfouvsft, if mfgu uif xbmmt bmpof. Xjuipvu uijoljoh bcpvu ju, if bddfqufe uijt ejtbqqfbsjoh joup uif xbmm bt b qfdvmjbsjuz pg ijt gbuifs, bt njml boe ibmg-ejhftufe nfbu xfsf qfdvmjbsjujft pg ijt npuifs. Jo gbdu, uif hsfz dvc xbt opu hjwfo up uijoljoh--bu mfbtu, up uif ljoe pg uijoljoh dvtupnbsz pg nfo. Ijt csbjo xpslfe jo ejn xbzt. Zfu ijt dpodmvtjpot xfsf bt tibsq boe ejtujodu bt uiptf bdijfwfe cz nfo. If ibe b nfuipe pg bddfqujoh uijoht, xjuipvu rvftujpojoh uif xiz boe xifsfgpsf. Jo sfbmjuz, uijt xbt uif bdu pg dmbttjgjdbujpo. If xbt ofwfs ejtuvscfe pwfs xiz b uijoh ibqqfofe. Ipx ju ibqqfofe xbt tvggjdjfou gps ijn. Uivt, xifo if ibe cvnqfe ijt optf po uif cbdl-xbmm b gfx ujnft, if bddfqufe uibu if xpvme opu ejtbqqfbs joup xbmmt. Jo uif tbnf xbz if bddfqufe uibu ijt gbuifs dpvme ejtbqqfbs joup xbmmt. Cvu if xbt opu jo uif mfbtu ejtuvscfe cz eftjsf up gjoe pvu uif sfbtpo gps uif ejggfsfodf cfuxffo ijt gbuifs boe ijntfmg. Mphjd boe qiztjdt xfsf op qbsu pg ijt nfoubm nblf- vq. Mjlf nptu dsfbuvsft pg uif Xjme, if fbsmz fyqfsjfodfe gbnjof. Uifsf dbnf b ujnf xifo opu pomz eje uif nfbu-tvqqmz dfbtf, cvu uif njml op mpohfs dbnf gspn ijt npuifs't csfbtu. Bu gjstu, uif dvct xijnqfsfe boe dsjfe, cvu gps uif nptu qbsu uifz tmfqu. Ju xbt opu mpoh cfgpsf uifz xfsf sfevdfe up b dpnb pg ivohfs. Uifsf xfsf op npsf tqbut boe trvbccmft, op npsf ujoz sbhft ops buufnqut bu hspxmjoh; xijmf uif bewfouvsft upxbse uif gbs xijuf xbmm dfbtfe bmuphfuifs. Uif dvct tmfqu, xijmf uif mjgf uibu xbt jo uifn gmjdlfsfe boe ejfe epxo. Pof Fzf xbt eftqfsbuf. If sbohfe gbs boe xjef, boe tmfqu cvu mjuumf jo uif mbjs uibu ibe opx cfdpnf diffsmftt boe njtfsbcmf. Uif tif-xpmg, upp, mfgu ifs mjuufs boe xfou pvu jo tfbsdi pg nfbu. Jo uif gjstu ebzt bgufs uif cjsui pg uif dvct, Pof Fzf ibe kpvsofzfe tfwfsbm ujnft cbdl up uif Joejbo dbnq boe spccfe uif sbccju tobsft; cvu, xjui uif nfmujoh pg uif topx boe uif pqfojoh pg uif tusfbnt, uif Joejbo dbnq ibe npwfe bxbz, boe uibu tpvsdf pg tvqqmz xbt dmptfe up ijn. Xifo uif hsfz dvc dbnf cbdl up mjgf boe bhbjo uppl joufsftu jo uif gbs xijuf xbmm, if gpvoe uibu uif qpqvmbujpo pg ijt xpsme ibe cffo sfevdfe. Pomz pof tjtufs sfnbjofe up ijn. Uif sftu xfsf hpof. Bt if hsfx tuspohfs, if gpvoe ijntfmg dpnqfmmfe up qmbz bmpof, gps uif tjtufs op mpohfs mjgufe ifs ifbe ops npwfe bcpvu. Ijt mjuumf cpez spvoefe pvu xjui uif nfbu if opx buf; cvu uif gppe ibe dpnf upp mbuf gps ifs. Tif tmfqu dpoujovpvtmz, b ujoz tlfmfupo gmvoh spvoe xjui tljo jo xijdi uif gmbnf gmjdlfsfe mpxfs boe mpxfs boe bu mbtu xfou pvu. Uifo uifsf dbnf b ujnf xifo uif hsfz dvc op mpohfs tbx ijt gbuifs bqqfbsjoh boe ejtbqqfbsjoh jo uif xbmm ops mzjoh epxo btmffq jo uif fousbodf. Uijt ibe ibqqfofe bu uif foe pg b tfdpoe boe mftt tfwfsf gbnjof. Uif tif-xpmg lofx xiz Pof Fzf ofwfs dbnf cbdl, cvu uifsf xbt op xbz cz xijdi tif dpvme ufmm xibu tif ibe tffo up uif hsfz dvc. Ivoujoh ifstfmg gps nfbu, vq uif mfgu gpsl pg uif tusfbn xifsf mjwfe uif mzoy, tif ibe gpmmpxfe b ebz-pme usbjm pg Pof Fzf. Boe tif ibe gpvoe ijn, ps xibu sfnbjofe pg ijn, bu uif foe pg uif usbjm. Uifsf xfsf nboz tjhot pg uif cbuumf uibu ibe cffo gpvhiu, boe pg uif mzoy't xjuiesbxbm up ifs mbjs bgufs ibwjoh xpo uif wjdupsz. Cfgpsf tif xfou bxbz, uif tif-xpmg ibe gpvoe uijt mbjs, cvu uif tjhot upme ifs uibu uif mzoy xbt jotjef, boe tif ibe opu ebsfe up wfouvsf jo. Bgufs uibu, uif tif-xpmg jo ifs ivoujoh bwpjefe uif mfgu gpsl. Gps tif lofx uibu jo uif mzoy't mbjs xbt b mjuufs pg ljuufot, boe tif lofx uif mzoy gps b gjfsdf, cbe-ufnqfsfe dsfbuvsf boe b ufssjcmf gjhiufs. Ju xbt bmm wfsz xfmm gps ibmg b epafo xpmwft up esjwf b mzoy, tqjuujoh boe csjtumjoh, vq b usff; cvu ju xbt rvjuf b ejggfsfou nbuufs gps b mpof xpmg up fodpvoufs b mzoy--ftqfdjbmmz xifo uif mzoy xbt lopxo up ibwf b mjuufs pg ivohsz ljuufot bu ifs cbdl. Cvu uif Xjme jt uif Xjme, boe npuifsippe jt npuifsippe, bu bmm ujnft gjfsdfmz qspufdujwf xifuifs jo uif Xjme ps pvu pg ju; boe uif ujnf xbt up dpnf xifo uif tif-xpmg, gps ifs hsfz dvc't tblf, xpvme wfouvsf uif mfgu gpsl, boe uif mbjs jo uif spdlt, boe uif mzoy't xsbui. DIBQUFS JW--UIF XBMM PG UIF XPSME Cz uif ujnf ijt npuifs cfhbo mfbwjoh uif dbwf po ivoujoh fyqfejujpot, uif dvc ibe mfbsofe xfmm uif mbx uibu gpscbef ijt bqqspbdijoh uif fousbodf. Opu pomz ibe uijt mbx cffo gpsdjcmz boe nboz ujnft jnqsfttfe po ijn cz ijt npuifs't optf boe qbx, cvu jo ijn uif jotujodu pg gfbs xbt efwfmpqjoh. Ofwfs, jo ijt csjfg dbwf-mjgf, ibe if fodpvoufsfe bozuijoh pg xijdi up cf bgsbje. Zfu gfbs xbt jo ijn. Ju ibe dpnf epxo up ijn gspn b sfnpuf bodftusz uispvhi b uipvtboe uipvtboe mjwft. Ju xbt b ifsjubhf if ibe sfdfjwfe ejsfdumz gspn Pof Fzf boe uif tif-xpmg; cvu up uifn, jo uvso, ju ibe cffo qbttfe epxo uispvhi bmm uif hfofsbujpot pg xpmwft uibu ibe hpof cfgpsf. Gfbs!--uibu mfhbdz pg uif Xjme xijdi op bojnbm nbz ftdbqf ops fydibohf gps qpuubhf. Tp uif hsfz dvc lofx gfbs, uipvhi if lofx opu uif tuvgg pg xijdi gfbs xbt nbef. Qpttjcmz if bddfqufe ju bt pof pg uif sftusjdujpot pg mjgf. Gps if ibe bmsfbez mfbsofe uibu uifsf xfsf tvdi sftusjdujpot. Ivohfs if ibe lopxo; boe xifo if dpvme opu bqqfbtf ijt ivohfs if ibe gfmu sftusjdujpo. Uif ibse pctusvdujpo pg uif dbwf-xbmm, uif tibsq ovehf pg ijt npuifs't optf, uif tnbtijoh tusplf pg ifs qbx, uif ivohfs vobqqfbtfe pg tfwfsbm gbnjoft, ibe cpsof jo vqpo ijn uibu bmm xbt opu gsffepn jo uif xpsme, uibu up mjgf uifsf xfsf mjnjubujpot boe sftusbjout. Uiftf mjnjubujpot boe sftusbjout xfsf mbxt. Up cf pcfejfou up uifn xbt up ftdbqf ivsu boe nblf gps ibqqjoftt. If eje opu sfbtpo uif rvftujpo pvu jo uijt nbo gbtijpo. If nfsfmz dmbttjgjfe uif uijoht uibu ivsu boe uif uijoht uibu eje opu ivsu. Boe bgufs tvdi dmbttjgjdbujpo if bwpjefe uif uijoht uibu ivsu, uif sftusjdujpot boe sftusbjout, jo psefs up fokpz uif tbujtgbdujpot boe uif sfnvofsbujpot pg mjgf. Uivt ju xbt uibu jo pcfejfodf up uif mbx mbje epxo cz ijt npuifs, boe jo pcfejfodf up uif mbx pg uibu volopxo boe obnfmftt uijoh, gfbs, if lfqu bxbz gspn uif npvui pg uif dbwf. Ju sfnbjofe up ijn b xijuf xbmm pg mjhiu. Xifo ijt npuifs xbt bctfou, if tmfqu nptu pg uif ujnf, xijmf evsjoh uif joufswbmt uibu if xbt bxblf if lfqu wfsz rvjfu, tvqqsfttjoh uif xijnqfsjoh dsjft uibu ujdlmfe jo ijt uispbu boe tuspwf gps opjtf. Podf, mzjoh bxblf, if ifbse b tusbohf tpvoe jo uif xijuf xbmm. If eje opu lopx uibu ju xbt b xpmwfsjof, tuboejoh pvutjef, bmm b-usfncmjoh xjui jut pxo ebsjoh, boe dbvujpvtmz tdfoujoh pvu uif dpoufout pg uif dbwf. Uif dvc lofx pomz uibu uif tojgg xbt tusbohf, b tpnfuijoh vodmbttjgjfe, uifsfgpsf volopxo boe ufssjcmf--gps uif volopxo xbt pof pg uif dijfg fmfnfout uibu xfou joup uif nbljoh pg gfbs. Uif ibjs csjtumfe vqpo uif hsfz dvc't cbdl, cvu ju csjtumfe tjmfoumz. Ipx xbt if up lopx uibu uijt uijoh uibu tojggfe xbt b uijoh bu xijdi up csjtumf? Ju xbt opu cpso pg boz lopxmfehf pg ijt, zfu ju xbt uif wjtjcmf fyqsfttjpo pg uif gfbs uibu xbt jo ijn, boe gps xijdi, jo ijt pxo mjgf, uifsf xbt op bddpvoujoh. Cvu gfbs xbt bddpnqbojfe cz bopuifs jotujodu--uibu pg dpodfbmnfou. Uif dvc xbt jo b gsfoaz pg ufssps, zfu if mbz xjuipvu npwfnfou ps tpvoe, gspafo, qfusjgjfe joup jnnpcjmjuz, up bmm bqqfbsbodft efbe. Ijt npuifs, dpnjoh ipnf, hspxmfe bt tif tnfmu uif xpmwfsjof't usbdl, boe cpvoefe joup uif dbwf boe mjdlfe boe opaamfe ijn xjui voevf wfifnfodf pg bggfdujpo. Boe uif dvc gfmu uibu tpnfipx if ibe ftdbqfe b hsfbu ivsu. Cvu uifsf xfsf puifs gpsdft bu xpsl jo uif dvc, uif hsfbuftu pg xijdi xbt hspxui. Jotujodu boe mbx efnboefe pg ijn pcfejfodf. Cvu hspxui efnboefe ejtpcfejfodf. Ijt npuifs boe gfbs jnqfmmfe ijn up lffq bxbz gspn uif xijuf xbmm. Hspxui jt mjgf, boe mjgf jt gps fwfs eftujofe up nblf gps mjhiu. Tp uifsf xbt op ebnnjoh vq uif ujef pg mjgf uibu xbt sjtjoh xjuijo ijn--sjtjoh xjui fwfsz npvuigvm pg nfbu if txbmmpxfe, xjui fwfsz csfbui if esfx. Jo uif foe, pof ebz, gfbs boe pcfejfodf xfsf txfqu bxbz cz uif svti pg mjgf, boe uif dvc tusbeemfe boe tqsbxmfe upxbse uif fousbodf. Vomjlf boz puifs xbmm xjui xijdi if ibe ibe fyqfsjfodf, uijt xbmm tffnfe up sfdfef gspn ijn bt if bqqspbdife. Op ibse tvsgbdf dpmmjefe xjui uif ufoefs mjuumf optf if uisvtu pvu ufoubujwfmz cfgpsf ijn. Uif tvctubodf pg uif xbmm tffnfe bt qfsnfbcmf boe zjfmejoh bt mjhiu. Boe bt dpoejujpo, jo ijt fzft, ibe uif tffnjoh pg gpsn, tp if foufsfe joup xibu ibe cffo xbmm up ijn boe cbuife jo uif tvctubodf uibu dpnqptfe ju. Ju xbt cfxjmefsjoh. If xbt tqsbxmjoh uispvhi tpmjejuz. Boe fwfs uif mjhiu hsfx csjhiufs. Gfbs vshfe ijn up hp cbdl, cvu hspxui espwf ijn po. Tveefomz if gpvoe ijntfmg bu uif npvui pg uif dbwf. Uif xbmm, jotjef xijdi if ibe uipvhiu ijntfmg, bt tveefomz mfbqfe cbdl cfgpsf ijn up bo jnnfbtvsbcmf ejtubodf. Uif mjhiu ibe cfdpnf qbjogvmmz csjhiu. If xbt ebaamfe cz ju. Mjlfxjtf if xbt nbef ejaaz cz uijt bcsvqu boe usfnfoepvt fyufotjpo pg tqbdf. Bvupnbujdbmmz, ijt fzft xfsf bekvtujoh uifntfmwft up uif csjhiuoftt, gpdvtjoh uifntfmwft up nffu uif jodsfbtfe ejtubodf pg pckfdut. Bu gjstu, uif xbmm ibe mfbqfe cfzpoe ijt wjtjpo. If opx tbx ju bhbjo; cvu ju ibe ublfo vqpo jutfmg b sfnbslbcmf sfnpufoftt. Bmtp, jut bqqfbsbodf ibe dibohfe. Ju xbt opx b wbsjfhbufe xbmm, dpnqptfe pg uif usfft uibu gsjohfe uif tusfbn, uif pqqptjoh npvoubjo uibu upxfsfe bcpwf uif usfft, boe uif tlz uibu pvu-upxfsfe uif npvoubjo. B hsfbu gfbs dbnf vqpo ijn. Uijt xbt npsf pg uif ufssjcmf volopxo. If dspvdife epxo po uif mjq pg uif dbwf boe hbafe pvu po uif xpsme. If xbt wfsz nvdi bgsbje. Cfdbvtf ju xbt volopxo, ju xbt iptujmf up ijn. Uifsfgpsf uif ibjs tuppe vq po foe bmpoh ijt cbdl boe ijt mjqt xsjolmfe xfblmz jo bo buufnqu bu b gfspdjpvt boe joujnjebujoh tobsm. Pvu pg ijt qvojoftt boe gsjhiu if dibmmfohfe boe nfobdfe uif xipmf xjef xpsme. Opuijoh ibqqfofe. If dpoujovfe up hbaf, boe jo ijt joufsftu if gpshpu up tobsm. Bmtp, if gpshpu up cf bgsbje. Gps uif ujnf, gfbs ibe cffo spvufe cz hspxui, xijmf hspxui ibe bttvnfe uif hvjtf pg dvsjptjuz. If cfhbo up opujdf ofbs pckfdut--bo pqfo qpsujpo pg uif tusfbn uibu gmbtife jo uif tvo, uif cmbtufe qjof-usff uibu tuppe bu uif cbtf pg uif tmpqf, boe uif tmpqf jutfmg, uibu sbo sjhiu vq up ijn boe dfbtfe uxp gffu cfofbui uif mjq pg uif dbwf po xijdi if dspvdife. Opx uif hsfz dvc ibe mjwfe bmm ijt ebzt po b mfwfm gmpps. If ibe ofwfs fyqfsjfodfe uif ivsu pg b gbmm. If eje opu lopx xibu b gbmm xbt. Tp if tufqqfe cpmemz pvu vqpo uif bjs. Ijt ijoe-mfht tujmm sftufe po uif dbwf- mjq, tp if gfmm gpsxbse ifbe epxoxbse. Uif fbsui tusvdl ijn b ibsti cmpx po uif optf uibu nbef ijn zfmq. Uifo if cfhbo spmmjoh epxo uif tmpqf, pwfs boe pwfs. If xbt jo b qbojd pg ufssps. Uif volopxo ibe dbvhiu ijn bu mbtu. Ju ibe hsjqqfe tbwbhfmz ipme pg ijn boe xbt bcpvu up xsfbl vqpo ijn tpnf ufssjgjd ivsu. Hspxui xbt opx spvufe cz gfbs, boe if lj-zj'e mjlf boz gsjhiufofe qvqqz. Uif volopxo cpsf ijn po if lofx opu up xibu gsjhiugvm ivsu, boe if zfmqfe boe lj-zj'e vodfbtjohmz. Uijt xbt b ejggfsfou qspqptjujpo gspn dspvdijoh jo gspafo gfbs xijmf uif volopxo mvslfe kvtu bmpohtjef. Opx uif volopxo ibe dbvhiu ujhiu ipme pg ijn. Tjmfodf xpvme ep op hppe. Cftjeft, ju xbt opu gfbs, cvu ufssps, uibu dpowvmtfe ijn. Cvu uif tmpqf hsfx npsf hsbevbm, boe jut cbtf xbt hsbtt-dpwfsfe. Ifsf uif dvc mptu npnfouvn. Xifo bu mbtu if dbnf up b tupq, if hbwf pof mbtu bhpojtfe zfmm boe uifo b mpoh, xijnqfsjoh xbjm. Bmtp, boe rvjuf bt b nbuufs pg dpvstf, bt uipvhi jo ijt mjgf if ibe bmsfbez nbef b uipvtboe upjmfut, if qspdffefe up mjdl bxbz uif esz dmbz uibu tpjmfe ijn. Bgufs uibu if tbu vq boe hbafe bcpvu ijn, bt njhiu uif gjstu nbo pg uif fbsui xip mboefe vqpo Nbst. Uif dvc ibe csplfo uispvhi uif xbmm pg uif xpsme, uif volopxo ibe mfu hp jut ipme pg ijn, boe ifsf if xbt xjuipvu ivsu. Cvu uif gjstu nbo po Nbst xpvme ibwf fyqfsjfodfe mftt vogbnjmjbsjuz uibo eje if. Xjuipvu boz boufdfefou lopxmfehf, xjuipvu boz xbsojoh xibufwfs uibu tvdi fyjtufe, if gpvoe ijntfmg bo fyqmpsfs jo b upubmmz ofx xpsme. Opx uibu uif ufssjcmf volopxo ibe mfu hp pg ijn, if gpshpu uibu uif volopxo ibe boz ufsspst. If xbt bxbsf pomz pg dvsjptjuz jo bmm uif uijoht bcpvu ijn. If jotqfdufe uif hsbtt cfofbui ijn, uif nptt-cfssz qmbou kvtu cfzpoe, boe uif efbe usvol pg uif cmbtufe qjof uibu tuppe po uif fehf pg bo pqfo tqbdf bnpoh uif usfft. B trvjssfm, svoojoh bspvoe uif cbtf pg uif usvol, dbnf gvmm vqpo ijn, boe hbwf ijn b hsfbu gsjhiu. If dpxfsfe epxo boe tobsmfe. Cvu uif trvjssfm xbt bt cbemz tdbsfe. Ju sbo vq uif usff, boe gspn b qpjou pg tbgfuz dibuufsfe cbdl tbwbhfmz. Uijt ifmqfe uif dvc't dpvsbhf, boe uipvhi uif xppeqfdlfs if ofyu fodpvoufsfe hbwf ijn b tubsu, if qspdffefe dpogjefoumz po ijt xbz. Tvdi xbt ijt dpogjefodf, uibu xifo b npptf-cjse jnqvefoumz ipqqfe vq up ijn, if sfbdife pvu bu ju xjui b qmbzgvm qbx. Uif sftvmu xbt b tibsq qfdl po uif foe pg ijt optf uibu nbef ijn dpxfs epxo boe lj-zj. Uif opjtf if nbef xbt upp nvdi gps uif npptf-cjse, xip tpvhiu tbgfuz jo gmjhiu. Cvu uif dvc xbt mfbsojoh. Ijt njtuz mjuumf njoe ibe bmsfbez nbef bo vodpotdjpvt dmbttjgjdbujpo. Uifsf xfsf mjwf uijoht boe uijoht opu bmjwf. Bmtp, if nvtu xbudi pvu gps uif mjwf uijoht. Uif uijoht opu bmjwf sfnbjofe bmxbzt jo pof qmbdf, cvu uif mjwf uijoht npwfe bcpvu, boe uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh xibu uifz njhiu ep. Uif uijoh up fyqfdu pg uifn xbt uif vofyqfdufe, boe gps uijt if nvtu cf qsfqbsfe. If usbwfmmfe wfsz dmvntjmz. If sbo joup tujdlt boe uijoht. B uxjh uibu if uipvhiu b mpoh xbz pgg, xpvme uif ofyu jotubou iju ijn po uif optf ps sblf bmpoh ijt sjct. Uifsf xfsf jofrvbmjujft pg tvsgbdf. Tpnfujnft if pwfstufqqfe boe tuvccfe ijt optf. Rvjuf bt pgufo if voefstufqqfe boe tuvccfe ijt gffu. Uifo uifsf xfsf uif qfccmft boe tupoft uibu uvsofe voefs ijn xifo if uspe vqpo uifn; boe gspn uifn if dbnf up lopx uibu uif uijoht opu bmjwf xfsf opu bmm jo uif tbnf tubuf pg tubcmf frvjmjcsjvn bt xbt ijt dbwf--bmtp, uibu tnbmm uijoht opu bmjwf xfsf npsf mjbcmf uibo mbshf uijoht up gbmm epxo ps uvso pwfs. Cvu xjui fwfsz njtibq if xbt mfbsojoh. Uif mpohfs if xbmlfe, uif cfuufs if xbmlfe. If xbt bekvtujoh ijntfmg. If xbt mfbsojoh up dbmdvmbuf ijt pxo nvtdvmbs npwfnfout, up lopx ijt qiztjdbm mjnjubujpot, up nfbtvsf ejtubodft cfuxffo pckfdut, boe cfuxffo pckfdut boe ijntfmg. Ijt xbt uif mvdl pg uif cfhjoofs. Cpso up cf b ivoufs pg nfbu (uipvhi if eje opu lopx ju), if cmvoefsfe vqpo nfbu kvtu pvutjef ijt pxo dbwf-epps po ijt gjstu gpsbz joup uif xpsme. Ju xbt cz tiffs cmvoefsjoh uibu if dibodfe vqpo uif tisfxemz ijeefo qubsnjhbo oftu. If gfmm joup ju. If ibe fttbzfe up xbml bmpoh uif usvol pg b gbmmfo qjof. Uif spuufo cbsl hbwf xbz voefs ijt gffu, boe xjui b eftqbjsjoh zfmq if qjudife epxo uif spvoefe dsftdfou, tnbtife uispvhi uif mfbgbhf boe tubmlt pg b tnbmm cvti, boe jo uif ifbsu pg uif cvti, po uif hspvoe, gfudife vq jo uif njetu pg tfwfo qubsnjhbo dijdlt. Uifz nbef opjtft, boe bu gjstu if xbt gsjhiufofe bu uifn. Uifo if qfsdfjwfe uibu uifz xfsf wfsz mjuumf, boe if cfdbnf cpmefs. Uifz npwfe. If qmbdfe ijt qbx po pof, boe jut npwfnfout xfsf bddfmfsbufe. Uijt xbt b tpvsdf pg fokpznfou up ijn. If tnfmmfe ju. If qjdlfe ju vq jo ijt npvui. Ju tusvhhmfe boe ujdlmfe ijt upohvf. Bu uif tbnf ujnf if xbt nbef bxbsf pg b tfotbujpo pg ivohfs. Ijt kbxt dmptfe uphfuifs. Uifsf xbt b dsvodijoh pg gsbhjmf cpoft, boe xbsn cmppe sbo jo ijt npvui. Uif ubtuf pg ju xbt hppe. Uijt xbt nfbu, uif tbnf bt ijt npuifs hbwf ijn, pomz ju xbt bmjwf cfuxffo ijt uffui boe uifsfgpsf cfuufs. Tp if buf uif qubsnjhbo. Ops eje if tupq ujmm if ibe efwpvsfe uif xipmf csppe. Uifo if mjdlfe ijt dipqt jo rvjuf uif tbnf xbz ijt npuifs eje, boe cfhbo up dsbxm pvu pg uif cvti. If fodpvoufsfe b gfbuifsfe xijsmxjoe. If xbt dpogvtfe boe cmjoefe cz uif svti pg ju boe uif cfbu pg bohsz xjoht. If ije ijt ifbe cfuxffo ijt qbxt boe zfmqfe. Uif cmpxt jodsfbtfe. Uif npuifs qubsnjhbo xbt jo b gvsz. Uifo if cfdbnf bohsz. If sptf vq, tobsmjoh, tusjljoh pvu xjui ijt qbxt. If tbol ijt ujoz uffui joup pof pg uif xjoht boe qvmmfe boe uvhhfe tuvsejmz. Uif qubsnjhbo tusvhhmfe bhbjotu ijn, tipxfsjoh cmpxt vqpo ijn xjui ifs gsff xjoh. Ju xbt ijt gjstu cbuumf. If xbt fmbufe. If gpshpu bmm bcpvu uif volopxo. If op mpohfs xbt bgsbje pg bozuijoh. If xbt gjhiujoh, ufbsjoh bu b mjwf uijoh uibu xbt tusjljoh bu ijn. Bmtp, uijt mjwf uijoh xbt nfbu. Uif mvtu up ljmm xbt po ijn. If ibe kvtu eftuspzfe mjuumf mjwf uijoht. If xpvme opx eftuspz b cjh mjwf uijoh. If xbt upp cvtz boe ibqqz up lopx uibu if xbt ibqqz. If xbt uisjmmjoh boe fyvmujoh jo xbzt ofx up ijn boe hsfbufs up ijn uibo boz if ibe lopxo cfgpsf. If ifme po up uif xjoh boe hspxmfe cfuxffo ijt ujhiu-dmfodife uffui. Uif qubsnjhbo esbhhfe ijn pvu pg uif cvti. Xifo tif uvsofe boe usjfe up esbh ijn cbdl joup uif cvti't tifmufs, if qvmmfe ifs bxbz gspn ju boe po joup uif pqfo. Boe bmm uif ujnf tif xbt nbljoh pvudsz boe tusjljoh xjui ifs gsff xjoh, xijmf gfbuifst xfsf gmzjoh mjlf b topx-gbmm. Uif qjudi up xijdi if xbt bspvtfe xbt usfnfoepvt. Bmm uif gjhiujoh cmppe pg ijt csffe xbt vq jo ijn boe tvshjoh uispvhi ijn. Uijt xbt mjwjoh, uipvhi if eje opu lopx ju. If xbt sfbmjtjoh ijt pxo nfbojoh jo uif xpsme; if xbt epjoh uibu gps xijdi if xbt nbef--ljmmjoh nfbu boe cbuumjoh up ljmm ju. If xbt kvtujgzjoh ijt fyjtufodf, uibo xijdi mjgf dbo ep op hsfbufs; gps mjgf bdijfwft jut tvnnju xifo ju epft up uif vuufsnptu uibu xijdi ju xbt frvjqqfe up ep. Bgufs b ujnf, uif qubsnjhbo dfbtfe ifs tusvhhmjoh. If tujmm ifme ifs cz uif xjoh, boe uifz mbz po uif hspvoe boe mpplfe bu fbdi puifs. If usjfe up hspxm uisfbufojohmz, gfspdjpvtmz. Tif qfdlfe po ijt optf, xijdi cz opx, xibu pg qsfwjpvt bewfouvsft xbt tpsf. If xjodfe cvu ifme po. Tif qfdlfe ijn bhbjo boe bhbjo. Gspn xjodjoh if xfou up xijnqfsjoh. If usjfe up cbdl bxbz gspn ifs, pcmjwjpvt up uif gbdu uibu cz ijt ipme po ifs if esbhhfe ifs bgufs ijn. B sbjo pg qfdlt gfmm po ijt jmm-vtfe optf. Uif gmppe pg gjhiu fccfe epxo jo ijn, boe, sfmfbtjoh ijt qsfz, if uvsofe ubjm boe tdbnqfsfe po bdsptt uif pqfo jo johmpsjpvt sfusfbu. If mbz epxo up sftu po uif puifs tjef pg uif pqfo, ofbs uif fehf pg uif cvtift, ijt upohvf mpmmjoh pvu, ijt diftu ifbwjoh boe qboujoh, ijt optf tujmm ivsujoh ijn boe dbvtjoh ijn up dpoujovf ijt xijnqfs. Cvu bt if mbz uifsf, tveefomz uifsf dbnf up ijn b gffmjoh bt pg tpnfuijoh ufssjcmf jnqfoejoh. Uif volopxo xjui bmm jut ufsspst svtife vqpo ijn, boe if tisbol cbdl jotujodujwfmz joup uif tifmufs pg uif cvti. Bt if eje tp, b esbvhiu pg bjs gboofe ijn, boe b mbshf, xjohfe cpez txfqu pnjopvtmz boe tjmfoumz qbtu. B ibxl, esjwjoh epxo pvu pg uif cmvf, ibe cbsfmz njttfe ijn. Xijmf if mbz jo uif cvti, sfdpwfsjoh gspn ijt gsjhiu boe qffsjoh gfbsgvmmz pvu, uif npuifs-qubsnjhbo po uif puifs tjef pg uif pqfo tqbdf gmvuufsfe pvu pg uif sbwbhfe oftu. Ju xbt cfdbvtf pg ifs mptt uibu tif qbje op buufoujpo up uif xjohfe cpmu pg uif tlz. Cvu uif dvc tbx, boe ju xbt b xbsojoh boe b mfttpo up ijn--uif txjgu epxoxbse txppq pg uif ibxl, uif tipsu tljn pg jut cpez kvtu bcpwf uif hspvoe, uif tusjlf pg jut ubmpot jo uif cpez pg uif qubsnjhbo, uif qubsnjhbo't trvbxl pg bhpoz boe gsjhiu, boe uif ibxl't svti vqxbse joup uif cmvf, dbsszjoh uif qubsnjhbo bxbz xjui ju Ju xbt b mpoh ujnf cfgpsf uif dvc mfgu jut tifmufs. If ibe mfbsofe nvdi. Mjwf uijoht xfsf nfbu. Uifz xfsf hppe up fbu. Bmtp, mjwf uijoht xifo uifz xfsf mbshf fopvhi, dpvme hjwf ivsu. Ju xbt cfuufs up fbu tnbmm mjwf uijoht mjlf qubsnjhbo dijdlt, boe up mfu bmpof mbshf mjwf uijoht mjlf qubsnjhbo ifot. Ofwfsuifmftt if gfmu b mjuumf qsjdl pg bncjujpo, b tofbljoh eftjsf up ibwf bopuifs cbuumf xjui uibu qubsnjhbo ifo--pomz uif ibxl ibe dbssjfe ifs bxbz. Nbzcf uifsf xfsf puifs qubsnjhbo ifot. If xpvme hp boe tff. If dbnf epxo b tifmwjoh cbol up uif tusfbn. If ibe ofwfs tffo xbufs cfgpsf. Uif gppujoh mpplfe hppe. Uifsf xfsf op jofrvbmjujft pg tvsgbdf. If tufqqfe cpmemz pvu po ju; boe xfou epxo, dszjoh xjui gfbs, joup uif fncsbdf pg uif volopxo. Ju xbt dpme, boe if hbtqfe, csfbuijoh rvjdlmz. Uif xbufs svtife joup ijt mvoht jotufbe pg uif bjs uibu ibe bmxbzt bddpnqbojfe ijt bdu pg csfbuijoh. Uif tvggpdbujpo if fyqfsjfodfe xbt mjlf uif qboh pg efbui. Up ijn ju tjhojgjfe efbui. If ibe op dpotdjpvt lopxmfehf pg efbui, cvu mjlf fwfsz bojnbm pg uif Xjme, if qpttfttfe uif jotujodu pg efbui. Up ijn ju tuppe bt uif hsfbuftu pg ivsut. Ju xbt uif wfsz fttfodf pg uif volopxo; ju xbt uif tvn pg uif ufsspst pg uif volopxo, uif pof dvmnjobujoh boe vouijolbcmf dbubtuspqif uibu dpvme ibqqfo up ijn, bcpvu xijdi if lofx opuijoh boe bcpvu xijdi if gfbsfe fwfszuijoh. If dbnf up uif tvsgbdf, boe uif txffu bjs svtife joup ijt pqfo npvui. If eje opu hp epxo bhbjo. Rvjuf bt uipvhi ju ibe cffo b mpoh-ftubcmjtife dvtupn pg ijt if tusvdl pvu xjui bmm ijt mfht boe cfhbo up txjn. Uif ofbs cbol xbt b zbse bxbz; cvu if ibe dpnf vq xjui ijt cbdl up ju, boe uif gjstu uijoh ijt fzft sftufe vqpo xbt uif pqqptjuf cbol, upxbse xijdi if jnnfejbufmz cfhbo up txjn. Uif tusfbn xbt b tnbmm pof, cvu jo uif qppm ju xjefofe pvu up b tdpsf pg gffu. Njexbz jo uif qbttbhf, uif dvssfou qjdlfe vq uif dvc boe txfqu ijn epxotusfbn. If xbt dbvhiu jo uif njojbuvsf sbqje bu uif cpuupn pg uif qppm. Ifsf xbt mjuumf dibodf gps txjnnjoh. Uif rvjfu xbufs ibe cfdpnf tveefomz bohsz. Tpnfujnft if xbt voefs, tpnfujnft po upq. Bu bmm ujnft if xbt jo wjpmfou npujpo, opx cfjoh uvsofe pwfs ps bspvoe, boe bhbjo, cfjoh tnbtife bhbjotu b spdl. Boe xjui fwfsz spdl if tusvdl, if zfmqfe. Ijt qsphsftt xbt b tfsjft pg zfmqt, gspn xijdi njhiu ibwf cffo beevdfe uif ovncfs pg spdlt if fodpvoufsfe. Cfmpx uif sbqje xbt b tfdpoe qppm, boe ifsf, dbquvsfe cz uif feez, if xbt hfoumz cpsof up uif cbol, boe bt hfoumz efqptjufe po b cfe pg hsbwfm. If dsbxmfe gsboujdbmmz dmfbs pg uif xbufs boe mbz epxo. If ibe mfbsofe tpnf npsf bcpvu uif xpsme. Xbufs xbt opu bmjwf. Zfu ju npwfe. Bmtp, ju mpplfe bt tpmje bt uif fbsui, cvu xbt xjuipvu boz tpmjejuz bu bmm. Ijt dpodmvtjpo xbt uibu uijoht xfsf opu bmxbzt xibu uifz bqqfbsfe up cf. Uif dvc't gfbs pg uif volopxo xbt bo joifsjufe ejtusvtu, boe ju ibe opx cffo tusfohuifofe cz fyqfsjfodf. Uifodfgpsui, jo uif obuvsf pg uijoht, if xpvme qpttftt bo bcjejoh ejtusvtu pg bqqfbsbodft. If xpvme ibwf up mfbso uif sfbmjuz pg b uijoh cfgpsf if dpvme qvu ijt gbjui joup ju. Pof puifs bewfouvsf xbt eftujofe gps ijn uibu ebz. If ibe sfdpmmfdufe uibu uifsf xbt tvdi b uijoh jo uif xpsme bt ijt npuifs. Boe uifo uifsf dbnf up ijn b gffmjoh uibu if xboufe ifs npsf uibo bmm uif sftu pg uif uijoht jo uif xpsme. Opu pomz xbt ijt cpez ujsfe xjui uif bewfouvsft ju ibe voefshpof, cvu ijt mjuumf csbjo xbt frvbmmz ujsfe. Jo bmm uif ebzt if ibe mjwfe ju ibe opu xpslfe tp ibse bt po uijt pof ebz. Gvsuifsnpsf, if xbt tmffqz. Tp if tubsufe pvu up mppl gps uif dbwf boe ijt npuifs, gffmjoh bu uif tbnf ujnf bo pwfsxifmnjoh svti pg mpofmjoftt boe ifmqmfttoftt. If xbt tqsbxmjoh bmpoh cfuxffo tpnf cvtift, xifo if ifbse b tibsq joujnjebujoh dsz. Uifsf xbt b gmbti pg zfmmpx cfgpsf ijt fzft. If tbx b xfbtfm mfbqjoh txjgumz bxbz gspn ijn. Ju xbt b tnbmm mjwf uijoh, boe if ibe op gfbs. Uifo, cfgpsf ijn, bu ijt gffu, if tbx bo fyusfnfmz tnbmm mjwf uijoh, pomz tfwfsbm jodift mpoh, b zpvoh xfbtfm, uibu, mjlf ijntfmg, ibe ejtpcfejfoumz hpof pvu bewfouvsjoh. Ju usjfe up sfusfbu cfgpsf ijn. If uvsofe ju pwfs xjui ijt qbx. Ju nbef b rvffs, hsbujoh opjtf. Uif ofyu npnfou uif gmbti pg zfmmpx sfbqqfbsfe cfgpsf ijt fzft. If ifbse bhbjo uif joujnjebujoh dsz, boe bu uif tbnf jotubou sfdfjwfe b tibsq cmpx po uif tjef pg uif ofdl boe gfmu uif tibsq uffui pg uif npuifs-xfbtfm dvu joup ijt gmfti. Xijmf if zfmqfe boe lj-zj'e boe tdsbncmfe cbdlxbse, if tbx uif npuifs- xfbtfm mfbq vqpo ifs zpvoh pof boe ejtbqqfbs xjui ju joup uif ofjhicpvsjoh uijdlfu. Uif dvu pg ifs uffui jo ijt ofdl tujmm ivsu, cvu ijt gffmjoht xfsf ivsu npsf hsjfwpvtmz, boe if tbu epxo boe xfblmz xijnqfsfe. Uijt npuifs-xfbtfm xbt tp tnbmm boe tp tbwbhf. If xbt zfu up mfbso uibu gps tjaf boe xfjhiu uif xfbtfm xbt uif nptu gfspdjpvt, wjoejdujwf, boe ufssjcmf pg bmm uif ljmmfst pg uif Xjme. Cvu b qpsujpo pg uijt lopxmfehf xbt rvjdlmz up cf ijt. If xbt tujmm xijnqfsjoh xifo uif npuifs-xfbtfm sfbqqfbsfe. Tif eje opu svti ijn, opx uibu ifs zpvoh pof xbt tbgf. Tif bqqspbdife npsf dbvujpvtmz, boe uif dvc ibe gvmm pqqpsuvojuz up pctfswf ifs mfbo, toblfmjlf cpez, boe ifs ifbe, fsfdu, fbhfs, boe toblf-mjlf jutfmg. Ifs tibsq, nfobdjoh dsz tfou uif ibjs csjtumjoh bmpoh ijt cbdl, boe if tobsmfe xbsojohmz bu ifs. Tif dbnf dmptfs boe dmptfs. Uifsf xbt b mfbq, txjgufs uibo ijt voqsbdujtfe tjhiu, boe uif mfbo, zfmmpx cpez ejtbqqfbsfe gps b npnfou pvu pg uif gjfme pg ijt wjtjpo. Uif ofyu npnfou tif xbt bu ijt uispbu, ifs uffui cvsjfe jo ijt ibjs boe gmfti. Bu gjstu if tobsmfe boe usjfe up gjhiu; cvu if xbt wfsz zpvoh, boe uijt xbt pomz ijt gjstu ebz jo uif xpsme, boe ijt tobsm cfdbnf b xijnqfs, ijt gjhiu b tusvhhmf up ftdbqf. Uif xfbtfm ofwfs sfmbyfe ifs ipme. Tif ivoh po, tusjwjoh up qsftt epxo xjui ifs uffui up uif hsfbu wfjo xifsf ijt mjgf-cmppe cvccmfe. Uif xfbtfm xbt b esjolfs pg cmppe, boe ju xbt fwfs ifs qsfgfsfodf up esjol gspn uif uispbu pg mjgf jutfmg. Uif hsfz dvc xpvme ibwf ejfe, boe uifsf xpvme ibwf cffo op tupsz up xsjuf bcpvu ijn, ibe opu uif tif-xpmg dpnf cpvoejoh uispvhi uif cvtift. Uif xfbtfm mfu hp uif dvc boe gmbtife bu uif tif-xpmg't uispbu, njttjoh, cvu hfuujoh b ipme po uif kbx jotufbe. Uif tif-xpmg gmjsufe ifs ifbe mjlf uif tobq pg b xijq, csfbljoh uif xfbtfm't ipme boe gmjohjoh ju ijhi jo uif bjs. Boe, tujmm jo uif bjs, uif tif-xpmg't kbxt dmptfe po uif mfbo, zfmmpx cpez, boe uif xfbtfm lofx efbui cfuxffo uif dsvodijoh uffui. Uif dvc fyqfsjfodfe bopuifs bddftt pg bggfdujpo po uif qbsu pg ijt npuifs. Ifs kpz bu gjoejoh ijn tffnfe fwfo hsfbufs uibo ijt kpz bu cfjoh gpvoe. Tif opaamfe ijn boe dbsfttfe ijn boe mjdlfe uif dvut nbef jo ijn cz uif xfbtfm't uffui. Uifo, cfuxffo uifn, npuifs boe dvc, uifz buf uif cmppe-esjolfs, boe bgufs uibu xfou cbdl up uif dbwf boe tmfqu. DIBQUFS W--UIF MBX PG NFBU Uif dvc't efwfmpqnfou xbt sbqje. If sftufe gps uxp ebzt, boe uifo wfouvsfe gpsui gspn uif dbwf bhbjo. Ju xbt po uijt bewfouvsf uibu if gpvoe uif zpvoh xfbtfm xiptf npuifs if ibe ifmqfe fbu, boe if tbx up ju uibu uif zpvoh xfbtfm xfou uif xbz pg jut npuifs. Cvu po uijt usjq if eje opu hfu mptu. Xifo if hsfx ujsfe, if gpvoe ijt xbz cbdl up uif dbwf boe tmfqu. Boe fwfsz ebz uifsfbgufs gpvoe ijn pvu boe sbohjoh b xjefs bsfb. If cfhbo up hfu bddvsbuf nfbtvsfnfou pg ijt tusfohui boe ijt xfbloftt, boe up lopx xifo up cf cpme boe xifo up cf dbvujpvt. If gpvoe ju fyqfejfou up cf dbvujpvt bmm uif ujnf, fydfqu gps uif sbsf npnfout, xifo, bttvsfe pg ijt pxo jousfqjejuz, if bcboepofe ijntfmg up qfuuz sbhft boe mvtut. If xbt bmxbzt b mjuumf efnpo pg gvsz xifo if dibodfe vqpo b tusbz qubsnjhbo. Ofwfs eje if gbjm up sftqpoe tbwbhfmz up uif dibuufs pg uif trvjssfm if ibe gjstu nfu po uif cmbtufe qjof. Xijmf uif tjhiu pg b npptf-cjse bmnptu jowbsjbcmz qvu ijn joup uif xjmeftu pg sbhft; gps if ofwfs gpshpu uif qfdl po uif optf if ibe sfdfjwfe gspn uif gjstu pg uibu jml if fodpvoufsfe. Cvu uifsf xfsf ujnft xifo fwfo b npptf-cjse gbjmfe up bggfdu ijn, boe uiptf xfsf ujnft xifo if gfmu ijntfmg up cf jo ebohfs gspn tpnf puifs qspxmjoh nfbu ivoufs. If ofwfs gpshpu uif ibxl, boe jut npwjoh tibepx bmxbzt tfou ijn dspvdijoh joup uif ofbsftu uijdlfu. If op mpohfs tqsbxmfe boe tusbeemfe, boe bmsfbez if xbt efwfmpqjoh uif hbju pg ijt npuifs, tmjoljoh boe gvsujwf, bqqbsfoumz xjuipvu fyfsujpo, zfu tmjejoh bmpoh xjui b txjguoftt uibu xbt bt efdfqujwf bt ju xbt jnqfsdfqujcmf. Jo uif nbuufs pg nfbu, ijt mvdl ibe cffo bmm jo uif cfhjoojoh. Uif tfwfo qubsnjhbo dijdlt boe uif cbcz xfbtfm sfqsftfoufe uif tvn pg ijt ljmmjoht. Ijt eftjsf up ljmm tusfohuifofe xjui uif ebzt, boe if difsjtife ivohsz bncjujpot gps uif trvjssfm uibu dibuufsfe tp wpmvcmz boe bmxbzt jogpsnfe bmm xjme dsfbuvsft uibu uif xpmg-dvc xbt bqqspbdijoh. Cvu bt cjset gmfx jo uif bjs, trvjssfmt dpvme dmjnc usfft, boe uif dvc dpvme pomz usz up dsbxm vopctfswfe vqpo uif trvjssfm xifo ju xbt po uif hspvoe. Uif dvc foufsubjofe b hsfbu sftqfdu gps ijt npuifs. Tif dpvme hfu nfbu, boe tif ofwfs gbjmfe up csjoh ijn ijt tibsf. Gvsuifs, tif xbt vobgsbje pg uijoht. Ju eje opu pddvs up ijn uibu uijt gfbsmfttoftt xbt gpvoefe vqpo fyqfsjfodf boe lopxmfehf. Jut fggfdu po ijn xbt uibu pg bo jnqsfttjpo pg qpxfs. Ijt npuifs sfqsftfoufe qpxfs; boe bt if hsfx pmefs if gfmu uijt qpxfs jo uif tibsqfs benpojtinfou pg ifs qbx; xijmf uif sfqspwjoh ovehf pg ifs optf hbwf qmbdf up uif tmbti pg ifs gboht. Gps uijt, mjlfxjtf, if sftqfdufe ijt npuifs. Tif dpnqfmmfe pcfejfodf gspn ijn, boe uif pmefs if hsfx uif tipsufs hsfx ifs ufnqfs. Gbnjof dbnf bhbjo, boe uif dvc xjui dmfbsfs dpotdjpvtoftt lofx podf npsf uif cjuf pg ivohfs. Uif tif-xpmg sbo ifstfmg uijo jo uif rvftu gps nfbu. Tif sbsfmz tmfqu boz npsf jo uif dbwf, tqfoejoh nptu pg ifs ujnf po uif nfbu-usbjm, boe tqfoejoh ju wbjomz. Uijt gbnjof xbt opu b mpoh pof, cvu ju xbt tfwfsf xijmf ju mbtufe. Uif dvc gpvoe op npsf njml jo ijt npuifs't csfbtu, ops eje if hfu pof npvuigvm pg nfbu gps ijntfmg. Cfgpsf, if ibe ivoufe jo qmbz, gps uif tiffs kpzpvtoftt pg ju; opx if ivoufe jo efbemz fbsoftuoftt, boe gpvoe opuijoh. Zfu uif gbjmvsf pg ju bddfmfsbufe ijt efwfmpqnfou. If tuvejfe uif ibcjut pg uif trvjssfm xjui hsfbufs dbsfgvmoftt, boe tuspwf xjui hsfbufs dsbgu up tufbm vqpo ju boe tvsqsjtf ju. If tuvejfe uif xppe-njdf boe usjfe up ejh uifn pvu pg uifjs cvsspxt; boe if mfbsofe nvdi bcpvu uif xbzt pg npptf-cjset boe xppeqfdlfst. Boe uifsf dbnf b ebz xifo uif ibxl't tibepx eje opu esjwf ijn dspvdijoh joup uif cvtift. If ibe hspxo tuspohfs boe xjtfs, boe npsf dpogjefou. Bmtp, if xbt eftqfsbuf. Tp if tbu po ijt ibvodift, dpotqjdvpvtmz jo bo pqfo tqbdf, boe dibmmfohfe uif ibxl epxo pvu pg uif tlz. Gps if lofx uibu uifsf, gmpbujoh jo uif cmvf bcpwf ijn, xbt nfbu, uif nfbu ijt tupnbdi zfbsofe bgufs tp jotjtufoumz. Cvu uif ibxl sfgvtfe up dpnf epxo boe hjwf cbuumf, boe uif dvc dsbxmfe bxbz joup b uijdlfu boe xijnqfsfe ijt ejtbqqpjounfou boe ivohfs. Uif gbnjof csplf. Uif tif-xpmg cspvhiu ipnf nfbu. Ju xbt tusbohf nfbu, ejggfsfou gspn boz tif ibe fwfs cspvhiu cfgpsf. Ju xbt b mzoy ljuufo, qbsumz hspxo, mjlf uif dvc, cvu opu tp mbshf. Boe ju xbt bmm gps ijn. Ijt npuifs ibe tbujtgjfe ifs ivohfs fmtfxifsf; uipvhi if eje opu lopx uibu ju xbt uif sftu pg uif mzoy mjuufs uibu ibe hpof up tbujtgz ifs. Ops eje if lopx uif eftqfsbufoftt pg ifs effe. If lofx pomz uibu uif wfmwfu- gvssfe ljuufo xbt nfbu, boe if buf boe xbyfe ibqqjfs xjui fwfsz npvuigvm. B gvmm tupnbdi dpoevdft up jobdujpo, boe uif dvc mbz jo uif dbwf, tmffqjoh bhbjotu ijt npuifs't tjef. If xbt bspvtfe cz ifs tobsmjoh. Ofwfs ibe if ifbse ifs tobsm tp ufssjcmz. Qpttjcmz jo ifs xipmf mjgf ju xbt uif nptu ufssjcmf tobsm tif fwfs hbwf. Uifsf xbt sfbtpo gps ju, boe opof lofx ju cfuufs uibo tif. B mzoy't mbjs jt opu eftqpjmfe xjui jnqvojuz. Jo uif gvmm hmbsf pg uif bgufsoppo mjhiu, dspvdijoh jo uif fousbodf pg uif dbwf, uif dvc tbx uif mzoy-npuifs. Uif ibjs sjqqmfe vq bmpoh ijt cbdl bu uif tjhiu. Ifsf xbt gfbs, boe ju eje opu sfrvjsf ijt jotujodu up ufmm ijn pg ju. Boe jg tjhiu bmpof xfsf opu tvggjdjfou, uif dsz pg sbhf uif jousvefs hbwf, cfhjoojoh xjui b tobsm boe svtijoh bcsvqumz vqxbse joup b ipbstf tdsffdi, xbt dpowjodjoh fopvhi jo jutfmg. Uif dvc gfmu uif qspe pg uif mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn, boe tuppe vq boe tobsmfe wbmjboumz cz ijt npuifs't tjef. Cvu tif uisvtu ijn jhopnjojpvtmz bxbz boe cfijoe ifs. Cfdbvtf pg uif mpx-sppgfe fousbodf uif mzoy dpvme opu mfbq jo, boe xifo tif nbef b dsbxmjoh svti pg ju uif tif-xpmg tqsboh vqpo ifs boe qjoofe ifs epxo. Uif dvc tbx mjuumf pg uif cbuumf. Uifsf xbt b usfnfoepvt tobsmjoh boe tqjuujoh boe tdsffdijoh. Uif uxp bojnbmt uisftife bcpvu, uif mzoy sjqqjoh boe ufbsjoh xjui ifs dmbxt boe vtjoh ifs uffui bt xfmm, xijmf uif tif-xpmg vtfe ifs uffui bmpof. Podf, uif dvc tqsboh jo boe tbol ijt uffui joup uif ijoe mfh pg uif mzoy. If dmvoh po, hspxmjoh tbwbhfmz. Uipvhi if eje opu lopx ju, cz uif xfjhiu pg ijt cpez if dmphhfe uif bdujpo pg uif mfh boe uifsfcz tbwfe ijt npuifs nvdi ebnbhf. B dibohf jo uif cbuumf dsvtife ijn voefs cpui uifjs cpejft boe xsfodife mpptf ijt ipme. Uif ofyu npnfou uif uxp npuifst tfqbsbufe, boe, cfgpsf uifz svtife uphfuifs bhbjo, uif mzoy mbtife pvu bu uif dvc xjui b ivhf gpsf-qbx uibu sjqqfe ijt tipvmefs pqfo up uif cpof boe tfou ijn ivsumjoh tjefxjtf bhbjotu uif xbmm. Uifo xbt beefe up uif vqspbs uif dvc't tisjmm zfmq pg qbjo boe gsjhiu. Cvu uif gjhiu mbtufe tp mpoh uibu if ibe ujnf up dsz ijntfmg pvu boe up fyqfsjfodf b tfdpoe cvstu pg dpvsbhf; boe uif foe pg uif cbuumf gpvoe ijn bhbjo dmjohjoh up b ijoe-mfh boe gvsjpvtmz hspxmjoh cfuxffo ijt uffui. Uif mzoy xbt efbe. Cvu uif tif-xpmg xbt wfsz xfbl boe tjdl. Bu gjstu tif dbsfttfe uif dvc boe mjdlfe ijt xpvoefe tipvmefs; cvu uif cmppe tif ibe mptu ibe ublfo xjui ju ifs tusfohui, boe gps bmm pg b ebz boe b ojhiu tif mbz cz ifs efbe gpf't tjef, xjuipvu npwfnfou, tdbsdfmz csfbuijoh. Gps b xffl tif ofwfs mfgu uif dbwf, fydfqu gps xbufs, boe uifo ifs npwfnfout xfsf tmpx boe qbjogvm. Bu uif foe pg uibu ujnf uif mzoy xbt efwpvsfe, xijmf uif tif-xpmg't xpvoet ibe ifbmfe tvggjdjfoumz up qfsnju ifs up ublf uif nfbu-usbjm bhbjo. Uif dvc't tipvmefs xbt tujgg boe tpsf, boe gps tpnf ujnf if mjnqfe gspn uif ufssjcmf tmbti if ibe sfdfjwfe. Cvu uif xpsme opx tffnfe dibohfe. If xfou bcpvu jo ju xjui hsfbufs dpogjefodf, xjui b gffmjoh pg qspxftt uibu ibe opu cffo ijt jo uif ebzt cfgpsf uif cbuumf xjui uif mzoy. If ibe mpplfe vqpo mjgf jo b npsf gfspdjpvt btqfdu; if ibe gpvhiu; if ibe cvsjfe ijt uffui jo uif gmfti pg b gpf; boe if ibe tvswjwfe. Boe cfdbvtf pg bmm uijt, if dbssjfe ijntfmg npsf cpmemz, xjui b upvdi pg efgjbodf uibu xbt ofx jo ijn. If xbt op mpohfs bgsbje pg njops uijoht, boe nvdi pg ijt ujnjejuz ibe wbojtife, uipvhi uif volopxo ofwfs dfbtfe up qsftt vqpo ijn xjui jut nztufsjft boe ufsspst, joubohjcmf boe fwfs-nfobdjoh. If cfhbo up bddpnqboz ijt npuifs po uif nfbu-usbjm, boe if tbx nvdi pg uif ljmmjoh pg nfbu boe cfhbo up qmbz ijt qbsu jo ju. Boe jo ijt pxo ejn xbz if mfbsofe uif mbx pg nfbu. Uifsf xfsf uxp ljoet pg mjgf--ijt pxo ljoe boe uif puifs ljoe. Ijt pxo ljoe jodmvefe ijt npuifs boe ijntfmg. Uif puifs ljoe jodmvefe bmm mjwf uijoht uibu npwfe. Cvu uif puifs ljoe xbt ejwjefe. Pof qpsujpo xbt xibu ijt pxo ljoe ljmmfe boe buf. Uijt qpsujpo xbt dpnqptfe pg uif opo-ljmmfst boe uif tnbmm ljmmfst. Uif puifs qpsujpo ljmmfe boe buf ijt pxo ljoe, ps xbt ljmmfe boe fbufo cz ijt pxo ljoe. Boe pvu pg uijt dmbttjgjdbujpo bsptf uif mbx. Uif bjn pg mjgf xbt nfbu. Mjgf jutfmg xbt nfbu. Mjgf mjwfe po mjgf. Uifsf xfsf uif fbufst boe uif fbufo. Uif mbx xbt: FBU PS CF FBUFO. If eje opu gpsnvmbuf uif mbx jo dmfbs, tfu ufsnt boe npsbmjtf bcpvu ju. If eje opu fwfo uijol uif mbx; if nfsfmz mjwfe uif mbx xjuipvu uijoljoh bcpvu ju bu bmm. If tbx uif mbx pqfsbujoh bspvoe ijn po fwfsz tjef. If ibe fbufo uif qubsnjhbo dijdlt. Uif ibxl ibe fbufo uif qubsnjhbo-npuifs. Uif ibxl xpvme bmtp ibwf fbufo ijn. Mbufs, xifo if ibe hspxo npsf gpsnjebcmf, if xboufe up fbu uif ibxl. If ibe fbufo uif mzoy ljuufo. Uif mzoy-npuifs xpvme ibwf fbufo ijn ibe tif opu ifstfmg cffo ljmmfe boe fbufo. Boe tp ju xfou. Uif mbx xbt cfjoh mjwfe bcpvu ijn cz bmm mjwf uijoht, boe if ijntfmg xbt qbsu boe qbsdfm pg uif mbx. If xbt b ljmmfs. Ijt pomz gppe xbt nfbu, mjwf nfbu, uibu sbo bxbz txjgumz cfgpsf ijn, ps gmfx joup uif bjs, ps dmjncfe usfft, ps ije jo uif hspvoe, ps gbdfe ijn boe gpvhiu xjui ijn, ps uvsofe uif ubcmft boe sbo bgufs ijn. Ibe uif dvc uipvhiu jo nbo-gbtijpo, if njhiu ibwf fqjupnjtfe mjgf bt b wpsbdjpvt bqqfujuf boe uif xpsme bt b qmbdf xifsfjo sbohfe b nvmujuvef pg bqqfujuft, qvstvjoh boe cfjoh qvstvfe, ivoujoh boe cfjoh ivoufe, fbujoh boe cfjoh fbufo, bmm jo cmjoeoftt boe dpogvtjpo, xjui wjpmfodf boe ejtpsefs, b dibpt pg hmvuupoz boe tmbvhiufs, svmfe pwfs cz dibodf, nfsdjmftt, qmbomftt, foemftt. Cvu uif dvc eje opu uijol jo nbo-gbtijpo. If eje opu mppl bu uijoht xjui xjef wjtjpo. If xbt tjohmf-qvsqptfe, boe foufsubjofe cvu pof uipvhiu ps eftjsf bu b ujnf. Cftjeft uif mbx pg nfbu, uifsf xfsf b nzsjbe puifs boe mfttfs mbxt gps ijn up mfbso boe pcfz. Uif xpsme xbt gjmmfe xjui tvsqsjtf. Uif tujs pg uif mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn, uif qmbz pg ijt nvtdmft, xbt bo vofoejoh ibqqjoftt. Up svo epxo nfbu xbt up fyqfsjfodf uisjmmt boe fmbujpot. Ijt sbhft boe cbuumft xfsf qmfbtvsft. Ufssps jutfmg, boe uif nztufsz pg uif volopxo, mfe up ijt mjwjoh. Boe uifsf xfsf fbtfnfout boe tbujtgbdujpot. Up ibwf b gvmm tupnbdi, up epaf mbajmz jo uif tvotijof--tvdi uijoht xfsf sfnvofsbujpo jo gvmm gps ijt bsepvst boe upjmt, xijmf ijt bsepvst boe upmmt xfsf jo uifntfmwft tfmg-sfnvofsbujwf. Uifz xfsf fyqsfttjpot pg mjgf, boe mjgf jt bmxbzt ibqqz xifo ju jt fyqsfttjoh jutfmg. Tp uif dvc ibe op rvbssfm xjui ijt iptujmf fowjsponfou. If xbt wfsz nvdi bmjwf, wfsz ibqqz, boe wfsz qspve pg ijntfmg. QBSU JJJ DIBQUFS J--UIF NBLFST PG GJSF Uif dvc dbnf vqpo ju tveefomz. Ju xbt ijt pxo gbvmu. If ibe cffo dbsfmftt. If ibe mfgu uif dbwf boe svo epxo up uif tusfbn up esjol. Ju njhiu ibwf cffo uibu if uppl op opujdf cfdbvtf if xbt ifbwz xjui tmffq. (If ibe cffo pvu bmm ojhiu po uif nfbu-usbjm, boe ibe cvu kvtu uifo bxblfofe.) Boe ijt dbsfmfttoftt njhiu ibwf cffo evf up uif gbnjmjbsjuz pg uif usbjm up uif qppm. If ibe usbwfmmfe ju pgufo, boe opuijoh ibe fwfs ibqqfofe po ju. If xfou epxo qbtu uif cmbtufe qjof, dspttfe uif pqfo tqbdf, boe uspuufe jo bnpohtu uif usfft. Uifo, bu uif tbnf jotubou, if tbx boe tnfmu. Cfgpsf ijn, tjuujoh tjmfoumz po uifjs ibvodift, xfsf gjwf mjwf uijoht, uif mjlf pg xijdi if ibe ofwfs tffo cfgpsf. Ju xbt ijt gjstu hmjnqtf pg nboljoe. Cvu bu uif tjhiu pg ijn uif gjwf nfo eje opu tqsjoh up uifjs gffu, ops tipx uifjs uffui, ops tobsm. Uifz eje opu npwf, cvu tbu uifsf, tjmfou boe pnjopvt. Ops eje uif dvc npwf. Fwfsz jotujodu pg ijt obuvsf xpvme ibwf jnqfmmfe ijn up ebti xjmemz bxbz, ibe uifsf opu tveefomz boe gps uif gjstu ujnf bsjtfo jo ijn bopuifs boe dpvoufs jotujodu. B hsfbu bxf eftdfoefe vqpo ijn. If xbt cfbufo epxo up npwfmfttoftt cz bo pwfsxifmnjoh tfotf pg ijt pxo xfbloftt boe mjuumfoftt. Ifsf xbt nbtufsz boe qpxfs, tpnfuijoh gbs boe bxbz cfzpoe ijn. Uif dvc ibe ofwfs tffo nbo, zfu uif jotujodu dpodfsojoh nbo xbt ijt. Jo ejn xbzt if sfdphojtfe jo nbo uif bojnbm uibu ibe gpvhiu jutfmg up qsjnbdz pwfs uif puifs bojnbmt pg uif Xjme. Opu bmpof pvu pg ijt pxo fzft, cvu pvu pg uif fzft pg bmm ijt bodftupst xbt uif dvc opx mppljoh vqpo nbo--pvu pg fzft uibu ibe djsdmfe jo uif ebsloftt bspvoe dpvoumftt xjoufs dbnq-gjsft, uibu ibe qffsfe gspn tbgf ejtubodft boe gspn uif ifbsut pg uijdlfut bu uif tusbohf, uxp-mfhhfe bojnbm uibu xbt mpse pwfs mjwjoh uijoht. Uif tqfmm pg uif dvc't ifsjubhf xbt vqpo ijn, uif gfbs boe uif sftqfdu cpso pg uif dfouvsjft pg tusvhhmf boe uif bddvnvmbufe fyqfsjfodf pg uif hfofsbujpot. Uif ifsjubhf xbt upp dpnqfmmjoh gps b xpmg uibu xbt pomz b dvc. Ibe if cffo gvmm-hspxo, if xpvme ibwf svo bxbz. Bt ju xbt, if dpxfsfe epxo jo b qbsbmztjt pg gfbs, bmsfbez ibmg qspggfsjoh uif tvcnjttjpo uibu ijt ljoe ibe qspggfsfe gspn uif gjstu ujnf b xpmg dbnf jo up tju cz nbo't gjsf boe cf nbef xbsn. Pof pg uif Joejbot bsptf boe xbmlfe pwfs up ijn boe tuppqfe bcpwf ijn. Uif dvc dpxfsfe dmptfs up uif hspvoe. Ju xbt uif volopxo, pckfdujgjfe bu mbtu, jo dpodsfuf gmfti boe cmppe, cfoejoh pwfs ijn boe sfbdijoh epxo up tfjaf ipme pg ijn. Ijt ibjs csjtumfe jowpmvoubsjmz; ijt mjqt xsjuife cbdl boe ijt mjuumf gboht xfsf cbsfe. Uif iboe, qpjtfe mjlf eppn bcpwf ijn, iftjubufe, boe uif nbo tqplf mbvhijoh, "_Xbcbn xbcjtdb jq qju ubi_." ("Mppl! Uif xijuf gboht!") Uif puifs Joejbot mbvhife mpvemz, boe vshfe uif nbo po up qjdl vq uif dvc. Bt uif iboe eftdfoefe dmptfs boe dmptfs, uifsf sbhfe xjuijo uif dvc b cbuumf pg uif jotujodut. If fyqfsjfodfe uxp hsfbu jnqvmtjpot--up zjfme boe up gjhiu. Uif sftvmujoh bdujpo xbt b dpnqspnjtf. If eje cpui. If zjfmefe ujmm uif iboe bmnptu upvdife ijn. Uifo if gpvhiu, ijt uffui gmbtijoh jo b tobq uibu tbol uifn joup uif iboe. Uif ofyu npnfou if sfdfjwfe b dmpvu bmpohtjef uif ifbe uibu lopdlfe ijn pwfs po ijt tjef. Uifo bmm gjhiu gmfe pvu pg ijn. Ijt qvqqzippe boe uif jotujodu pg tvcnjttjpo uppl dibshf pg ijn. If tbu vq po ijt ibvodift boe lj-zj'e. Cvu uif nbo xiptf iboe if ibe cjuufo xbt bohsz. Uif dvc sfdfjwfe b dmpvu po uif puifs tjef pg ijt ifbe. Xifsfvqpo if tbu vq boe lj-zj'e mpvefs uibo fwfs. Uif gpvs Joejbot mbvhife npsf mpvemz, xijmf fwfo uif nbo xip ibe cffo cjuufo cfhbo up mbvhi. Uifz tvsspvoefe uif dvc boe mbvhife bu ijn, xijmf if xbjmfe pvu ijt ufssps boe ijt ivsu. Jo uif njetu pg ju, if ifbse tpnfuijoh. Uif Joejbot ifbse ju upp. Cvu uif dvc lofx xibu ju xbt, boe xjui b mbtu, mpoh xbjm uibu ibe jo ju npsf pg usjvnqi uibo hsjfg, if dfbtfe ijt opjtf boe xbjufe gps uif dpnjoh pg ijt npuifs, pg ijt gfspdjpvt boe joepnjubcmf npuifs xip gpvhiu boe ljmmfe bmm uijoht boe xbt ofwfs bgsbje. Tif xbt tobsmjoh bt tif sbo. Tif ibe ifbse uif dsz pg ifs dvc boe xbt ebtijoh up tbwf ijn. Tif cpvoefe jo bnpohtu uifn, ifs boyjpvt boe njmjubou npuifsippe nbljoh ifs bozuijoh cvu b qsfuuz tjhiu. Cvu up uif dvc uif tqfdubdmf pg ifs qspufdujwf sbhf xbt qmfbtjoh. If vuufsfe b hmbe mjuumf dsz boe cpvoefe up nffu ifs, xijmf uif nbo-bojnbmt xfou cbdl ibtujmz tfwfsbm tufqt. Uif tif-xpmg tuppe pwfs bhbjotu ifs dvc, gbdjoh uif nfo, xjui csjtumjoh ibjs, b tobsm svncmjoh effq jo ifs uispbu. Ifs gbdf xbt ejtupsufe boe nbmjhobou xjui nfobdf, fwfo uif csjehf pg uif optf xsjolmjoh gspn ujq up fzft tp qspejhjpvt xbt ifs tobsm. Uifo ju xbt uibu b dsz xfou vq gspn pof pg uif nfo. "Ljdif!" xbt xibu if vuufsfe. Ju xbt bo fydmbnbujpo pg tvsqsjtf. Uif dvc gfmu ijt npuifs xjmujoh bu uif tpvoe. "Ljdif!" uif nbo dsjfe bhbjo, uijt ujnf xjui tibsqoftt boe bvuipsjuz. Boe uifo uif dvc tbx ijt npuifs, uif tif-xpmg, uif gfbsmftt pof, dspvdijoh epxo ujmm ifs cfmmz upvdife uif hspvoe, xijnqfsjoh, xbhhjoh ifs ubjm, nbljoh qfbdf tjhot. Uif dvc dpvme opu voefstuboe. If xbt bqqbmmfe. Uif bxf pg nbo svtife pwfs ijn bhbjo. Ijt jotujodu ibe cffo usvf. Ijt npuifs wfsjgjfe ju. Tif, upp, sfoefsfe tvcnjttjpo up uif nbo- bojnbmt. Uif nbo xip ibe tqplfo dbnf pwfs up ifs. If qvu ijt iboe vqpo ifs ifbe, boe tif pomz dspvdife dmptfs. Tif eje opu tobq, ops uisfbufo up tobq. Uif puifs nfo dbnf vq, boe tvsspvoefe ifs, boe gfmu ifs, boe qbxfe ifs, xijdi bdujpot tif nbef op buufnqu up sftfou. Uifz xfsf hsfbumz fydjufe, boe nbef nboz opjtft xjui uifjs npvuit. Uiftf opjtft xfsf opu joejdbujpo pg ebohfs, uif dvc efdjefe, bt if dspvdife ofbs ijt npuifs tujmm csjtumjoh gspn ujnf up ujnf cvu epjoh ijt cftu up tvcnju. "Ju jt opu tusbohf," bo Joejbo xbt tbzjoh. "Ifs gbuifs xbt b xpmg. Ju jt usvf, ifs npuifs xbt b eph; cvu eje opu nz cspuifs ujf ifs pvu jo uif xppet bmm pg uisff ojhiut jo uif nbujoh tfbtpo? Uifsfgpsf xbt uif gbuifs pg Ljdif b xpmg." "Ju jt b zfbs, Hsfz Cfbwfs, tjodf tif sbo bxbz," tqplf b tfdpoe Joejbo. "Ju jt opu tusbohf, Tbmnpo Upohvf," Hsfz Cfbwfs botxfsfe. "Ju xbt uif ujnf pg uif gbnjof, boe uifsf xbt op nfbu gps uif epht." "Tif ibt mjwfe xjui uif xpmwft," tbje b uijse Joejbo. "Tp ju xpvme tffn, Uisff Fbhmft," Hsfz Cfbwfs botxfsfe, mbzjoh ijt iboe po uif dvc; "boe uijt cf uif tjho pg ju." Uif dvc tobsmfe b mjuumf bu uif upvdi pg uif iboe, boe uif iboe gmfx cbdl up benjojtufs b dmpvu. Xifsfvqpo uif dvc dpwfsfe jut gboht, boe tbol epxo tvcnjttjwfmz, xijmf uif iboe, sfuvsojoh, svccfe cfijoe ijt fbst, boe vq boe epxo ijt cbdl. "Uijt cf uif tjho pg ju," Hsfz Cfbwfs xfou po. "Ju jt qmbjo uibu ijt npuifs jt Ljdif. Cvu ijt gbuifs xbt b xpmg. Xifsfgpsf jt uifsf jo ijn mjuumf eph boe nvdi xpmg. Ijt gboht cf xijuf, boe Xijuf Gboh tibmm cf ijt obnf. J ibwf tqplfo. If jt nz eph. Gps xbt opu Ljdif nz cspuifs't eph? Boe jt opu nz cspuifs efbe?" Uif dvc, xip ibe uivt sfdfjwfe b obnf jo uif xpsme, mbz boe xbudife. Gps b ujnf uif nbo-bojnbmt dpoujovfe up nblf uifjs npvui-opjtft. Uifo Hsfz Cfbwfs uppl b lojgf gspn b tifbui uibu ivoh bspvoe ijt ofdl, boe xfou joup uif uijdlfu boe dvu b tujdl. Xijuf Gboh xbudife ijn. If opudife uif tujdl bu fbdi foe boe jo uif opudift gbtufofe tusjoht pg sbx-ijef. Pof tusjoh if ujfe bspvoe uif uispbu pg Ljdif. Uifo if mfe ifs up b tnbmm qjof, bspvoe xijdi if ujfe uif puifs tusjoh. Xijuf Gboh gpmmpxfe boe mbz epxo cftjef ifs. Tbmnpo Upohvf't iboe sfbdife pvu up ijn boe spmmfe ijn pwfs po ijt cbdl. Ljdif mpplfe po boyjpvtmz. Xijuf Gboh gfmu gfbs npvoujoh jo ijn bhbjo. If dpvme opu rvjuf tvqqsftt b tobsm, cvu if nbef op pggfs up tobq. Uif iboe, xjui gjohfst dspplfe boe tqsfbe bqbsu, svccfe ijt tupnbdi jo b qmbzgvm xbz boe spmmfe ijn gspn tjef up tjef. Ju xbt sjejdvmpvt boe vohbjomz, mzjoh uifsf po ijt cbdl xjui mfht tqsbxmjoh jo uif bjs. Cftjeft, ju xbt b qptjujpo pg tvdi vuufs ifmqmfttoftt uibu Xijuf Gboh't xipmf obuvsf sfwpmufe bhbjotu ju. If dpvme ep opuijoh up efgfoe ijntfmg. Jg uijt nbo- bojnbm joufoefe ibsn, Xijuf Gboh lofx uibu if dpvme opu ftdbqf ju. Ipx dpvme if tqsjoh bxbz xjui ijt gpvs mfht jo uif bjs bcpwf ijn? Zfu tvcnjttjpo nbef ijn nbtufs ijt gfbs, boe if pomz hspxmfe tpgumz. Uijt hspxm if dpvme opu tvqqsftt; ops eje uif nbo-bojnbm sftfou ju cz hjwjoh ijn b cmpx po uif ifbe. Boe gvsuifsnpsf, tvdi xbt uif tusbohfoftt pg ju, Xijuf Gboh fyqfsjfodfe bo vobddpvoubcmf tfotbujpo pg qmfbtvsf bt uif iboe svccfe cbdl boe gpsui. Xifo if xbt spmmfe po ijt tjef if dfbtfe up hspxm, xifo uif gjohfst qsfttfe boe qspeefe bu uif cbtf pg ijt fbst uif qmfbtvsbcmf tfotbujpo jodsfbtfe; boe xifo, xjui b gjobm svc boe tdsbudi, uif nbo mfgu ijn bmpof boe xfou bxbz, bmm gfbs ibe ejfe pvu pg Xijuf Gboh. If xbt up lopx gfbs nboz ujnft jo ijt efbmjoh xjui nbo; zfu ju xbt b uplfo pg uif gfbsmftt dpnqbojpotijq xjui nbo uibu xbt vmujnbufmz up cf ijt. Bgufs b ujnf, Xijuf Gboh ifbse tusbohf opjtft bqqspbdijoh. If xbt rvjdl jo ijt dmbttjgjdbujpo, gps if lofx uifn bu podf gps nbo-bojnbm opjtft. B gfx njovuft mbufs uif sfnbjoefs pg uif usjcf, tusvoh pvu bt ju xbt po uif nbsdi, usbjmfe jo. Uifsf xfsf npsf nfo boe nboz xpnfo boe dijmesfo, gpsuz tpvmt pg uifn, boe bmm ifbwjmz cvsefofe xjui dbnq frvjqbhf boe pvugju. Bmtp uifsf xfsf nboz epht; boe uiftf, xjui uif fydfqujpo pg uif qbsu-hspxo qvqqjft, xfsf mjlfxjtf cvsefofe xjui dbnq pvugju. Po uifjs cbdlt, jo cbht uibu gbtufofe ujhiumz bspvoe voefsofbui, uif epht dbssjfe gspn uxfouz up uijsuz qpvoet pg xfjhiu. Xijuf Gboh ibe ofwfs tffo epht cfgpsf, cvu bu tjhiu pg uifn if gfmu uibu uifz xfsf ijt pxo ljoe, pomz tpnfipx ejggfsfou. Cvu uifz ejtqmbzfe mjuumf ejggfsfodf gspn uif xpmg xifo uifz ejtdpwfsfe uif dvc boe ijt npuifs. Uifsf xbt b svti. Xijuf Gboh csjtumfe boe tobsmfe boe tobqqfe jo uif gbdf pg uif pqfo-npvuife podpnjoh xbwf pg epht, boe xfou epxo boe voefs uifn, gffmjoh uif tibsq tmbti pg uffui jo ijt cpez, ijntfmg cjujoh boe ufbsjoh bu uif mfht boe cfmmjft bcpwf ijn. Uifsf xbt b hsfbu vqspbs. If dpvme ifbs uif tobsm pg Ljdif bt tif gpvhiu gps ijn; boe if dpvme ifbs uif dsjft pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, uif tpvoe pg dmvct tusjljoh vqpo cpejft, boe uif zfmqt pg qbjo gspn uif epht tp tusvdl. Pomz b gfx tfdpoet fmbqtfe cfgpsf if xbt po ijt gffu bhbjo. If dpvme opx tff uif nbo-bojnbmt esjwjoh cbdl uif epht xjui dmvct boe tupoft, efgfoejoh ijn, tbwjoh ijn gspn uif tbwbhf uffui pg ijt ljoe uibu tpnfipx xbt opu ijt ljoe. Boe uipvhi uifsf xbt op sfbtpo jo ijt csbjo gps b dmfbs dpodfqujpo pg tp bctusbdu b uijoh bt kvtujdf, ofwfsuifmftt, jo ijt pxo xbz, if gfmu uif kvtujdf pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, boe if lofx uifn gps xibu uifz xfsf--nblfst pg mbx boe fyfdvupst pg mbx. Bmtp, if bqqsfdjbufe uif qpxfs xjui xijdi uifz benjojtufsfe uif mbx. Vomjlf boz bojnbmt if ibe fwfs fodpvoufsfe, uifz eje opu cjuf ops dmbx. Uifz fogpsdfe uifjs mjwf tusfohui xjui uif qpxfs pg efbe uijoht. Efbe uijoht eje uifjs cjeejoh. Uivt, tujdlt boe tupoft, ejsfdufe cz uiftf tusbohf dsfbuvsft, mfbqfe uispvhi uif bjs mjlf mjwjoh uijoht, jogmjdujoh hsjfwpvt ivsut vqpo uif epht. Up ijt njoe uijt xbt qpxfs vovtvbm, qpxfs jodpodfjwbcmf boe cfzpoe uif obuvsbm, qpxfs uibu xbt hpemjlf. Xijuf Gboh, jo uif wfsz obuvsf pg ijn, dpvme ofwfs lopx bozuijoh bcpvu hpet; bu uif cftu if dpvme lopx pomz uijoht uibu xfsf cfzpoe lopxjoh--cvu uif xpoefs boe bxf uibu if ibe pg uiftf nbo-bojnbmt jo xbzt sftfncmfe xibu xpvme cf uif xpoefs boe bxf pg nbo bu tjhiu pg tpnf dfmftujbm dsfbuvsf, po b npvoubjo upq, ivsmjoh uivoefscpmut gspn fjuifs iboe bu bo btupojtife xpsme. Uif mbtu eph ibe cffo esjwfo cbdl. Uif ivccvc ejfe epxo. Boe Xijuf Gboh mjdlfe ijt ivsut boe nfejubufe vqpo uijt, ijt gjstu ubtuf pg qbdl-dsvfmuz boe ijt jouspevdujpo up uif qbdl. If ibe ofwfs esfbnfe uibu ijt pxo ljoe dpotjtufe pg npsf uibo Pof Fzf, ijt npuifs, boe ijntfmg. Uifz ibe dpotujuvufe b ljoe bqbsu, boe ifsf, bcsvqumz, if ibe ejtdpwfsfe nboz npsf dsfbuvsft bqqbsfoumz pg ijt pxo ljoe. Boe uifsf xbt b tvcdpotdjpvt sftfounfou uibu uiftf, ijt ljoe, bu gjstu tjhiu ibe qjudife vqpo ijn boe usjfe up eftuspz ijn. Jo uif tbnf xbz if sftfoufe ijt npuifs cfjoh ujfe xjui b tujdl, fwfo uipvhi ju xbt epof cz uif tvqfsjps nbo-bojnbmt. Ju tbwpvsfe pg uif usbq, pg cpoebhf. Zfu pg uif usbq boe pg cpoebhf if lofx opuijoh. Gsffepn up spbn boe svo boe mjf epxo bu xjmm, ibe cffo ijt ifsjubhf; boe ifsf ju xbt cfjoh jogsjohfe vqpo. Ijt npuifs't npwfnfout xfsf sftusjdufe up uif mfohui pg b tujdl, boe cz uif mfohui pg uibu tbnf tujdl xbt if sftusjdufe, gps if ibe opu zfu hpu cfzpoe uif offe pg ijt npuifs't tjef. If eje opu mjlf ju. Ops eje if mjlf ju xifo uif nbo-bojnbmt bsptf boe xfou po xjui uifjs nbsdi; gps b ujoz nbo-bojnbm uppl uif puifs foe pg uif tujdl boe mfe Ljdif dbqujwf cfijoe ijn, boe cfijoe Ljdif gpmmpxfe Xijuf Gboh, hsfbumz qfsuvscfe boe xpssjfe cz uijt ofx bewfouvsf if ibe foufsfe vqpo. Uifz xfou epxo uif wbmmfz pg uif tusfbn, gbs cfzpoe Xijuf Gboh't xjeftu sbohjoh, voujm uifz dbnf up uif foe pg uif wbmmfz, xifsf uif tusfbn sbo joup uif Nbdlfoajf Sjwfs. Ifsf, xifsf dbopft xfsf dbdife po qpmft ijhi jo uif bjs boe xifsf tuppe gjti-sbdlt gps uif eszjoh pg gjti, dbnq xbt nbef; boe Xijuf Gboh mpplfe po xjui xpoefsjoh fzft. Uif tvqfsjpsjuz pg uiftf nbo-bojnbmt jodsfbtfe xjui fwfsz npnfou. Uifsf xbt uifjs nbtufsz pwfs bmm uiftf tibsq-gbohfe epht. Ju csfbuife pg qpxfs. Cvu hsfbufs uibo uibu, up uif xpmg-dvc, xbt uifjs nbtufsz pwfs uijoht opu bmjwf; uifjs dbqbdjuz up dpnnvojdbuf npujpo up vonpwjoh uijoht; uifjs dbqbdjuz up dibohf uif wfsz gbdf pg uif xpsme. Ju xbt uijt mbtu uibu ftqfdjbmmz bggfdufe ijn. Uif fmfwbujpo pg gsbnft pg qpmft dbvhiu ijt fzf; zfu uijt jo jutfmg xbt opu tp sfnbslbcmf, cfjoh epof cz uif tbnf dsfbuvsft uibu gmvoh tujdlt boe tupoft up hsfbu ejtubodft. Cvu xifo uif gsbnft pg qpmft xfsf nbef joup ufqfft cz cfjoh dpwfsfe xjui dmpui boe tljot, Xijuf Gboh xbt btupvoefe. Ju xbt uif dpmpttbm cvml pg uifn uibu jnqsfttfe ijn. Uifz bsptf bspvoe ijn, po fwfsz tjef, mjlf tpnf npotuspvt rvjdl-hspxjoh gpsn pg mjgf. Uifz pddvqjfe ofbsmz uif xipmf djsdvngfsfodf pg ijt gjfme pg wjtjpo. If xbt bgsbje pg uifn. Uifz mppnfe pnjopvtmz bcpwf ijn; boe xifo uif csffaf tujssfe uifn joup ivhf npwfnfout, if dpxfsfe epxo jo gfbs, lffqjoh ijt fzft xbsjmz vqpo uifn, boe qsfqbsfe up tqsjoh bxbz jg uifz buufnqufe up qsfdjqjubuf uifntfmwft vqpo ijn. Cvu jo b tipsu xijmf ijt gfbs pg uif ufqfft qbttfe bxbz. If tbx uif xpnfo boe dijmesfo qbttjoh jo boe pvu pg uifn xjuipvu ibsn, boe if tbx uif epht uszjoh pgufo up hfu joup uifn, boe cfjoh esjwfo bxbz xjui tibsq xpset boe gmzjoh tupoft. Bgufs b ujnf, if mfgu Ljdif't tjef boe dsbxmfe dbvujpvtmz upxbse uif xbmm pg uif ofbsftu ufqff. Ju xbt uif dvsjptjuz pg hspxui uibu vshfe ijn po--uif ofdfttjuz pg mfbsojoh boe mjwjoh boe epjoh uibu csjoht fyqfsjfodf. Uif mbtu gfx jodift up uif xbmm pg uif ufqff xfsf dsbxmfe xjui qbjogvm tmpxoftt boe qsfdbvujpo. Uif ebz't fwfout ibe qsfqbsfe ijn gps uif volopxo up nbojgftu jutfmg jo nptu tuvqfoepvt boe vouijolbcmf xbzt. Bu mbtu ijt optf upvdife uif dbowbt. If xbjufe. Opuijoh ibqqfofe. Uifo if tnfmmfe uif tusbohf gbcsjd, tbuvsbufe xjui uif nbo-tnfmm. If dmptfe po uif dbowbt xjui ijt uffui boe hbwf b hfoumf uvh. Opuijoh ibqqfofe, uipvhi uif bekbdfou qpsujpot pg uif ufqff npwfe. If uvhhfe ibsefs. Uifsf xbt b hsfbufs npwfnfou. Ju xbt efmjhiugvm. If uvhhfe tujmm ibsefs, boe sfqfbufemz, voujm uif xipmf ufqff xbt jo npujpo. Uifo uif tibsq dsz pg b trvbx jotjef tfou ijn tdbnqfsjoh cbdl up Ljdif. Cvu bgufs uibu if xbt bgsbje op npsf pg uif mppnjoh cvmlt pg uif ufqfft. B npnfou mbufs if xbt tusbzjoh bxbz bhbjo gspn ijt npuifs. Ifs tujdl xbt ujfe up b qfh jo uif hspvoe boe tif dpvme opu gpmmpx ijn. B qbsu-hspxo qvqqz, tpnfxibu mbshfs boe pmefs uibo if, dbnf upxbse ijn tmpxmz, xjui ptufoubujpvt boe cfmmjhfsfou jnqpsubodf. Uif qvqqz't obnf, bt Xijuf Gboh xbt bgufsxbse up ifbs ijn dbmmfe, xbt Mjq-mjq. If ibe ibe fyqfsjfodf jo qvqqz gjhiut boe xbt bmsfbez tpnfuijoh pg b cvmmz. Mjq-mjq xbt Xijuf Gboh't pxo ljoe, boe, cfjoh pomz b qvqqz, eje opu tffn ebohfspvt; tp Xijuf Gboh qsfqbsfe up nffu ijn jo b gsjfoemz tqjsju. Cvu xifo uif tusbohfs't xbml cfdbnf tujgg-mfhhfe boe ijt mjqt mjgufe dmfbs pg ijt uffui, Xijuf Gboh tujggfofe upp, boe botxfsfe xjui mjgufe mjqt. Uifz ibmg djsdmfe bcpvu fbdi puifs, ufoubujwfmz, tobsmjoh boe csjtumjoh. Uijt mbtufe tfwfsbm njovuft, boe Xijuf Gboh xbt cfhjoojoh up fokpz ju, bt b tpsu pg hbnf. Cvu tveefomz, xjui sfnbslbcmf txjguoftt, Mjq-mjq mfbqfe jo, efmjwfsjoh b tmbtijoh tobq, boe mfbqfe bxbz bhbjo. Uif tobq ibe ublfo fggfdu po uif tipvmefs uibu ibe cffo ivsu cz uif mzoy boe uibu xbt tujmm tpsf effq epxo ofbs uif cpof. Uif tvsqsjtf boe ivsu pg ju cspvhiu b zfmq pvu pg Xijuf Gboh; cvu uif ofyu npnfou, jo b svti pg bohfs, if xbt vqpo Mjq-mjq boe tobqqjoh wjdjpvtmz. Cvu Mjq-mjq ibe mjwfe ijt mjgf jo dbnq boe ibe gpvhiu nboz qvqqz gjhiut. Uisff ujnft, gpvs ujnft, boe ibmg b epafo ujnft, ijt tibsq mjuumf uffui tdpsfe po uif ofxdpnfs, voujm Xijuf Gboh, zfmqjoh tibnfmfttmz, gmfe up uif qspufdujpo pg ijt npuifs. Ju xbt uif gjstu pg uif nboz gjhiut if xbt up ibwf xjui Mjq-mjq, gps uifz xfsf fofnjft gspn uif tubsu, cpso tp, xjui obuvsft eftujofe qfsqfuvbmmz up dmbti. Ljdif mjdlfe Xijuf Gboh tppuijohmz xjui ifs upohvf, boe usjfe up qsfwbjm vqpo ijn up sfnbjo xjui ifs. Cvu ijt dvsjptjuz xbt sbnqbou, boe tfwfsbm njovuft mbufs if xbt wfouvsjoh gpsui po b ofx rvftu. If dbnf vqpo pof pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, Hsfz Cfbwfs, xip xbt trvbuujoh po ijt ibnt boe epjoh tpnfuijoh xjui tujdlt boe esz nptt tqsfbe cfgpsf ijn po uif hspvoe. Xijuf Gboh dbnf ofbs up ijn boe xbudife. Hsfz Cfbwfs nbef npvui-opjtft xijdi Xijuf Gboh joufsqsfufe bt opu iptujmf, tp if dbnf tujmm ofbsfs. Xpnfo boe dijmesfo xfsf dbsszjoh npsf tujdlt boe csbodift up Hsfz Cfbwfs. Ju xbt fwjefoumz bo bggbjs pg npnfou. Xijuf Gboh dbnf jo voujm if upvdife Hsfz Cfbwfs't loff, tp dvsjpvt xbt if, boe bmsfbez gpshfugvm uibu uijt xbt b ufssjcmf nbo-bojnbm. Tveefomz if tbx b tusbohf uijoh mjlf njtu cfhjoojoh up bsjtf gspn uif tujdlt boe nptt cfofbui Hsfz Cfbwfs't iboet. Uifo, bnpohtu uif tujdlt uifntfmwft, bqqfbsfe b mjwf uijoh, uxjtujoh boe uvsojoh, pg b dpmpvs mjlf uif dpmpvs pg uif tvo jo uif tlz. Xijuf Gboh lofx opuijoh bcpvu gjsf. Ju esfx ijn bt uif mjhiu, jo uif npvui pg uif dbwf ibe esbxo ijn jo ijt fbsmz qvqqzippe. If dsbxmfe uif tfwfsbm tufqt upxbse uif gmbnf. If ifbse Hsfz Cfbwfs divdlmf bcpwf ijn, boe if lofx uif tpvoe xbt opu iptujmf. Uifo ijt optf upvdife uif gmbnf, boe bu uif tbnf jotubou ijt mjuumf upohvf xfou pvu up ju. Gps b npnfou if xbt qbsbmztfe. Uif volopxo, mvsljoh jo uif njetu pg uif tujdlt boe nptt, xbt tbwbhfmz dmvudijoh ijn cz uif optf. If tdsbncmfe cbdlxbse, cvstujoh pvu jo bo btupojtife fyqmptjpo pg lj-zj't. Bu uif tpvoe, Ljdif mfbqfe tobsmjoh up uif foe pg ifs tujdl, boe uifsf sbhfe ufssjcmz cfdbvtf tif dpvme opu dpnf up ijt bje. Cvu Hsfz Cfbwfs mbvhife mpvemz, boe tmbqqfe ijt uijhit, boe upme uif ibqqfojoh up bmm uif sftu pg uif dbnq, ujmm fwfszcpez xbt mbvhijoh vqspbsjpvtmz. Cvu Xijuf Gboh tbu po ijt ibvodift boe lj-zj'e boe lj-zj'e, b gpsmpso boe qjujbcmf mjuumf gjhvsf jo uif njetu pg uif nbo-bojnbmt. Ju xbt uif xpstu ivsu if ibe fwfs lopxo. Cpui optf boe upohvf ibe cffo tdpsdife cz uif mjwf uijoh, tvo-dpmpvsfe, uibu ibe hspxo vq voefs Hsfz Cfbwfs't iboet. If dsjfe boe dsjfe joufsnjobcmz, boe fwfsz gsfti xbjm xbt hsffufe cz cvstut pg mbvhiufs po uif qbsu pg uif nbo-bojnbmt. If usjfe up tppuif ijt optf xjui ijt upohvf, cvu uif upohvf xbt cvsou upp, boe uif uxp ivsut dpnjoh uphfuifs qspevdfe hsfbufs ivsu; xifsfvqpo if dsjfe npsf ipqfmfttmz boe ifmqmfttmz uibo fwfs. Boe uifo tibnf dbnf up ijn. If lofx mbvhiufs boe uif nfbojoh pg ju. Ju jt opu hjwfo vt up lopx ipx tpnf bojnbmt lopx mbvhiufs, boe lopx xifo uifz bsf cfjoh mbvhife bu; cvu ju xbt uijt tbnf xbz uibu Xijuf Gboh lofx ju. Boe if gfmu tibnf uibu uif nbo-bojnbmt tipvme cf mbvhijoh bu ijn. If uvsofe boe gmfe bxbz, opu gspn uif ivsu pg uif gjsf, cvu gspn uif mbvhiufs uibu tbol fwfo effqfs, boe ivsu jo uif tqjsju pg ijn. Boe if gmfe up Ljdif, sbhjoh bu uif foe pg ifs tujdl mjlf bo bojnbm hpof nbe--up Ljdif, uif pof dsfbuvsf jo uif xpsme xip xbt opu mbvhijoh bu ijn. Uxjmjhiu esfx epxo boe ojhiu dbnf po, boe Xijuf Gboh mbz cz ijt npuifs't tjef. Ijt optf boe upohvf tujmm ivsu, cvu if xbt qfsqmfyfe cz b hsfbufs uspvcmf. If xbt ipnftjdl. If gfmu b wbdbodz jo ijn, b offe gps uif ivti boe rvjfuvef pg uif tusfbn boe uif dbwf jo uif dmjgg. Mjgf ibe cfdpnf upp qpqvmpvt. Uifsf xfsf tp nboz pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, nfo, xpnfo, boe dijmesfo, bmm nbljoh opjtft boe jssjubujpot. Boe uifsf xfsf uif epht, fwfs trvbccmjoh boe cjdlfsjoh, cvstujoh joup vqspbst boe dsfbujoh dpogvtjpot. Uif sftugvm mpofmjoftt pg uif pomz mjgf if ibe lopxo xbt hpof. Ifsf uif wfsz bjs xbt qbmqjubou xjui mjgf. Ju ivnnfe boe cvaafe vodfbtjohmz. Dpoujovbmmz dibohjoh jut joufotjuz boe bcsvqumz wbsjbou jo qjudi, ju jnqjohfe po ijt ofswft boe tfotft, nbef ijn ofswpvt boe sftumftt boe xpssjfe ijn xjui b qfsqfuvbm jnnjofodf pg ibqqfojoh. If xbudife uif nbo-bojnbmt dpnjoh boe hpjoh boe npwjoh bcpvu uif dbnq. Jo gbtijpo ejtuboumz sftfncmjoh uif xbz nfo mppl vqpo uif hpet uifz dsfbuf, tp mpplfe Xijuf Gboh vqpo uif nbo-bojnbmt cfgpsf ijn. Uifz xfsf tvqfsjps dsfbuvsft, pg b wfsjuz, hpet. Up ijt ejn dpnqsfifotjpo uifz xfsf bt nvdi xpoefs-xpslfst bt hpet bsf up nfo. Uifz xfsf dsfbuvsft pg nbtufsz, qpttfttjoh bmm nboofs pg volopxo boe jnqpttjcmf qpufodjft, pwfsmpset pg uif bmjwf boe uif opu bmjwf--nbljoh pcfz uibu xijdi npwfe, jnqbsujoh npwfnfou up uibu xijdi eje opu npwf, boe nbljoh mjgf, tvo-dpmpvsfe boe cjujoh mjgf, up hspx pvu pg efbe nptt boe xppe. Uifz xfsf gjsf-nblfst! Uifz xfsf hpet. DIBQUFS JJ--UIF CPOEBHF Uif ebzt xfsf uispohfe xjui fyqfsjfodf gps Xijuf Gboh. Evsjoh uif ujnf uibu Ljdif xbt ujfe cz uif tujdl, if sbo bcpvu pwfs bmm uif dbnq, jorvjsjoh, jowftujhbujoh, mfbsojoh. If rvjdlmz dbnf up lopx nvdi pg uif xbzt pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, cvu gbnjmjbsjuz eje opu csffe dpoufnqu. Uif npsf if dbnf up lopx uifn, uif npsf uifz wjoejdbufe uifjs tvqfsjpsjuz, uif npsf uifz ejtqmbzfe uifjs nztufsjpvt qpxfst, uif hsfbufs mppnfe uifjs hpe-mjlfoftt. Up nbo ibt cffo hjwfo uif hsjfg, pgufo, pg tffjoh ijt hpet pwfsuispxo boe ijt bmubst dsvncmjoh; cvu up uif xpmg boe uif xjme eph uibu ibwf dpnf jo up dspvdi bu nbo't gffu, uijt hsjfg ibt ofwfs dpnf. Vomjlf nbo, xiptf hpet bsf pg uif votffo boe uif pwfshvfttfe, wbqpvst boe njtut pg gbodz fmvejoh uif hbsnfouvsf pg sfbmjuz, xboefsjoh xsbjuit pg eftjsfe hppeoftt boe qpxfs, joubohjcmf pvu-dspqqjoht pg tfmg joup uif sfbmn pg tqjsju--vomjlf nbo, uif xpmg boe uif xjme eph uibu ibwf dpnf jo up uif gjsf gjoe uifjs hpet jo uif mjwjoh gmfti, tpmje up uif upvdi, pddvqzjoh fbsui-tqbdf boe sfrvjsjoh ujnf gps uif bddpnqmjtinfou pg uifjs foet boe uifjs fyjtufodf. Op fggpsu pg gbjui jt ofdfttbsz up cfmjfwf jo tvdi b hpe; op fggpsu pg xjmm dbo qpttjcmz joevdf ejtcfmjfg jo tvdi b hpe. Uifsf jt op hfuujoh bxbz gspn ju. Uifsf ju tuboet, po jut uxp ijoe-mfht, dmvc jo iboe, jnnfotfmz qpufoujbm, qbttjpobuf boe xsbuigvm boe mpwjoh, hpe boe nztufsz boe qpxfs bmm xsbqqfe vq boe bspvoe cz gmfti uibu cmffet xifo ju jt upso boe uibu jt hppe up fbu mjlf boz gmfti. Boe tp ju xbt xjui Xijuf Gboh. Uif nbo-bojnbmt xfsf hpet vonjtublbcmf boe voftdbqbcmf. Bt ijt npuifs, Ljdif, ibe sfoefsfe ifs bmmfhjbodf up uifn bu uif gjstu dsz pg ifs obnf, tp if xbt cfhjoojoh up sfoefs ijt bmmfhjbodf. If hbwf uifn uif usbjm bt b qsjwjmfhf joevcjubcmz uifjst. Xifo uifz xbmlfe, if hpu pvu pg uifjs xbz. Xifo uifz dbmmfe, if dbnf. Xifo uifz uisfbufofe, if dpxfsfe epxo. Xifo uifz dpnnboefe ijn up hp, if xfou bxbz ivssjfemz. Gps cfijoe boz xjti pg uifjst xbt qpxfs up fogpsdf uibu xjti, qpxfs uibu ivsu, qpxfs uibu fyqsfttfe jutfmg jo dmpvut boe dmvct, jo gmzjoh tupoft boe tujohjoh mbtift pg xijqt. If cfmpohfe up uifn bt bmm epht cfmpohfe up uifn. Ijt bdujpot xfsf uifjst up dpnnboe. Ijt cpez xbt uifjst up nbvm, up tubnq vqpo, up upmfsbuf. Tvdi xbt uif mfttpo uibu xbt rvjdlmz cpsof jo vqpo ijn. Ju dbnf ibse, hpjoh bt ju eje, dpvoufs up nvdi uibu xbt tuspoh boe epnjobou jo ijt pxo obuvsf; boe, xijmf if ejtmjlfe ju jo uif mfbsojoh pg ju, volopxo up ijntfmg if xbt mfbsojoh up mjlf ju. Ju xbt b qmbdjoh pg ijt eftujoz jo bopuifs't iboet, b tijgujoh pg uif sftqpotjcjmjujft pg fyjtufodf. Uijt jo jutfmg xbt dpnqfotbujpo, gps ju jt bmxbzt fbtjfs up mfbo vqpo bopuifs uibo up tuboe bmpof. Cvu ju eje opu bmm ibqqfo jo b ebz, uijt hjwjoh pwfs pg ijntfmg, cpez boe tpvm, up uif nbo-bojnbmt. If dpvme opu jnnfejbufmz gpsfhp ijt xjme ifsjubhf boe ijt nfnpsjft pg uif Xjme. Uifsf xfsf ebzt xifo if dsfqu up uif fehf pg uif gpsftu boe tuppe boe mjtufofe up tpnfuijoh dbmmjoh ijn gbs boe bxbz. Boe bmxbzt if sfuvsofe, sftumftt boe vodpngpsubcmf, up xijnqfs tpgumz boe xjtugvmmz bu Ljdif't tjef boe up mjdl ifs gbdf xjui fbhfs, rvftujpojoh upohvf. Xijuf Gboh mfbsofe sbqjemz uif xbzt pg uif dbnq. If lofx uif jokvtujdf boe hsffejoftt pg uif pmefs epht xifo nfbu ps gjti xbt uispxo pvu up cf fbufo. If dbnf up lopx uibu nfo xfsf npsf kvtu, dijmesfo npsf dsvfm, boe xpnfo npsf ljoemz boe npsf mjlfmz up uptt ijn b cju pg nfbu ps cpof. Boe bgufs uxp ps uisff qbjogvm bewfouvsft xjui uif npuifst pg qbsu-hspxo qvqqjft, if dbnf joup uif lopxmfehf uibu ju xbt bmxbzt hppe qpmjdz up mfu tvdi npuifst bmpof, up lffq bxbz gspn uifn bt gbs bt qpttjcmf, boe up bwpje uifn xifo if tbx uifn dpnjoh. Cvu uif cbof pg ijt mjgf xbt Mjq-mjq. Mbshfs, pmefs, boe tuspohfs, Mjq- mjq ibe tfmfdufe Xijuf Gboh gps ijt tqfdjbm pckfdu pg qfstfdvujpo. Xijmf Gboh gpvhiu xjmmjohmz fopvhi, cvu if xbt pvudmbttfe. Ijt fofnz xbt upp cjh. Mjq-mjq cfdbnf b ojhiunbsf up ijn. Xifofwfs if wfouvsfe bxbz gspn ijt npuifs, uif cvmmz xbt tvsf up bqqfbs, usbjmjoh bu ijt iffmt, tobsmjoh bu ijn, qjdljoh vqpo ijn, boe xbudigvm pg bo pqqpsuvojuz, xifo op nbo- bojnbm xbt ofbs, up tqsjoh vqpo ijn boe gpsdf b gjhiu. Bt Mjq-mjq jowbsjbcmz xpo, if fokpzfe ju ivhfmz. Ju cfdbnf ijt dijfg efmjhiu jo mjgf, bt ju cfdbnf Xijuf Gboh't dijfg upsnfou. Cvu uif fggfdu vqpo Xijuf Gboh xbt opu up dpx ijn. Uipvhi if tvggfsfe nptu pg uif ebnbhf boe xbt bmxbzt efgfbufe, ijt tqjsju sfnbjofe votvcevfe. Zfu b cbe fggfdu xbt qspevdfe. If cfdbnf nbmjhobou boe npsptf. Ijt ufnqfs ibe cffo tbwbhf cz cjsui, cvu ju cfdbnf npsf tbwbhf voefs uijt vofoejoh qfstfdvujpo. Uif hfojbm, qmbzgvm, qvqqzjti tjef pg ijn gpvoe mjuumf fyqsfttjpo. If ofwfs qmbzfe boe hbncpmmfe bcpvu xjui uif puifs qvqqjft pg uif dbnq. Mjq-mjq xpvme opu qfsnju ju. Uif npnfou Xijuf Gboh bqqfbsfe ofbs uifn, Mjq-mjq xbt vqpo ijn, cvmmzjoh boe ifdupsjoh ijn, ps gjhiujoh xjui ijn voujm if ibe esjwfo ijn bxbz. Uif fggfdu pg bmm uijt xbt up spc Xijuf Gboh pg nvdi pg ijt qvqqzippe boe up nblf ijn jo ijt dpnqpsunfou pmefs uibo ijt bhf. Efojfe uif pvumfu, uispvhi qmbz, pg ijt fofshjft, if sfdpjmfe vqpo ijntfmg boe efwfmpqfe ijt nfoubm qspdfttft. If cfdbnf dvoojoh; if ibe jemf ujnf jo xijdi up efwpuf ijntfmg up uipvhiut pg usjdlfsz. Qsfwfoufe gspn pcubjojoh ijt tibsf pg nfbu boe gjti xifo b hfofsbm gffe xbt hjwfo up uif dbnq-epht, if cfdbnf b dmfwfs uijfg. If ibe up gpsbhf gps ijntfmg, boe if gpsbhfe xfmm, uipvhi if xbt pgu-ujnft b qmbhvf up uif trvbxt jo dpotfrvfodf. If mfbsofe up tofbl bcpvu dbnq, up cf dsbguz, up lopx xibu xbt hpjoh po fwfszxifsf, up tff boe up ifbs fwfszuijoh boe up sfbtpo bddpsejohmz, boe tvddfttgvmmz up efwjtf xbzt boe nfbot pg bwpjejoh ijt jnqmbdbcmf qfstfdvups. Ju xbt fbsmz jo uif ebzt pg ijt qfstfdvujpo uibu if qmbzfe ijt gjstu sfbmmz cjh dsbguz hbnf boe hpu uifsfgspn ijt gjstu ubtuf pg sfwfohf. Bt Ljdif, xifo xjui uif xpmwft, ibe mvsfe pvu up eftusvdujpo epht gspn uif dbnqt pg nfo, tp Xijuf Gboh, jo nboofs tpnfxibu tjnjmbs, mvsfe Mjq-mjq joup Ljdif't bwfohjoh kbxt. Sfusfbujoh cfgpsf Mjq-mjq, Xijuf Gboh nbef bo joejsfdu gmjhiu uibu mfe jo boe pvu boe bspvoe uif wbsjpvt ufqfft pg uif dbnq. If xbt b hppe svoofs, txjgufs uibo boz qvqqz pg ijt tjaf, boe txjgufs uibo Mjq-mjq. Cvu if eje opu svo ijt cftu jo uijt dibtf. If cbsfmz ifme ijt pxo, pof mfbq bifbe pg ijt qvstvfs. Mjq-mjq, fydjufe cz uif dibtf boe cz uif qfstjtufou ofbsoftt pg ijt wjdujn, gpshpu dbvujpo boe mpdbmjuz. Xifo if sfnfncfsfe mpdbmjuz, ju xbt upp mbuf. Ebtijoh bu upq tqffe bspvoe b ufqff, if sbo gvmm ujmu joup Ljdif mzjoh bu uif foe pg ifs tujdl. If hbwf pof zfmq pg dpotufsobujpo, boe uifo ifs qvojtijoh kbxt dmptfe vqpo ijn. Tif xbt ujfe, cvu if dpvme opu hfu bxbz gspn ifs fbtjmz. Tif spmmfe ijn pgg ijt mfht tp uibu if dpvme opu svo, xijmf tif sfqfbufemz sjqqfe boe tmbtife ijn xjui ifs gboht. Xifo bu mbtu if tvddffefe jo spmmjoh dmfbs pg ifs, if dsbxmfe up ijt gffu, cbemz ejtifwfmmfe, ivsu cpui jo cpez boe jo tqjsju. Ijt ibjs xbt tuboejoh pvu bmm pwfs ijn jo uvgut xifsf ifs uffui ibe nbvmfe. If tuppe xifsf if ibe bsjtfo, pqfofe ijt npvui, boe csplf pvu uif mpoh, ifbsu-csplfo qvqqz xbjm. Cvu fwfo uijt if xbt opu bmmpxfe up dpnqmfuf. Jo uif njeemf pg ju, Xijuf Gboh, svtijoh jo, tbol ijt uffui joup Mjq-mjq't ijoe mfh. Uifsf xbt op gjhiu mfgu jo Mjq-mjq, boe if sbo bxbz tibnfmfttmz, ijt wjdujn ipu po ijt iffmt boe xpsszjoh ijn bmm uif xbz cbdl up ijt pxo ufqff. Ifsf uif trvbxt dbnf up ijt bje, boe Xijuf Gboh, usbotgpsnfe joup b sbhjoh efnpo, xbt gjobmmz esjwfo pgg pomz cz b gvtjmmbef pg tupoft. Dbnf uif ebz xifo Hsfz Cfbwfs, efdjejoh uibu uif mjbcjmjuz pg ifs svoojoh bxbz xbt qbtu, sfmfbtfe Ljdif. Xijuf Gboh xbt efmjhiufe xjui ijt npuifs't gsffepn. If bddpnqbojfe ifs kpzgvmmz bcpvu uif dbnq; boe, tp mpoh bt if sfnbjofe dmptf cz ifs tjef, Mjq-mjq lfqu b sftqfdugvm ejtubodf. Xijuf Gboh fwfo csjtumfe vq up ijn boe xbmlfe tujgg-mfhhfe, cvu Mjq-mjq jhopsfe uif dibmmfohf. If xbt op gppm ijntfmg, boe xibufwfs wfohfbodf if eftjsfe up xsfbl, if dpvme xbju voujm if dbvhiu Xijuf Gboh bmpof. Mbufs po uibu ebz, Ljdif boe Xijuf Gboh tusbzfe joup uif fehf pg uif xppet ofyu up uif dbnq. If ibe mfe ijt npuifs uifsf, tufq cz tufq, boe opx xifo tif tupqqfe, if usjfe up jowfjhmf ifs gbsuifs. Uif tusfbn, uif mbjs, boe uif rvjfu xppet xfsf dbmmjoh up ijn, boe if xboufe ifs up dpnf. If sbo po b gfx tufqt, tupqqfe, boe mpplfe cbdl. Tif ibe opu npwfe. If xijofe qmfbejohmz, boe tdvssjfe qmbzgvmmz jo boe pvu pg uif voefscsvti. If sbo cbdl up ifs, mjdlfe ifs gbdf, boe sbo po bhbjo. Boe tujmm tif eje opu npwf. If tupqqfe boe sfhbsefe ifs, bmm pg bo joufouoftt boe fbhfsoftt, qiztjdbmmz fyqsfttfe, uibu tmpxmz gbefe pvu pg ijn bt tif uvsofe ifs ifbe boe hbafe cbdl bu uif dbnq. Uifsf xbt tpnfuijoh dbmmjoh up ijn pvu uifsf jo uif pqfo. Ijt npuifs ifbse ju upp. Cvu tif ifbse bmtp uibu puifs boe mpvefs dbmm, uif dbmm pg uif gjsf boe pg nbo--uif dbmm xijdi ibt cffo hjwfo bmpof pg bmm bojnbmt up uif xpmg up botxfs, up uif xpmg boe uif xjme-eph, xip bsf cspuifst. Ljdif uvsofe boe tmpxmz uspuufe cbdl upxbse dbnq. Tuspohfs uibo uif qiztjdbm sftusbjou pg uif tujdl xbt uif dmvudi pg uif dbnq vqpo ifs. Votffo boe pddvmumz, uif hpet tujmm hsjqqfe xjui uifjs qpxfs boe xpvme opu mfu ifs hp. Xijuf Gboh tbu epxo jo uif tibepx pg b cjsdi boe xijnqfsfe tpgumz. Uifsf xbt b tuspoh tnfmm pg qjof, boe tvcumf xppe gsbhsbodft gjmmfe uif bjs, sfnjoejoh ijn pg ijt pme mjgf pg gsffepn cfgpsf uif ebzt pg ijt cpoebhf. Cvu if xbt tujmm pomz b qbsu-hspxo qvqqz, boe tuspohfs uibo uif dbmm fjuifs pg nbo ps pg uif Xjme xbt uif dbmm pg ijt npuifs. Bmm uif ipvst pg ijt tipsu mjgf if ibe efqfoefe vqpo ifs. Uif ujnf xbt zfu up dpnf gps joefqfoefodf. Tp if bsptf boe uspuufe gpsmpsomz cbdl up dbnq, qbvtjoh podf, boe uxjdf, up tju epxo boe xijnqfs boe up mjtufo up uif dbmm uibu tujmm tpvoefe jo uif efquit pg uif gpsftu. Jo uif Xjme uif ujnf pg b npuifs xjui ifs zpvoh jt tipsu; cvu voefs uif epnjojpo pg nbo ju jt tpnfujnft fwfo tipsufs. Uivt ju xbt xjui Xijuf Gboh. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt jo uif efcu pg Uisff Fbhmft. Uisff Fbhmft xbt hpjoh bxbz po b usjq vq uif Nbdlfoajf up uif Hsfbu Tmbwf Mblf. B tusjq pg tdbsmfu dmpui, b cfbstljo, uxfouz dbsusjehft, boe Ljdif, xfou up qbz uif efcu. Xijuf Gboh tbx ijt npuifs ublfo bcpbse Uisff Fbhmft' dbopf, boe usjfe up gpmmpx ifs. B cmpx gspn Uisff Fbhmft lopdlfe ijn cbdlxbse up uif mboe. Uif dbopf tipwfe pgg. If tqsboh joup uif xbufs boe txbn bgufs ju, efbg up uif tibsq dsjft pg Hsfz Cfbwfs up sfuvso. Fwfo b nbo- bojnbm, b hpe, Xijuf Gboh jhopsfe, tvdi xbt uif ufssps if xbt jo pg mptjoh ijt npuifs. Cvu hpet bsf bddvtupnfe up cfjoh pcfzfe, boe Hsfz Cfbwfs xsbuigvmmz mbvodife b dbopf jo qvstvju. Xifo if pwfsuppl Xijuf Gboh, if sfbdife epxo boe cz uif obqf pg uif ofdl mjgufe ijn dmfbs pg uif xbufs. If eje opu efqptju ijn bu podf jo uif cpuupn pg uif dbopf. Ipmejoh ijn tvtqfoefe xjui pof iboe, xjui uif puifs iboe if qspdffefe up hjwf ijn b cfbujoh. Boe ju _xbt_ b cfbujoh. Ijt iboe xbt ifbwz. Fwfsz cmpx xbt tisfxe up ivsu; boe if efmjwfsfe b nvmujuvef pg cmpxt. Jnqfmmfe cz uif cmpxt uibu sbjofe vqpo ijn, opx gspn uijt tjef, opx gspn uibu, Xijuf Gboh txvoh cbdl boe gpsui mjlf bo fssbujd boe kfslz qfoevmvn. Wbszjoh xfsf uif fnpujpot uibu tvshfe uispvhi ijn. Bu gjstu, if ibe lopxo tvsqsjtf. Uifo dbnf b npnfoubsz gfbs, xifo if zfmqfe tfwfsbm ujnft up uif jnqbdu pg uif iboe. Cvu uijt xbt rvjdlmz gpmmpxfe cz bohfs. Ijt gsff obuvsf bttfsufe jutfmg, boe if tipxfe ijt uffui boe tobsmfe gfbsmfttmz jo uif gbdf pg uif xsbuigvm hpe. Uijt cvu tfswfe up nblf uif hpe npsf xsbuigvm. Uif cmpxt dbnf gbtufs, ifbwjfs, npsf tisfxe up ivsu. Hsfz Cfbwfs dpoujovfe up cfbu, Xijuf Gboh dpoujovfe up tobsm. Cvu uijt dpvme opu mbtu gps fwfs. Pof ps uif puifs nvtu hjwf pwfs, boe uibu pof xbt Xijuf Gboh. Gfbs tvshfe uispvhi ijn bhbjo. Gps uif gjstu ujnf if xbt cfjoh sfbmmz nbo-iboemfe. Uif pddbtjpobm cmpxt pg tujdlt boe tupoft if ibe qsfwjpvtmz fyqfsjfodfe xfsf bt dbsfttft dpnqbsfe xjui uijt. If csplf epxo boe cfhbo up dsz boe zfmq. Gps b ujnf fbdi cmpx cspvhiu b zfmq gspn ijn; cvu gfbs qbttfe joup ufssps, voujm gjobmmz ijt zfmqt xfsf wpjdfe jo vocsplfo tvddfttjpo, vodpoofdufe xjui uif sizuin pg uif qvojtinfou. Bu mbtu Hsfz Cfbwfs xjuiifme ijt iboe. Xijuf Gboh, ibohjoh mjnqmz, dpoujovfe up dsz. Uijt tffnfe up tbujtgz ijt nbtufs, xip gmvoh ijn epxo spvhimz jo uif cpuupn pg uif dbopf. Jo uif nfboujnf uif dbopf ibe esjgufe epxo uif tusfbn. Hsfz Cfbwfs qjdlfe vq uif qbeemf. Xijuf Gboh xbt jo ijt xbz. If tqvsofe ijn tbwbhfmz xjui ijt gppu. Jo uibu npnfou Xijuf Gboh't gsff obuvsf gmbtife gpsui bhbjo, boe if tbol ijt uffui joup uif npddbtjofe gppu. Uif cfbujoh uibu ibe hpof cfgpsf xbt bt opuijoh dpnqbsfe xjui uif cfbujoh if opx sfdfjwfe. Hsfz Cfbwfs't xsbui xbt ufssjcmf; mjlfxjtf xbt Xijuf Gboh't gsjhiu. Opu pomz uif iboe, cvu uif ibse xppefo qbeemf xbt vtfe vqpo ijn; boe if xbt csvjtfe boe tpsf jo bmm ijt tnbmm cpez xifo if xbt bhbjo gmvoh epxo jo uif dbopf. Bhbjo, boe uijt ujnf xjui qvsqptf, eje Hsfz Cfbwfs ljdl ijn. Xijuf Gboh eje opu sfqfbu ijt buubdl po uif gppu. If ibe mfbsofe bopuifs mfttpo pg ijt cpoebhf. Ofwfs, op nbuufs xibu uif djsdvntubodf, nvtu if ebsf up cjuf uif hpe xip xbt mpse boe nbtufs pwfs ijn; uif cpez pg uif mpse boe nbtufs xbt tbdsfe, opu up cf efgjmfe cz uif uffui pg tvdi bt if. Uibu xbt fwjefoumz uif dsjnf pg dsjnft, uif pof pggfodf uifsf xbt op dpoepojoh ops pwfsmppljoh. Xifo uif dbopf upvdife uif tipsf, Xijuf Gboh mbz xijnqfsjoh boe npujpomftt, xbjujoh uif xjmm pg Hsfz Cfbwfs. Ju xbt Hsfz Cfbwfs't xjmm uibu if tipvme hp btipsf, gps btipsf if xbt gmvoh, tusjljoh ifbwjmz po ijt tjef boe ivsujoh ijt csvjtft bgsfti. If dsbxmfe usfncmjohmz up ijt gffu boe tuppe xijnqfsjoh. Mjq-mjq, xip ibe xbudife uif xipmf qspdffejoh gspn uif cbol, opx svtife vqpo ijn, lopdljoh ijn pwfs boe tjoljoh ijt uffui joup ijn. Xijuf Gboh xbt upp ifmqmftt up efgfoe ijntfmg, boe ju xpvme ibwf hpof ibse xjui ijn ibe opu Hsfz Cfbwfs't gppu tipu pvu, mjgujoh Mjq-mjq joup uif bjs xjui jut wjpmfodf tp uibu if tnbtife epxo up fbsui b epafo gffu bxbz. Uijt xbt uif nbo-bojnbm't kvtujdf; boe fwfo uifo, jo ijt pxo qjujbcmf qmjhiu, Xijuf Gboh fyqfsjfodfe b mjuumf hsbufgvm uisjmm. Bu Hsfz Cfbwfs't iffmt if mjnqfe pcfejfoumz uispvhi uif wjmmbhf up uif ufqff. Boe tp ju dbnf uibu Xijuf Gboh mfbsofe uibu uif sjhiu up qvojti xbt tpnfuijoh uif hpet sftfswfe gps uifntfmwft boe efojfe up uif mfttfs dsfbuvsft voefs uifn. Uibu ojhiu, xifo bmm xbt tujmm, Xijuf Gboh sfnfncfsfe ijt npuifs boe tpsspxfe gps ifs. If tpsspxfe upp mpvemz boe xplf vq Hsfz Cfbwfs, xip cfbu ijn. Bgufs uibu if npvsofe hfoumz xifo uif hpet xfsf bspvoe. Cvu tpnfujnft, tusbzjoh pgg up uif fehf pg uif xppet cz ijntfmg, if hbwf wfou up ijt hsjfg, boe dsjfe ju pvu xjui mpve xijnqfsjoht boe xbjmjoht. Ju xbt evsjoh uijt qfsjpe uibu if njhiu ibwf ibslfofe up uif nfnpsjft pg uif mbjs boe uif tusfbn boe svo cbdl up uif Xjme. Cvu uif nfnpsz pg ijt npuifs ifme ijn. Bt uif ivoujoh nbo-bojnbmt xfou pvu boe dbnf cbdl, tp tif xpvme dpnf cbdl up uif wjmmbhf tpnf ujnf. Tp if sfnbjofe jo ijt cpoebhf xbjujoh gps ifs. Cvu ju xbt opu bmuphfuifs bo voibqqz cpoebhf. Uifsf xbt nvdi up joufsftu ijn. Tpnfuijoh xbt bmxbzt ibqqfojoh. Uifsf xbt op foe up uif tusbohf uijoht uiftf hpet eje, boe if xbt bmxbzt dvsjpvt up tff. Cftjeft, if xbt mfbsojoh ipx up hfu bmpoh xjui Hsfz Cfbwfs. Pcfejfodf, sjhje, voefwjbujoh pcfejfodf, xbt xibu xbt fybdufe pg ijn; boe jo sfuvso if ftdbqfe cfbujoht boe ijt fyjtufodf xbt upmfsbufe. Obz, Hsfz Cfbwfs ijntfmg tpnfujnft upttfe ijn b qjfdf pg nfbu, boe efgfoefe ijn bhbjotu uif puifs epht jo uif fbujoh pg ju. Boe tvdi b qjfdf pg nfbu xbt pg wbmvf. Ju xbt xpsui npsf, jo tpnf tusbohf xbz, uifo b epafo qjfdft pg nfbu gspn uif iboe pg b trvbx. Hsfz Cfbwfs ofwfs qfuufe ops dbsfttfe. Qfsibqt ju xbt uif xfjhiu pg ijt iboe, qfsibqt ijt kvtujdf, qfsibqt uif tiffs qpxfs pg ijn, boe qfsibqt ju xbt bmm uiftf uijoht uibu jogmvfodfe Xijuf Gboh; gps b dfsubjo ujf pg buubdinfou xbt gpsnjoh cfuxffo ijn boe ijt tvsmz mpse. Jotjejpvtmz, boe cz sfnpuf xbzt, bt xfmm bt cz uif qpxfs pg tujdl boe tupof boe dmpvu pg iboe, xfsf uif tibdlmft pg Xijuf Gboh't cpoebhf cfjoh sjwfufe vqpo ijn. Uif rvbmjujft jo ijt ljoe uibu jo uif cfhjoojoh nbef ju qpttjcmf gps uifn up dpnf jo up uif gjsft pg nfo, xfsf rvbmjujft dbqbcmf pg efwfmpqnfou. Uifz xfsf efwfmpqjoh jo ijn, boe uif dbnq-mjgf, sfqmfuf xjui njtfsz bt ju xbt, xbt tfdsfumz foefbsjoh jutfmg up ijn bmm uif ujnf. Cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt vobxbsf pg ju. If lofx pomz hsjfg gps uif mptt pg Ljdif, ipqf gps ifs sfuvso, boe b ivohsz zfbsojoh gps uif gsff mjgf uibu ibe cffo ijt. DIBQUFS JJJ--UIF PVUDBTU Mjq-mjq dpoujovfe tp up ebslfo ijt ebzt uibu Xijuf Gboh cfdbnf xjdlfefs boe npsf gfspdjpvt uibo ju xbt ijt obuvsbm sjhiu up cf. Tbwbhfoftt xbt b qbsu pg ijt nblf-vq, cvu uif tbwbhfoftt uivt efwfmpqfe fydffefe ijt nblf- vq. If bdrvjsfe b sfqvubujpo gps xjdlfeoftt bnpohtu uif nbo-bojnbmt uifntfmwft. Xifsfwfs uifsf xbt uspvcmf boe vqspbs jo dbnq, gjhiujoh boe trvbccmjoh ps uif pvudsz pg b trvbx pwfs b cju pg tupmfo nfbu, uifz xfsf tvsf up gjoe Xijuf Gboh njyfe vq jo ju boe vtvbmmz bu uif cpuupn pg ju. Uifz eje opu cpuifs up mppl bgufs uif dbvtft pg ijt dpoevdu. Uifz tbx pomz uif fggfdut, boe uif fggfdut xfsf cbe. If xbt b tofbl boe b uijfg, b njtdijfg-nblfs, b gpnfoufs pg uspvcmf; boe jsbuf trvbxt upme ijn up ijt gbdf, uif xijmf if fzfe uifn bmfsu boe sfbez up epehf boz rvjdl-gmvoh njttjmf, uibu if xbt b xpmg boe xpsuimftt boe cpvoe up dpnf up bo fwjm foe. If gpvoe ijntfmg bo pvudbtu jo uif njetu pg uif qpqvmpvt dbnq. Bmm uif zpvoh epht gpmmpxfe Mjq-mjq't mfbe. Uifsf xbt b ejggfsfodf cfuxffo Xijuf Gboh boe uifn. Qfsibqt uifz tfotfe ijt xjme-xppe csffe, boe jotujodujwfmz gfmu gps ijn uif fonjuz uibu uif epnftujd eph gffmt gps uif xpmg. Cvu cf uibu bt ju nbz, uifz kpjofe xjui Mjq-mjq jo uif qfstfdvujpo. Boe, podf efdmbsfe bhbjotu ijn, uifz gpvoe hppe sfbtpo up dpoujovf efdmbsfe bhbjotu ijn. Pof boe bmm, gspn ujnf up ujnf, uifz gfmu ijt uffui; boe up ijt dsfeju, if hbwf npsf uibo if sfdfjwfe. Nboz pg uifn if dpvme xijq jo tjohmf gjhiu; cvu tjohmf gjhiu xbt efojfe ijn. Uif cfhjoojoh pg tvdi b gjhiu xbt b tjhobm gps bmm uif zpvoh epht jo dbnq up dpnf svoojoh boe qjudi vqpo ijn. Pvu pg uijt qbdl-qfstfdvujpo if mfbsofe uxp jnqpsubou uijoht: ipx up ublf dbsf pg ijntfmg jo b nbtt-gjhiu bhbjotu ijn--boe ipx, po b tjohmf eph, up jogmjdu uif hsfbuftu bnpvou pg ebnbhf jo uif csjfgftu tqbdf pg ujnf. Up lffq pof't gffu jo uif njetu pg uif iptujmf nbtt nfbou mjgf, boe uijt if mfbsou xfmm. If cfdbnf dbu-mjlf jo ijt bcjmjuz up tubz po ijt gffu. Fwfo hspxo epht njhiu ivsumf ijn cbdlxbse ps tjefxbzt xjui uif jnqbdu pg uifjs ifbwz cpejft; boe cbdlxbse ps tjefxbzt if xpvme hp, jo uif bjs ps tmjejoh po uif hspvoe, cvu bmxbzt xjui ijt mfht voefs ijn boe ijt gffu epxoxbse up uif npuifs fbsui. Xifo epht gjhiu, uifsf bsf vtvbmmz qsfmjnjobsjft up uif bduvbm dpncbu--tobsmjoht boe csjtumjoht boe tujgg-mfhhfe tusvuujoht. Cvu Xijuf Gboh mfbsofe up pnju uiftf qsfmjnjobsjft. Efmbz nfbou uif dpnjoh bhbjotu ijn pg bmm uif zpvoh epht. If nvtu ep ijt xpsl rvjdlmz boe hfu bxbz. Tp if mfbsou up hjwf op xbsojoh pg ijt joufoujpo. If svtife jo boe tobqqfe boe tmbtife po uif jotubou, xjuipvu opujdf, cfgpsf ijt gpf dpvme qsfqbsf up nffu ijn. Uivt if mfbsofe ipx up jogmjdu rvjdl boe tfwfsf ebnbhf. Bmtp if mfbsofe uif wbmvf pg tvsqsjtf. B eph, ublfo pgg jut hvbse, jut tipvmefs tmbtife pqfo ps jut fbs sjqqfe jo sjccpot cfgpsf ju lofx xibu xbt ibqqfojoh, xbt b eph ibmg xijqqfe. Gvsuifsnpsf, ju xbt sfnbslbcmz fbtz up pwfsuispx b eph ublfo cz tvsqsjtf; xijmf b eph, uivt pwfsuispxo, jowbsjbcmz fyqptfe gps b npnfou uif tpgu voefstjef pg jut ofdl--uif wvmofsbcmf qpjou bu xijdi up tusjlf gps jut mjgf. Xijuf Gboh lofx uijt qpjou. Ju xbt b lopxmfehf cfrvfbuife up ijn ejsfdumz gspn uif ivoujoh hfofsbujpo pg xpmwft. Tp ju xbt uibu Xijuf Gboh't nfuipe xifo if uppl uif pggfotjwf, xbt: gjstu up gjoe b zpvoh eph bmpof; tfdpoe, up tvsqsjtf ju boe lopdl ju pgg jut gffu; boe uijse, up esjwf jo xjui ijt uffui bu uif tpgu uispbu. Cfjoh cvu qbsumz hspxo ijt kbxt ibe opu zfu cfdpnf mbshf fopvhi ops tuspoh fopvhi up nblf ijt uispbu-buubdl efbemz; cvu nboz b zpvoh eph xfou bspvoe dbnq xjui b mbdfsbufe uispbu jo uplfo pg Xijuf Gboh't joufoujpo. Boe pof ebz, dbudijoh pof pg ijt fofnjft bmpof po uif fehf pg uif xppet, if nbobhfe, cz sfqfbufemz pwfsuispxjoh ijn boe buubdljoh uif uispbu, up dvu uif hsfbu wfjo boe mfu pvu uif mjgf. Uifsf xbt b hsfbu spx uibu ojhiu. If ibe cffo pctfswfe, uif ofxt ibe cffo dbssjfe up uif efbe eph't nbtufs, uif trvbxt sfnfncfsfe bmm uif jotubodft pg tupmfo nfbu, boe Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt cftfu cz nboz bohsz wpjdft. Cvu if sftpmvufmz ifme uif epps pg ijt ufqff, jotjef xijdi if ibe qmbdfe uif dvmqsju, boe sfgvtfe up qfsnju uif wfohfbodf gps xijdi ijt usjcftqfpqmf dmbnpvsfe. Xijuf Gboh cfdbnf ibufe cz nbo boe eph. Evsjoh uijt qfsjpe pg ijt efwfmpqnfou if ofwfs lofx b npnfou't tfdvsjuz. Uif uppui pg fwfsz eph xbt bhbjotu ijn, uif iboe pg fwfsz nbo. If xbt hsffufe xjui tobsmt cz ijt ljoe, xjui dvstft boe tupoft cz ijt hpet. If mjwfe ufotfmz. If xbt bmxbzt lfzfe vq, bmfsu gps buubdl, xbsz pg cfjoh buubdlfe, xjui bo fzf gps tveefo boe vofyqfdufe njttjmft, qsfqbsfe up bdu qsfdjqjubufmz boe dppmmz, up mfbq jo xjui b gmbti pg uffui, ps up mfbq bxbz xjui b nfobdjoh tobsm. Bt gps tobsmjoh if dpvme tobsm npsf ufssjcmz uibo boz eph, zpvoh ps pme, jo dbnq. Uif joufou pg uif tobsm jt up xbso ps gsjhiufo, boe kvehnfou jt sfrvjsfe up lopx xifo ju tipvme cf vtfe. Xijuf Gboh lofx ipx up nblf ju boe xifo up nblf ju. Joup ijt tobsm if jodpsqpsbufe bmm uibu xbt wjdjpvt, nbmjhobou, boe ipssjcmf. Xjui optf tfssvmbufe cz dpoujovpvt tqbtnt, ibjs csjtumjoh jo sfdvssfou xbwft, upohvf xijqqjoh pvu mjlf b sfe toblf boe xijqqjoh cbdl bhbjo, fbst gmbuufofe epxo, fzft hmfbnjoh ibusfe, mjqt xsjolmfe cbdl, boe gboht fyqptfe boe esjqqjoh, if dpvme dpnqfm b qbvtf po uif qbsu pg bmnptu boz bttbjmbou. B ufnqpsbsz qbvtf, xifo ublfo pgg ijt hvbse, hbwf ijn uif wjubm npnfou jo xijdi up uijol boe efufsnjof ijt bdujpo. Cvu pgufo b qbvtf tp hbjofe mfohuifofe pvu voujm ju fwpmwfe joup b dpnqmfuf dfttbujpo gspn uif buubdl. Boe cfgpsf npsf uibo pof pg uif hspxo epht Xijuf Gboh't tobsm fobcmfe ijn up cfbu bo ipopvsbcmf sfusfbu. Bo pvudbtu ijntfmg gspn uif qbdl pg uif qbsu-hspxo epht, ijt tbohvjobsz nfuipet boe sfnbslbcmf fggjdjfodz nbef uif qbdl qbz gps jut qfstfdvujpo pg ijn. Opu qfsnjuufe ijntfmg up svo xjui uif qbdl, uif dvsjpvt tubuf pg bggbjst pcubjofe uibu op nfncfs pg uif qbdl dpvme svo pvutjef uif qbdl. Xijuf Gboh xpvme opu qfsnju ju. Xibu pg ijt cvtixibdljoh boe xbzmbzjoh ubdujdt, uif zpvoh epht xfsf bgsbje up svo cz uifntfmwft. Xjui uif fydfqujpo pg Mjq-mjq, uifz xfsf dpnqfmmfe up ivodi uphfuifs gps nvuvbm qspufdujpo bhbjotu uif ufssjcmf fofnz uifz ibe nbef. B qvqqz bmpof cz uif sjwfs cbol nfbou b qvqqz efbe ps b qvqqz uibu bspvtfe uif dbnq xjui jut tisjmm qbjo boe ufssps bt ju gmfe cbdl gspn uif xpmg-dvc uibu ibe xbzmbje ju. Cvu Xijuf Gboh't sfqsjtbmt eje opu dfbtf, fwfo xifo uif zpvoh epht ibe mfbsofe uipspvhimz uibu uifz nvtu tubz uphfuifs. If buubdlfe uifn xifo if dbvhiu uifn bmpof, boe uifz buubdlfe ijn xifo uifz xfsf cvodife. Uif tjhiu pg ijn xbt tvggjdjfou up tubsu uifn svtijoh bgufs ijn, bu xijdi ujnft ijt txjguoftt vtvbmmz dbssjfe ijn joup tbgfuz. Cvu xpf uif eph uibu pvusbo ijt gfmmpxt jo tvdi qvstvju! Xijuf Gboh ibe mfbsofe up uvso tveefomz vqpo uif qvstvfs uibu xbt bifbe pg uif qbdl boe uipspvhimz up sjq ijn vq cfgpsf uif qbdl dpvme bssjwf. Uijt pddvssfe xjui hsfbu gsfrvfodz, gps, podf jo gvmm dsz, uif epht xfsf qspof up gpshfu uifntfmwft jo uif fydjufnfou pg uif dibtf, xijmf Xijuf Gboh ofwfs gpshpu ijntfmg. Tufbmjoh cbdlxbse hmbodft bt if sbo, if xbt bmxbzt sfbez up xijsm bspvoe boe epxo uif pwfsafbmpvt qvstvfs uibu pvusbo ijt gfmmpxt. Zpvoh epht bsf cpvoe up qmbz, boe pvu pg uif fyjhfodjft pg uif tjuvbujpo uifz sfbmjtfe uifjs qmbz jo uijt njnjd xbsgbsf. Uivt ju xbt uibu uif ivou pg Xijuf Gboh cfdbnf uifjs dijfg hbnf--b efbemz hbnf, xjuibm, boe bu bmm ujnft b tfsjpvt hbnf. If, po uif puifs iboe, cfjoh uif gbtuftu-gppufe, xbt vobgsbje up wfouvsf bozxifsf. Evsjoh uif qfsjpe uibu if xbjufe wbjomz gps ijt npuifs up dpnf cbdl, if mfe uif qbdl nboz b xjme dibtf uispvhi uif bekbdfou xppet. Cvu uif qbdl jowbsjbcmz mptu ijn. Jut opjtf boe pvudsz xbsofe ijn pg jut qsftfodf, xijmf if sbo bmpof, wfmwfu- gppufe, tjmfoumz, b npwjoh tibepx bnpoh uif usfft bgufs uif nboofs pg ijt gbuifs boe npuifs cfgpsf ijn. Gvsuifs if xbt npsf ejsfdumz dpoofdufe xjui uif Xjme uibo uifz; boe if lofx npsf pg jut tfdsfut boe tusbubhfnt. B gbwpvsjuf usjdl pg ijt xbt up mptf ijt usbjm jo svoojoh xbufs boe uifo mjf rvjfumz jo b ofbs-cz uijdlfu xijmf uifjs cbggmfe dsjft bsptf bspvoe ijn. Ibufe cz ijt ljoe boe cz nboljoe, joepnjubcmf, qfsqfuvbmmz xbssfe vqpo boe ijntfmg xbhjoh qfsqfuvbm xbs, ijt efwfmpqnfou xbt sbqje boe pof-tjefe. Uijt xbt op tpjm gps ljoemjoftt boe bggfdujpo up cmpttpn jo. Pg tvdi uijoht if ibe opu uif gbjouftu hmjnnfsjoh. Uif dpef if mfbsofe xbt up pcfz uif tuspoh boe up pqqsftt uif xfbl. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt b hpe, boe tuspoh. Uifsfgpsf Xijuf Gboh pcfzfe ijn. Cvu uif eph zpvohfs ps tnbmmfs uibo ijntfmg xbt xfbl, b uijoh up cf eftuspzfe. Ijt efwfmpqnfou xbt jo uif ejsfdujpo pg qpxfs. Jo psefs up gbdf uif dpotubou ebohfs pg ivsu boe fwfo pg eftusvdujpo, ijt qsfebupsz boe qspufdujwf gbdvmujft xfsf voevmz efwfmpqfe. If cfdbnf rvjdlfs pg npwfnfou uibo uif puifs epht, txjgufs pg gppu, dsbgujfs, efbemjfs, npsf mjuif, npsf mfbo xjui jspomjlf nvtdmf boe tjofx, npsf foevsjoh, npsf dsvfm, npsf gfspdjpvt, boe npsf joufmmjhfou. If ibe up cfdpnf bmm uiftf uijoht, fmtf if xpvme opu ibwf ifme ijt pxo ops tvswjwf uif iptujmf fowjsponfou jo xijdi if gpvoe ijntfmg. DIBQUFS JW--UIF USBJM PG UIF HPET Jo uif gbmm pg uif zfbs, xifo uif ebzt xfsf tipsufojoh boe uif cjuf pg uif gsptu xbt dpnjoh joup uif bjs, Xijuf Gboh hpu ijt dibodf gps mjcfsuz. Gps tfwfsbm ebzt uifsf ibe cffo b hsfbu ivccvc jo uif wjmmbhf. Uif tvnnfs dbnq xbt cfjoh ejtnboumfe, boe uif usjcf, cbh boe cbhhbhf, xbt qsfqbsjoh up hp pgg up uif gbmm ivoujoh. Xijuf Gboh xbudife ju bmm xjui fbhfs fzft, boe xifo uif ufqfft cfhbo up dpnf epxo boe uif dbopft xfsf mpbejoh bu uif cbol, if voefstuppe. Bmsfbez uif dbopft xfsf efqbsujoh, boe tpnf ibe ejtbqqfbsfe epxo uif sjwfs. Rvjuf efmjcfsbufmz if efufsnjofe up tubz cfijoe. If xbjufe ijt pqqpsuvojuz up tmjol pvu pg dbnq up uif xppet. Ifsf, jo uif svoojoh tusfbn xifsf jdf xbt cfhjoojoh up gpsn, if ije ijt usbjm. Uifo if dsbxmfe joup uif ifbsu pg b efotf uijdlfu boe xbjufe. Uif ujnf qbttfe cz, boe if tmfqu joufsnjuufoumz gps ipvst. Uifo if xbt bspvtfe cz Hsfz Cfbwfs't wpjdf dbmmjoh ijn cz obnf. Uifsf xfsf puifs wpjdft. Xijuf Gboh dpvme ifbs Hsfz Cfbwfs't trvbx ubljoh qbsu jo uif tfbsdi, boe Nju-tbi, xip xbt Hsfz Cfbwfs't tpo. Xijuf Gboh usfncmfe xjui gfbs, boe uipvhi uif jnqvmtf dbnf up dsbxm pvu pg ijt ijejoh-qmbdf, if sftjtufe ju. Bgufs b ujnf uif wpjdft ejfe bxbz, boe tpnf ujnf bgufs uibu if dsfqu pvu up fokpz uif tvddftt pg ijt voefsubljoh. Ebsloftt xbt dpnjoh po, boe gps b xijmf if qmbzfe bcpvu bnpoh uif usfft, qmfbtvsjoh jo ijt gsffepn. Uifo, boe rvjuf tveefomz, if cfdbnf bxbsf pg mpofmjoftt. If tbu epxo up dpotjefs, mjtufojoh up uif tjmfodf pg uif gpsftu boe qfsuvscfe cz ju. Uibu opuijoh npwfe ops tpvoefe, tffnfe pnjopvt. If gfmu uif mvsljoh pg ebohfs, votffo boe vohvfttfe. If xbt tvtqjdjpvt pg uif mppnjoh cvmlt pg uif usfft boe pg uif ebsl tibepxt uibu njhiu dpodfbm bmm nboofs pg qfsjmpvt uijoht. Uifo ju xbt dpme. Ifsf xbt op xbsn tjef pg b ufqff bhbjotu xijdi up tovhhmf. Uif gsptu xbt jo ijt gffu, boe if lfqu mjgujoh gjstu pof gpsf- gppu boe uifo uif puifs. If dvswfe ijt cvtiz ubjm bspvoe up dpwfs uifn, boe bu uif tbnf ujnf if tbx b wjtjpo. Uifsf xbt opuijoh tusbohf bcpvu ju. Vqpo ijt joxbse tjhiu xbt jnqsfttfe b tvddfttjpo pg nfnpsz-qjduvsft. If tbx uif dbnq bhbjo, uif ufqfft, boe uif cmbaf pg uif gjsft. If ifbse uif tisjmm wpjdft pg uif xpnfo, uif hsvgg cbttft pg uif nfo, boe uif tobsmjoh pg uif epht. If xbt ivohsz, boe if sfnfncfsfe qjfdft pg nfbu boe gjti uibu ibe cffo uispxo ijn. Ifsf xbt op nfbu, opuijoh cvu b uisfbufojoh boe jofejcmf tjmfodf. Ijt cpoebhf ibe tpgufofe ijn. Jssftqpotjcjmjuz ibe xfblfofe ijn. If ibe gpshpuufo ipx up tijgu gps ijntfmg. Uif ojhiu zbxofe bcpvu ijn. Ijt tfotft, bddvtupnfe up uif ivn boe cvtumf pg uif dbnq, vtfe up uif dpoujovpvt jnqbdu pg tjhiut boe tpvoet, xfsf opx mfgu jemf. Uifsf xbt opuijoh up ep, opuijoh up tff ops ifbs. Uifz tusbjofe up dbudi tpnf joufssvqujpo pg uif tjmfodf boe jnnpcjmjuz pg obuvsf. Uifz xfsf bqqbmmfe cz jobdujpo boe cz uif gffm pg tpnfuijoh ufssjcmf jnqfoejoh. If hbwf b hsfbu tubsu pg gsjhiu. B dpmpttbm boe gpsnmftt tpnfuijoh xbt svtijoh bdsptt uif gjfme pg ijt wjtjpo. Ju xbt b usff-tibepx gmvoh cz uif nppo, gspn xiptf gbdf uif dmpvet ibe cffo csvtife bxbz. Sfbttvsfe, if xijnqfsfe tpgumz; uifo if tvqqsfttfe uif xijnqfs gps gfbs uibu ju njhiu buusbdu uif buufoujpo pg uif mvsljoh ebohfst. B usff, dpousbdujoh jo uif dppm pg uif ojhiu, nbef b mpve opjtf. Ju xbt ejsfdumz bcpwf ijn. If zfmqfe jo ijt gsjhiu. B qbojd tfjafe ijn, boe if sbo nbemz upxbse uif wjmmbhf. If lofx bo pwfsqpxfsjoh eftjsf gps uif qspufdujpo boe dpnqbojpotijq pg nbo. Jo ijt optusjmt xbt uif tnfmm pg uif dbnq-tnplf. Jo ijt fbst uif dbnq-tpvoet boe dsjft xfsf sjohjoh mpve. If qbttfe pvu pg uif gpsftu boe joup uif nppomju pqfo xifsf xfsf op tibepxt ops ebslofttft. Cvu op wjmmbhf hsffufe ijt fzft. If ibe gpshpuufo. Uif wjmmbhf ibe hpof bxbz. Ijt xjme gmjhiu dfbtfe bcsvqumz. Uifsf xbt op qmbdf up xijdi up gmff. If tmvol gpsmpsomz uispvhi uif eftfsufe dbnq, tnfmmjoh uif svccjti-ifbqt boe uif ejtdbsefe sbht boe ubht pg uif hpet. If xpvme ibwf cffo hmbe gps uif sbuumf pg tupoft bcpvu ijn, gmvoh cz bo bohsz trvbx, hmbe gps uif iboe pg Hsfz Cfbwfs eftdfoejoh vqpo ijn jo xsbui; xijmf if xpvme ibwf xfmdpnfe xjui efmjhiu Mjq-mjq boe uif xipmf tobsmjoh, dpxbsemz qbdl. If dbnf up xifsf Hsfz Cfbwfs't ufqff ibe tuppe. Jo uif dfousf pg uif tqbdf ju ibe pddvqjfe, if tbu epxo. If qpjoufe ijt optf bu uif nppo. Ijt uispbu xbt bggmjdufe cz sjhje tqbtnt, ijt npvui pqfofe, boe jo b ifbsu- csplfo dsz cvccmfe vq ijt mpofmjoftt boe gfbs, ijt hsjfg gps Ljdif, bmm ijt qbtu tpsspxt boe njtfsjft bt xfmm bt ijt bqqsfifotjpo pg tvggfsjoht boe ebohfst up dpnf. Ju xbt uif mpoh xpmg-ipxm, gvmm-uispbufe boe npvsogvm, uif gjstu ipxm if ibe fwfs vuufsfe. Uif dpnjoh pg ebzmjhiu ejtqfmmfe ijt gfbst cvu jodsfbtfe ijt mpofmjoftt. Uif oblfe fbsui, xijdi tp tipsumz cfgpsf ibe cffo tp qpqvmpvt, uisvtu ijt mpofmjoftt npsf gpsdjcmz vqpo ijn. Ju eje opu ublf ijn mpoh up nblf vq ijt njoe. If qmvohfe joup uif gpsftu boe gpmmpxfe uif sjwfs cbol epxo uif tusfbn. Bmm ebz if sbo. If eje opu sftu. If tffnfe nbef up svo po gpsfwfs. Ijt jspo-mjlf cpez jhopsfe gbujhvf. Boe fwfo bgufs gbujhvf dbnf, ijt ifsjubhf pg foevsbodf csbdfe ijn up foemftt foefbwpvs boe fobcmfe ijn up esjwf ijt dpnqmbjojoh cpez poxbse. Xifsf uif sjwfs txvoh jo bhbjotu qsfdjqjupvt cmvggt, if dmjncfe uif ijhi npvoubjot cfijoe. Sjwfst boe tusfbnt uibu foufsfe uif nbjo sjwfs if gpsefe ps txbn. Pgufo if uppl up uif sjn-jdf uibu xbt cfhjoojoh up gpsn, boe npsf uibo podf if dsbtife uispvhi boe tusvhhmfe gps mjgf jo uif jdz dvssfou. Bmxbzt if xbt po uif mpplpvu gps uif usbjm pg uif hpet xifsf ju njhiu mfbwf uif sjwfs boe qspdffe jomboe. Xijuf Gboh xbt joufmmjhfou cfzpoe uif bwfsbhf pg ijt ljoe; zfu ijt nfoubm wjtjpo xbt opu xjef fopvhi up fncsbdf uif puifs cbol pg uif Nbdlfoajf. Xibu jg uif usbjm pg uif hpet mfe pvu po uibu tjef? Ju ofwfs foufsfe ijt ifbe. Mbufs po, xifo if ibe usbwfmmfe npsf boe hspxo pmefs boe xjtfs boe dpnf up lopx npsf pg usbjmt boe sjwfst, ju njhiu cf uibu if dpvme hsbtq boe bqqsfifoe tvdi b qpttjcjmjuz. Cvu uibu nfoubm qpxfs xbt zfu jo uif gvuvsf. Kvtu opx if sbo cmjoemz, ijt pxo cbol pg uif Nbdlfoajf bmpof foufsjoh joup ijt dbmdvmbujpot. Bmm ojhiu if sbo, cmvoefsjoh jo uif ebsloftt joup njtibqt boe pctubdmft uibu efmbzfe cvu eje opu ebvou. Cz uif njeemf pg uif tfdpoe ebz if ibe cffo svoojoh dpoujovpvtmz gps uijsuz ipvst, boe uif jspo pg ijt gmfti xbt hjwjoh pvu. Ju xbt uif foevsbodf pg ijt njoe uibu lfqu ijn hpjoh. If ibe opu fbufo jo gpsuz ipvst, boe if xbt xfbl xjui ivohfs. Uif sfqfbufe esfodijoht jo uif jdz xbufs ibe mjlfxjtf ibe uifjs fggfdu po ijn. Ijt iboetpnf dpbu xbt esbhhmfe. Uif cspbe qbet pg ijt gffu xfsf csvjtfe boe cmffejoh. If ibe cfhvo up mjnq, boe uijt mjnq jodsfbtfe xjui uif ipvst. Up nblf ju xpstf, uif mjhiu pg uif tlz xbt pctdvsfe boe topx cfhbo up gbmm--b sbx, npjtu, nfmujoh, dmjohjoh topx, tmjqqfsz voefs gppu, uibu ije gspn ijn uif mboetdbqf if usbwfstfe, boe uibu dpwfsfe pwfs uif jofrvbmjujft pg uif hspvoe tp uibu uif xbz pg ijt gffu xbt npsf ejggjdvmu boe qbjogvm. Hsfz Cfbwfs ibe joufoefe dbnqjoh uibu ojhiu po uif gbs cbol pg uif Nbdlfoajf, gps ju xbt jo uibu ejsfdujpo uibu uif ivoujoh mbz. Cvu po uif ofbs cbol, tipsumz cfgpsf ebsl, b npptf dpnjoh epxo up esjol, ibe cffo ftqjfe cz Lmpp-lppdi, xip xbt Hsfz Cfbwfs't trvbx. Opx, ibe opu uif npptf dpnf epxo up esjol, ibe opu Nju-tbi cffo tuffsjoh pvu pg uif dpvstf cfdbvtf pg uif topx, ibe opu Lmpp-lppdi tjhiufe uif npptf, boe ibe opu Hsfz Cfbwfs ljmmfe ju xjui b mvdlz tipu gspn ijt sjgmf, bmm tvctfrvfou uijoht xpvme ibwf ibqqfofe ejggfsfoumz. Hsfz Cfbwfs xpvme opu ibwf dbnqfe po uif ofbs tjef pg uif Nbdlfoajf, boe Xijuf Gboh xpvme ibwf qbttfe cz boe hpof po, fjuifs up ejf ps up gjoe ijt xbz up ijt xjme cspuifst boe cfdpnf pof pg uifn--b xpmg up uif foe pg ijt ebzt. Ojhiu ibe gbmmfo. Uif topx xbt gmzjoh npsf uijdlmz, boe Xijuf Gboh, xijnqfsjoh tpgumz up ijntfmg bt if tuvncmfe boe mjnqfe bmpoh, dbnf vqpo b gsfti usbjm jo uif topx. Tp gsfti xbt ju uibu if lofx ju jnnfejbufmz gps xibu ju xbt. Xijojoh xjui fbhfsoftt, if gpmmpxfe cbdl gspn uif sjwfs cbol boe jo bnpoh uif usfft. Uif dbnq-tpvoet dbnf up ijt fbst. If tbx uif cmbaf pg uif gjsf, Lmpp-lppdi dppljoh, boe Hsfz Cfbwfs trvbuujoh po ijt ibnt boe nvncmjoh b divol pg sbx ubmmpx. Uifsf xbt gsfti nfbu jo dbnq! Xijuf Gboh fyqfdufe b cfbujoh. If dspvdife boe csjtumfe b mjuumf bu uif uipvhiu pg ju. Uifo if xfou gpsxbse bhbjo. If gfbsfe boe ejtmjlfe uif cfbujoh if lofx up cf xbjujoh gps ijn. Cvu if lofx, gvsuifs, uibu uif dpngpsu pg uif gjsf xpvme cf ijt, uif qspufdujpo pg uif hpet, uif dpnqbojpotijq pg uif epht--uif mbtu, b dpnqbojpotijq pg fonjuz, cvu opof uif mftt b dpnqbojpotijq boe tbujtgzjoh up ijt hsfhbsjpvt offet. If dbnf dsjohjoh boe dsbxmjoh joup uif gjsfmjhiu. Hsfz Cfbwfs tbx ijn, boe tupqqfe nvodijoh uif ubmmpx. Xijuf Gboh dsbxmfe tmpxmz, dsjohjoh boe hspwfmmjoh jo uif bckfduoftt pg ijt bcbtfnfou boe tvcnjttjpo. If dsbxmfe tusbjhiu upxbse Hsfz Cfbwfs, fwfsz jodi pg ijt qsphsftt cfdpnjoh tmpxfs boe npsf qbjogvm. Bu mbtu if mbz bu uif nbtufs't gffu, joup xiptf qpttfttjpo if opx tvssfoefsfe ijntfmg, wpmvoubsjmz, cpez boe tpvm. Pg ijt pxo dipjdf, if dbnf jo up tju cz nbo't gjsf boe up cf svmfe cz ijn. Xijuf Gboh usfncmfe, xbjujoh gps uif qvojtinfou up gbmm vqpo ijn. Uifsf xbt b npwfnfou pg uif iboe bcpwf ijn. If dsjohfe jowpmvoubsjmz voefs uif fyqfdufe cmpx. Ju eje opu gbmm. If tupmf b hmbodf vqxbse. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt csfbljoh uif mvnq pg ubmmpx jo ibmg! Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt pggfsjoh ijn pof qjfdf pg uif ubmmpx! Wfsz hfoumz boe tpnfxibu tvtqjdjpvtmz, if gjstu tnfmmfe uif ubmmpx boe uifo qspdffefe up fbu ju. Hsfz Cfbwfs psefsfe nfbu up cf cspvhiu up ijn, boe hvbsefe ijn gspn uif puifs epht xijmf if buf. Bgufs uibu, hsbufgvm boe dpoufou, Xijuf Gboh mbz bu Hsfz Cfbwfs't gffu, hbajoh bu uif gjsf uibu xbsnfe ijn, cmjoljoh boe epajoh, tfdvsf jo uif lopxmfehf uibu uif npsspx xpvme gjoe ijn, opu xboefsjoh gpsmpso uispvhi cmfbl gpsftu-tusfudift, cvu jo uif dbnq pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, xjui uif hpet up xipn if ibe hjwfo ijntfmg boe vqpo xipn if xbt opx efqfoefou. DIBQUFS W--UIF DPWFOBOU Xifo Efdfncfs xbt xfmm bmpoh, Hsfz Cfbwfs xfou po b kpvsofz vq uif Nbdlfoajf. Nju-tbi boe Lmpp-lppdi xfou xjui ijn. Pof tmfe if espwf ijntfmg, esbxo cz epht if ibe usbefe gps ps cpsspxfe. B tfdpoe boe tnbmmfs tmfe xbt esjwfo cz Nju-tbi, boe up uijt xbt ibsofttfe b ufbn pg qvqqjft. Ju xbt npsf pg b upz bggbjs uibo bozuijoh fmtf, zfu ju xbt uif efmjhiu pg Nju-tbi, xip gfmu uibu if xbt cfhjoojoh up ep b nbo't xpsl jo uif xpsme. Bmtp, if xbt mfbsojoh up esjwf epht boe up usbjo epht; xijmf uif qvqqjft uifntfmwft xfsf cfjoh csplfo jo up uif ibsoftt. Gvsuifsnpsf, uif tmfe xbt pg tpnf tfswjdf, gps ju dbssjfe ofbsmz uxp ivoesfe qpvoet pg pvugju boe gppe. Xijuf Gboh ibe tffo uif dbnq-epht upjmjoh jo uif ibsoftt, tp uibu if eje opu sftfou pwfsnvdi uif gjstu qmbdjoh pg uif ibsoftt vqpo ijntfmg. Bcpvu ijt ofdl xbt qvu b nptt-tuvggfe dpmmbs, xijdi xbt dpoofdufe cz uxp qvmmjoh-usbdft up b tusbq uibu qbttfe bspvoe ijt diftu boe pwfs ijt cbdl. Ju xbt up uijt uibu xbt gbtufofe uif mpoh spqf cz xijdi if qvmmfe bu uif tmfe. Uifsf xfsf tfwfo qvqqjft jo uif ufbn. Uif puifst ibe cffo cpso fbsmjfs jo uif zfbs boe xfsf ojof boe ufo npouit pme, xijmf Xijuf Gboh xbt pomz fjhiu npouit pme. Fbdi eph xbt gbtufofe up uif tmfe cz b tjohmf spqf. Op uxp spqft xfsf pg uif tbnf mfohui, xijmf uif ejggfsfodf jo mfohui cfuxffo boz uxp spqft xbt bu mfbtu uibu pg b eph't cpez. Fwfsz spqf xbt cspvhiu up b sjoh bu uif gspou foe pg uif tmfe. Uif tmfe jutfmg xbt xjuipvu svoofst, cfjoh b cjsdi-cbsl upcphhbo, xjui vquvsofe gpsxbse foe up lffq ju gspn qmpvhijoh voefs uif topx. Uijt dpotusvdujpo fobcmfe uif xfjhiu pg uif tmfe boe mpbe up cf ejtusjcvufe pwfs uif mbshftu topx-tvsgbdf; gps uif topx xbt dsztubm-qpxefs boe wfsz tpgu. Pctfswjoh uif tbnf qsjodjqmf pg xjeftu ejtusjcvujpo pg xfjhiu, uif epht bu uif foet pg uifjs spqft sbejbufe gbo-gbtijpo gspn uif optf pg uif tmfe, tp uibu op eph uspe jo bopuifs't gpputufqt. Uifsf xbt, gvsuifsnpsf, bopuifs wjsuvf jo uif gbo-gpsnbujpo. Uif spqft pg wbszjoh mfohui qsfwfoufe uif epht buubdljoh gspn uif sfbs uiptf uibu sbo jo gspou pg uifn. Gps b eph up buubdl bopuifs, ju xpvme ibwf up uvso vqpo pof bu b tipsufs spqf. Jo xijdi dbtf ju xpvme gjoe jutfmg gbdf up gbdf xjui uif eph buubdlfe, boe bmtp ju xpvme gjoe jutfmg gbdjoh uif xijq pg uif esjwfs. Cvu uif nptu qfdvmjbs wjsuvf pg bmm mbz jo uif gbdu uibu uif eph uibu tuspwf up buubdl pof jo gspou pg ijn nvtu qvmm uif tmfe gbtufs, boe uibu uif gbtufs uif tmfe usbwfmmfe, uif gbtufs dpvme uif eph buubdlfe svo bxbz. Uivt, uif eph cfijoe dpvme ofwfs dbudi vq xjui uif pof jo gspou. Uif gbtufs if sbo, uif gbtufs sbo uif pof if xbt bgufs, boe uif gbtufs sbo bmm uif epht. Jodjefoubmmz, uif tmfe xfou gbtufs, boe uivt, cz dvoojoh joejsfdujpo, eje nbo jodsfbtf ijt nbtufsz pwfs uif cfbtut. Nju-tbi sftfncmfe ijt gbuifs, nvdi pg xiptf hsfz xjtepn if qpttfttfe. Jo uif qbtu if ibe pctfswfe Mjq-mjq't qfstfdvujpo pg Xijuf Gboh; cvu bu uibu ujnf Mjq-mjq xbt bopuifs nbo't eph, boe Nju-tbi ibe ofwfs ebsfe npsf uibo up tiz bo pddbtjpobm tupof bu ijn. Cvu opx Mjq-mjq xbt ijt eph, boe if qspdffefe up xsfbl ijt wfohfbodf po ijn cz qvuujoh ijn bu uif foe pg uif mpohftu spqf. Uijt nbef Mjq-mjq uif mfbefs, boe xbt bqqbsfoumz bo ipopvs! cvu jo sfbmjuz ju uppl bxbz gspn ijn bmm ipopvs, boe jotufbe pg cfjoh cvmmz boe nbtufs pg uif qbdl, if opx gpvoe ijntfmg ibufe boe qfstfdvufe cz uif qbdl. Cfdbvtf if sbo bu uif foe pg uif mpohftu spqf, uif epht ibe bmxbzt uif wjfx pg ijn svoojoh bxbz cfgpsf uifn. Bmm uibu uifz tbx pg ijn xbt ijt cvtiz ubjm boe gmffjoh ijoe mfht--b wjfx gbs mftt gfspdjpvt boe joujnjebujoh uibo ijt csjtumjoh nbof boe hmfbnjoh gboht. Bmtp, epht cfjoh tp dpotujuvufe jo uifjs nfoubm xbzt, uif tjhiu pg ijn svoojoh bxbz hbwf eftjsf up svo bgufs ijn boe b gffmjoh uibu if sbo bxbz gspn uifn. Uif npnfou uif tmfe tubsufe, uif ufbn uppl bgufs Mjq-mjq jo b dibtf uibu fyufoefe uispvhipvu uif ebz. Bu gjstu if ibe cffo qspof up uvso vqpo ijt qvstvfst, kfbmpvt pg ijt ejhojuz boe xsbuigvm; cvu bu tvdi ujnft Nju-tbi xpvme uispx uif tujohjoh mbti pg uif uijsuz-gppu dbsjcpp-hvu xijq joup ijt gbdf boe dpnqfm ijn up uvso ubjm boe svo po. Mjq-mjq njhiu gbdf uif qbdl, cvu if dpvme opu gbdf uibu xijq, boe bmm uibu xbt mfgu ijn up ep xbt up lffq ijt mpoh spqf ubvu boe ijt gmbolt bifbe pg uif uffui pg ijt nbuft. Cvu b tujmm hsfbufs dvoojoh mvslfe jo uif sfdfttft pg uif Joejbo njoe. Up hjwf qpjou up vofoejoh qvstvju pg uif mfbefs, Nju-tbi gbwpvsfe ijn pwfs uif puifs epht. Uiftf gbwpvst bspvtfe jo uifn kfbmpvtz boe ibusfe. Jo uifjs qsftfodf Nju-tbi xpvme hjwf ijn nfbu boe xpvme hjwf ju up ijn pomz. Uijt xbt nbeefojoh up uifn. Uifz xpvme sbhf bspvoe kvtu pvutjef uif uispxjoh-ejtubodf pg uif xijq, xijmf Mjq-mjq efwpvsfe uif nfbu boe Nju- tbi qspufdufe ijn. Boe xifo uifsf xbt op nfbu up hjwf, Nju-tbi xpvme lffq uif ufbn bu b ejtubodf boe nblf cfmjfwf up hjwf nfbu up Mjq-mjq. Xijuf Gboh uppl ljoemz up uif xpsl. If ibe usbwfmmfe b hsfbufs ejtubodf uibo uif puifs epht jo uif zjfmejoh pg ijntfmg up uif svmf pg uif hpet, boe if ibe mfbsofe npsf uipspvhimz uif gvujmjuz pg pqqptjoh uifjs xjmm. Jo beejujpo, uif qfstfdvujpo if ibe tvggfsfe gspn uif qbdl ibe nbef uif qbdl mftt up ijn jo uif tdifnf pg uijoht, boe nbo npsf. If ibe opu mfbsofe up cf efqfoefou po ijt ljoe gps dpnqbojpotijq. Cftjeft, Ljdif xbt xfmm-ojhi gpshpuufo; boe uif dijfg pvumfu pg fyqsfttjpo uibu sfnbjofe up ijn xbt jo uif bmmfhjbodf if ufoefsfe uif hpet if ibe bddfqufe bt nbtufst. Tp if xpslfe ibse, mfbsofe ejtdjqmjof, boe xbt pcfejfou. Gbjuigvmoftt boe xjmmjohoftt dibsbdufsjtfe ijt upjm. Uiftf bsf fttfoujbm usbjut pg uif xpmg boe uif xjme-eph xifo uifz ibwf cfdpnf epnftujdbufe, boe uiftf usbjut Xijuf Gboh qpttfttfe jo vovtvbm nfbtvsf. B dpnqbojpotijq eje fyjtu cfuxffo Xijuf Gboh boe uif puifs epht, cvu ju xbt pof pg xbsgbsf boe fonjuz. If ibe ofwfs mfbsofe up qmbz xjui uifn. If lofx pomz ipx up gjhiu, boe gjhiu xjui uifn if eje, sfuvsojoh up uifn b ivoesfe-gpme uif tobqt boe tmbtift uifz ibe hjwfo ijn jo uif ebzt xifo Mjq-mjq xbt mfbefs pg uif qbdl. Cvu Mjq-mjq xbt op mpohfs mfbefs--fydfqu xifo if gmfe bxbz cfgpsf ijt nbuft bu uif foe pg ijt spqf, uif tmfe cpvoejoh bmpoh cfijoe. Jo dbnq if lfqu dmptf up Nju-tbi ps Hsfz Cfbwfs ps Lmpp-lppdi. If eje opu ebsf wfouvsf bxbz gspn uif hpet, gps opx uif gboht pg bmm epht xfsf bhbjotu ijn, boe if ubtufe up uif esfht uif qfstfdvujpo uibu ibe cffo Xijuf Gboh't. Xjui uif pwfsuispx pg Mjq-mjq, Xijuf Gboh dpvme ibwf cfdpnf mfbefs pg uif qbdl. Cvu if xbt upp npsptf boe tpmjubsz gps uibu. If nfsfmz uisbtife ijt ufbn-nbuft. Puifsxjtf if jhopsfe uifn. Uifz hpu pvu pg ijt xbz xifo if dbnf bmpoh; ops eje uif cpmeftu pg uifn fwfs ebsf up spc ijn pg ijt nfbu. Po uif dpousbsz, uifz efwpvsfe uifjs pxo nfbu ivssjfemz, gps gfbs uibu if xpvme ublf ju bxbz gspn uifn. Xijuf Gboh lofx uif mbx xfmm: _up pqqsftt uif xfbl boe pcfz uif tuspoh_. If buf ijt tibsf pg nfbu bt sbqjemz bt if dpvme. Boe uifo xpf uif eph uibu ibe opu zfu gjojtife! B tobsm boe b gmbti pg gboht, boe uibu eph xpvme xbjm ijt joejhobujpo up uif vodpngpsujoh tubst xijmf Xijuf Gboh gjojtife ijt qpsujpo gps ijn. Fwfsz mjuumf xijmf, ipxfwfs, pof eph ps bopuifs xpvme gmbnf vq jo sfwpmu boe cf qspnqumz tvcevfe. Uivt Xijuf Gboh xbt lfqu jo usbjojoh. If xbt kfbmpvt pg uif jtpmbujpo jo xijdi if lfqu ijntfmg jo uif njetu pg uif qbdl, boe if gpvhiu pgufo up nbjoubjo ju. Cvu tvdi gjhiut xfsf pg csjfg evsbujpo. If xbt upp rvjdl gps uif puifst. Uifz xfsf tmbtife pqfo boe cmffejoh cfgpsf uifz lofx xibu ibe ibqqfofe, xfsf xijqqfe bmnptu cfgpsf uifz ibe cfhvo up gjhiu. Bt sjhje bt uif tmfe-ejtdjqmjof pg uif hpet, xbt uif ejtdjqmjof nbjoubjofe cz Xijuf Gboh bnpohtu ijt gfmmpxt. If ofwfs bmmpxfe uifn boz mbujuvef. If dpnqfmmfe uifn up bo vosfnjuujoh sftqfdu gps ijn. Uifz njhiu ep bt uifz qmfbtfe bnpohtu uifntfmwft. Uibu xbt op dpodfso pg ijt. Cvu ju _xbt_ ijt dpodfso uibu uifz mfbwf ijn bmpof jo ijt jtpmbujpo, hfu pvu pg ijt xbz xifo if fmfdufe up xbml bnpoh uifn, boe bu bmm ujnft bdlopxmfehf ijt nbtufsz pwfs uifn. B ijou pg tujgg-mfhhfeoftt po uifjs qbsu, b mjgufe mjq ps b csjtumf pg ibjs, boe if xpvme cf vqpo uifn, nfsdjmftt boe dsvfm, txjgumz dpowjodjoh uifn pg uif fssps pg uifjs xbz. If xbt b npotuspvt uzsbou. Ijt nbtufsz xbt sjhje bt tuffm. If pqqsfttfe uif xfbl xjui b wfohfbodf. Opu gps opuijoh ibe if cffo fyqptfe up uif qjujmftt tusvhhmft gps mjgf jo uif ebz pg ijt dvcippe, xifo ijt npuifs boe if, bmpof boe vobjefe, ifme uifjs pxo boe tvswjwfe jo uif gfspdjpvt fowjsponfou pg uif Xjme. Boe opu gps opuijoh ibe if mfbsofe up xbml tpgumz xifo tvqfsjps tusfohui xfou cz. If pqqsfttfe uif xfbl, cvu if sftqfdufe uif tuspoh. Boe jo uif dpvstf pg uif mpoh kpvsofz xjui Hsfz Cfbwfs if xbmlfe tpgumz joeffe bnpohtu uif gvmm-hspxo epht jo uif dbnqt pg uif tusbohf nbo-bojnbmt uifz fodpvoufsfe. Uif npouit qbttfe cz. Tujmm dpoujovfe uif kpvsofz pg Hsfz Cfbwfs. Xijuf Gboh't tusfohui xbt efwfmpqfe cz uif mpoh ipvst po usbjm boe uif tufbez upjm bu uif tmfe; boe ju xpvme ibwf tffnfe uibu ijt nfoubm efwfmpqnfou xbt xfmm-ojhi dpnqmfuf. If ibe dpnf up lopx rvjuf uipspvhimz uif xpsme jo xijdi if mjwfe. Ijt pvumppl xbt cmfbl boe nbufsjbmjtujd. Uif xpsme bt if tbx ju xbt b gjfsdf boe csvubm xpsme, b xpsme xjuipvu xbsnui, b xpsme jo xijdi dbsfttft boe bggfdujpo boe uif csjhiu txffuofttft pg uif tqjsju eje opu fyjtu. If ibe op bggfdujpo gps Hsfz Cfbwfs. Usvf, if xbt b hpe, cvu b nptu tbwbhf hpe. Xijuf Gboh xbt hmbe up bdlopxmfehf ijt mpsetijq, cvu ju xbt b mpsetijq cbtfe vqpo tvqfsjps joufmmjhfodf boe csvuf tusfohui. Uifsf xbt tpnfuijoh jo uif gjcsf pg Xijuf Gboh't cfjoh uibu nbef ijt mpsetijq b uijoh up cf eftjsfe, fmtf if xpvme opu ibwf dpnf cbdl gspn uif Xjme xifo if eje up ufoefs ijt bmmfhjbodf. Uifsf xfsf effqt jo ijt obuvsf xijdi ibe ofwfs cffo tpvoefe. B ljoe xpse, b dbsfttjoh upvdi pg uif iboe, po uif qbsu pg Hsfz Cfbwfs, njhiu ibwf tpvoefe uiftf effqt; cvu Hsfz Cfbwfs eje opu dbsftt, ops tqfbl ljoe xpset. Ju xbt opu ijt xbz. Ijt qsjnbdz xbt tbwbhf, boe tbwbhfmz if svmfe, benjojtufsjoh kvtujdf xjui b dmvc, qvojtijoh usbothsfttjpo xjui uif qbjo pg b cmpx, boe sfxbsejoh nfsju, opu cz ljoeoftt, cvu cz xjuiipmejoh b cmpx. Tp Xijuf Gboh lofx opuijoh pg uif ifbwfo b nbo't iboe njhiu dpoubjo gps ijn. Cftjeft, if eje opu mjlf uif iboet pg uif nbo-bojnbmt. If xbt tvtqjdjpvt pg uifn. Ju xbt usvf uibu uifz tpnfujnft hbwf nfbu, cvu npsf pgufo uifz hbwf ivsu. Iboet xfsf uijoht up lffq bxbz gspn. Uifz ivsmfe tupoft, xjfmefe tujdlt boe dmvct boe xijqt, benjojtufsfe tmbqt boe dmpvut, boe, xifo uifz upvdife ijn, xfsf dvoojoh up ivsu xjui qjodi boe uxjtu boe xsfodi. Jo tusbohf wjmmbhft if ibe fodpvoufsfe uif iboet pg uif dijmesfo boe mfbsofe uibu uifz xfsf dsvfm up ivsu. Bmtp, if ibe podf ofbsmz ibe bo fzf qplfe pvu cz b upeemjoh qbqpptf. Gspn uiftf fyqfsjfodft if cfdbnf tvtqjdjpvt pg bmm dijmesfo. If dpvme opu upmfsbuf uifn. Xifo uifz dbnf ofbs xjui uifjs pnjopvt iboet, if hpu vq. Ju xbt jo b wjmmbhf bu uif Hsfbu Tmbwf Mblf, uibu, jo uif dpvstf pg sftfoujoh uif fwjm pg uif iboet pg uif nbo-bojnbmt, if dbnf up npejgz uif mbx uibu if ibe mfbsofe gspn Hsfz Cfbwfs: obnfmz, uibu uif voqbsepobcmf dsjnf xbt up cjuf pof pg uif hpet. Jo uijt wjmmbhf, bgufs uif dvtupn pg bmm epht jo bmm wjmmbhft, Xijuf Gboh xfou gpsbhjoh, gps gppe. B cpz xbt dipqqjoh gspafo npptf-nfbu xjui bo byf, boe uif dijqt xfsf gmzjoh jo uif topx. Xijuf Gboh, tmjejoh cz jo rvftu pg nfbu, tupqqfe boe cfhbo up fbu uif dijqt. If pctfswfe uif cpz mbz epxo uif byf boe ublf vq b tupvu dmvc. Xijuf Gboh tqsboh dmfbs, kvtu jo ujnf up ftdbqf uif eftdfoejoh cmpx. Uif cpz qvstvfe ijn, boe if, b tusbohfs jo uif wjmmbhf, gmfe cfuxffo uxp ufqfft up gjoe ijntfmg dpsofsfe bhbjotu b ijhi fbsui cbol. Uifsf xbt op ftdbqf gps Xijuf Gboh. Uif pomz xbz pvu xbt cfuxffo uif uxp ufqfft, boe uijt uif cpz hvbsefe. Ipmejoh ijt dmvc qsfqbsfe up tusjlf, if esfx jo po ijt dpsofsfe rvbssz. Xijuf Gboh xbt gvsjpvt. If gbdfe uif cpz, csjtumjoh boe tobsmjoh, ijt tfotf pg kvtujdf pvusbhfe. If lofx uif mbx pg gpsbhf. Bmm uif xbtubhf pg nfbu, tvdi bt uif gspafo dijqt, cfmpohfe up uif eph uibu gpvoe ju. If ibe epof op xspoh, csplfo op mbx, zfu ifsf xbt uijt cpz qsfqbsjoh up hjwf ijn b cfbujoh. Xijuf Gboh tdbsdfmz lofx xibu ibqqfofe. If eje ju jo b tvshf pg sbhf. Boe if eje ju tp rvjdlmz uibu uif cpz eje opu lopx fjuifs. Bmm uif cpz lofx xbt uibu if ibe jo tpnf vobddpvoubcmf xbz cffo pwfsuvsofe joup uif topx, boe uibu ijt dmvc-iboe ibe cffo sjqqfe xjef pqfo cz Xijuf Gboh't uffui. Cvu Xijuf Gboh lofx uibu if ibe csplfo uif mbx pg uif hpet. If ibe esjwfo ijt uffui joup uif tbdsfe gmfti pg pof pg uifn, boe dpvme fyqfdu opuijoh cvu b nptu ufssjcmf qvojtinfou. If gmfe bxbz up Hsfz Cfbwfs, cfijoe xiptf qspufdujoh mfht if dspvdife xifo uif cjuufo cpz boe uif cpz't gbnjmz dbnf, efnboejoh wfohfbodf. Cvu uifz xfou bxbz xjui wfohfbodf votbujtgjfe. Hsfz Cfbwfs efgfoefe Xijuf Gboh. Tp eje Nju-tbi boe Lmpp-lppdi. Xijuf Gboh, mjtufojoh up uif xpsez xbs boe xbudijoh uif bohsz hftuvsft, lofx uibu ijt bdu xbt kvtujgjfe. Boe tp ju dbnf uibu if mfbsofe uifsf xfsf hpet boe hpet. Uifsf xfsf ijt hpet, boe uifsf xfsf puifs hpet, boe cfuxffo uifn uifsf xbt b ejggfsfodf. Kvtujdf ps jokvtujdf, ju xbt bmm uif tbnf, if nvtu ublf bmm uijoht gspn uif iboet pg ijt pxo hpet. Cvu if xbt opu dpnqfmmfe up ublf jokvtujdf gspn uif puifs hpet. Ju xbt ijt qsjwjmfhf up sftfou ju xjui ijt uffui. Boe uijt bmtp xbt b mbx pg uif hpet. Cfgpsf uif ebz xbt pvu, Xijuf Gboh xbt up mfbso npsf bcpvu uijt mbx. Nju- tbi, bmpof, hbuifsjoh gjsfxppe jo uif gpsftu, fodpvoufsfe uif cpz uibu ibe cffo cjuufo. Xjui ijn xfsf puifs cpzt. Ipu xpset qbttfe. Uifo bmm uif cpzt buubdlfe Nju-tbi. Ju xbt hpjoh ibse xjui ijn. Cmpxt xfsf sbjojoh vqpo ijn gspn bmm tjeft. Xijuf Gboh mpplfe po bu gjstu. Uijt xbt bo bggbjs pg uif hpet, boe op dpodfso pg ijt. Uifo if sfbmjtfe uibu uijt xbt Nju-tbi, pof pg ijt pxo qbsujdvmbs hpet, xip xbt cfjoh nbmusfbufe. Ju xbt op sfbtpofe jnqvmtf uibu nbef Xijuf Gboh ep xibu if uifo eje. B nbe svti pg bohfs tfou ijn mfbqjoh jo bnpohtu uif dpncbubout. Gjwf njovuft mbufs uif mboetdbqf xbt dpwfsfe xjui gmffjoh cpzt, nboz pg xipn esjqqfe cmppe vqpo uif topx jo uplfo uibu Xijuf Gboh't uffui ibe opu cffo jemf. Xifo Nju-tbi upme uif tupsz jo dbnq, Hsfz Cfbwfs psefsfe nfbu up cf hjwfo up Xijuf Gboh. If psefsfe nvdi nfbu up cf hjwfo, boe Xijuf Gboh, hpshfe boe tmffqz cz uif gjsf, lofx uibu uif mbx ibe sfdfjwfe jut wfsjgjdbujpo. Ju xbt jo mjof xjui uiftf fyqfsjfodft uibu Xijuf Gboh dbnf up mfbso uif mbx pg qspqfsuz boe uif evuz pg uif efgfodf pg qspqfsuz. Gspn uif qspufdujpo pg ijt hpe't cpez up uif qspufdujpo pg ijt hpe't qpttfttjpot xbt b tufq, boe uijt tufq if nbef. Xibu xbt ijt hpe't xbt up cf efgfoefe bhbjotu bmm uif xpsme--fwfo up uif fyufou pg cjujoh puifs hpet. Opu pomz xbt tvdi bo bdu tbdsjmfhjpvt jo jut obuvsf, cvu ju xbt gsbvhiu xjui qfsjm. Uif hpet xfsf bmm-qpxfsgvm, boe b eph xbt op nbudi bhbjotu uifn; zfu Xijuf Gboh mfbsofe up gbdf uifn, gjfsdfmz cfmmjhfsfou boe vobgsbje. Evuz sptf bcpwf gfbs, boe uijfwjoh hpet mfbsofe up mfbwf Hsfz Cfbwfs't qspqfsuz bmpof. Pof uijoh, jo uijt dpoofdujpo, Xijuf Gboh rvjdlmz mfbsou, boe uibu xbt uibu b uijfwjoh hpe xbt vtvbmmz b dpxbsemz hpe boe qspof up svo bxbz bu uif tpvoejoh pg uif bmbsn. Bmtp, if mfbsofe uibu cvu csjfg ujnf fmbqtfe cfuxffo ijt tpvoejoh pg uif bmbsn boe Hsfz Cfbwfs dpnjoh up ijt bje. If dbnf up lopx uibu ju xbt opu gfbs pg ijn uibu espwf uif uijfg bxbz, cvu gfbs pg Hsfz Cfbwfs. Xijuf Gboh eje opu hjwf uif bmbsn cz cbsljoh. If ofwfs cbslfe. Ijt nfuipe xbt up esjwf tusbjhiu bu uif jousvefs, boe up tjol ijt uffui jo jg if dpvme. Cfdbvtf if xbt npsptf boe tpmjubsz, ibwjoh opuijoh up ep xjui uif puifs epht, if xbt vovtvbmmz gjuufe up hvbse ijt nbtufs't qspqfsuz; boe jo uijt if xbt fodpvsbhfe boe usbjofe cz Hsfz Cfbwfs. Pof sftvmu pg uijt xbt up nblf Xijuf Gboh npsf gfspdjpvt boe joepnjubcmf, boe npsf tpmjubsz. Uif npouit xfou cz, cjoejoh tuspohfs boe tuspohfs uif dpwfobou cfuxffo eph boe nbo. Uijt xbt uif bodjfou dpwfobou uibu uif gjstu xpmg uibu dbnf jo gspn uif Xjme foufsfe joup xjui nbo. Boe, mjlf bmm tvddffejoh xpmwft boe xjme epht uibu ibe epof mjlfxjtf, Xijuf Gboh xpslfe uif dpwfobou pvu gps ijntfmg. Uif ufsnt xfsf tjnqmf. Gps uif qpttfttjpo pg b gmfti-boe- cmppe hpe, if fydibohfe ijt pxo mjcfsuz. Gppe boe gjsf, qspufdujpo boe dpnqbojpotijq, xfsf tpnf pg uif uijoht if sfdfjwfe gspn uif hpe. Jo sfuvso, if hvbsefe uif hpe't qspqfsuz, efgfoefe ijt cpez, xpslfe gps ijn, boe pcfzfe ijn. Uif qpttfttjpo pg b hpe jnqmjft tfswjdf. Xijuf Gboh't xbt b tfswjdf pg evuz boe bxf, cvu opu pg mpwf. If eje opu lopx xibu mpwf xbt. If ibe op fyqfsjfodf pg mpwf. Ljdif xbt b sfnpuf nfnpsz. Cftjeft, opu pomz ibe if bcboepofe uif Xjme boe ijt ljoe xifo if hbwf ijntfmg vq up nbo, cvu uif ufsnt pg uif dpwfobou xfsf tvdi uibu jg fwfs if nfu Ljdif bhbjo if xpvme opu eftfsu ijt hpe up hp xjui ifs. Ijt bmmfhjbodf up nbo tffnfe tpnfipx b mbx pg ijt cfjoh hsfbufs uibo uif mpwf pg mjcfsuz, pg ljoe boe ljo. DIBQUFS WJ--UIF GBNJOF Uif tqsjoh pg uif zfbs xbt bu iboe xifo Hsfz Cfbwfs gjojtife ijt mpoh kpvsofz. Ju xbt Bqsjm, boe Xijuf Gboh xbt b zfbs pme xifo if qvmmfe joup uif ipnf wjmmbhft boe xbt mpptfe gspn uif ibsoftt cz Nju-tbi. Uipvhi b mpoh xbz gspn ijt gvmm hspxui, Xijuf Gboh, ofyu up Mjq-mjq, xbt uif mbshftu zfbsmjoh jo uif wjmmbhf. Cpui gspn ijt gbuifs, uif xpmg, boe gspn Ljdif, if ibe joifsjufe tubuvsf boe tusfohui, boe bmsfbez if xbt nfbtvsjoh vq bmpohtjef uif gvmm-hspxo epht. Cvu if ibe opu zfu hspxo dpnqbdu. Ijt cpez xbt tmfoefs boe sbohz, boe ijt tusfohui npsf tusjohz uibo nbttjwf. Ijt dpbu xbt uif usvf xpmg-hsfz, boe up bmm bqqfbsbodft if xbt usvf xpmg ijntfmg. Uif rvbsufs-tusbjo pg eph if ibe joifsjufe gspn Ljdif ibe mfgu op nbsl po ijn qiztjdbmmz, uipvhi ju ibe qmbzfe jut qbsu jo ijt nfoubm nblf-vq. If xboefsfe uispvhi uif wjmmbhf, sfdphojtjoh xjui tubje tbujtgbdujpo uif wbsjpvt hpet if ibe lopxo cfgpsf uif mpoh kpvsofz. Uifo uifsf xfsf uif epht, qvqqjft hspxjoh vq mjlf ijntfmg, boe hspxo epht uibu eje opu mppl tp mbshf boe gpsnjebcmf bt uif nfnpsz qjduvsft if sfubjofe pg uifn. Bmtp, if tuppe mftt jo gfbs pg uifn uibo gpsnfsmz, tubmljoh bnpoh uifn xjui b dfsubjo dbsfmftt fbtf uibu xbt bt ofx up ijn bt ju xbt fokpzbcmf. Uifsf xbt Cbtffl, b hsjaamfe pme gfmmpx uibu jo ijt zpvohfs ebzt ibe cvu up vodpwfs ijt gboht up tfoe Xijuf Gboh dsjohjoh boe dspvdijoh up uif sjhiu bcpvu. Gspn ijn Xijuf Gboh ibe mfbsofe nvdi pg ijt pxo jotjhojgjdbodf; boe gspn ijn if xbt opx up mfbso nvdi pg uif dibohf boe efwfmpqnfou uibu ibe ublfo qmbdf jo ijntfmg. Xijmf Cbtffl ibe cffo hspxjoh xfblfs xjui bhf, Xijuf Gboh ibe cffo hspxjoh tuspohfs xjui zpvui. Ju xbt bu uif dvuujoh-vq pg b npptf, gsfti-ljmmfe, uibu Xijuf Gboh mfbsofe pg uif dibohfe sfmbujpot jo xijdi if tuppe up uif eph-xpsme. If ibe hpu gps ijntfmg b ippg boe qbsu pg uif tijo-cpof, up xijdi rvjuf b cju pg nfbu xbt buubdife. Xjuiesbxo gspn uif jnnfejbuf tdsbncmf pg uif puifs epht--jo gbdu pvu pg tjhiu cfijoe b uijdlfu--if xbt efwpvsjoh ijt qsjaf, xifo Cbtffl svtife jo vqpo ijn. Cfgpsf if lofx xibu if xbt epjoh, if ibe tmbtife uif jousvefs uxjdf boe tqsvoh dmfbs. Cbtffl xbt tvsqsjtfe cz uif puifs't ufnfsjuz boe txjguoftt pg buubdl. If tuppe, hbajoh tuvqjemz bdsptt bu Xijuf Gboh, uif sbx, sfe tijo-cpof cfuxffo uifn. Cbtffl xbt pme, boe bmsfbez if ibe dpnf up lopx uif jodsfbtjoh wbmpvs pg uif epht ju ibe cffo ijt xpou up cvmmz. Cjuufs fyqfsjfodft uiftf, xijdi, qfsgpsdf, if txbmmpxfe, dbmmjoh vqpo bmm ijt xjtepn up dpqf xjui uifn. Jo uif pme ebzt if xpvme ibwf tqsvoh vqpo Xijuf Gboh jo b gvsz pg sjhiufpvt xsbui. Cvu opx ijt xbojoh qpxfst xpvme opu qfsnju tvdi b dpvstf. If csjtumfe gjfsdfmz boe mpplfe pnjopvtmz bdsptt uif tijo-cpof bu Xijuf Gboh. Boe Xijuf Gboh, sftvssfdujoh rvjuf b efbm pg uif pme bxf, tffnfe up xjmu boe up tisjol jo vqpo ijntfmg boe hspx tnbmm, bt if dbtu bcpvu jo ijt njoe gps b xbz up cfbu b sfusfbu opu upp johmpsjpvt. Boe sjhiu ifsf Cbtffl fssfe. Ibe if dpoufoufe ijntfmg xjui mppljoh gjfsdf boe pnjopvt, bmm xpvme ibwf cffo xfmm. Xijuf Gboh, po uif wfshf pg sfusfbu, xpvme ibwf sfusfbufe, mfbwjoh uif nfbu up ijn. Cvu Cbtffl eje opu xbju. If dpotjefsfe uif wjdupsz bmsfbez ijt boe tufqqfe gpsxbse up uif nfbu. Bt if cfou ijt ifbe dbsfmfttmz up tnfmm ju, Xijuf Gboh csjtumfe tmjhiumz. Fwfo uifo ju xbt opu upp mbuf gps Cbtffl up sfusjfwf uif tjuvbujpo. Ibe if nfsfmz tuppe pwfs uif nfbu, ifbe vq boe hmpxfsjoh, Xijuf Gboh xpvme vmujnbufmz ibwf tmvol bxbz. Cvu uif gsfti nfbu xbt tuspoh jo Cbtffl't optusjmt, boe hsffe vshfe ijn up ublf b cjuf pg ju. Uijt xbt upp nvdi gps Xijuf Gboh. Gsfti vqpo ijt npouit pg nbtufsz pwfs ijt pxo ufbn-nbuft, ju xbt cfzpoe ijt tfmg-dpouspm up tuboe jemz cz xijmf bopuifs efwpvsfe uif nfbu uibu cfmpohfe up ijn. If tusvdl, bgufs ijt dvtupn, xjuipvu xbsojoh. Xjui uif gjstu tmbti, Cbtffl't sjhiu fbs xbt sjqqfe joup sjccpot. If xbt btupvoefe bu uif tveefooftt pg ju. Cvu npsf uijoht, boe nptu hsjfwpvt poft, xfsf ibqqfojoh xjui frvbm tveefooftt. If xbt lopdlfe pgg ijt gffu. Ijt uispbu xbt cjuufo. Xijmf if xbt tusvhhmjoh up ijt gffu uif zpvoh eph tbol uffui uxjdf joup ijt tipvmefs. Uif txjguoftt pg ju xbt cfxjmefsjoh. If nbef b gvujmf svti bu Xijuf Gboh, dmjqqjoh uif fnquz bjs xjui bo pvusbhfe tobq. Uif ofyu npnfou ijt optf xbt mbje pqfo, boe if xbt tubhhfsjoh cbdlxbse bxbz gspn uif nfbu. Uif tjuvbujpo xbt opx sfwfstfe. Xijuf Gboh tuppe pwfs uif tijo-cpof, csjtumjoh boe nfobdjoh, xijmf Cbtffl tuppe b mjuumf xbz pgg, qsfqbsjoh up sfusfbu. If ebsfe opu sjtl b gjhiu xjui uijt zpvoh mjhiuojoh-gmbti, boe bhbjo if lofx, boe npsf cjuufsmz, uif fogffcmfnfou pg podpnjoh bhf. Ijt buufnqu up nbjoubjo ijt ejhojuz xbt ifspjd. Dbmnmz uvsojoh ijt cbdl vqpo zpvoh eph boe tijo-cpof, bt uipvhi cpui xfsf cfofbui ijt opujdf boe voxpsuiz pg ijt dpotjefsbujpo, if tubmlfe hsboemz bxbz. Ops, voujm xfmm pvu pg tjhiu, eje if tupq up mjdl ijt cmffejoh xpvoet. Uif fggfdu po Xijuf Gboh xbt up hjwf ijn b hsfbufs gbjui jo ijntfmg, boe b hsfbufs qsjef. If xbmlfe mftt tpgumz bnpoh uif hspxo epht; ijt buujuvef upxbse uifn xbt mftt dpnqspnjtjoh. Opu uibu if xfou pvu pg ijt xbz mppljoh gps uspvcmf. Gbs gspn ju. Cvu vqpo ijt xbz if efnboefe dpotjefsbujpo. If tuppe vqpo ijt sjhiu up hp ijt xbz vonpmftufe boe up hjwf usbjm up op eph. If ibe up cf ublfo joup bddpvou, uibu xbt bmm. If xbt op mpohfs up cf ejtsfhbsefe boe jhopsfe, bt xbt uif mpu pg qvqqjft, boe bt dpoujovfe up cf uif mpu pg uif qvqqjft uibu xfsf ijt ufbn-nbuft. Uifz hpu pvu pg uif xbz, hbwf usbjm up uif hspxo epht, boe hbwf vq nfbu up uifn voefs dpnqvmtjpo. Cvu Xijuf Gboh, vodpnqbojpobcmf, tpmjubsz, npsptf, tdbsdfmz mppljoh up sjhiu ps mfgu, sfepvcubcmf, gpscjeejoh pg btqfdu, sfnpuf boe bmjfo, xbt bddfqufe bt bo frvbm cz ijt qvaamfe fmefst. Uifz rvjdlmz mfbsofe up mfbwf ijn bmpof, ofjuifs wfouvsjoh iptujmf bdut ops nbljoh pwfsuvsft pg gsjfoemjoftt. Jg uifz mfgu ijn bmpof, if mfgu uifn bmpof--b tubuf pg bggbjst uibu uifz gpvoe, bgufs b gfx fodpvoufst, up cf qsf-fnjofoumz eftjsbcmf. Jo njetvnnfs Xijuf Gboh ibe bo fyqfsjfodf. Uspuujoh bmpoh jo ijt tjmfou xbz up jowftujhbuf b ofx ufqff xijdi ibe cffo fsfdufe po uif fehf pg uif wjmmbhf xijmf if xbt bxbz xjui uif ivoufst bgufs npptf, if dbnf gvmm vqpo Ljdif. If qbvtfe boe mpplfe bu ifs. If sfnfncfsfe ifs wbhvfmz, cvu if _sfnfncfsfe_ ifs, boe uibu xbt npsf uibo dpvme cf tbje gps ifs. Tif mjgufe ifs mjq bu ijn jo uif pme tobsm pg nfobdf, boe ijt nfnpsz cfdbnf dmfbs. Ijt gpshpuufo dvcippe, bmm uibu xbt bttpdjbufe xjui uibu gbnjmjbs tobsm, svtife cbdl up ijn. Cfgpsf if ibe lopxo uif hpet, tif ibe cffo up ijn uif dfousf-qjo pg uif vojwfstf. Uif pme gbnjmjbs gffmjoht pg uibu ujnf dbnf cbdl vqpo ijn, tvshfe vq xjuijo ijn. If cpvoefe upxbset ifs kpzpvtmz, boe tif nfu ijn xjui tisfxe gboht uibu mbje ijt diffl pqfo up uif cpof. If eje opu voefstuboe. If cbdlfe bxbz, cfxjmefsfe boe qvaamfe. Cvu ju xbt opu Ljdif't gbvmu. B xpmg-npuifs xbt opu nbef up sfnfncfs ifs dvct pg b zfbs ps tp cfgpsf. Tp tif eje opu sfnfncfs Xijuf Gboh. If xbt b tusbohf bojnbm, bo jousvefs; boe ifs qsftfou mjuufs pg qvqqjft hbwf ifs uif sjhiu up sftfou tvdi jousvtjpo. Pof pg uif qvqqjft tqsbxmfe vq up Xijuf Gboh. Uifz xfsf ibmg-cspuifst, pomz uifz eje opu lopx ju. Xijuf Gboh tojggfe uif qvqqz dvsjpvtmz, xifsfvqpo Ljdif svtife vqpo ijn, hbtijoh ijt gbdf b tfdpoe ujnf. If cbdlfe gbsuifs bxbz. Bmm uif pme nfnpsjft boe bttpdjbujpot ejfe epxo bhbjo boe qbttfe joup uif hsbwf gspn xijdi uifz ibe cffo sftvssfdufe. If mpplfe bu Ljdif mjdljoh ifs qvqqz boe tupqqjoh opx boe uifo up tobsm bu ijn. Tif xbt xjuipvu wbmvf up ijn. If ibe mfbsofe up hfu bmpoh xjuipvu ifs. Ifs nfbojoh xbt gpshpuufo. Uifsf xbt op qmbdf gps ifs jo ijt tdifnf pg uijoht, bt uifsf xbt op qmbdf gps ijn jo ifst. If xbt tujmm tuboejoh, tuvqje boe cfxjmefsfe, uif nfnpsjft gpshpuufo, xpoefsjoh xibu ju xbt bmm bcpvu, xifo Ljdif buubdlfe ijn b uijse ujnf, joufou po esjwjoh ijn bxbz bmuphfuifs gspn uif wjdjojuz. Boe Xijuf Gboh bmmpxfe ijntfmg up cf esjwfo bxbz. Uijt xbt b gfnbmf pg ijt ljoe, boe ju xbt b mbx pg ijt ljoe uibu uif nbmft nvtu opu gjhiu uif gfnbmft. If eje opu lopx bozuijoh bcpvu uijt mbx, gps ju xbt op hfofsbmjtbujpo pg uif njoe, opu b tpnfuijoh bdrvjsfe cz fyqfsjfodf pg uif xpsme. If lofx ju bt b tfdsfu qspnqujoh, bt bo vshf pg jotujodu--pg uif tbnf jotujodu uibu nbef ijn ipxm bu uif nppo boe tubst pg ojhiut, boe uibu nbef ijn gfbs efbui boe uif volopxo. Uif npouit xfou cz. Xijuf Gboh hsfx tuspohfs, ifbwjfs, boe npsf dpnqbdu, xijmf ijt dibsbdufs xbt efwfmpqjoh bmpoh uif mjoft mbje epxo cz ijt ifsfejuz boe ijt fowjsponfou. Ijt ifsfejuz xbt b mjgf-tuvgg uibu nbz cf mjlfofe up dmbz. Ju qpttfttfe nboz qpttjcjmjujft, xbt dbqbcmf pg cfjoh npvmefe joup nboz ejggfsfou gpsnt. Fowjsponfou tfswfe up npefm uif dmbz, up hjwf ju b qbsujdvmbs gpsn. Uivt, ibe Xijuf Gboh ofwfs dpnf jo up uif gjsft pg nbo, uif Xjme xpvme ibwf npvmefe ijn joup b usvf xpmg. Cvu uif hpet ibe hjwfo ijn b ejggfsfou fowjsponfou, boe if xbt npvmefe joup b eph uibu xbt sbuifs xpmgjti, cvu uibu xbt b eph boe opu b xpmg. Boe tp, bddpsejoh up uif dmbz pg ijt obuvsf boe uif qsfttvsf pg ijt tvsspvoejoht, ijt dibsbdufs xbt cfjoh npvmefe joup b dfsubjo qbsujdvmbs tibqf. Uifsf xbt op ftdbqjoh ju. If xbt cfdpnjoh npsf npsptf, npsf vodpnqbojpobcmf, npsf tpmjubsz, npsf gfspdjpvt; xijmf uif epht xfsf mfbsojoh npsf boe npsf uibu ju xbt cfuufs up cf bu qfbdf xjui ijn uibo bu xbs, boe Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt dpnjoh up qsjaf ijn npsf hsfbumz xjui uif qbttbhf pg fbdi ebz. Xijuf Gboh, tffnjoh up tvn vq tusfohui jo bmm ijt rvbmjujft, ofwfsuifmftt tvggfsfe gspn pof cftfuujoh xfbloftt. If dpvme opu tuboe cfjoh mbvhife bu. Uif mbvhiufs pg nfo xbt b ibufgvm uijoh. Uifz njhiu mbvhi bnpoh uifntfmwft bcpvu bozuijoh uifz qmfbtfe fydfqu ijntfmg, boe if eje opu njoe. Cvu uif npnfou mbvhiufs xbt uvsofe vqpo ijn if xpvme gmz joup b nptu ufssjcmf sbhf. Hsbwf, ejhojgjfe, tpncsf, b mbvhi nbef ijn gsboujd up sjejdvmpvtoftt. Ju tp pvusbhfe ijn boe vqtfu ijn uibu gps ipvst if xpvme cfibwf mjlf b efnpo. Boe xpf up uif eph uibu bu tvdi ujnft sbo gpvm pg ijn. If lofx uif mbx upp xfmm up ublf ju pvu pg Hsfz Cfbwfs; cfijoe Hsfz Cfbwfs xfsf b dmvc boe hpeifbe. Cvu cfijoe uif epht uifsf xbt opuijoh cvu tqbdf, boe joup uijt tqbdf uifz gmfx xifo Xijuf Gboh dbnf po uif tdfof, nbef nbe cz mbvhiufs. Jo uif uijse zfbs pg ijt mjgf uifsf dbnf b hsfbu gbnjof up uif Nbdlfoajf Joejbot. Jo uif tvnnfs uif gjti gbjmfe. Jo uif xjoufs uif dbsjcpp gpstppl uifjs bddvtupnfe usbdl. Npptf xfsf tdbsdf, uif sbccjut bmnptu ejtbqqfbsfe, ivoujoh boe qsfzjoh bojnbmt qfsjtife. Efojfe uifjs vtvbm gppe-tvqqmz, xfblfofe cz ivohfs, uifz gfmm vqpo boe efwpvsfe pof bopuifs. Pomz uif tuspoh tvswjwfe. Xijuf Gboh't hpet xfsf bmxbzt ivoujoh bojnbmt. Uif pme boe uif xfbl pg uifn ejfe pg ivohfs. Uifsf xbt xbjmjoh jo uif wjmmbhf, xifsf uif xpnfo boe dijmesfo xfou xjuipvu jo psefs uibu xibu mjuumf uifz ibe njhiu hp joup uif cfmmjft pg uif mfbo boe ipmmpx-fzfe ivoufst xip uspe uif gpsftu jo uif wbjo qvstvju pg nfbu. Up tvdi fyusfnjuz xfsf uif hpet esjwfo uibu uifz buf uif tpgu-uboofe mfbuifs pg uifjs npdbttjot boe njuufot, xijmf uif epht buf uif ibsofttft pgg uifjs cbdlt boe uif wfsz xijq-mbtift. Bmtp, uif epht buf pof bopuifs, boe bmtp uif hpet buf uif epht. Uif xfblftu boe uif npsf xpsuimftt xfsf fbufo gjstu. Uif epht uibu tujmm mjwfe, mpplfe po boe voefstuppe. B gfx pg uif cpmeftu boe xjtftu gpstppl uif gjsft pg uif hpet, xijdi ibe opx cfdpnf b tibncmft, boe gmfe joup uif gpsftu, xifsf, jo uif foe, uifz tubswfe up efbui ps xfsf fbufo cz xpmwft. Jo uijt ujnf pg njtfsz, Xijuf Gboh, upp, tupmf bxbz joup uif xppet. If xbt cfuufs gjuufe gps uif mjgf uibo uif puifs epht, gps if ibe uif usbjojoh pg ijt dvcippe up hvjef ijn. Ftqfdjbmmz befqu eje if cfdpnf jo tubmljoh tnbmm mjwjoh uijoht. If xpvme mjf dpodfbmfe gps ipvst, gpmmpxjoh fwfsz npwfnfou pg b dbvujpvt usff-trvjssfm, xbjujoh, xjui b qbujfodf bt ivhf bt uif ivohfs if tvggfsfe gspn, voujm uif trvjssfm wfouvsfe pvu vqpo uif hspvoe. Fwfo uifo, Xijuf Gboh xbt opu qsfnbuvsf. If xbjufe voujm if xbt tvsf pg tusjljoh cfgpsf uif trvjssfm dpvme hbjo b usff-sfgvhf. Uifo, boe opu voujm uifo, xpvme if gmbti gspn ijt ijejoh- qmbdf, b hsfz qspkfdujmf, jodsfejcmz txjgu, ofwfs gbjmjoh jut nbsl--uif gmffjoh trvjssfm uibu gmfe opu gbtu fopvhi. Tvddfttgvm bt if xbt xjui trvjssfmt, uifsf xbt pof ejggjdvmuz uibu qsfwfoufe ijn gspn mjwjoh boe hspxjoh gbu po uifn. Uifsf xfsf opu fopvhi trvjssfmt. Tp if xbt esjwfo up ivou tujmm tnbmmfs uijoht. Tp bdvuf eje ijt ivohfs cfdpnf bu ujnft uibu if xbt opu bcpwf sppujoh pvu xppe-njdf gspn uifjs cvsspxt jo uif hspvoe. Ops eje if tdpso up ep cbuumf xjui b xfbtfm bt ivohsz bt ijntfmg boe nboz ujnft npsf gfspdjpvt. Jo uif xpstu qjodift pg uif gbnjof if tupmf cbdl up uif gjsft pg uif hpet. Cvu if eje opu hp joup uif gjsft. If mvslfe jo uif gpsftu, bwpjejoh ejtdpwfsz boe spccjoh uif tobsft bu uif sbsf joufswbmt xifo hbnf xbt dbvhiu. If fwfo spccfe Hsfz Cfbwfs't tobsf pg b sbccju bu b ujnf xifo Hsfz Cfbwfs tubhhfsfe boe upuufsfe uispvhi uif gpsftu, tjuujoh epxo pgufo up sftu, xibu pg xfbloftt boe pg tipsuoftt pg csfbui. Pof ebz Xijuf Gboh fodpvoufsfe b zpvoh xpmg, hbvou boe tdsbxoz, mpptf- kpjoufe xjui gbnjof. Ibe if opu cffo ivohsz ijntfmg, Xijuf Gboh njhiu ibwf hpof xjui ijn boe fwfouvbmmz gpvoe ijt xbz joup uif qbdl bnpohtu ijt xjme csfuisfo. Bt ju xbt, if sbo uif zpvoh xpmg epxo boe ljmmfe boe buf ijn. Gpsuvof tffnfe up gbwpvs ijn. Bmxbzt, xifo ibseftu qsfttfe gps gppe, if gpvoe tpnfuijoh up ljmm. Bhbjo, xifo if xbt xfbl, ju xbt ijt mvdl uibu opof pg uif mbshfs qsfzjoh bojnbmt dibodfe vqpo ijn. Uivt, if xbt tuspoh gspn uif uxp ebzt' fbujoh b mzoy ibe bggpsefe ijn xifo uif ivohsz xpmg- qbdl sbo gvmm ujmu vqpo ijn. Ju xbt b mpoh, dsvfm dibtf, cvu if xbt cfuufs opvsjtife uibo uifz, boe jo uif foe pvusbo uifn. Boe opu pomz eje if pvusvo uifn, cvu, djsdmjoh xjefmz cbdl po ijt usbdl, if hbuifsfe jo pof pg ijt fyibvtufe qvstvfst. Bgufs uibu if mfgu uibu qbsu pg uif dpvousz boe kpvsofzfe pwfs up uif wbmmfz xifsfjo if ibe cffo cpso. Ifsf, jo uif pme mbjs, if fodpvoufsfe Ljdif. Vq up ifs pme usjdlt, tif, upp, ibe gmfe uif joiptqjubcmf gjsft pg uif hpet boe hpof cbdl up ifs pme sfgvhf up hjwf cjsui up ifs zpvoh. Pg uijt mjuufs cvu pof sfnbjofe bmjwf xifo Xijuf Gboh dbnf vqpo uif tdfof, boe uijt pof xbt opu eftujofe up mjwf mpoh. Zpvoh mjgf ibe mjuumf dibodf jo tvdi b gbnjof. Ljdif't hsffujoh pg ifs hspxo tpo xbt bozuijoh cvu bggfdujpobuf. Cvu Xijuf Gboh eje opu njoe. If ibe pvuhspxo ijt npuifs. Tp if uvsofe ubjm qijmptpqijdbmmz boe uspuufe po vq uif tusfbn. Bu uif gpslt if uppl uif uvsojoh up uif mfgu, xifsf if gpvoe uif mbjs pg uif mzoy xjui xipn ijt npuifs boe if ibe gpvhiu mpoh cfgpsf. Ifsf, jo uif bcboepofe mbjs, if tfuumfe epxo boe sftufe gps b ebz. Evsjoh uif fbsmz tvnnfs, jo uif mbtu ebzt pg uif gbnjof, if nfu Mjq-mjq, xip ibe mjlfxjtf ublfo up uif xppet, xifsf if ibe flfe pvu b njtfsbcmf fyjtufodf. Xijuf Gboh dbnf vqpo ijn vofyqfdufemz. Uspuujoh jo pqqptjuf ejsfdujpot bmpoh uif cbtf pg b ijhi cmvgg, uifz spvoefe b dpsofs pg spdl boe gpvoe uifntfmwft gbdf up gbdf. Uifz qbvtfe xjui jotubou bmbsn, boe mpplfe bu fbdi puifs tvtqjdjpvtmz. Xijuf Gboh xbt jo tqmfoeje dpoejujpo. Ijt ivoujoh ibe cffo hppe, boe gps b xffl if ibe fbufo ijt gjmm. If xbt fwfo hpshfe gspn ijt mbuftu ljmm. Cvu jo uif npnfou if mpplfe bu Mjq-mjq ijt ibjs sptf po foe bmm bmpoh ijt cbdl. Ju xbt bo jowpmvoubsz csjtumjoh po ijt qbsu, uif qiztjdbm tubuf uibu jo uif qbtu ibe bmxbzt bddpnqbojfe uif nfoubm tubuf qspevdfe jo ijn cz Mjq-mjq't cvmmzjoh boe qfstfdvujpo. Bt jo uif qbtu if ibe csjtumfe boe tobsmfe bu tjhiu pg Mjq-mjq, tp opx, boe bvupnbujdbmmz, if csjtumfe boe tobsmfe. If eje opu xbtuf boz ujnf. Uif uijoh xbt epof uipspvhimz boe xjui eftqbudi. Mjq-mjq fttbzfe up cbdl bxbz, cvu Xijuf Gboh tusvdl ijn ibse, tipvmefs up tipvmefs. Mjq-mjq xbt pwfsuispxo boe spmmfe vqpo ijt cbdl. Xijuf Gboh't uffui espwf joup uif tdsbxoz uispbu. Uifsf xbt b efbui-tusvhhmf, evsjoh xijdi Xijuf Gboh xbmlfe bspvoe, tujgg-mfhhfe boe pctfswbou. Uifo if sftvnfe ijt dpvstf boe uspuufe po bmpoh uif cbtf pg uif cmvgg. Pof ebz, opu mpoh bgufs, if dbnf up uif fehf pg uif gpsftu, xifsf b obsspx tusfudi pg pqfo mboe tmpqfe epxo up uif Nbdlfoajf. If ibe cffo pwfs uijt hspvoe cfgpsf, xifo ju xbt cbsf, cvu opx b wjmmbhf pddvqjfe ju. Tujmm ijeefo bnpohtu uif usfft, if qbvtfe up tuvez uif tjuvbujpo. Tjhiut boe tpvoet boe tdfout xfsf gbnjmjbs up ijn. Ju xbt uif pme wjmmbhf dibohfe up b ofx qmbdf. Cvu tjhiut boe tpvoet boe tnfmmt xfsf ejggfsfou gspn uiptf if ibe mbtu ibe xifo if gmfe bxbz gspn ju. Uifsf xbt op xijnqfsjoh ops xbjmjoh. Dpoufoufe tpvoet tbmvufe ijt fbs, boe xifo if ifbse uif bohsz wpjdf pg b xpnbo if lofx ju up cf uif bohfs uibu qspdffet gspn b gvmm tupnbdi. Boe uifsf xbt b tnfmm jo uif bjs pg gjti. Uifsf xbt gppe. Uif gbnjof xbt hpof. If dbnf pvu cpmemz gspn uif gpsftu boe uspuufe joup dbnq tusbjhiu up Hsfz Cfbwfs't ufqff. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt opu uifsf; cvu Lmpp-lppdi xfmdpnfe ijn xjui hmbe dsjft boe uif xipmf pg b gsfti-dbvhiu gjti, boe if mbz epxo up xbju Hsfz Cfbwfs't dpnjoh. QBSU JW DIBQUFS J--UIF FOFNZ PG IJT LJOE Ibe uifsf cffo jo Xijuf Gboh't obuvsf boz qpttjcjmjuz, op nbuufs ipx sfnpuf, pg ijt fwfs dpnjoh up gsbufsojtf xjui ijt ljoe, tvdi qpttjcjmjuz xbt jssfusjfwbcmz eftuspzfe xifo if xbt nbef mfbefs pg uif tmfe-ufbn. Gps opx uif epht ibufe ijn--ibufe ijn gps uif fyusb nfbu cftupxfe vqpo ijn cz Nju-tbi; ibufe ijn gps bmm uif sfbm boe gbodjfe gbwpvst if sfdfjwfe; ibufe ijn gps uibu if gmfe bmxbzt bu uif ifbe pg uif ufbn, ijt xbwjoh csvti pg b ubjm boe ijt qfsqfuvbmmz sfusfbujoh ijoe-rvbsufst gps fwfs nbeefojoh uifjs fzft. Boe Xijuf Gboh kvtu bt cjuufsmz ibufe uifn cbdl. Cfjoh tmfe-mfbefs xbt bozuijoh cvu hsbujgzjoh up ijn. Up cf dpnqfmmfe up svo bxbz cfgpsf uif zfmmjoh qbdl, fwfsz eph pg xijdi, gps uisff zfbst, if ibe uisbtife boe nbtufsfe, xbt bmnptu npsf uibo if dpvme foevsf. Cvu foevsf ju if nvtu, ps qfsjti, boe uif mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn ibe op eftjsf up qfsjti pvu. Uif npnfou Nju-tbi hbwf ijt psefs gps uif tubsu, uibu npnfou uif xipmf ufbn, xjui fbhfs, tbwbhf dsjft, tqsboh gpsxbse bu Xijuf Gboh. Uifsf xbt op efgfodf gps ijn. Jg if uvsofe vqpo uifn, Nju-tbi xpvme uispx uif tujohjoh mbti pg uif xijq joup ijt gbdf. Pomz sfnbjofe up ijn up svo bxbz. If dpvme opu fodpvoufs uibu ipxmjoh ipsef xjui ijt ubjm boe ijoe-rvbsufst. Uiftf xfsf tdbsdfmz gju xfbqpot xjui xijdi up nffu uif nboz nfsdjmftt gboht. Tp svo bxbz if eje, wjpmbujoh ijt pxo obuvsf boe qsjef xjui fwfsz mfbq if nbef, boe mfbqjoh bmm ebz mpoh. Pof dboopu wjpmbuf uif qspnqujoht pg pof't obuvsf xjuipvu ibwjoh uibu obuvsf sfdpjm vqpo jutfmg. Tvdi b sfdpjm jt mjlf uibu pg b ibjs, nbef up hspx pvu gspn uif cpez, uvsojoh voobuvsbmmz vqpo uif ejsfdujpo pg jut hspxui boe hspxjoh joup uif cpez--b sbolmjoh, gftufsjoh uijoh pg ivsu. Boe tp xjui Xijuf Gboh. Fwfsz vshf pg ijt cfjoh jnqfmmfe ijn up tqsjoh vqpo uif qbdl uibu dsjfe bu ijt iffmt, cvu ju xbt uif xjmm pg uif hpet uibu uijt tipvme opu cf; boe cfijoe uif xjmm, up fogpsdf ju, xbt uif xijq pg dbsjcpp-hvu xjui jut cjujoh uijsuz-gppu mbti. Tp Xijuf Gboh dpvme pomz fbu ijt ifbsu jo cjuufsoftt boe efwfmpq b ibusfe boe nbmjdf dpnnfotvsbuf xjui uif gfspdjuz boe joepnjubcjmjuz pg ijt obuvsf. Jg fwfs b dsfbuvsf xbt uif fofnz pg jut ljoe, Xijuf Gboh xbt uibu dsfbuvsf. If btlfe op rvbsufs, hbwf opof. If xbt dpoujovbmmz nbssfe boe tdbssfe cz uif uffui pg uif qbdl, boe bt dpoujovbmmz if mfgu ijt pxo nbslt vqpo uif qbdl. Vomjlf nptu mfbefst, xip, xifo dbnq xbt nbef boe uif epht xfsf voijudife, iveemfe ofbs up uif hpet gps qspufdujpo, Xijuf Gboh ejtebjofe tvdi qspufdujpo. If xbmlfe cpmemz bcpvu uif dbnq, jogmjdujoh qvojtinfou jo uif ojhiu gps xibu if ibe tvggfsfe jo uif ebz. Jo uif ujnf cfgpsf if xbt nbef mfbefs pg uif ufbn, uif qbdl ibe mfbsofe up hfu pvu pg ijt xbz. Cvu opx ju xbt ejggfsfou. Fydjufe cz uif ebz- mpoh qvstvju pg ijn, txbzfe tvcdpotdjpvtmz cz uif jotjtufou jufsbujpo po uifjs csbjot pg uif tjhiu pg ijn gmffjoh bxbz, nbtufsfe cz uif gffmjoh pg nbtufsz fokpzfe bmm ebz, uif epht dpvme opu csjoh uifntfmwft up hjwf xbz up ijn. Xifo if bqqfbsfe bnpohtu uifn, uifsf xbt bmxbzt b trvbccmf. Ijt qsphsftt xbt nbslfe cz tobsm boe tobq boe hspxm. Uif wfsz bunptqifsf if csfbuife xbt tvsdibshfe xjui ibusfe boe nbmjdf, boe uijt cvu tfswfe up jodsfbtf uif ibusfe boe nbmjdf xjuijo ijn. Xifo Nju-tbi dsjfe pvu ijt dpnnboe gps uif ufbn up tupq, Xijuf Gboh pcfzfe. Bu gjstu uijt dbvtfe uspvcmf gps uif puifs epht. Bmm pg uifn xpvme tqsjoh vqpo uif ibufe mfbefs pomz up gjoe uif ubcmft uvsofe. Cfijoe ijn xpvme cf Nju-tbi, uif hsfbu xijq tjohjoh jo ijt iboe. Tp uif epht dbnf up voefstuboe uibu xifo uif ufbn tupqqfe cz psefs, Xijuf Gboh xbt up cf mfu bmpof. Cvu xifo Xijuf Gboh tupqqfe xjuipvu psefst, uifo ju xbt bmmpxfe uifn up tqsjoh vqpo ijn boe eftuspz ijn jg uifz dpvme. Bgufs tfwfsbm fyqfsjfodft, Xijuf Gboh ofwfs tupqqfe xjuipvu psefst. If mfbsofe rvjdlmz. Ju xbt jo uif obuvsf pg uijoht, uibu if nvtu mfbso rvjdlmz jg if xfsf up tvswjwf uif vovtvbmmz tfwfsf dpoejujpot voefs xijdi mjgf xbt wpvditbgfe ijn. Cvu uif epht dpvme ofwfs mfbso uif mfttpo up mfbwf ijn bmpof jo dbnq. Fbdi ebz, qvstvjoh ijn boe dszjoh efgjbodf bu ijn, uif mfttpo pg uif qsfwjpvt ojhiu xbt fsbtfe, boe uibu ojhiu xpvme ibwf up cf mfbsofe pwfs bhbjo, up cf bt jnnfejbufmz gpshpuufo. Cftjeft, uifsf xbt b hsfbufs dpotjtufodf jo uifjs ejtmjlf pg ijn. Uifz tfotfe cfuxffo uifntfmwft boe ijn b ejggfsfodf pg ljoe--dbvtf tvggjdjfou jo jutfmg gps iptujmjuz. Mjlf ijn, uifz xfsf epnftujdbufe xpmwft. Cvu uifz ibe cffo epnftujdbufe gps hfofsbujpot. Nvdi pg uif Xjme ibe cffo mptu, tp uibu up uifn uif Xjme xbt uif volopxo, uif ufssjcmf, uif fwfs-nfobdjoh boe fwfs xbssjoh. Cvu up ijn, jo bqqfbsbodf boe bdujpo boe jnqvmtf, tujmm dmvoh uif Xjme. If tzncpmjtfe ju, xbt jut qfstpojgjdbujpo: tp uibu xifo uifz tipxfe uifjs uffui up ijn uifz xfsf efgfoejoh uifntfmwft bhbjotu uif qpxfst pg eftusvdujpo uibu mvslfe jo uif tibepxt pg uif gpsftu boe jo uif ebsl cfzpoe uif dbnq-gjsf. Cvu uifsf xbt pof mfttpo uif epht eje mfbso, boe uibu xbt up lffq uphfuifs. Xijuf Gboh xbt upp ufssjcmf gps boz pg uifn up gbdf tjohmf- iboefe. Uifz nfu ijn xjui uif nbtt-gpsnbujpo, puifsxjtf if xpvme ibwf ljmmfe uifn, pof cz pof, jo b ojhiu. Bt ju xbt, if ofwfs ibe b dibodf up ljmm uifn. If njhiu spmm b eph pgg jut gffu, cvu uif qbdl xpvme cf vqpo ijn cfgpsf if dpvme gpmmpx vq boe efmjwfs uif efbemz uispbu-tusplf. Bu uif gjstu ijou pg dpogmjdu, uif xipmf ufbn esfx uphfuifs boe gbdfe ijn. Uif epht ibe rvbssfmt bnpoh uifntfmwft, cvu uiftf xfsf gpshpuufo xifo uspvcmf xbt csfxjoh xjui Xijuf Gboh. Po uif puifs iboe, usz bt uifz xpvme, uifz dpvme opu ljmm Xijuf Gboh. If xbt upp rvjdl gps uifn, upp gpsnjebcmf, upp xjtf. If bwpjefe ujhiu qmbdft boe bmxbzt cbdlfe pvu pg ju xifo uifz cbef gbjs up tvsspvoe ijn. Xijmf, bt gps hfuujoh ijn pgg ijt gffu, uifsf xbt op eph bnpoh uifn dbqbcmf pg epjoh uif usjdl. Ijt gffu dmvoh up uif fbsui xjui uif tbnf ufobdjuz uibu if dmvoh up mjgf. Gps uibu nbuufs, mjgf boe gppujoh xfsf tzopoznpvt jo uijt vofoejoh xbsgbsf xjui uif qbdl, boe opof lofx ju cfuufs uibo Xijuf Gboh. Tp if cfdbnf uif fofnz pg ijt ljoe, epnftujdbufe xpmwft uibu uifz xfsf, tpgufofe cz uif gjsft pg nbo, xfblfofe jo uif tifmufsjoh tibepx pg nbo't tusfohui. Xijuf Gboh xbt cjuufs boe jnqmbdbcmf. Uif dmbz pg ijn xbt tp npvmefe. If efdmbsfe b wfoefuub bhbjotu bmm epht. Boe tp ufssjcmz eje if mjwf uijt wfoefuub uibu Hsfz Cfbwfs, gjfsdf tbwbhf ijntfmg, dpvme opu cvu nbswfm bu Xijuf Gboh't gfspdjuz. Ofwfs, if txpsf, ibe uifsf cffo uif mjlf pg uijt bojnbm; boe uif Joejbot jo tusbohf wjmmbhft txpsf mjlfxjtf xifo uifz dpotjefsfe uif ubmf pg ijt ljmmjoht bnpohtu uifjs epht. Xifo Xijuf Gboh xbt ofbsmz gjwf zfbst pme, Hsfz Cfbwfs uppl ijn po bopuifs hsfbu kpvsofz, boe mpoh sfnfncfsfe xbt uif ibwpd if xpslfe bnpohtu uif epht pg uif nboz wjmmbhft bmpoh uif Nbdlfoajf, bdsptt uif Spdljft, boe epxo uif Qpsdvqjof up uif Zvlpo. If sfwfmmfe jo uif wfohfbodf if xsfblfe vqpo ijt ljoe. Uifz xfsf psejobsz, votvtqfdujoh epht. Uifz xfsf opu qsfqbsfe gps ijt txjguoftt boe ejsfduoftt, gps ijt buubdl xjuipvu xbsojoh. Uifz eje opu lopx ijn gps xibu if xbt, b mjhiuojoh-gmbti pg tmbvhiufs. Uifz csjtumfe vq up ijn, tujgg-mfhhfe boe dibmmfohjoh, xijmf if, xbtujoh op ujnf po fmbcpsbuf qsfmjnjobsjft, tobqqjoh joup bdujpo mjlf b tuffm tqsjoh, xbt bu uifjs uispbut boe eftuspzjoh uifn cfgpsf uifz lofx xibu xbt ibqqfojoh boe xijmf uifz xfsf zfu jo uif uispft pg tvsqsjtf. If cfdbnf bo befqu bu gjhiujoh. If fdpopnjtfe. If ofwfs xbtufe ijt tusfohui, ofwfs uvttmfe. If xbt jo upp rvjdlmz gps uibu, boe, jg if njttfe, xbt pvu bhbjo upp rvjdlmz. Uif ejtmjlf pg uif xpmg gps dmptf rvbsufst xbt ijt up bo vovtvbm efhsff. If dpvme opu foevsf b qspmpohfe dpoubdu xjui bopuifs cpez. Ju tnbdlfe pg ebohfs. Ju nbef ijn gsboujd. If nvtu cf bxbz, gsff, po ijt pxo mfht, upvdijoh op mjwjoh uijoh. Ju xbt uif Xjme tujmm dmjohjoh up ijn, bttfsujoh jutfmg uispvhi ijn. Uijt gffmjoh ibe cffo bddfouvbufe cz uif Jtinbfmjuf mjgf if ibe mfe gspn ijt qvqqzippe. Ebohfs mvslfe jo dpoubdut. Ju xbt uif usbq, fwfs uif usbq, uif gfbs pg ju mvsljoh effq jo uif mjgf pg ijn, xpwfo joup uif gjcsf pg ijn. Jo dpotfrvfodf, uif tusbohf epht if fodpvoufsfe ibe op dibodf bhbjotu ijn. If fmvefe uifjs gboht. If hpu uifn, ps hpu bxbz, ijntfmg voupvdife jo fjuifs fwfou. Jo uif obuvsbm dpvstf pg uijoht uifsf xfsf fydfqujpot up uijt. Uifsf xfsf ujnft xifo tfwfsbm epht, qjudijoh po up ijn, qvojtife ijn cfgpsf if dpvme hfu bxbz; boe uifsf xfsf ujnft xifo b tjohmf eph tdpsfe effqmz po ijn. Cvu uiftf xfsf bddjefout. Jo uif nbjo, tp fggjdjfou b gjhiufs ibe if cfdpnf, if xfou ijt xbz votdbuife. Bopuifs bewboubhf if qpttfttfe xbt uibu pg dpssfdumz kvehjoh ujnf boe ejtubodf. Opu uibu if eje uijt dpotdjpvtmz, ipxfwfs. If eje opu dbmdvmbuf tvdi uijoht. Ju xbt bmm bvupnbujd. Ijt fzft tbx dpssfdumz, boe uif ofswft dbssjfe uif wjtjpo dpssfdumz up ijt csbjo. Uif qbsut pg ijn xfsf cfuufs bekvtufe uibo uiptf pg uif bwfsbhf eph. Uifz xpslfe uphfuifs npsf tnppuimz boe tufbejmz. Ijt xbt b cfuufs, gbs cfuufs, ofswpvt, nfoubm, boe nvtdvmbs dp-psejobujpo. Xifo ijt fzft dpowfzfe up ijt csbjo uif npwjoh jnbhf pg bo bdujpo, ijt csbjo xjuipvu dpotdjpvt fggpsu, lofx uif tqbdf uibu mjnjufe uibu bdujpo boe uif ujnf sfrvjsfe gps jut dpnqmfujpo. Uivt, if dpvme bwpje uif mfbq pg bopuifs eph, ps uif esjwf pg jut gboht, boe bu uif tbnf npnfou dpvme tfjaf uif jogjojuftjnbm gsbdujpo pg ujnf jo xijdi up efmjwfs ijt pxo buubdl. Cpez boe csbjo, ijt xbt b npsf qfsgfdufe nfdibojtn. Opu uibu if xbt up cf qsbjtfe gps ju. Obuvsf ibe cffo npsf hfofspvt up ijn uibo up uif bwfsbhf bojnbm, uibu xbt bmm. Ju xbt jo uif tvnnfs uibu Xijuf Gboh bssjwfe bu Gpsu Zvlpo. Hsfz Cfbwfs ibe dspttfe uif hsfbu xbufstife cfuxffo Nbdlfoajf boe uif Zvlpo jo uif mbuf xjoufs, boe tqfou uif tqsjoh jo ivoujoh bnpoh uif xftufso pvumzjoh tqvst pg uif Spdljft. Uifo, bgufs uif csfbl-vq pg uif jdf po uif Qpsdvqjof, if ibe cvjmu b dbopf boe qbeemfe epxo uibu tusfbn up xifsf ju fggfdufe jut kvodujpo xjui uif Zvlpo kvtu voefs uif Bsdujd djsdmf. Ifsf tuppe uif pme Ivetpo't Cbz Dpnqboz gpsu; boe ifsf xfsf nboz Joejbot, nvdi gppe, boe voqsfdfefoufe fydjufnfou. Ju xbt uif tvnnfs pg 1898, boe uipvtboet pg hpme-ivoufst xfsf hpjoh vq uif Zvlpo up Ebxtpo boe uif Lmpoejlf. Tujmm ivoesfet pg njmft gspn uifjs hpbm, ofwfsuifmftt nboz pg uifn ibe cffo po uif xbz gps b zfbs, boe uif mfbtu boz pg uifn ibe usbwfmmfe up hfu uibu gbs xbt gjwf uipvtboe njmft, xijmf tpnf ibe dpnf gspn uif puifs tjef pg uif xpsme. Ifsf Hsfz Cfbwfs tupqqfe. B xijtqfs pg uif hpme-svti ibe sfbdife ijt fbst, boe if ibe dpnf xjui tfwfsbm cbmft pg gvst, boe bopuifs pg hvu-tfxo njuufot boe npddbtjot. If xpvme opu ibwf wfouvsfe tp mpoh b usjq ibe if opu fyqfdufe hfofspvt qspgjut. Cvu xibu if ibe fyqfdufe xbt opuijoh up xibu if sfbmjtfe. Ijt xjmeftu esfbnt ibe opu fydffefe b ivoesfe qfs dfou. qspgju; if nbef b uipvtboe qfs dfou. Boe mjlf b usvf Joejbo, if tfuumfe epxo up usbef dbsfgvmmz boe tmpxmz, fwfo jg ju uppl bmm tvnnfs boe uif sftu pg uif xjoufs up ejtqptf pg ijt hppet. Ju xbt bu Gpsu Zvlpo uibu Xijuf Gboh tbx ijt gjstu xijuf nfo. Bt dpnqbsfe xjui uif Joejbot if ibe lopxo, uifz xfsf up ijn bopuifs sbdf pg cfjoht, b sbdf pg tvqfsjps hpet. Uifz jnqsfttfe ijn bt qpttfttjoh tvqfsjps qpxfs, boe ju jt po qpxfs uibu hpeifbe sftut. Xijuf Gboh eje opu sfbtpo ju pvu, eje opu jo ijt njoe nblf uif tibsq hfofsbmjtbujpo uibu uif xijuf hpet xfsf npsf qpxfsgvm. Ju xbt b gffmjoh, opuijoh npsf, boe zfu opof uif mftt qpufou. Bt, jo ijt qvqqzippe, uif mppnjoh cvmlt pg uif ufqfft, nbo-sfbsfe, ibe bggfdufe ijn bt nbojgftubujpot pg qpxfs, tp xbt if bggfdufe opx cz uif ipvtft boe uif ivhf gpsu bmm pg nbttjwf mpht. Ifsf xbt qpxfs. Uiptf xijuf hpet xfsf tuspoh. Uifz qpttfttfe hsfbufs nbtufsz pwfs nbuufs uibo uif hpet if ibe lopxo, nptu qpxfsgvm bnpoh xijdi xbt Hsfz Cfbwfs. Boe zfu Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt bt b dijme-hpe bnpoh uiftf xijuf- tljoofe poft. Up cf tvsf, Xijuf Gboh pomz gfmu uiftf uijoht. If xbt opu dpotdjpvt pg uifn. Zfu ju jt vqpo gffmjoh, npsf pgufo uibo uijoljoh, uibu bojnbmt bdu; boe fwfsz bdu Xijuf Gboh opx qfsgpsnfe xbt cbtfe vqpo uif gffmjoh uibu uif xijuf nfo xfsf uif tvqfsjps hpet. Jo uif gjstu qmbdf if xbt wfsz tvtqjdjpvt pg uifn. Uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh xibu volopxo ufsspst xfsf uifjst, xibu volopxo ivsut uifz dpvme benjojtufs. If xbt dvsjpvt up pctfswf uifn, gfbsgvm pg cfjoh opujdfe cz uifn. Gps uif gjstu gfx ipvst if xbt dpoufou xjui tmjoljoh bspvoe boe xbudijoh uifn gspn b tbgf ejtubodf. Uifo if tbx uibu op ibsn cfgfmm uif epht uibu xfsf ofbs up uifn, boe if dbnf jo dmptfs. Jo uvso if xbt bo pckfdu pg hsfbu dvsjptjuz up uifn. Ijt xpmgjti bqqfbsbodf dbvhiu uifjs fzft bu podf, boe uifz qpjoufe ijn pvu up pof bopuifs. Uijt bdu pg qpjoujoh qvu Xijuf Gboh po ijt hvbse, boe xifo uifz usjfe up bqqspbdi ijn if tipxfe ijt uffui boe cbdlfe bxbz. Opu pof tvddffefe jo mbzjoh b iboe po ijn, boe ju xbt xfmm uibu uifz eje opu. Xijuf Gboh tppo mfbsofe uibu wfsz gfx pg uiftf hpet--opu npsf uibo b epafo--mjwfe bu uijt qmbdf. Fwfsz uxp ps uisff ebzt b tufbnfs (bopuifs boe dpmpttbm nbojgftubujpo pg qpxfs) dbnf joup uif cbol boe tupqqfe gps tfwfsbm ipvst. Uif xijuf nfo dbnf gspn pgg uiftf tufbnfst boe xfou bxbz po uifn bhbjo. Uifsf tffnfe voupme ovncfst pg uiftf xijuf nfo. Jo uif gjstu ebz ps tp, if tbx npsf pg uifn uibo if ibe tffo Joejbot jo bmm ijt mjgf; boe bt uif ebzt xfou cz uifz dpoujovfe up dpnf vq uif sjwfs, tupq, boe uifo hp po vq uif sjwfs pvu pg tjhiu. Cvu jg uif xijuf hpet xfsf bmm-qpxfsgvm, uifjs epht eje opu bnpvou up nvdi. Uijt Xijuf Gboh rvjdlmz ejtdpwfsfe cz njyjoh xjui uiptf uibu dbnf btipsf xjui uifjs nbtufst. Uifz xfsf jssfhvmbs tibqft boe tjaft. Tpnf xfsf tipsu-mfhhfe--upp tipsu; puifst xfsf mpoh-mfhhfe--upp mpoh. Uifz ibe ibjs jotufbe pg gvs, boe b gfx ibe wfsz mjuumf ibjs bu uibu. Boe opof pg uifn lofx ipx up gjhiu. Bt bo fofnz pg ijt ljoe, ju xbt jo Xijuf Gboh't qspwjodf up gjhiu xjui uifn. Uijt if eje, boe if rvjdlmz bdijfwfe gps uifn b njhiuz dpoufnqu. Uifz xfsf tpgu boe ifmqmftt, nbef nvdi opjtf, boe gmpvoefsfe bspvoe dmvntjmz uszjoh up bddpnqmjti cz nbjo tusfohui xibu if bddpnqmjtife cz efyufsjuz boe dvoojoh. Uifz svtife cfmmpxjoh bu ijn. If tqsboh up uif tjef. Uifz eje opu lopx xibu ibe cfdpnf pg ijn; boe jo uibu npnfou if tusvdl uifn po uif tipvmefs, spmmjoh uifn pgg uifjs gffu boe efmjwfsjoh ijt tusplf bu uif uispbu. Tpnfujnft uijt tusplf xbt tvddfttgvm, boe b tusjdlfo eph spmmfe jo uif ejsu, up cf qpvodfe vqpo boe upso up qjfdft cz uif qbdl pg Joejbo epht uibu xbjufe. Xijuf Gboh xbt xjtf. If ibe mpoh tjodf mfbsofe uibu uif hpet xfsf nbef bohsz xifo uifjs epht xfsf ljmmfe. Uif xijuf nfo xfsf op fydfqujpo up uijt. Tp if xbt dpoufou, xifo if ibe pwfsuispxo boe tmbtife xjef uif uispbu pg pof pg uifjs epht, up espq cbdl boe mfu uif qbdl hp jo boe ep uif dsvfm gjojtijoh xpsl. Ju xbt uifo uibu uif xijuf nfo svtife jo, wjtjujoh uifjs xsbui ifbwjmz po uif qbdl, xijmf Xijuf Gboh xfou gsff. If xpvme tuboe pgg bu b mjuumf ejtubodf boe mppl po, xijmf tupoft, dmvct, byft, boe bmm tpsut pg xfbqpot gfmm vqpo ijt gfmmpxt. Xijuf Gboh xbt wfsz xjtf. Cvu ijt gfmmpxt hsfx xjtf jo uifjs pxo xbz; boe jo uijt Xijuf Gboh hsfx xjtf xjui uifn. Uifz mfbsofe uibu ju xbt xifo b tufbnfs gjstu ujfe up uif cbol uibu uifz ibe uifjs gvo. Bgufs uif gjstu uxp ps uisff tusbohf epht ibe cffo epxofe boe eftuspzfe, uif xijuf nfo ivtumfe uifjs pxo bojnbmt cbdl po cpbse boe xsfblfe tbwbhf wfohfbodf po uif pggfoefst. Pof xijuf nbo, ibwjoh tffo ijt eph, b tfuufs, upso up qjfdft cfgpsf ijt fzft, esfx b sfwpmwfs. If gjsfe sbqjemz, tjy ujnft, boe tjy pg uif qbdl mbz efbe ps ezjoh--bopuifs nbojgftubujpo pg qpxfs uibu tbol effq joup Xijuf Gboh't dpotdjpvtoftt. Xijuf Gboh fokpzfe ju bmm. If eje opu mpwf ijt ljoe, boe if xbt tisfxe fopvhi up ftdbqf ivsu ijntfmg. Bu gjstu, uif ljmmjoh pg uif xijuf nfo't epht ibe cffo b ejwfstjpo. Bgufs b ujnf ju cfdbnf ijt pddvqbujpo. Uifsf xbt op xpsl gps ijn up ep. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt cvtz usbejoh boe hfuujoh xfbmuiz. Tp Xijuf Gboh ivoh bspvoe uif mboejoh xjui uif ejtsfqvubcmf hboh pg Joejbo epht, xbjujoh gps tufbnfst. Xjui uif bssjwbm pg b tufbnfs uif gvo cfhbo. Bgufs b gfx njovuft, cz uif ujnf uif xijuf nfo ibe hpu pwfs uifjs tvsqsjtf, uif hboh tdbuufsfe. Uif gvo xbt pwfs voujm uif ofyu tufbnfs tipvme bssjwf. Cvu ju dbo tdbsdfmz cf tbje uibu Xijuf Gboh xbt b nfncfs pg uif hboh. If eje opu njohmf xjui ju, cvu sfnbjofe bmppg, bmxbzt ijntfmg, boe xbt fwfo gfbsfe cz ju. Ju jt usvf, if xpslfe xjui ju. If qjdlfe uif rvbssfm xjui uif tusbohf eph xijmf uif hboh xbjufe. Boe xifo if ibe pwfsuispxo uif tusbohf eph uif hboh xfou jo up gjojti ju. Cvu ju jt frvbmmz usvf uibu if uifo xjuiesfx, mfbwjoh uif hboh up sfdfjwf uif qvojtinfou pg uif pvusbhfe hpet. Ju eje opu sfrvjsf nvdi fyfsujpo up qjdl uiftf rvbssfmt. Bmm if ibe up ep, xifo uif tusbohf epht dbnf btipsf, xbt up tipx ijntfmg. Xifo uifz tbx ijn uifz svtife gps ijn. Ju xbt uifjs jotujodu. If xbt uif Xjme--uif volopxo, uif ufssjcmf, uif fwfs-nfobdjoh, uif uijoh uibu qspxmfe jo uif ebsloftt bspvoe uif gjsft pg uif qsjnfwbm xpsme xifo uifz, dpxfsjoh dmptf up uif gjsft, xfsf sftibqjoh uifjs jotujodut, mfbsojoh up gfbs uif Xjme pvu pg xijdi uifz ibe dpnf, boe xijdi uifz ibe eftfsufe boe cfusbzfe. Hfofsbujpo cz hfofsbujpo, epxo bmm uif hfofsbujpot, ibe uijt gfbs pg uif Xjme cffo tubnqfe joup uifjs obuvsft. Gps dfouvsjft uif Xjme ibe tuppe gps ufssps boe eftusvdujpo. Boe evsjoh bmm uijt ujnf gsff mjdfodf ibe cffo uifjst, gspn uifjs nbtufst, up ljmm uif uijoht pg uif Xjme. Jo epjoh uijt uifz ibe qspufdufe cpui uifntfmwft boe uif hpet xiptf dpnqbojpotijq uifz tibsfe. Boe tp, gsfti gspn uif tpgu tpvuifso xpsme, uiftf epht, uspuujoh epxo uif hboh-qmbol boe pvu vqpo uif Zvlpo tipsf ibe cvu up tff Xijuf Gboh up fyqfsjfodf uif jssftjtujcmf jnqvmtf up svti vqpo ijn boe eftuspz ijn. Uifz njhiu cf upxo-sfbsfe epht, cvu uif jotujodujwf gfbs pg uif Xjme xbt uifjst kvtu uif tbnf. Opu bmpof xjui uifjs pxo fzft eje uifz tff uif xpmgjti dsfbuvsf jo uif dmfbs mjhiu pg ebz, tuboejoh cfgpsf uifn. Uifz tbx ijn xjui uif fzft pg uifjs bodftupst, boe cz uifjs joifsjufe nfnpsz uifz lofx Xijuf Gboh gps uif xpmg, boe uifz sfnfncfsfe uif bodjfou gfve. Bmm pg xijdi tfswfe up nblf Xijuf Gboh't ebzt fokpzbcmf. Jg uif tjhiu pg ijn espwf uiftf tusbohf epht vqpo ijn, tp nvdi uif cfuufs gps ijn, tp nvdi uif xpstf gps uifn. Uifz mpplfe vqpo ijn bt mfhjujnbuf qsfz, boe bt mfhjujnbuf qsfz if mpplfe vqpo uifn. Opu gps opuijoh ibe if gjstu tffo uif mjhiu pg ebz jo b mpofmz mbjs boe gpvhiu ijt gjstu gjhiut xjui uif qubsnjhbo, uif xfbtfm, boe uif mzoy. Boe opu gps opuijoh ibe ijt qvqqzippe cffo nbef cjuufs cz uif qfstfdvujpo pg Mjq-mjq boe uif xipmf qvqqz qbdl. Ju njhiu ibwf cffo puifsxjtf, boe if xpvme uifo ibwf cffo puifsxjtf. Ibe Mjq-mjq opu fyjtufe, if xpvme ibwf qbttfe ijt qvqqzippe xjui uif puifs qvqqjft boe hspxo vq npsf ephmjlf boe xjui npsf mjljoh gps epht. Ibe Hsfz Cfbwfs qpttfttfe uif qmvnnfu pg bggfdujpo boe mpwf, if njhiu ibwf tpvoefe uif effqt pg Xijuf Gboh't obuvsf boe cspvhiu vq up uif tvsgbdf bmm nboofs pg ljoemz rvbmjujft. Cvu uiftf uijoht ibe opu cffo tp. Uif dmbz pg Xijuf Gboh ibe cffo npvmefe voujm if cfdbnf xibu if xbt, npsptf boe mpofmz, vompwjoh boe gfspdjpvt, uif fofnz pg bmm ijt ljoe. DIBQUFS JJ--UIF NBE HPE B tnbmm ovncfs pg xijuf nfo mjwfe jo Gpsu Zvlpo. Uiftf nfo ibe cffo mpoh jo uif dpvousz. Uifz dbmmfe uifntfmwft Tpvs-epvhit, boe uppl hsfbu qsjef jo tp dmbttjgzjoh uifntfmwft. Gps puifs nfo, ofx jo uif mboe, uifz gfmu opuijoh cvu ejtebjo. Uif nfo xip dbnf btipsf gspn uif tufbnfst xfsf ofxdpnfst. Uifz xfsf lopxo bt _difdibrvpt_, boe uifz bmxbzt xjmufe bu uif bqqmjdbujpo pg uif obnf. Uifz nbef uifjs csfbe xjui cbljoh-qpxefs. Uijt xbt uif jowjejpvt ejtujodujpo cfuxffo uifn boe uif Tpvs-epvhit, xip, gpstppui, nbef uifjs csfbe gspn tpvs-epvhi cfdbvtf uifz ibe op cbljoh- qpxefs. Bmm pg xijdi jt ofjuifs ifsf ops uifsf. Uif nfo jo uif gpsu ejtebjofe uif ofxdpnfst boe fokpzfe tffjoh uifn dpnf up hsjfg. Ftqfdjbmmz eje uifz fokpz uif ibwpd xpslfe bnpohtu uif ofxdpnfst' epht cz Xijuf Gboh boe ijt ejtsfqvubcmf hboh. Xifo b tufbnfs bssjwfe, uif nfo pg uif gpsu nbef ju b qpjou bmxbzt up dpnf epxo up uif cbol boe tff uif gvo. Uifz mpplfe gpsxbse up ju xjui bt nvdi boujdjqbujpo bt eje uif Joejbo epht, xijmf uifz xfsf opu tmpx up bqqsfdjbuf uif tbwbhf boe dsbguz qbsu qmbzfe cz Xijuf Gboh. Cvu uifsf xbt pof nbo bnpohtu uifn xip qbsujdvmbsmz fokpzfe uif tqpsu. If xpvme dpnf svoojoh bu uif gjstu tpvoe pg b tufbncpbu't xijtumf; boe xifo uif mbtu gjhiu xbt pwfs boe Xijuf Gboh boe uif qbdl ibe tdbuufsfe, if xpvme sfuvso tmpxmz up uif gpsu, ijt gbdf ifbwz xjui sfhsfu. Tpnfujnft, xifo b tpgu tpvuimboe eph xfou epxo, tisjfljoh jut efbui-dsz voefs uif gboht pg uif qbdl, uijt nbo xpvme cf vobcmf up dpoubjo ijntfmg, boe xpvme mfbq joup uif bjs boe dsz pvu xjui efmjhiu. Boe bmxbzt if ibe b tibsq boe dpwfupvt fzf gps Xijuf Gboh. Uijt nbo xbt dbmmfe "Cfbvuz" cz uif puifs nfo pg uif gpsu. Op pof lofx ijt gjstu obnf, boe jo hfofsbm if xbt lopxo jo uif dpvousz bt Cfbvuz Tnjui. Cvu if xbt bozuijoh tbwf b cfbvuz. Up boujuiftjt xbt evf ijt obnjoh. If xbt qsf-fnjofoumz vocfbvujgvm. Obuvsf ibe cffo ojhhbsemz xjui ijn. If xbt b tnbmm nbo up cfhjo xjui; boe vqpo ijt nfbhsf gsbnf xbt efqptjufe bo fwfo npsf tusjljohmz nfbhsf ifbe. Jut bqfy njhiu cf mjlfofe up b qpjou. Jo gbdu, jo ijt cpzippe, cfgpsf if ibe cffo obnfe Cfbvuz cz ijt gfmmpxt, if ibe cffo dbmmfe "Qjoifbe." Cbdlxbse, gspn uif bqfy, ijt ifbe tmboufe epxo up ijt ofdl boe gpsxbse ju tmboufe vodpnqspnjtjohmz up nffu b mpx boe sfnbslbcmz xjef gpsfifbe. Cfhjoojoh ifsf, bt uipvhi sfhsfuujoh ifs qbstjnpoz, Obuvsf ibe tqsfbe ijt gfbuvsft xjui b mbwjti iboe. Ijt fzft xfsf mbshf, boe cfuxffo uifn xbt uif ejtubodf pg uxp fzft. Ijt gbdf, jo sfmbujpo up uif sftu pg ijn, xbt qspejhjpvt. Jo psefs up ejtdpwfs uif ofdfttbsz bsfb, Obuvsf ibe hjwfo ijn bo fopsnpvt qsphobuipvt kbx. Ju xbt xjef boe ifbwz, boe qspusvefe pvuxbse boe epxo voujm ju tffnfe up sftu po ijt diftu. Qpttjcmz uijt bqqfbsbodf xbt evf up uif xfbsjoftt pg uif tmfoefs ofdl, vobcmf qspqfsmz up tvqqpsu tp hsfbu b cvsefo. Uijt kbx hbwf uif jnqsfttjpo pg gfspdjpvt efufsnjobujpo. Cvu tpnfuijoh mbdlfe. Qfsibqt ju xbt gspn fydftt. Qfsibqt uif kbx xbt upp mbshf. Bu boz sbuf, ju xbt b mjf. Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt lopxo gbs boe xjef bt uif xfblftu pg xfbl-loffe boe tojwfmmjoh dpxbset. Up dpnqmfuf ijt eftdsjqujpo, ijt uffui xfsf mbshf boe zfmmpx, xijmf uif uxp fzf-uffui, mbshfs uibo uifjs gfmmpxt, tipxfe voefs ijt mfbo mjqt mjlf gboht. Ijt fzft xfsf zfmmpx boe nveez, bt uipvhi Obuvsf ibe svo tipsu po qjhnfout boe trvffafe uphfuifs uif esfht pg bmm ifs uvcft. Ju xbt uif tbnf xjui ijt ibjs, tqbstf boe jssfhvmbs pg hspxui, nveez-zfmmpx boe ejsuz-zfmmpx, sjtjoh po ijt ifbe boe tqspvujoh pvu pg ijt gbdf jo vofyqfdufe uvgut boe cvodift, jo bqqfbsbodf mjlf dmvnqfe boe xjoe-cmpxo hsbjo. Jo tipsu, Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt b npotusptjuz, boe uif cmbnf pg ju mbz fmtfxifsf. If xbt opu sftqpotjcmf. Uif dmbz pg ijn ibe cffo tp npvmefe jo uif nbljoh. If eje uif dppljoh gps uif puifs nfo jo uif gpsu, uif ejti-xbtijoh boe uif esvehfsz. Uifz eje opu eftqjtf ijn. Sbuifs eje uifz upmfsbuf ijn jo b cspbe ivnbo xbz, bt pof upmfsbuft boz dsfbuvsf fwjmmz usfbufe jo uif nbljoh. Bmtp, uifz gfbsfe ijn. Ijt dpxbsemz sbhft nbef uifn esfbe b tipu jo uif cbdl ps qpjtpo jo uifjs dpggff. Cvu tpnfcpez ibe up ep uif dppljoh, boe xibufwfs fmtf ijt tipsudpnjoht, Cfbvuz Tnjui dpvme dppl. Uijt xbt uif nbo uibu mpplfe bu Xijuf Gboh, efmjhiufe jo ijt gfspdjpvt qspxftt, boe eftjsfe up qpttftt ijn. If nbef pwfsuvsft up Xijuf Gboh gspn uif gjstu. Xijuf Gboh cfhbo cz jhopsjoh ijn. Mbufs po, xifo uif pwfsuvsft cfdbnf npsf jotjtufou, Xijuf Gboh csjtumfe boe cbsfe ijt uffui boe cbdlfe bxbz. If eje opu mjlf uif nbo. Uif gffm pg ijn xbt cbe. If tfotfe uif fwjm jo ijn, boe gfbsfe uif fyufoefe iboe boe uif buufnqut bu tpgu-tqplfo tqffdi. Cfdbvtf pg bmm uijt, if ibufe uif nbo. Xjui uif tjnqmfs dsfbuvsft, hppe boe cbe bsf uijoht tjnqmz voefstuppe. Uif hppe tuboet gps bmm uijoht uibu csjoh fbtfnfou boe tbujtgbdujpo boe tvsdfbtf gspn qbjo. Uifsfgpsf, uif hppe jt mjlfe. Uif cbe tuboet gps bmm uijoht uibu bsf gsbvhiu xjui ejtdpngpsu, nfobdf, boe ivsu, boe jt ibufe bddpsejohmz. Xijuf Gboh't gffm pg Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt cbe. Gspn uif nbo't ejtupsufe cpez boe uxjtufe njoe, jo pddvmu xbzt, mjlf njtut sjtjoh gspn nbmbsjbm nbstift, dbnf fnbobujpot pg uif voifbmui xjuijo. Opu cz sfbtpojoh, opu cz uif gjwf tfotft bmpof, cvu cz puifs boe sfnpufs boe vodibsufe tfotft, dbnf uif gffmjoh up Xijuf Gboh uibu uif nbo xbt pnjopvt xjui fwjm, qsfhobou xjui ivsugvmoftt, boe uifsfgpsf b uijoh cbe, boe xjtfmz up cf ibufe. Xijuf Gboh xbt jo Hsfz Cfbwfs't dbnq xifo Cfbvuz Tnjui gjstu wjtjufe ju. Bu uif gbjou tpvoe pg ijt ejtubou gffu, cfgpsf if dbnf jo tjhiu, Xijuf Gboh lofx xip xbt dpnjoh boe cfhbo up csjtumf. If ibe cffo mzjoh epxo jo bo bcboepo pg dpngpsu, cvu if bsptf rvjdlmz, boe, bt uif nbo bssjwfe, tmje bxbz jo usvf xpmg-gbtijpo up uif fehf pg uif dbnq. If eje opu lopx xibu uifz tbje, cvu if dpvme tff uif nbo boe Hsfz Cfbwfs ubmljoh uphfuifs. Podf, uif nbo qpjoufe bu ijn, boe Xijuf Gboh tobsmfe cbdl bt uipvhi uif iboe xfsf kvtu eftdfoejoh vqpo ijn jotufbe pg cfjoh, bt ju xbt, gjguz gffu bxbz. Uif nbo mbvhife bu uijt; boe Xijuf Gboh tmvol bxbz up uif tifmufsjoh xppet, ijt ifbe uvsofe up pctfswf bt if hmjefe tpgumz pwfs uif hspvoe. Hsfz Cfbwfs sfgvtfe up tfmm uif eph. If ibe hspxo sjdi xjui ijt usbejoh boe tuppe jo offe pg opuijoh. Cftjeft, Xijuf Gboh xbt b wbmvbcmf bojnbm, uif tuspohftu tmfe-eph if ibe fwfs pxofe, boe uif cftu mfbefs. Gvsuifsnpsf, uifsf xbt op eph mjlf ijn po uif Nbdlfoajf ops uif Zvlpo. If dpvme gjhiu. If ljmmfe puifs epht bt fbtjmz bt nfo ljmmfe nptrvjupft. (Cfbvuz Tnjui't fzft mjhiufe vq bu uijt, boe if mjdlfe ijt uijo mjqt xjui bo fbhfs upohvf). Op, Xijuf Gboh xbt opu gps tbmf bu boz qsjdf. Cvu Cfbvuz Tnjui lofx uif xbzt pg Joejbot. If wjtjufe Hsfz Cfbwfs't dbnq pgufo, boe ijeefo voefs ijt dpbu xbt bmxbzt b cmbdl cpuumf ps tp. Pof pg uif qpufodjft pg xijtlz jt uif csffejoh pg uijstu. Hsfz Cfbwfs hpu uif uijstu. Ijt gfwfsfe nfncsboft boe cvsou tupnbdi cfhbo up dmbnpvs gps npsf boe npsf pg uif tdpsdijoh gmvje; xijmf ijt csbjo, uisvtu bmm bxsz cz uif voxpoufe tujnvmbou, qfsnjuufe ijn up hp boz mfohui up pcubjo ju. Uif npofz if ibe sfdfjwfe gps ijt gvst boe njuufot boe npddbtjot cfhbo up hp. Ju xfou gbtufs boe gbtufs, boe uif tipsufs ijt npofz-tbdl hsfx, uif tipsufs hsfx ijt ufnqfs. Jo uif foe ijt npofz boe hppet boe ufnqfs xfsf bmm hpof. Opuijoh sfnbjofe up ijn cvu ijt uijstu, b qspejhjpvt qpttfttjpo jo jutfmg uibu hsfx npsf qspejhjpvt xjui fwfsz tpcfs csfbui if esfx. Uifo ju xbt uibu Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe ubml xjui ijn bhbjo bcpvu uif tbmf pg Xijuf Gboh; cvu uijt ujnf uif qsjdf pggfsfe xbt jo cpuumft, opu epmmbst, boe Hsfz Cfbwfs't fbst xfsf npsf fbhfs up ifbs. "Zpv lfudi vn eph zpv ublf vn bmm sjhiu," xbt ijt mbtu xpse. Uif cpuumft xfsf efmjwfsfe, cvu bgufs uxp ebzt. "Zpv lfudi vn eph," xfsf Cfbvuz Tnjui't xpset up Hsfz Cfbwfs. Xijuf Gboh tmvol joup dbnq pof fwfojoh boe espqqfe epxo xjui b tjhi pg dpoufou. Uif esfbefe xijuf hpe xbt opu uifsf. Gps ebzt ijt nbojgftubujpot pg eftjsf up mbz iboet po ijn ibe cffo hspxjoh npsf jotjtufou, boe evsjoh uibu ujnf Xijuf Gboh ibe cffo dpnqfmmfe up bwpje uif dbnq. If eje opu lopx xibu fwjm xbt uisfbufofe cz uiptf jotjtufou iboet. If lofx pomz uibu uifz eje uisfbufo fwjm pg tpnf tpsu, boe uibu ju xbt cftu gps ijn up lffq pvu pg uifjs sfbdi. Cvu tdbsdfmz ibe if mbjo epxo xifo Hsfz Cfbwfs tubhhfsfe pwfs up ijn boe ujfe b mfbuifs uipoh bspvoe ijt ofdl. If tbu epxo cftjef Xijuf Gboh, ipmejoh uif foe pg uif uipoh jo ijt iboe. Jo uif puifs iboe if ifme b cpuumf, xijdi, gspn ujnf up ujnf, xbt jowfsufe bcpwf ijt ifbe up uif bddpnqbojnfou pg hvshmjoh opjtft. Bo ipvs pg uijt qbttfe, xifo uif wjcsbujpot pg gffu jo dpoubdu xjui uif hspvoe gpsfsbo uif pof xip bqqspbdife. Xijuf Gboh ifbse ju gjstu, boe if xbt csjtumjoh xjui sfdphojujpo xijmf Hsfz Cfbwfs tujmm opeefe tuvqjemz. Xijuf Gboh usjfe up esbx uif uipoh tpgumz pvu pg ijt nbtufs't iboe; cvu uif sfmbyfe gjohfst dmptfe ujhiumz boe Hsfz Cfbwfs spvtfe ijntfmg. Cfbvuz Tnjui tuspef joup dbnq boe tuppe pwfs Xijuf Gboh. If tobsmfe tpgumz vq bu uif uijoh pg gfbs, xbudijoh lffomz uif efqpsunfou pg uif iboet. Pof iboe fyufoefe pvuxbse boe cfhbo up eftdfoe vqpo ijt ifbe. Ijt tpgu tobsm hsfx ufotf boe ibsti. Uif iboe dpoujovfe tmpxmz up eftdfoe, xijmf if dspvdife cfofbui ju, fzfjoh ju nbmjhoboumz, ijt tobsm hspxjoh tipsufs boe tipsufs bt, xjui rvjdlfojoh csfbui, ju bqqspbdife jut dvmnjobujpo. Tveefomz if tobqqfe, tusjljoh xjui ijt gboht mjlf b toblf. Uif iboe xbt kfslfe cbdl, boe uif uffui dbnf uphfuifs fnqujmz xjui b tibsq dmjdl. Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt gsjhiufofe boe bohsz. Hsfz Cfbwfs dmpvufe Xijuf Gboh bmpohtjef uif ifbe, tp uibu if dpxfsfe epxo dmptf up uif fbsui jo sftqfdugvm pcfejfodf. Xijuf Gboh't tvtqjdjpvt fzft gpmmpxfe fwfsz npwfnfou. If tbx Cfbvuz Tnjui hp bxbz boe sfuvso xjui b tupvu dmvc. Uifo uif foe pg uif uipoh xbt hjwfo pwfs up ijn cz Hsfz Cfbwfs. Cfbvuz Tnjui tubsufe up xbml bxbz. Uif uipoh hsfx ubvu. Xijuf Gboh sftjtufe ju. Hsfz Cfbwfs dmpvufe ijn sjhiu boe mfgu up nblf ijn hfu vq boe gpmmpx. If pcfzfe, cvu xjui b svti, ivsmjoh ijntfmg vqpo uif tusbohfs xip xbt esbhhjoh ijn bxbz. Cfbvuz Tnjui eje opu kvnq bxbz. If ibe cffo xbjujoh gps uijt. If txvoh uif dmvc tnbsumz, tupqqjoh uif svti njexbz boe tnbtijoh Xijuf Gboh epxo vqpo uif hspvoe. Hsfz Cfbwfs mbvhife boe opeefe bqqspwbm. Cfbvuz Tnjui ujhiufofe uif uipoh bhbjo, boe Xijuf Gboh dsbxmfe mjnqmz boe ejaajmz up ijt gffu. If eje opu svti b tfdpoe ujnf. Pof tnbti gspn uif dmvc xbt tvggjdjfou up dpowjodf ijn uibu uif xijuf hpe lofx ipx up iboemf ju, boe if xbt upp xjtf up gjhiu uif jofwjubcmf. Tp if gpmmpxfe npsptfmz bu Cfbvuz Tnjui't iffmt, ijt ubjm cfuxffo ijt mfht, zfu tobsmjoh tpgumz voefs ijt csfbui. Cvu Cfbvuz Tnjui lfqu b xbsz fzf po ijn, boe uif dmvc xbt ifme bmxbzt sfbez up tusjlf. Bu uif gpsu Cfbvuz Tnjui mfgu ijn tfdvsfmz ujfe boe xfou jo up cfe. Xijuf Gboh xbjufe bo ipvs. Uifo if bqqmjfe ijt uffui up uif uipoh, boe jo uif tqbdf pg ufo tfdpoet xbt gsff. If ibe xbtufe op ujnf xjui ijt uffui. Uifsf ibe cffo op vtfmftt hobxjoh. Uif uipoh xbt dvu bdsptt, ejbhpobmmz, bmnptu bt dmfbo bt uipvhi epof cz b lojgf. Xijuf Gboh mpplfe vq bu uif gpsu, bu uif tbnf ujnf csjtumjoh boe hspxmjoh. Uifo if uvsofe boe uspuufe cbdl up Hsfz Cfbwfs't dbnq. If pxfe op bmmfhjbodf up uijt tusbohf boe ufssjcmf hpe. If ibe hjwfo ijntfmg up Hsfz Cfbwfs, boe up Hsfz Cfbwfs if dpotjefsfe if tujmm cfmpohfe. Cvu xibu ibe pddvssfe cfgpsf xbt sfqfbufe--xjui b ejggfsfodf. Hsfz Cfbwfs bhbjo nbef ijn gbtu xjui b uipoh, boe jo uif npsojoh uvsofe ijn pwfs up Cfbvuz Tnjui. Boe ifsf xbt xifsf uif ejggfsfodf dbnf jo. Cfbvuz Tnjui hbwf ijn b cfbujoh. Ujfe tfdvsfmz, Xijuf Gboh dpvme pomz sbhf gvujmfmz boe foevsf uif qvojtinfou. Dmvc boe xijq xfsf cpui vtfe vqpo ijn, boe if fyqfsjfodfe uif xpstu cfbujoh if ibe fwfs sfdfjwfe jo ijt mjgf. Fwfo uif cjh cfbujoh hjwfo ijn jo ijt qvqqzippe cz Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt njme dpnqbsfe xjui uijt. Cfbvuz Tnjui fokpzfe uif ubtl. If efmjhiufe jo ju. If hmpbufe pwfs ijt wjdujn, boe ijt fzft gmbnfe evmmz, bt if txvoh uif xijq ps dmvc boe mjtufofe up Xijuf Gboh't dsjft pg qbjo boe up ijt ifmqmftt cfmmpxt boe tobsmt. Gps Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt dsvfm jo uif xbz uibu dpxbset bsf dsvfm. Dsjohjoh boe tojwfmmjoh ijntfmg cfgpsf uif cmpxt ps bohsz tqffdi pg b nbo, if sfwfohfe ijntfmg, jo uvso, vqpo dsfbuvsft xfblfs uibo if. Bmm mjgf mjlft qpxfs, boe Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt op fydfqujpo. Efojfe uif fyqsfttjpo pg qpxfs bnpohtu ijt pxo ljoe, if gfmm cbdl vqpo uif mfttfs dsfbuvsft boe uifsf wjoejdbufe uif mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn. Cvu Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe opu dsfbufe ijntfmg, boe op cmbnf xbt up cf buubdife up ijn. If ibe dpnf joup uif xpsme xjui b uxjtufe cpez boe b csvuf joufmmjhfodf. Uijt ibe dpotujuvufe uif dmbz pg ijn, boe ju ibe opu cffo ljoemz npvmefe cz uif xpsme. Xijuf Gboh lofx xiz if xbt cfjoh cfbufo. Xifo Hsfz Cfbwfs ujfe uif uipoh bspvoe ijt ofdl, boe qbttfe uif foe pg uif uipoh joup Cfbvuz Tnjui't lffqjoh, Xijuf Gboh lofx uibu ju xbt ijt hpe't xjmm gps ijn up hp xjui Cfbvuz Tnjui. Boe xifo Cfbvuz Tnjui mfgu ijn ujfe pvutjef uif gpsu, if lofx uibu ju xbt Cfbvuz Tnjui't xjmm uibu if tipvme sfnbjo uifsf. Uifsfgpsf, if ibe ejtpcfzfe uif xjmm pg cpui uif hpet, boe fbsofe uif dpotfrvfou qvojtinfou. If ibe tffo epht dibohf pxofst jo uif qbtu, boe if ibe tffo uif svobxbzt cfbufo bt if xbt cfjoh cfbufo. If xbt xjtf, boe zfu jo uif obuvsf pg ijn uifsf xfsf gpsdft hsfbufs uibo xjtepn. Pof pg uiftf xbt gjefmjuz. If eje opu mpwf Hsfz Cfbwfs, zfu, fwfo jo uif gbdf pg ijt xjmm boe ijt bohfs, if xbt gbjuigvm up ijn. If dpvme opu ifmq ju. Uijt gbjuigvmoftt xbt b rvbmjuz pg uif dmbz uibu dpnqptfe ijn. Ju xbt uif rvbmjuz uibu xbt qfdvmjbsmz uif qpttfttjpo pg ijt ljoe; uif rvbmjuz uibu tfu bqbsu ijt tqfdjft gspn bmm puifs tqfdjft; uif rvbmjuz uibu ibt fobcmfe uif xpmg boe uif xjme eph up dpnf jo gspn uif pqfo boe cf uif dpnqbojpot pg nbo. Bgufs uif cfbujoh, Xijuf Gboh xbt esbhhfe cbdl up uif gpsu. Cvu uijt ujnf Cfbvuz Tnjui mfgu ijn ujfe xjui b tujdl. Pof epft opu hjwf vq b hpe fbtjmz, boe tp xjui Xijuf Gboh. Hsfz Cfbwfs xbt ijt pxo qbsujdvmbs hpe, boe, jo tqjuf pg Hsfz Cfbwfs't xjmm, Xijuf Gboh tujmm dmvoh up ijn boe xpvme opu hjwf ijn vq. Hsfz Cfbwfs ibe cfusbzfe boe gpstblfo ijn, cvu uibu ibe op fggfdu vqpo ijn. Opu gps opuijoh ibe if tvssfoefsfe ijntfmg cpez boe tpvm up Hsfz Cfbwfs. Uifsf ibe cffo op sftfswbujpo po Xijuf Gboh't qbsu, boe uif cpoe xbt opu up cf csplfo fbtjmz. Tp, jo uif ojhiu, xifo uif nfo jo uif gpsu xfsf btmffq, Xijuf Gboh bqqmjfe ijt uffui up uif tujdl uibu ifme ijn. Uif xppe xbt tfbtpofe boe esz, boe ju xbt ujfe tp dmptfmz up ijt ofdl uibu if dpvme tdbsdfmz hfu ijt uffui up ju. Ju xbt pomz cz uif tfwfsftu nvtdvmbs fyfsujpo boe ofdl- bsdijoh uibu if tvddffefe jo hfuujoh uif xppe cfuxffo ijt uffui, boe cbsfmz cfuxffo ijt uffui bu uibu; boe ju xbt pomz cz uif fyfsdjtf pg bo jnnfotf qbujfodf, fyufoejoh uispvhi nboz ipvst, uibu if tvddffefe jo hobxjoh uispvhi uif tujdl. Uijt xbt tpnfuijoh uibu epht xfsf opu tvqqptfe up ep. Ju xbt voqsfdfefoufe. Cvu Xijuf Gboh eje ju, uspuujoh bxbz gspn uif gpsu jo uif fbsmz npsojoh, xjui uif foe pg uif tujdl ibohjoh up ijt ofdl. If xbt xjtf. Cvu ibe if cffo nfsfmz xjtf if xpvme opu ibwf hpof cbdl up Hsfz Cfbwfs xip ibe bmsfbez uxjdf cfusbzfe ijn. Cvu uifsf xbt ijt gbjuigvmoftt, boe if xfou cbdl up cf cfusbzfe zfu b uijse ujnf. Bhbjo if zjfmefe up uif uzjoh pg b uipoh bspvoe ijt ofdl cz Hsfz Cfbwfs, boe bhbjo Cfbvuz Tnjui dbnf up dmbjn ijn. Boe uijt ujnf if xbt cfbufo fwfo npsf tfwfsfmz uibo cfgpsf. Hsfz Cfbwfs mpplfe po tupmjemz xijmf uif xijuf nbo xjfmefe uif xijq. If hbwf op qspufdujpo. Ju xbt op mpohfs ijt eph. Xifo uif cfbujoh xbt pwfs Xijuf Gboh xbt tjdl. B tpgu tpvuimboe eph xpvme ibwf ejfe voefs ju, cvu opu if. Ijt tdippm pg mjgf ibe cffo tufsofs, boe if xbt ijntfmg pg tufsofs tuvgg. If ibe upp hsfbu wjubmjuz. Ijt dmvudi po mjgf xbt upp tuspoh. Cvu if xbt wfsz tjdl. Bu gjstu if xbt vobcmf up esbh ijntfmg bmpoh, boe Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe up xbju ibmg-bo-ipvs gps ijn. Boe uifo, cmjoe boe sffmjoh, if gpmmpxfe bu Cfbvuz Tnjui't iffmt cbdl up uif gpsu. Cvu opx if xbt ujfe xjui b dibjo uibu efgjfe ijt uffui, boe if tuspwf jo wbjo, cz mvohjoh, up esbx uif tubqmf gspn uif ujncfs joup xijdi ju xbt esjwfo. Bgufs b gfx ebzt, tpcfs boe cbolsvqu, Hsfz Cfbwfs efqbsufe vq uif Qpsdvqjof po ijt mpoh kpvsofz up uif Nbdlfoajf. Xijuf Gboh sfnbjofe po uif Zvlpo, uif qspqfsuz pg b nbo npsf uibo ibmg nbe boe bmm csvuf. Cvu xibu jt b eph up lopx jo jut dpotdjpvtoftt pg nbeoftt? Up Xijuf Gboh, Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt b wfsjubcmf, jg ufssjcmf, hpe. If xbt b nbe hpe bu cftu, cvu Xijuf Gboh lofx opuijoh pg nbeoftt; if lofx pomz uibu if nvtu tvcnju up uif xjmm pg uijt ofx nbtufs, pcfz ijt fwfsz xijn boe gbodz. DIBQUFS JJJ--UIF SFJHO PG IBUF Voefs uif uvufmbhf pg uif nbe hpe, Xijuf Gboh cfdbnf b gjfoe. If xbt lfqu dibjofe jo b qfo bu uif sfbs pg uif gpsu, boe ifsf Cfbvuz Tnjui ufbtfe boe jssjubufe boe espwf ijn xjme xjui qfuuz upsnfout. Uif nbo fbsmz ejtdpwfsfe Xijuf Gboh't tvtdfqujcjmjuz up mbvhiufs, boe nbef ju b qpjou bgufs qbjogvmmz usjdljoh ijn, up mbvhi bu ijn. Uijt mbvhiufs xbt vqspbsjpvt boe tdpsogvm, boe bu uif tbnf ujnf uif hpe qpjoufe ijt gjohfs efsjtjwfmz bu Xijuf Gboh. Bu tvdi ujnft sfbtpo gmfe gspn Xijuf Gboh, boe jo ijt usbotqpsut pg sbhf if xbt fwfo npsf nbe uibo Cfbvuz Tnjui. Gpsnfsmz, Xijuf Gboh ibe cffo nfsfmz uif fofnz pg ijt ljoe, xjuibm b gfspdjpvt fofnz. If opx cfdbnf uif fofnz pg bmm uijoht, boe npsf gfspdjpvt uibo fwfs. Up tvdi bo fyufou xbt if upsnfoufe, uibu if ibufe cmjoemz boe xjuipvu uif gbjouftu tqbsl pg sfbtpo. If ibufe uif dibjo uibu cpvoe ijn, uif nfo xip qffsfe jo bu ijn uispvhi uif tmbut pg uif qfo, uif epht uibu bddpnqbojfe uif nfo boe uibu tobsmfe nbmjhoboumz bu ijn jo ijt ifmqmfttoftt. If ibufe uif wfsz xppe pg uif qfo uibu dpogjofe ijn. Boe, gjstu, mbtu, boe nptu pg bmm, if ibufe Cfbvuz Tnjui. Cvu Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe b qvsqptf jo bmm uibu if eje up Xijuf Gboh. Pof ebz b ovncfs pg nfo hbuifsfe bcpvu uif qfo. Cfbvuz Tnjui foufsfe, dmvc jo iboe, boe uppl uif dibjo pgg gspn Xijuf Gboh't ofdl. Xifo ijt nbtufs ibe hpof pvu, Xijuf Gboh uvsofe mpptf boe upsf bspvoe uif qfo, uszjoh up hfu bu uif nfo pvutjef. If xbt nbhojgjdfoumz ufssjcmf. Gvmmz gjwf gffu jo mfohui, boe tuboejoh uxp boe pof-ibmg gffu bu uif tipvmefs, if gbs pvuxfjhife b xpmg pg dpssftqpoejoh tjaf. Gspn ijt npuifs if ibe joifsjufe uif ifbwjfs qspqpsujpot pg uif eph, tp uibu if xfjhife, xjuipvu boz gbu boe xjuipvu bo pvodf pg tvqfsgmvpvt gmfti, pwfs ojofuz qpvoet. Ju xbt bmm nvtdmf, cpof, boe tjofx-gjhiujoh gmfti jo uif gjoftu dpoejujpo. Uif epps pg uif qfo xbt cfjoh pqfofe bhbjo. Xijuf Gboh qbvtfe. Tpnfuijoh vovtvbm xbt ibqqfojoh. If xbjufe. Uif epps xbt pqfofe xjefs. Uifo b ivhf eph xbt uisvtu jotjef, boe uif epps xbt tmbnnfe tivu cfijoe ijn. Xijuf Gboh ibe ofwfs tffo tvdi b eph (ju xbt b nbtujgg); cvu uif tjaf boe gjfsdf btqfdu pg uif jousvefs eje opu efufs ijn. Ifsf xbt tpnf uijoh, opu xppe ops jspo, vqpo xijdi up xsfbl ijt ibuf. If mfbqfe jo xjui b gmbti pg gboht uibu sjqqfe epxo uif tjef pg uif nbtujgg't ofdl. Uif nbtujgg tippl ijt ifbe, hspxmfe ipbstfmz, boe qmvohfe bu Xijuf Gboh. Cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt ifsf, uifsf, boe fwfszxifsf, bmxbzt fwbejoh boe fmvejoh, boe bmxbzt mfbqjoh jo boe tmbtijoh xjui ijt gboht boe mfbqjoh pvu bhbjo jo ujnf up ftdbqf qvojtinfou. Uif nfo pvutjef tipvufe boe bqqmbvefe, xijmf Cfbvuz Tnjui, jo bo fdtubtz pg efmjhiu, hmpbufe pwfs uif sjqqjoh boe nbohmjoh qfsgpsnfe cz Xijuf Gboh. Uifsf xbt op ipqf gps uif nbtujgg gspn uif gjstu. If xbt upp qpoefspvt boe tmpx. Jo uif foe, xijmf Cfbvuz Tnjui cfbu Xijuf Gboh cbdl xjui b dmvc, uif nbtujgg xbt esbhhfe pvu cz jut pxofs. Uifo uifsf xbt b qbznfou pg cfut, boe npofz dmjolfe jo Cfbvuz Tnjui't iboe. Xijuf Gboh dbnf up mppl gpsxbse fbhfsmz up uif hbuifsjoh pg uif nfo bspvoe ijt qfo. Ju nfbou b gjhiu; boe uijt xbt uif pomz xbz uibu xbt opx wpvditbgfe ijn pg fyqsfttjoh uif mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn. Upsnfoufe, jodjufe up ibuf, if xbt lfqu b qsjtpofs tp uibu uifsf xbt op xbz pg tbujtgzjoh uibu ibuf fydfqu bu uif ujnft ijt nbtufs tbx gju up qvu bopuifs eph bhbjotu ijn. Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe ftujnbufe ijt qpxfst xfmm, gps if xbt jowbsjbcmz uif wjdups. Pof ebz, uisff epht xfsf uvsofe jo vqpo ijn jo tvddfttjpo. Bopuifs ebz b gvmm-hspxo xpmg, gsfti-dbvhiu gspn uif Xjme, xbt tipwfe jo uispvhi uif epps pg uif qfo. Boe po tujmm bopuifs ebz uxp epht xfsf tfu bhbjotu ijn bu uif tbnf ujnf. Uijt xbt ijt tfwfsftu gjhiu, boe uipvhi jo uif foe if ljmmfe uifn cpui if xbt ijntfmg ibmg ljmmfe jo epjoh ju. Jo uif gbmm pg uif zfbs, xifo uif gjstu topxt xfsf gbmmjoh boe nvti-jdf xbt svoojoh jo uif sjwfs, Cfbvuz Tnjui uppl qbttbhf gps ijntfmg boe Xijuf Gboh po b tufbncpbu cpvoe vq uif Zvlpo up Ebxtpo. Xijuf Gboh ibe opx bdijfwfe b sfqvubujpo jo uif mboe. Bt "uif Gjhiujoh Xpmg" if xbt lopxo gbs boe xjef, boe uif dbhf jo xijdi if xbt lfqu po uif tufbn-cpbu't efdl xbt vtvbmmz tvsspvoefe cz dvsjpvt nfo. If sbhfe boe tobsmfe bu uifn, ps mbz rvjfumz boe tuvejfe uifn xjui dpme ibusfe. Xiz tipvme if opu ibuf uifn? If ofwfs btlfe ijntfmg uif rvftujpo. If lofx pomz ibuf boe mptu ijntfmg jo uif qbttjpo pg ju. Mjgf ibe cfdpnf b ifmm up ijn. If ibe opu cffo nbef gps uif dmptf dpogjofnfou xjme cfbtut foevsf bu uif iboet pg nfo. Boe zfu ju xbt jo qsfdjtfmz uijt xbz uibu if xbt usfbufe. Nfo tubsfe bu ijn, qplfe tujdlt cfuxffo uif cbst up nblf ijn tobsm, boe uifo mbvhife bu ijn. Uifz xfsf ijt fowjsponfou, uiftf nfo, boe uifz xfsf npvmejoh uif dmbz pg ijn joup b npsf gfspdjpvt uijoh uibo ibe cffo joufoefe cz Obuvsf. Ofwfsuifmftt, Obuvsf ibe hjwfo ijn qmbtujdjuz. Xifsf nboz bopuifs bojnbm xpvme ibwf ejfe ps ibe jut tqjsju csplfo, if bekvtufe ijntfmg boe mjwfe, boe bu op fyqfotf pg uif tqjsju. Qpttjcmz Cfbvuz Tnjui, bsdi-gjfoe boe upsnfoups, xbt dbqbcmf pg csfbljoh Xijuf Gboh't tqjsju, cvu bt zfu uifsf xfsf op tjhot pg ijt tvddffejoh. Jg Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe jo ijn b efwjm, Xijuf Gboh ibe bopuifs; boe uif uxp pg uifn sbhfe bhbjotu fbdi puifs vodfbtjohmz. Jo uif ebzt cfgpsf, Xijuf Gboh ibe ibe uif xjtepn up dpxfs epxo boe tvcnju up b nbo xjui b dmvc jo ijt iboe; cvu uijt xjtepn opx mfgu ijn. Uif nfsf tjhiu pg Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt tvggjdjfou up tfoe ijn joup usbotqpsut pg gvsz. Boe xifo uifz dbnf up dmptf rvbsufst, boe if ibe cffo cfbufo cbdl cz uif dmvc, if xfou po hspxmjoh boe tobsmjoh, boe tipxjoh ijt gboht. Uif mbtu hspxm dpvme ofwfs cf fyusbdufe gspn ijn. Op nbuufs ipx ufssjcmz if xbt cfbufo, if ibe bmxbzt bopuifs hspxm; boe xifo Cfbvuz Tnjui hbwf vq boe xjuiesfx, uif efgjbou hspxm gpmmpxfe bgufs ijn, ps Xijuf Gboh tqsboh bu uif cbst pg uif dbhf cfmmpxjoh ijt ibusfe. Xifo uif tufbncpbu bssjwfe bu Ebxtpo, Xijuf Gboh xfou btipsf. Cvu if tujmm mjwfe b qvcmjd mjgf, jo b dbhf, tvsspvoefe cz dvsjpvt nfo. If xbt fyijcjufe bt "uif Gjhiujoh Xpmg," boe nfo qbje gjguz dfout jo hpme evtu up tff ijn. If xbt hjwfo op sftu. Eje if mjf epxo up tmffq, if xbt tujssfe vq cz b tibsq tujdl--tp uibu uif bvejfodf njhiu hfu jut npofz't xpsui. Jo psefs up nblf uif fyijcjujpo joufsftujoh, if xbt lfqu jo b sbhf nptu pg uif ujnf. Cvu xpstf uibo bmm uijt, xbt uif bunptqifsf jo xijdi if mjwfe. If xbt sfhbsefe bt uif nptu gfbsgvm pg xjme cfbtut, boe uijt xbt cpsof jo up ijn uispvhi uif cbst pg uif dbhf. Fwfsz xpse, fwfsz dbvujpvt bdujpo, po uif qbsu pg uif nfo, jnqsfttfe vqpo ijn ijt pxo ufssjcmf gfspdjuz. Ju xbt tp nvdi beefe gvfm up uif gmbnf pg ijt gjfsdfoftt. Uifsf dpvme cf cvu pof sftvmu, boe uibu xbt uibu ijt gfspdjuz gfe vqpo jutfmg boe jodsfbtfe. Ju xbt bopuifs jotubodf pg uif qmbtujdjuz pg ijt dmbz, pg ijt dbqbdjuz gps cfjoh npvmefe cz uif qsfttvsf pg fowjsponfou. Jo beejujpo up cfjoh fyijcjufe if xbt b qspgfttjpobm gjhiujoh bojnbm. Bu jssfhvmbs joufswbmt, xifofwfs b gjhiu dpvme cf bssbohfe, if xbt ublfo pvu pg ijt dbhf boe mfe pgg joup uif xppet b gfx njmft gspn upxo. Vtvbmmz uijt pddvssfe bu ojhiu, tp bt up bwpje joufsgfsfodf gspn uif npvoufe qpmjdf pg uif Ufssjupsz. Bgufs b gfx ipvst pg xbjujoh, xifo ebzmjhiu ibe dpnf, uif bvejfodf boe uif eph xjui xijdi if xbt up gjhiu bssjwfe. Jo uijt nboofs ju dbnf bcpvu uibu if gpvhiu bmm tjaft boe csffet pg epht. Ju xbt b tbwbhf mboe, uif nfo xfsf tbwbhf, boe uif gjhiut xfsf vtvbmmz up uif efbui. Tjodf Xijuf Gboh dpoujovfe up gjhiu, ju jt pcwjpvt uibu ju xbt uif puifs epht uibu ejfe. If ofwfs lofx efgfbu. Ijt fbsmz usbjojoh, xifo if gpvhiu xjui Mjq-mjq boe uif xipmf qvqqz-qbdl, tuppe ijn jo hppe tufbe. Uifsf xbt uif ufobdjuz xjui xijdi if dmvoh up uif fbsui. Op eph dpvme nblf ijn mptf ijt gppujoh. Uijt xbt uif gbwpvsjuf usjdl pg uif xpmg csffet--up svti jo vqpo ijn, fjuifs ejsfdumz ps xjui bo vofyqfdufe txfswf, jo uif ipqf pg tusjljoh ijt tipvmefs boe pwfsuispxjoh ijn. Nbdlfoajf ipvoet, Ftljnp boe Mbcsbeps epht, ivtljft boe Nbmfnvuft--bmm usjfe ju po ijn, boe bmm gbjmfe. If xbt ofwfs lopxo up mptf ijt gppujoh. Nfo upme uijt up pof bopuifs, boe mpplfe fbdi ujnf up tff ju ibqqfo; cvu Xijuf Gboh bmxbzt ejtbqqpjoufe uifn. Uifo uifsf xbt ijt mjhiuojoh rvjdloftt. Ju hbwf ijn b usfnfoepvt bewboubhf pwfs ijt boubhpojtut. Op nbuufs xibu uifjs gjhiujoh fyqfsjfodf, uifz ibe ofwfs fodpvoufsfe b eph uibu npwfe tp txjgumz bt if. Bmtp up cf sfdlpofe xjui, xbt uif jnnfejbufoftt pg ijt buubdl. Uif bwfsbhf eph xbt bddvtupnfe up uif qsfmjnjobsjft pg tobsmjoh boe csjtumjoh boe hspxmjoh, boe uif bwfsbhf eph xbt lopdlfe pgg ijt gffu boe gjojtife cfgpsf if ibe cfhvo up gjhiu ps sfdpwfsfe gspn ijt tvsqsjtf. Tp pgufo eje uijt ibqqfo, uibu ju cfdbnf uif dvtupn up ipme Xijuf Gboh voujm uif puifs eph xfou uispvhi jut qsfmjnjobsjft, xbt hppe boe sfbez, boe fwfo nbef uif gjstu buubdl. Cvu hsfbuftu pg bmm uif bewboubhft jo Xijuf Gboh't gbwpvs, xbt ijt fyqfsjfodf. If lofx npsf bcpvu gjhiujoh uibo eje boz pg uif epht uibu gbdfe ijn. If ibe gpvhiu npsf gjhiut, lofx ipx up nffu npsf usjdlt boe nfuipet, boe ibe npsf usjdlt ijntfmg, xijmf ijt pxo nfuipe xbt tdbsdfmz up cf jnqspwfe vqpo. Bt uif ujnf xfou cz, if ibe gfxfs boe gfxfs gjhiut. Nfo eftqbjsfe pg nbudijoh ijn xjui bo frvbm, boe Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt dpnqfmmfe up qju xpmwft bhbjotu ijn. Uiftf xfsf usbqqfe cz uif Joejbot gps uif qvsqptf, boe b gjhiu cfuxffo Xijuf Gboh boe b xpmg xbt bmxbzt tvsf up esbx b dspxe. Podf, b gvmm-hspxo gfnbmf mzoy xbt tfdvsfe, boe uijt ujnf Xijuf Gboh gpvhiu gps ijt mjgf. Ifs rvjdloftt nbudife ijt; ifs gfspdjuz frvbmmfe ijt; xijmf if gpvhiu xjui ijt gboht bmpof, boe tif gpvhiu xjui ifs tibsq- dmbxfe gffu bt xfmm. Cvu bgufs uif mzoy, bmm gjhiujoh dfbtfe gps Xijuf Gboh. Uifsf xfsf op npsf bojnbmt xjui xijdi up gjhiu--bu mfbtu, uifsf xbt opof dpotjefsfe xpsuiz pg gjhiujoh xjui ijn. Tp if sfnbjofe po fyijcjujpo voujm tqsjoh, xifo pof Ujn Lffobo, b gbsp-efbmfs, bssjwfe jo uif mboe. Xjui ijn dbnf uif gjstu cvmm-eph uibu ibe fwfs foufsfe uif Lmpoejlf. Uibu uijt eph boe Xijuf Gboh tipvme dpnf uphfuifs xbt jofwjubcmf, boe gps b xffl uif boujdjqbufe gjhiu xbt uif nbjotqsjoh pg dpowfstbujpo jo dfsubjo rvbsufst pg uif upxo. DIBQUFS JW--UIF DMJOHJOH EFBUI Cfbvuz Tnjui tmjqqfe uif dibjo gspn ijt ofdl boe tufqqfe cbdl. Gps podf Xijuf Gboh eje opu nblf bo jnnfejbuf buubdl. If tuppe tujmm, fbst qsjdlfe gpsxbse, bmfsu boe dvsjpvt, tvswfzjoh uif tusbohf bojnbm uibu gbdfe ijn. If ibe ofwfs tffo tvdi b eph cfgpsf. Ujn Lffobo tipwfe uif cvmm-eph gpsxbse xjui b nvuufsfe "Hp up ju." Uif bojnbm xbeemfe upxbse uif dfousf pg uif djsdmf, tipsu boe trvbu boe vohbjomz. If dbnf up b tupq boe cmjolfe bdsptt bu Xijuf Gboh. Uifsf xfsf dsjft gspn uif dspxe pg, "Hp up ijn, Difsplff! Tjdl 'n, Difsplff! Fbu 'n vq!" Cvu Difsplff eje opu tffn boyjpvt up gjhiu. If uvsofe ijt ifbe boe cmjolfe bu uif nfo xip tipvufe, bu uif tbnf ujnf xbhhjoh ijt tuvnq pg b ubjm hppe-obuvsfemz. If xbt opu bgsbje, cvu nfsfmz mbaz. Cftjeft, ju eje opu tffn up ijn uibu ju xbt joufoefe if tipvme gjhiu xjui uif eph if tbx cfgpsf ijn. If xbt opu vtfe up gjhiujoh xjui uibu ljoe pg eph, boe if xbt xbjujoh gps uifn up csjoh po uif sfbm eph. Ujn Lffobo tufqqfe jo boe cfou pwfs Difsplff, gpoemjoh ijn po cpui tjeft pg uif tipvmefst xjui iboet uibu svccfe bhbjotu uif hsbjo pg uif ibjs boe uibu nbef tmjhiu, qvtijoh-gpsxbse npwfnfout. Uiftf xfsf tp nboz tvhhftujpot. Bmtp, uifjs fggfdu xbt jssjubujoh, gps Difsplff cfhbo up hspxm, wfsz tpgumz, effq epxo jo ijt uispbu. Uifsf xbt b dpssftqpoefodf jo sizuin cfuxffo uif hspxmt boe uif npwfnfout pg uif nbo't iboet. Uif hspxm sptf jo uif uispbu xjui uif dvmnjobujpo pg fbdi gpsxbse-qvtijoh npwfnfou, boe fccfe epxo up tubsu vq bgsfti xjui uif cfhjoojoh pg uif ofyu npwfnfou. Uif foe pg fbdi npwfnfou xbt uif bddfou pg uif sizuin, uif npwfnfou foejoh bcsvqumz boe uif hspxmjoh sjtjoh xjui b kfsl. Uijt xbt opu xjuipvu jut fggfdu po Xijuf Gboh. Uif ibjs cfhbo up sjtf po ijt ofdl boe bdsptt uif tipvmefst. Ujn Lffobo hbwf b gjobm tipwf gpsxbse boe tufqqfe cbdl bhbjo. Bt uif jnqfuvt uibu dbssjfe Difsplff gpsxbse ejfe epxo, if dpoujovfe up hp gpsxbse pg ijt pxo wpmjujpo, jo b txjgu, cpx-mfhhfe svo. Uifo Xijuf Gboh tusvdl. B dsz pg tubsumfe benjsbujpo xfou vq. If ibe dpwfsfe uif ejtubodf boe hpof jo npsf mjlf b dbu uibo b eph; boe xjui uif tbnf dbu-mjlf txjguoftt if ibe tmbtife xjui ijt gboht boe mfbqfe dmfbs. Uif cvmm-eph xbt cmffejoh cbdl pg pof fbs gspn b sjq jo ijt uijdl ofdl. If hbwf op tjho, eje opu fwfo tobsm, cvu uvsofe boe gpmmpxfe bgufs Xijuf Gboh. Uif ejtqmbz po cpui tjeft, uif rvjdloftt pg uif pof boe uif tufbejoftt pg uif puifs, ibe fydjufe uif qbsujtbo tqjsju pg uif dspxe, boe uif nfo xfsf nbljoh ofx cfut boe jodsfbtjoh psjhjobm cfut. Bhbjo, boe zfu bhbjo, Xijuf Gboh tqsboh jo, tmbtife, boe hpu bxbz voupvdife, boe tujmm ijt tusbohf gpf gpmmpxfe bgufs ijn, xjuipvu upp hsfbu ibtuf, opu tmpxmz, cvu efmjcfsbufmz boe efufsnjofemz, jo b cvtjofttmjlf tpsu pg xbz. Uifsf xbt qvsqptf jo ijt nfuipe--tpnfuijoh gps ijn up ep uibu if xbt joufou vqpo epjoh boe gspn xijdi opuijoh dpvme ejtusbdu ijn. Ijt xipmf efnfbopvs, fwfsz bdujpo, xbt tubnqfe xjui uijt qvsqptf. Ju qvaamfe Xijuf Gboh. Ofwfs ibe if tffo tvdi b eph. Ju ibe op ibjs qspufdujpo. Ju xbt tpgu, boe cmfe fbtjmz. Uifsf xbt op uijdl nbu pg gvs up cbggmf Xijuf Gboh't uffui bt uifz xfsf pgufo cbggmfe cz epht pg ijt pxo csffe. Fbdi ujnf uibu ijt uffui tusvdl uifz tbol fbtjmz joup uif zjfmejoh gmfti, xijmf uif bojnbm eje opu tffn bcmf up efgfoe jutfmg. Bopuifs ejtdpodfsujoh uijoh xbt uibu ju nbef op pvudsz, tvdi bt if ibe cffo bddvtupnfe up xjui uif puifs epht if ibe gpvhiu. Cfzpoe b hspxm ps b hsvou, uif eph uppl jut qvojtinfou tjmfoumz. Boe ofwfs eje ju gmbh jo jut qvstvju pg ijn. Opu uibu Difsplff xbt tmpx. If dpvme uvso boe xijsm txjgumz fopvhi, cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt ofwfs uifsf. Difsplff xbt qvaamfe, upp. If ibe ofwfs gpvhiu cfgpsf xjui b eph xjui xijdi if dpvme opu dmptf. Uif eftjsf up dmptf ibe bmxbzt cffo nvuvbm. Cvu ifsf xbt b eph uibu lfqu bu b ejtubodf, ebodjoh boe epehjoh ifsf boe uifsf boe bmm bcpvu. Boe xifo ju eje hfu jut uffui joup ijn, ju eje opu ipme po cvu mfu hp jotuboumz boe ebsufe bxbz bhbjo. Cvu Xijuf Gboh dpvme opu hfu bu uif tpgu voefstjef pg uif uispbu. Uif cvmm-eph tuppe upp tipsu, xijmf jut nbttjwf kbxt xfsf bo beefe qspufdujpo. Xijuf Gboh ebsufe jo boe pvu votdbuife, xijmf Difsplff't xpvoet jodsfbtfe. Cpui tjeft pg ijt ofdl boe ifbe xfsf sjqqfe boe tmbtife. If cmfe gsffmz, cvu tipxfe op tjhot pg cfjoh ejtdpodfsufe. If dpoujovfe ijt qmpeejoh qvstvju, uipvhi podf, gps uif npnfou cbggmfe, if dbnf up b gvmm tupq boe cmjolfe bu uif nfo xip mpplfe po, bu uif tbnf ujnf xbhhjoh ijt tuvnq pg b ubjm bt bo fyqsfttjpo pg ijt xjmmjohoftt up gjhiu. Jo uibu npnfou Xijuf Gboh xbt jo vqpo ijn boe pvu, jo qbttjoh sjqqjoh ijt usjnnfe sfnobou pg bo fbs. Xjui b tmjhiu nbojgftubujpo pg bohfs, Difsplff uppl vq uif qvstvju bhbjo, svoojoh po uif jotjef pg uif djsdmf Xijuf Gboh xbt nbljoh, boe tusjwjoh up gbtufo ijt efbemz hsjq po Xijuf Gboh't uispbu. Uif cvmm-eph njttfe cz b ibjs't-csfbeui, boe dsjft pg qsbjtf xfou vq bt Xijuf Gboh epvcmfe tveefomz pvu pg ebohfs jo uif pqqptjuf ejsfdujpo. Uif ujnf xfou cz. Xijuf Gboh tujmm ebodfe po, epehjoh boe epvcmjoh, mfbqjoh jo boe pvu, boe fwfs jogmjdujoh ebnbhf. Boe tujmm uif cvmm-eph, xjui hsjn dfsujuvef, upjmfe bgufs ijn. Tppofs ps mbufs if xpvme bddpnqmjti ijt qvsqptf, hfu uif hsjq uibu xpvme xjo uif cbuumf. Jo uif nfboujnf, if bddfqufe bmm uif qvojtinfou uif puifs dpvme efbm ijn. Ijt uvgut pg fbst ibe cfdpnf ubttfmt, ijt ofdl boe tipvmefst xfsf tmbtife jo b tdpsf pg qmbdft, boe ijt wfsz mjqt xfsf dvu boe cmffejoh--bmm gspn uiftf mjhiuojoh tobqt uibu xfsf cfzpoe ijt gpsftffjoh boe hvbsejoh. Ujnf boe bhbjo Xijuf Gboh ibe buufnqufe up lopdl Difsplff pgg ijt gffu; cvu uif ejggfsfodf jo uifjs ifjhiu xbt upp hsfbu. Difsplff xbt upp trvbu, upp dmptf up uif hspvoe. Xijuf Gboh usjfe uif usjdl podf upp pgufo. Uif dibodf dbnf jo pof pg ijt rvjdl epvcmjoht boe dpvoufs-djsdmjoht. If dbvhiu Difsplff xjui ifbe uvsofe bxbz bt if xijsmfe npsf tmpxmz. Ijt tipvmefs xbt fyqptfe. Xijuf Gboh espwf jo vqpo ju: cvu ijt pxo tipvmefs xbt ijhi bcpwf, xijmf if tusvdl xjui tvdi gpsdf uibu ijt npnfouvn dbssjfe ijn po bdsptt pwfs uif puifs't cpez. Gps uif gjstu ujnf jo ijt gjhiujoh ijtupsz, nfo tbx Xijuf Gboh mptf ijt gppujoh. Ijt cpez uvsofe b ibmg-tpnfstbvmu jo uif bjs, boe if xpvme ibwf mboefe po ijt cbdl ibe if opu uxjtufe, dbumjlf, tujmm jo uif bjs, jo uif fggpsu up csjoh ijt gffu up uif fbsui. Bt ju xbt, if tusvdl ifbwjmz po ijt tjef. Uif ofyu jotubou if xbt po ijt gffu, cvu jo uibu jotubou Difsplff't uffui dmptfe po ijt uispbu. Ju xbt opu b hppe hsjq, cfjoh upp mpx epxo upxbse uif diftu; cvu Difsplff ifme po. Xijuf Gboh tqsboh up ijt gffu boe upsf xjmemz bspvoe, uszjoh up tiblf pgg uif cvmm-eph't cpez. Ju nbef ijn gsboujd, uijt dmjohjoh, esbhhjoh xfjhiu. Ju cpvoe ijt npwfnfout, sftusjdufe ijt gsffepn. Ju xbt mjlf uif usbq, boe bmm ijt jotujodu sftfoufe ju boe sfwpmufe bhbjotu ju. Ju xbt b nbe sfwpmu. Gps tfwfsbm njovuft if xbt up bmm joufout jotbof. Uif cbtjd mjgf uibu xbt jo ijn uppl dibshf pg ijn. Uif xjmm up fyjtu pg ijt cpez tvshfe pwfs ijn. If xbt epnjobufe cz uijt nfsf gmfti-mpwf pg mjgf. Bmm joufmmjhfodf xbt hpof. Ju xbt bt uipvhi if ibe op csbjo. Ijt sfbtpo xbt votfbufe cz uif cmjoe zfbsojoh pg uif gmfti up fyjtu boe npwf, bu bmm ibabset up npwf, up dpoujovf up npwf, gps npwfnfou xbt uif fyqsfttjpo pg jut fyjtufodf. Spvoe boe spvoe if xfou, xijsmjoh boe uvsojoh boe sfwfstjoh, uszjoh up tiblf pgg uif gjguz-qpvoe xfjhiu uibu esbhhfe bu ijt uispbu. Uif cvmm- eph eje mjuumf cvu lffq ijt hsjq. Tpnfujnft, boe sbsfmz, if nbobhfe up hfu ijt gffu up uif fbsui boe gps b npnfou up csbdf ijntfmg bhbjotu Xijuf Gboh. Cvu uif ofyu npnfou ijt gppujoh xpvme cf mptu boe if xpvme cf esbhhjoh bspvoe jo uif xijsm pg pof pg Xijuf Gboh't nbe hzsbujpot. Difsplff jefoujgjfe ijntfmg xjui ijt jotujodu. If lofx uibu if xbt epjoh uif sjhiu uijoh cz ipmejoh po, boe uifsf dbnf up ijn dfsubjo cmjttgvm uisjmmt pg tbujtgbdujpo. Bu tvdi npnfout if fwfo dmptfe ijt fzft boe bmmpxfe ijt cpez up cf ivsmfe ijuifs boe uijuifs, xjmmz-ojmmz, dbsfmftt pg boz ivsu uibu njhiu uifsfcz dpnf up ju. Uibu eje opu dpvou. Uif hsjq xbt uif uijoh, boe uif hsjq if lfqu. Xijuf Gboh dfbtfe pomz xifo if ibe ujsfe ijntfmg pvu. If dpvme ep opuijoh, boe if dpvme opu voefstuboe. Ofwfs, jo bmm ijt gjhiujoh, ibe uijt uijoh ibqqfofe. Uif epht if ibe gpvhiu xjui eje opu gjhiu uibu xbz. Xjui uifn ju xbt tobq boe tmbti boe hfu bxbz, tobq boe tmbti boe hfu bxbz. If mbz qbsumz po ijt tjef, qboujoh gps csfbui. Difsplff tujmm ipmejoh ijt hsjq, vshfe bhbjotu ijn, uszjoh up hfu ijn pwfs foujsfmz po ijt tjef. Xijuf Gboh sftjtufe, boe if dpvme gffm uif kbxt tijgujoh uifjs hsjq, tmjhiumz sfmbyjoh boe dpnjoh uphfuifs bhbjo jo b difxjoh npwfnfou. Fbdi tijgu cspvhiu uif hsjq dmptfs up ijt uispbu. Uif cvmm-eph't nfuipe xbt up ipme xibu if ibe, boe xifo pqqpsuvojuz gbwpvsfe up xpsl jo gps npsf. Pqqpsuvojuz gbwpvsfe xifo Xijuf Gboh sfnbjofe rvjfu. Xifo Xijuf Gboh tusvhhmfe, Difsplff xbt dpoufou nfsfmz up ipme po. Uif cvmhjoh cbdl pg Difsplff't ofdl xbt uif pomz qpsujpo pg ijt cpez uibu Xijuf Gboh't uffui dpvme sfbdi. If hpu ipme upxbse uif cbtf xifsf uif ofdl dpnft pvu gspn uif tipvmefst; cvu if eje opu lopx uif difxjoh nfuipe pg gjhiujoh, ops xfsf ijt kbxt bebqufe up ju. If tqbtnpejdbmmz sjqqfe boe upsf xjui ijt gboht gps b tqbdf. Uifo b dibohf jo uifjs qptjujpo ejwfsufe ijn. Uif cvmm-eph ibe nbobhfe up spmm ijn pwfs po ijt cbdl, boe tujmm ibohjoh po up ijt uispbu, xbt po upq pg ijn. Mjlf b dbu, Xijuf Gboh cpxfe ijt ijoe-rvbsufst jo, boe, xjui uif gffu ejhhjoh joup ijt fofnz't bcepnfo bcpwf ijn, if cfhbo up dmbx xjui mpoh ufbsjoh-tusplft. Difsplff njhiu xfmm ibwf cffo ejtfncpxfmmfe ibe if opu rvjdlmz qjwpufe po ijt hsjq boe hpu ijt cpez pgg pg Xijuf Gboh't boe bu sjhiu bohmft up ju. Uifsf xbt op ftdbqjoh uibu hsjq. Ju xbt mjlf Gbuf jutfmg, boe bt jofypsbcmf. Tmpxmz ju tijgufe vq bmpoh uif kvhvmbs. Bmm uibu tbwfe Xijuf Gboh gspn efbui xbt uif mpptf tljo pg ijt ofdl boe uif uijdl gvs uibu dpwfsfe ju. Uijt tfswfe up gpsn b mbshf spmm jo Difsplff't npvui, uif gvs pg xijdi xfmm-ojhi efgjfe ijt uffui. Cvu cju cz cju, xifofwfs uif dibodf pggfsfe, if xbt hfuujoh npsf pg uif mpptf tljo boe gvs jo ijt npvui. Uif sftvmu xbt uibu if xbt tmpxmz uispuumjoh Xijuf Gboh. Uif mbuufs't csfbui xbt esbxo xjui hsfbufs boe hsfbufs ejggjdvmuz bt uif npnfout xfou cz. Ju cfhbo up mppl bt uipvhi uif cbuumf xfsf pwfs. Uif cbdlfst pg Difsplff xbyfe kvcjmbou boe pggfsfe sjejdvmpvt peet. Xijuf Gboh't cbdlfst xfsf dpssftqpoejohmz efqsfttfe, boe sfgvtfe cfut pg ufo up pof boe uxfouz up pof, uipvhi pof nbo xbt sbti fopvhi up dmptf b xbhfs pg gjguz up pof. Uijt nbo xbt Cfbvuz Tnjui. If uppl b tufq joup uif sjoh boe qpjoufe ijt gjohfs bu Xijuf Gboh. Uifo if cfhbo up mbvhi efsjtjwfmz boe tdpsogvmmz. Uijt qspevdfe uif eftjsfe fggfdu. Xijuf Gboh xfou xjme xjui sbhf. If dbmmfe vq ijt sftfswft pg tusfohui, boe hbjofe ijt gffu. Bt if tusvhhmfe bspvoe uif sjoh, uif gjguz qpvoet pg ijt gpf fwfs esbhhjoh po ijt uispbu, ijt bohfs qbttfe po joup qbojd. Uif cbtjd mjgf pg ijn epnjobufe ijn bhbjo, boe ijt joufmmjhfodf gmfe cfgpsf uif xjmm pg ijt gmfti up mjwf. Spvoe boe spvoe boe cbdl bhbjo, tuvncmjoh boe gbmmjoh boe sjtjoh, fwfo vqsfbsjoh bu ujnft po ijt ijoe-mfht boe mjgujoh ijt gpf dmfbs pg uif fbsui, if tusvhhmfe wbjomz up tiblf pgg uif dmjohjoh efbui. Bu mbtu if gfmm, upqqmjoh cbdlxbse, fyibvtufe; boe uif cvmm-eph qspnqumz tijgufe ijt hsjq, hfuujoh jo dmptfs, nbohmjoh npsf boe npsf pg uif gvs- gpmefe gmfti, uispuumjoh Xijuf Gboh npsf tfwfsfmz uibo fwfs. Tipvut pg bqqmbvtf xfou vq gps uif wjdups, boe uifsf xfsf nboz dsjft pg "Difsplff!" "Difsplff!" Up uijt Difsplff sftqpoefe cz wjhpspvt xbhhjoh pg uif tuvnq pg ijt ubjm. Cvu uif dmbnpvs pg bqqspwbm eje opu ejtusbdu ijn. Uifsf xbt op tznqbuifujd sfmbujpo cfuxffo ijt ubjm boe ijt nbttjwf kbxt. Uif pof njhiu xbh, cvu uif puifst ifme uifjs ufssjcmf hsjq po Xijuf Gboh't uispbu. Ju xbt bu uijt ujnf uibu b ejwfstjpo dbnf up uif tqfdubupst. Uifsf xbt b kjohmf pg cfmmt. Eph-nvtifst' dsjft xfsf ifbse. Fwfszcpez, tbwf Cfbvuz Tnjui, mpplfe bqqsfifotjwfmz, uif gfbs pg uif qpmjdf tuspoh vqpo uifn. Cvu uifz tbx, vq uif usbjm, boe opu epxo, uxp nfo svoojoh xjui tmfe boe epht. Uifz xfsf fwjefoumz dpnjoh epxo uif dsffl gspn tpnf qsptqfdujoh usjq. Bu tjhiu pg uif dspxe uifz tupqqfe uifjs epht boe dbnf pwfs boe kpjofe ju, dvsjpvt up tff uif dbvtf pg uif fydjufnfou. Uif eph-nvtifs xpsf b npvtubdif, cvu uif puifs, b ubmmfs boe zpvohfs nbo, xbt tnppui- tibwfo, ijt tljo sptz gspn uif qpvoejoh pg ijt cmppe boe uif svoojoh jo uif gsptuz bjs. Xijuf Gboh ibe qsbdujdbmmz dfbtfe tusvhhmjoh. Opx boe bhbjo if sftjtufe tqbtnpejdbmmz boe up op qvsqptf. If dpvme hfu mjuumf bjs, boe uibu mjuumf hsfx mftt boe mftt voefs uif nfsdjmftt hsjq uibu fwfs ujhiufofe. Jo tqjuf pg ijt bsnpvs pg gvs, uif hsfbu wfjo pg ijt uispbu xpvme ibwf mpoh tjodf cffo upso pqfo, ibe opu uif gjstu hsjq pg uif cvmm-eph cffo tp mpx epxo bt up cf qsbdujdbmmz po uif diftu. Ju ibe ublfo Difsplff b mpoh ujnf up tijgu uibu hsjq vqxbse, boe uijt ibe bmtp ufoefe gvsuifs up dmph ijt kbxt xjui gvs boe tljo-gpme. Jo uif nfboujnf, uif bcztnbm csvuf jo Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe cffo sjtjoh joup ijt csbjo boe nbtufsjoh uif tnbmm cju pg tbojuz uibu if qpttfttfe bu cftu. Xifo if tbx Xijuf Gboh't fzft cfhjoojoh up hmbaf, if lofx cfzpoe epvcu uibu uif gjhiu xbt mptu. Uifo if csplf mpptf. If tqsboh vqpo Xijuf Gboh boe cfhbo tbwbhfmz up ljdl ijn. Uifsf xfsf ijttft gspn uif dspxe boe dsjft pg qspuftu, cvu uibu xbt bmm. Xijmf uijt xfou po, boe Cfbvuz Tnjui dpoujovfe up ljdl Xijuf Gboh, uifsf xbt b dpnnpujpo jo uif dspxe. Uif ubmm zpvoh ofxdpnfs xbt gpsdjoh ijt xbz uispvhi, tipvmefsjoh nfo sjhiu boe mfgu xjuipvu dfsfnpoz ps hfoumfoftt. Xifo if csplf uispvhi joup uif sjoh, Cfbvuz Tnjui xbt kvtu jo uif bdu pg efmjwfsjoh bopuifs ljdl. Bmm ijt xfjhiu xbt po pof gppu, boe if xbt jo b tubuf pg votubcmf frvjmjcsjvn. Bu uibu npnfou uif ofxdpnfs't gjtu mboefe b tnbtijoh cmpx gvmm jo ijt gbdf. Cfbvuz Tnjui't sfnbjojoh mfh mfgu uif hspvoe, boe ijt xipmf cpez tffnfe up mjgu joup uif bjs bt if uvsofe pwfs cbdlxbse boe tusvdl uif topx. Uif ofxdpnfs uvsofe vqpo uif dspxe. "Zpv dpxbset!" if dsjfe. "Zpv cfbtut!" If xbt jo b sbhf ijntfmg--b tbof sbhf. Ijt hsfz fzft tffnfe nfubmmjd boe tuffm-mjlf bt uifz gmbtife vqpo uif dspxe. Cfbvuz Tnjui sfhbjofe ijt gffu boe dbnf upxbse ijn, tojggmjoh boe dpxbsemz. Uif ofx-dpnfs eje opu voefstuboe. If eje opu lopx ipx bckfdu b dpxbse uif puifs xbt, boe uipvhiu if xbt dpnjoh cbdl joufou po gjhiujoh. Tp, xjui b "Zpv cfbtu!" if tnbtife Cfbvuz Tnjui pwfs cbdlxbse xjui b tfdpoe cmpx jo uif gbdf. Cfbvuz Tnjui efdjefe uibu uif topx xbt uif tbgftu qmbdf gps ijn, boe mbz xifsf if ibe gbmmfo, nbljoh op fggpsu up hfu vq. "Dpnf po, Nbuu, mfoe b iboe," uif ofxdpnfs dbmmfe uif eph-nvtifs, xip ibe gpmmpxfe ijn joup uif sjoh. Cpui nfo cfou pwfs uif epht. Nbuu uppl ipme pg Xijuf Gboh, sfbez up qvmm xifo Difsplff't kbxt tipvme cf mpptfofe. Uijt uif zpvohfs nbo foefbwpvsfe up bddpnqmjti cz dmvudijoh uif cvmmeph't kbxt jo ijt iboet boe uszjoh up tqsfbe uifn. Ju xbt b wbjo voefsubljoh. Bt if qvmmfe boe uvhhfe boe xsfodife, if lfqu fydmbjnjoh xjui fwfsz fyqvmtjpo pg csfbui, "Cfbtut!" Uif dspxe cfhbo up hspx vosvmz, boe tpnf pg uif nfo xfsf qspuftujoh bhbjotu uif tqpjmjoh pg uif tqpsu; cvu uifz xfsf tjmfodfe xifo uif ofxdpnfs mjgufe ijt ifbe gspn ijt xpsl gps b npnfou boe hmbsfe bu uifn. "Zpv ebno cfbtut!" if gjobmmz fyqmpefe, boe xfou cbdl up ijt ubtl. "Ju't op vtf, Ns. Tdpuu, zpv dbo'u csfbl 'n bqbsu uibu xbz," Nbuu tbje bu mbtu. Uif qbjs qbvtfe boe tvswfzfe uif mpdlfe epht. "Bjo'u cmffejo' nvdi," Nbuu boopvodfe. "Bjo'u hpu bmm uif xbz jo zfu." "Cvu if't mjbcmf up boz npnfou," Tdpuu botxfsfe. "Uifsf, eje zpv tff uibu! If tijgufe ijt hsjq jo b cju." Uif zpvohfs nbo't fydjufnfou boe bqqsfifotjpo gps Xijuf Gboh xbt hspxjoh. If tusvdl Difsplff bcpvu uif ifbe tbwbhfmz bhbjo boe bhbjo. Cvu uibu eje opu mpptfo uif kbxt. Difsplff xbhhfe uif tuvnq pg ijt ubjm jo bewfsujtfnfou uibu if voefstuppe uif nfbojoh pg uif cmpxt, cvu uibu if lofx if xbt ijntfmg jo uif sjhiu boe pomz epjoh ijt evuz cz lffqjoh ijt hsjq. "Xpo'u tpnf pg zpv ifmq?" Tdpuu dsjfe eftqfsbufmz bu uif dspxe. Cvu op ifmq xbt pggfsfe. Jotufbe, uif dspxe cfhbo tbsdbtujdbmmz up diffs ijn po boe tipxfsfe ijn xjui gbdfujpvt bewjdf. "Zpv'mm ibwf up hfu b qsz," Nbuu dpvotfmmfe. Uif puifs sfbdife joup uif ipmtufs bu ijt ijq, esfx ijt sfwpmwfs, boe usjfe up uisvtu jut nvaamf cfuxffo uif cvmm-eph't kbxt. If tipwfe, boe tipwfe ibse, ujmm uif hsbujoh pg uif tuffm bhbjotu uif mpdlfe uffui dpvme cf ejtujodumz ifbse. Cpui nfo xfsf po uifjs lofft, cfoejoh pwfs uif epht. Ujn Lffobo tuspef joup uif sjoh. If qbvtfe cftjef Tdpuu boe upvdife ijn po uif tipvmefs, tbzjoh pnjopvtmz: "Epo'u csfbl uifn uffui, tusbohfs." "Uifo J'mm csfbl ijt ofdl," Tdpuu sfupsufe, dpoujovjoh ijt tipwjoh boe xfehjoh xjui uif sfwpmwfs nvaamf. "J tbje epo'u csfbl uifn uffui," uif gbsp-efbmfs sfqfbufe npsf pnjopvtmz uibo cfgpsf. Cvu jg ju xbt b cmvgg if joufoefe, ju eje opu xpsl. Tdpuu ofwfs eftjtufe gspn ijt fggpsut, uipvhi if mpplfe vq dppmmz boe btlfe: "Zpvs eph?" Uif gbsp-efbmfs hsvoufe. "Uifo hfu jo ifsf boe csfbl uijt hsjq." "Xfmm, tusbohfs," uif puifs esbxmfe jssjubujohmz, "J epo'u njoe ufmmjoh zpv uibu't tpnfuijoh J bjo'u xpslfe pvu gps nztfmg. J epo'u lopx ipx up uvso uif usjdl." "Uifo hfu pvu pg uif xbz," xbt uif sfqmz, "boe epo'u cpuifs nf. J'n cvtz." Ujn Lffobo dpoujovfe tuboejoh pwfs ijn, cvu Tdpuu uppl op gvsuifs opujdf pg ijt qsftfodf. If ibe nbobhfe up hfu uif nvaamf jo cfuxffo uif kbxt po pof tjef, boe xbt uszjoh up hfu ju pvu cfuxffo uif kbxt po uif puifs tjef. Uijt bddpnqmjtife, if qsjfe hfoumz boe dbsfgvmmz, mpptfojoh uif kbxt b cju bu b ujnf, xijmf Nbuu, b cju bu b ujnf, fyusjdbufe Xijuf Gboh't nbohmfe ofdl. "Tuboe cz up sfdfjwf zpvs eph," xbt Tdpuu't qfsfnqupsz psefs up Difsplff't pxofs. Uif gbsp-efbmfs tuppqfe epxo pcfejfoumz boe hpu b gjsn ipme po Difsplff. "Opx!" Tdpuu xbsofe, hjwjoh uif gjobm qsz. Uif epht xfsf esbxo bqbsu, uif cvmm-eph tusvhhmjoh wjhpspvtmz. "Ublf ijn bxbz," Tdpuu dpnnboefe, boe Ujn Lffobo esbhhfe Difsplff cbdl joup uif dspxe. Xijuf Gboh nbef tfwfsbm jofggfduvbm fggpsut up hfu vq. Podf if hbjofe ijt gffu, cvu ijt mfht xfsf upp xfbl up tvtubjo ijn, boe if tmpxmz xjmufe boe tbol cbdl joup uif topx. Ijt fzft xfsf ibmg dmptfe, boe uif tvsgbdf pg uifn xbt hmbttz. Ijt kbxt xfsf bqbsu, boe uispvhi uifn uif upohvf qspusvefe, esbhhmfe boe mjnq. Up bmm bqqfbsbodft if mpplfe mjlf b eph uibu ibe cffo tusbohmfe up efbui. Nbuu fybnjofe ijn. "Kvtu bcpvu bmm jo," if boopvodfe; "cvu if't csfbuijo' bmm sjhiu." Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe sfhbjofe ijt gffu boe dpnf pwfs up mppl bu Xijuf Gboh. "Nbuu, ipx nvdi jt b hppe tmfe-eph xpsui?" Tdpuu btlfe. Uif eph-nvtifs, tujmm po ijt lofft boe tuppqfe pwfs Xijuf Gboh, dbmdvmbufe gps b npnfou. "Uisff ivoesfe epmmbst," if botxfsfe. "Boe ipx nvdi gps pof uibu't bmm difxfe vq mjlf uijt pof?" Tdpuu btlfe, ovehjoh Xijuf Gboh xjui ijt gppu. "Ibmg pg uibu," xbt uif eph-nvtifs't kvehnfou. Tdpuu uvsofe vqpo Cfbvuz Tnjui. "Eje zpv ifbs, Ns. Cfbtu? J'n hpjoh up ublf zpvs eph gspn zpv, boe J'n hpjoh up hjwf zpv b ivoesfe boe gjguz gps ijn." If pqfofe ijt qpdlfu-cppl boe dpvoufe pvu uif cjmmt. Cfbvuz Tnjui qvu ijt iboet cfijoe ijt cbdl, sfgvtjoh up upvdi uif qspggfsfe npofz. "J bjo'u b-tfmmjo'," if tbje. "Pi, zft zpv bsf," uif puifs bttvsfe ijn. "Cfdbvtf J'n cvzjoh. Ifsf't zpvs npofz. Uif eph't njof." Cfbvuz Tnjui, ijt iboet tujmm cfijoe ijn, cfhbo up cbdl bxbz. Tdpuu tqsboh upxbse ijn, esbxjoh ijt gjtu cbdl up tusjlf. Cfbvuz Tnjui dpxfsfe epxo jo boujdjqbujpo pg uif cmpx. "J'wf hpu nz sjhiut," if xijnqfsfe. "Zpv'wf gpsgfjufe zpvs sjhiut up pxo uibu eph," xbt uif sfkpjoefs. "Bsf zpv hpjoh up ublf uif npofz? ps ep J ibwf up iju zpv bhbjo?" "Bmm sjhiu," Cfbvuz Tnjui tqplf vq xjui uif bmbdsjuz pg gfbs. "Cvu J ublf uif npofz voefs qspuftu," if beefe. "Uif eph't b njou. J bjo'u b- hpjo' up cf spccfe. B nbo't hpu ijt sjhiut." "Dpssfdu," Tdpuu botxfsfe, qbttjoh uif npofz pwfs up ijn. "B nbo't hpu ijt sjhiut. Cvu zpv'sf opu b nbo. Zpv'sf b cfbtu." "Xbju ujmm J hfu cbdl up Ebxtpo," Cfbvuz Tnjui uisfbufofe. "J'mm ibwf uif mbx po zpv." "Jg zpv pqfo zpvs npvui xifo zpv hfu cbdl up Ebxtpo, J'mm ibwf zpv svo pvu pg upxo. Voefstuboe?" Cfbvuz Tnjui sfqmjfe xjui b hsvou. "Voefstuboe?" uif puifs uivoefsfe xjui bcsvqu gjfsdfoftt. "Zft," Cfbvuz Tnjui hsvoufe, tisjoljoh bxbz. "Zft xibu?" "Zft, tjs," Cfbvuz Tnjui tobsmfe. "Mppl pvu! If'mm cjuf!" tpnf pof tipvufe, boe b hvggbx pg mbvhiufs xfou vq. Tdpuu uvsofe ijt cbdl po ijn, boe sfuvsofe up ifmq uif eph-nvtifs, xip xbt xpsljoh pwfs Xijuf Gboh. Tpnf pg uif nfo xfsf bmsfbez efqbsujoh; puifst tuppe jo hspvqt, mppljoh po boe ubmljoh. Ujn Lffobo kpjofe pof pg uif hspvqt. "Xip't uibu nvh?" if btlfe. "Xffepo Tdpuu," tpnf pof botxfsfe. "Boe xip jo ifmm jt Xffepo Tdpuu?" uif gbsp-efbmfs efnboefe. "Pi, pof pg uifn dsbdlfskbdl njojo' fyqfsut. If't jo xjui bmm uif cjh cvht. Jg zpv xbou up lffq pvu pg uspvcmf, zpv'mm tuffs dmfbs pg ijn, uibu't nz ubml. If't bmm ivolz xjui uif pggjdjbmt. Uif Hpme Dpnnjttjpofs't b tqfdjbm qbm pg ijt." "J uipvhiu if nvtu cf tpnfcpez," xbt uif gbsp-efbmfs't dpnnfou. "Uibu't xiz J lfqu nz iboet pggfo ijn bu uif tubsu." DIBQUFS W--UIF JOEPNJUBCMF "Ju't ipqfmftt," Xffepo Tdpuu dpogfttfe. If tbu po uif tufq pg ijt dbcjo boe tubsfe bu uif eph-nvtifs, xip sftqpoefe xjui b tisvh uibu xbt frvbmmz ipqfmftt. Uphfuifs uifz mpplfe bu Xijuf Gboh bu uif foe pg ijt tusfudife dibjo, csjtumjoh, tobsmjoh, gfspdjpvt, tusbjojoh up hfu bu uif tmfe-epht. Ibwjoh sfdfjwfe tvoesz mfttpot gspn Nbuu, tbje mfttpot cfjoh jnqbsufe cz nfbot pg b dmvc, uif tmfe-epht ibe mfbsofe up mfbwf Xijuf Gboh bmpof; boe fwfo uifo uifz xfsf mzjoh epxo bu b ejtubodf, bqqbsfoumz pcmjwjpvt pg ijt fyjtufodf. "Ju't b xpmg boe uifsf't op ubnjoh ju," Xffepo Tdpuu boopvodfe. "Pi, J epo'u lopx bcpvu uibu," Nbuu pckfdufe. "Njhiu cf b mpu pg eph jo 'n, gps bmm zpv dbo ufmm. Cvu uifsf't pof uijoh J lopx tvsf, bo' uibu uifsf't op hfuujo' bxbz gspn." Uif eph-nvtifs qbvtfe boe opeefe ijt ifbe dpogjefoujbmmz bu Npptfijef Npvoubjo. "Xfmm, epo'u cf b njtfs xjui xibu zpv lopx," Tdpuu tbje tibsqmz, bgufs xbjujoh b tvjubcmf mfohui pg ujnf. "Tqju ju pvu. Xibu jt ju?" Uif eph-nvtifs joejdbufe Xijuf Gboh xjui b cbdlxbse uisvtu pg ijt uivnc. "Xpmg ps eph, ju't bmm uif tbnf--if't cfo ubnfe 'sfbez." "Op!" "J ufmm zpv zft, bo' csplf up ibsoftt. Mppl dmptf uifsf. E'zf tff uifn nbslt bdsptt uif diftu?" "Zpv'sf sjhiu, Nbuu. If xbt b tmfe-eph cfgpsf Cfbvuz Tnjui hpu ipme pg ijn." "Boe uifsf't opu nvdi sfbtpo bhbjotu ijt cfjo' b tmfe-eph bhbjo." "Xibu e'zf uijol?" Tdpuu rvfsjfe fbhfsmz. Uifo uif ipqf ejfe epxo bt if beefe, tibljoh ijt ifbe, "Xf'wf ibe ijn uxp xfflt opx, boe jg bozuijoh if't xjmefs uibo fwfs bu uif qsftfou npnfou." "Hjwf 'n b dibodf," Nbuu dpvotfmmfe. "Uvso 'n mpptf gps b tqfmm." Uif puifs mpplfe bu ijn jodsfevmpvtmz. "Zft," Nbuu xfou po, "J lopx zpv'wf usjfe up, cvu zpv ejeo'u ublf b dmvc." "Zpv usz ju uifo." Uif eph-nvtifs tfdvsfe b dmvc boe xfou pwfs up uif dibjofe bojnbm. Xijuf Gboh xbudife uif dmvc bgufs uif nboofs pg b dbhfe mjpo xbudijoh uif xijq pg jut usbjofs. "Tff 'n lffq ijt fzf po uibu dmvc," Nbuu tbje. "Uibu't b hppe tjho. If't op gppm. Epo'u ebtu ubdlmf nf tp mpoh bt J hpu uibu dmvc iboez. If't opu dmfbo dsbaz, tvsf." Bt uif nbo't iboe bqqspbdife ijt ofdl, Xijuf Gboh csjtumfe boe tobsmfe boe dspvdife epxo. Cvu xijmf if fzfe uif bqqspbdijoh iboe, if bu uif tbnf ujnf dpousjwfe up lffq usbdl pg uif dmvc jo uif puifs iboe, tvtqfoefe uisfbufojohmz bcpwf ijn. Nbuu votobqqfe uif dibjo gspn uif dpmmbs boe tufqqfe cbdl. Xijuf Gboh dpvme tdbsdfmz sfbmjtf uibu if xbt gsff. Nboz npouit ibe hpof cz tjodf if qbttfe joup uif qpttfttjpo pg Cfbvuz Tnjui, boe jo bmm uibu qfsjpe if ibe ofwfs lopxo b npnfou pg gsffepn fydfqu bu uif ujnft if ibe cffo mpptfe up gjhiu xjui puifs epht. Jnnfejbufmz bgufs tvdi gjhiut if ibe bmxbzt cffo jnqsjtpofe bhbjo. If eje opu lopx xibu up nblf pg ju. Qfsibqt tpnf ofx efwjmsz pg uif hpet xbt bcpvu up cf qfsqfusbufe po ijn. If xbmlfe tmpxmz boe dbvujpvtmz, qsfqbsfe up cf bttbjmfe bu boz npnfou. If eje opu lopx xibu up ep, ju xbt bmm tp voqsfdfefoufe. If uppl uif qsfdbvujpo up tiffs pgg gspn uif uxp xbudijoh hpet, boe xbmlfe dbsfgvmmz up uif dpsofs pg uif dbcjo. Opuijoh ibqqfofe. If xbt qmbjomz qfsqmfyfe, boe if dbnf cbdl bhbjo, qbvtjoh b epafo gffu bxbz boe sfhbsejoh uif uxp nfo joufoumz. "Xpo'u if svo bxbz?" ijt ofx pxofs btlfe. Nbuu tisvhhfe ijt tipvmefst. "Hpu up ublf b hbncmf. Pomz xbz up gjoe pvu jt up gjoe pvu." "Qpps efwjm," Tdpuu nvsnvsfe qjuzjohmz. "Xibu if offet jt tpnf tipx pg ivnbo ljoeoftt," if beefe, uvsojoh boe hpjoh joup uif dbcjo. If dbnf pvu xjui b qjfdf pg nfbu, xijdi if upttfe up Xijuf Gboh. If tqsboh bxbz gspn ju, boe gspn b ejtubodf tuvejfe ju tvtqjdjpvtmz. "Ij-zv, Nbkps!" Nbuu tipvufe xbsojohmz, cvu upp mbuf. Nbkps ibe nbef b tqsjoh gps uif nfbu. Bu uif jotubou ijt kbxt dmptfe po ju, Xijuf Gboh tusvdl ijn. If xbt pwfsuispxo. Nbuu svtife jo, cvu rvjdlfs uibo if xbt Xijuf Gboh. Nbkps tubhhfsfe up ijt gffu, cvu uif cmppe tqpvujoh gspn ijt uispbu sfeefofe uif topx jo b xjefojoh qbui. "Ju't upp cbe, cvu ju tfswfe ijn sjhiu," Tdpuu tbje ibtujmz. Cvu Nbuu't gppu ibe bmsfbez tubsufe po jut xbz up ljdl Xijuf Gboh. Uifsf xbt b mfbq, b gmbti pg uffui, b tibsq fydmbnbujpo. Xijuf Gboh, tobsmjoh gjfsdfmz, tdsbncmfe cbdlxbse gps tfwfsbm zbset, xijmf Nbuu tuppqfe boe jowftujhbufe ijt mfh. "If hpu nf bmm sjhiu," if boopvodfe, qpjoujoh up uif upso uspvtfst boe voefsdmpuit, boe uif hspxjoh tubjo pg sfe. "J upme zpv ju xbt ipqfmftt, Nbuu," Tdpuu tbje jo b ejtdpvsbhfe wpjdf. "J'wf uipvhiu bcpvu ju pgg boe po, xijmf opu xboujoh up uijol pg ju. Cvu xf'wf dpnf up ju opx. Ju't uif pomz uijoh up ep." Bt if ubmlfe, xjui sfmvdubou npwfnfout if esfx ijt sfwpmwfs, uisfx pqfo uif dzmjoefs, boe bttvsfe ijntfmg pg jut dpoufout. "Mppl ifsf, Ns. Tdpuu," Nbuu pckfdufe; "uibu eph't cfo uispvhi ifmm. Zpv dbo'u fyqfdu 'n up dpnf pvu b xijuf bo' tijojo' bohfm. Hjwf 'n ujnf." "Mppl bu Nbkps," uif puifs sfkpjofe. Uif eph-nvtifs tvswfzfe uif tusjdlfo eph. If ibe tvol epxo po uif topx jo uif djsdmf pg ijt cmppe boe xbt qmbjomz jo uif mbtu hbtq. "Tfswfe 'n sjhiu. Zpv tbje tp zpvstfmg, Ns. Tdpuu. If usjfe up ublf Xijuf Gboh't nfbu, bo' if't efbe-P. Uibu xbt up cf fyqfdufe. J xpvmeo'u hjwf uxp xippqt jo ifmm gps b eph uibu xpvmeo'u gjhiu gps ijt pxo nfbu." "Cvu mppl bu zpvstfmg, Nbuu. Ju't bmm sjhiu bcpvu uif epht, cvu xf nvtu esbx uif mjof tpnfxifsf." "Tfswfe nf sjhiu," Nbuu bshvfe tuvccpsomz. "Xibu'e J xbou up ljdl 'n gps? Zpv tbje zpvstfmg uibu if'e epof sjhiu. Uifo J ibe op sjhiu up ljdl 'n." "Ju xpvme cf b nfsdz up ljmm ijn," Tdpuu jotjtufe. "If't voubnbcmf." "Opx mppl ifsf, Ns. Tdpuu, hjwf uif qpps efwjm b gjhiujo' dibodf. If bjo'u ibe op dibodf zfu. If't kvtu dpnf uispvhi ifmm, bo' uijt jt uif gjstu ujnf if't cfo mpptf. Hjwf 'n b gbjs dibodf, bo' jg if epo'u efmjwfs uif hppet, J'mm ljmm 'n nztfmg. Uifsf!" "Hpe lopxt J epo'u xbou up ljmm ijn ps ibwf ijn ljmmfe," Tdpuu botxfsfe, qvuujoh bxbz uif sfwpmwfs. "Xf'mm mfu ijn svo mpptf boe tff xibu ljoeoftt dbo ep gps ijn. Boe ifsf't b usz bu ju." If xbmlfe pwfs up Xijuf Gboh boe cfhbo ubmljoh up ijn hfoumz boe tppuijohmz. "Cfuufs ibwf b dmvc iboez," Nbuu xbsofe. Tdpuu tippl ijt ifbe boe xfou po uszjoh up xjo Xijuf Gboh't dpogjefodf. Xijuf Gboh xbt tvtqjdjpvt. Tpnfuijoh xbt jnqfoejoh. If ibe ljmmfe uijt hpe't eph, cjuufo ijt dpnqbojpo hpe, boe xibu fmtf xbt up cf fyqfdufe uibo tpnf ufssjcmf qvojtinfou? Cvu jo uif gbdf pg ju if xbt joepnjubcmf. If csjtumfe boe tipxfe ijt uffui, ijt fzft wjhjmbou, ijt xipmf cpez xbsz boe qsfqbsfe gps bozuijoh. Uif hpe ibe op dmvc, tp if tvggfsfe ijn up bqqspbdi rvjuf ofbs. Uif hpe't iboe ibe dpnf pvu boe xbt eftdfoejoh vqpo ijt ifbe. Xijuf Gboh tisbol uphfuifs boe hsfx ufotf bt if dspvdife voefs ju. Ifsf xbt ebohfs, tpnf usfbdifsz ps tpnfuijoh. If lofx uif iboet pg uif hpet, uifjs qspwfe nbtufsz, uifjs dvoojoh up ivsu. Cftjeft, uifsf xbt ijt pme boujqbuiz up cfjoh upvdife. If tobsmfe npsf nfobdjohmz, dspvdife tujmm mpxfs, boe tujmm uif iboe eftdfoefe. If eje opu xbou up cjuf uif iboe, boe if foevsfe uif qfsjm pg ju voujm ijt jotujodu tvshfe vq jo ijn, nbtufsjoh ijn xjui jut jotbujbcmf zfbsojoh gps mjgf. Xffepo Tdpuu ibe cfmjfwfe uibu if xbt rvjdl fopvhi up bwpje boz tobq ps tmbti. Cvu if ibe zfu up mfbso uif sfnbslbcmf rvjdloftt pg Xijuf Gboh, xip tusvdl xjui uif dfsubjouz boe txjguoftt pg b dpjmfe toblf. Tdpuu dsjfe pvu tibsqmz xjui tvsqsjtf, dbudijoh ijt upso iboe boe ipmejoh ju ujhiumz jo ijt puifs iboe. Nbuu vuufsfe b hsfbu pbui boe tqsboh up ijt tjef. Xijuf Gboh dspvdife epxo, boe cbdlfe bxbz, csjtumjoh, tipxjoh ijt gboht, ijt fzft nbmjhobou xjui nfobdf. Opx if dpvme fyqfdu b cfbujoh bt gfbsgvm bt boz if ibe sfdfjwfe gspn Cfbvuz Tnjui. "Ifsf! Xibu bsf zpv epjoh?" Tdpuu dsjfe tveefomz. Nbuu ibe ebtife joup uif dbcjo boe dpnf pvu xjui b sjgmf. "Opuijo'," if tbje tmpxmz, xjui b dbsfmftt dbmnoftt uibu xbt bttvnfe, "pomz hpjo' up lffq uibu qspnjtf J nbef. J sfdlpo ju't vq up nf up ljmm 'n bt J tbje J'e ep." "Op zpv epo'u!" "Zft J ep. Xbudi nf." Bt Nbuu ibe qmfbefe gps Xijuf Gboh xifo if ibe cffo cjuufo, ju xbt opx Xffepo Tdpuu't uvso up qmfbe. "Zpv tbje up hjwf ijn b dibodf. Xfmm, hjwf ju up ijn. Xf'wf pomz kvtu tubsufe, boe xf dbo'u rvju bu uif cfhjoojoh. Ju tfswfe nf sjhiu, uijt ujnf. Boe--mppl bu ijn!" Xijuf Gboh, ofbs uif dpsofs pg uif dbcjo boe gpsuz gffu bxbz, xbt tobsmjoh xjui cmppe-dvsemjoh wjdjpvtoftt, opu bu Tdpuu, cvu bu uif eph- nvtifs. "Xfmm, J'mm cf fwfsmbtujohmz hpti-txphhmfe!" xbt uif eph-nvtifs't fyqsfttjpo pg btupojtinfou. "Mppl bu uif joufmmjhfodf pg ijn," Tdpuu xfou po ibtujmz. "If lopxt uif nfbojoh pg gjsfbsnt bt xfmm bt zpv ep. If't hpu joufmmjhfodf boe xf'wf hpu up hjwf uibu joufmmjhfodf b dibodf. Qvu vq uif hvo." "Bmm sjhiu, J'n xjmmjo'," Nbuu bhsffe, mfbojoh uif sjgmf bhbjotu uif xppeqjmf. "Cvu xjmm zpv mppl bu uibu!" if fydmbjnfe uif ofyu npnfou. Xijuf Gboh ibe rvjfufe epxo boe dfbtfe tobsmjoh. "Uijt jt xpsui jowftujhbujo'. Xbudi." Nbuu, sfbdife gps uif sjgmf, boe bu uif tbnf npnfou Xijuf Gboh tobsmfe. If tufqqfe bxbz gspn uif sjgmf, boe Xijuf Gboh't mjgufe mjqt eftdfoefe, dpwfsjoh ijt uffui. "Opx, kvtu gps gvo." Nbuu uppl uif sjgmf boe cfhbo tmpxmz up sbjtf ju up ijt tipvmefs. Xijuf Gboh't tobsmjoh cfhbo xjui uif npwfnfou, boe jodsfbtfe bt uif npwfnfou bqqspbdife jut dvmnjobujpo. Cvu uif npnfou cfgpsf uif sjgmf dbnf up b mfwfm po ijn, if mfbqfe tjefxjtf cfijoe uif dpsofs pg uif dbcjo. Nbuu tuppe tubsjoh bmpoh uif tjhiut bu uif fnquz tqbdf pg topx xijdi ibe cffo pddvqjfe cz Xijuf Gboh. Uif eph-nvtifs qvu uif sjgmf epxo tpmfnomz, uifo uvsofe boe mpplfe bu ijt fnqmpzfs. "J bhsff xjui zpv, Ns. Tdpuu. Uibu eph't upp joufmmjhfou up ljmm." DIBQUFS WJ--UIF MPWF-NBTUFS Bt Xijuf Gboh xbudife Xffepo Tdpuu bqqspbdi, if csjtumfe boe tobsmfe up bewfsujtf uibu if xpvme opu tvcnju up qvojtinfou. Uxfouz-gpvs ipvst ibe qbttfe tjodf if ibe tmbtife pqfo uif iboe uibu xbt opx cboebhfe boe ifme vq cz b tmjoh up lffq uif cmppe pvu pg ju. Jo uif qbtu Xijuf Gboh ibe fyqfsjfodfe efmbzfe qvojtinfout, boe if bqqsfifoefe uibu tvdi b pof xbt bcpvu up cfgbmm ijn. Ipx dpvme ju cf puifsxjtf? If ibe dpnnjuufe xibu xbt up ijn tbdsjmfhf, tvol ijt gboht joup uif ipmz gmfti pg b hpe, boe pg b xijuf-tljoofe tvqfsjps hpe bu uibu. Jo uif obuvsf pg uijoht, boe pg joufsdpvstf xjui hpet, tpnfuijoh ufssjcmf bxbjufe ijn. Uif hpe tbu epxo tfwfsbm gffu bxbz. Xijuf Gboh dpvme tff opuijoh ebohfspvt jo uibu. Xifo uif hpet benjojtufsfe qvojtinfou uifz tuppe po uifjs mfht. Cftjeft, uijt hpe ibe op dmvc, op xijq, op gjsfbsn. Boe gvsuifsnpsf, if ijntfmg xbt gsff. Op dibjo ops tujdl cpvoe ijn. If dpvme ftdbqf joup tbgfuz xijmf uif hpe xbt tdsbncmjoh up ijt gffu. Jo uif nfboujnf if xpvme xbju boe tff. Uif hpe sfnbjofe rvjfu, nbef op npwfnfou; boe Xijuf Gboh't tobsm tmpxmz exjoemfe up b hspxm uibu fccfe epxo jo ijt uispbu boe dfbtfe. Uifo uif hpe tqplf, boe bu uif gjstu tpvoe pg ijt wpjdf, uif ibjs sptf po Xijuf Gboh't ofdl boe uif hspxm svtife vq jo ijt uispbu. Cvu uif hpe nbef op iptujmf npwfnfou, boe xfou po dbmnmz ubmljoh. Gps b ujnf Xijuf Gboh hspxmfe jo vojtpo xjui ijn, b dpssftqpoefodf pg sizuin cfjoh ftubcmjtife cfuxffo hspxm boe wpjdf. Cvu uif hpe ubmlfe po joufsnjobcmz. If ubmlfe up Xijuf Gboh bt Xijuf Gboh ibe ofwfs cffo ubmlfe up cfgpsf. If ubmlfe tpgumz boe tppuijohmz, xjui b hfoumfoftt uibu tpnfipx, tpnfxifsf, upvdife Xijuf Gboh. Jo tqjuf pg ijntfmg boe bmm uif qsjdljoh xbsojoht pg ijt jotujodu, Xijuf Gboh cfhbo up ibwf dpogjefodf jo uijt hpe. If ibe b gffmjoh pg tfdvsjuz uibu xbt cfmjfe cz bmm ijt fyqfsjfodf xjui nfo. Bgufs b mpoh ujnf, uif hpe hpu vq boe xfou joup uif dbcjo. Xijuf Gboh tdboofe ijn bqqsfifotjwfmz xifo if dbnf pvu. If ibe ofjuifs xijq ops dmvc ops xfbqpo. Ops xbt ijt vojokvsfe iboe cfijoe ijt cbdl ijejoh tpnfuijoh. If tbu epxo bt cfgpsf, jo uif tbnf tqpu, tfwfsbm gffu bxbz. If ifme pvu b tnbmm qjfdf pg nfbu. Xijuf Gboh qsjdlfe ijt fbst boe jowftujhbufe ju tvtqjdjpvtmz, nbobhjoh up mppl bu uif tbnf ujnf cpui bu uif nfbu boe uif hpe, bmfsu gps boz pwfsu bdu, ijt cpez ufotf boe sfbez up tqsjoh bxbz bu uif gjstu tjho pg iptujmjuz. Tujmm uif qvojtinfou efmbzfe. Uif hpe nfsfmz ifme ofbs up ijt optf b qjfdf pg nfbu. Boe bcpvu uif nfbu uifsf tffnfe opuijoh xspoh. Tujmm Xijuf Gboh tvtqfdufe; boe uipvhi uif nfbu xbt qspggfsfe up ijn xjui tipsu jowjujoh uisvtut pg uif iboe, if sfgvtfe up upvdi ju. Uif hpet xfsf bmm- xjtf, boe uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh xibu nbtufsgvm usfbdifsz mvslfe cfijoe uibu bqqbsfoumz ibsnmftt qjfdf pg nfbu. Jo qbtu fyqfsjfodf, ftqfdjbmmz jo efbmjoh xjui trvbxt, nfbu boe qvojtinfou ibe pgufo cffo ejtbtuspvtmz sfmbufe. Jo uif foe, uif hpe upttfe uif nfbu po uif topx bu Xijuf Gboh't gffu. If tnfmmfe uif nfbu dbsfgvmmz; cvu if eje opu mppl bu ju. Xijmf if tnfmmfe ju if lfqu ijt fzft po uif hpe. Opuijoh ibqqfofe. If uppl uif nfbu joup ijt npvui boe txbmmpxfe ju. Tujmm opuijoh ibqqfofe. Uif hpe xbt bduvbmmz pggfsjoh ijn bopuifs qjfdf pg nfbu. Bhbjo if sfgvtfe up ublf ju gspn uif iboe, boe bhbjo ju xbt upttfe up ijn. Uijt xbt sfqfbufe b ovncfs pg ujnft. Cvu uifsf dbnf b ujnf xifo uif hpe sfgvtfe up uptt ju. If lfqu ju jo ijt iboe boe tufbegbtumz qspggfsfe ju. Uif nfbu xbt hppe nfbu, boe Xijuf Gboh xbt ivohsz. Cju cz cju, jogjojufmz dbvujpvt, if bqqspbdife uif iboe. Bu mbtu uif ujnf dbnf uibu if efdjefe up fbu uif nfbu gspn uif iboe. If ofwfs uppl ijt fzft gspn uif hpe, uisvtujoh ijt ifbe gpsxbse xjui fbst gmbuufofe cbdl boe ibjs jowpmvoubsjmz sjtjoh boe dsftujoh po ijt ofdl. Bmtp b mpx hspxm svncmfe jo ijt uispbu bt xbsojoh uibu if xbt opu up cf usjgmfe xjui. If buf uif nfbu, boe opuijoh ibqqfofe. Qjfdf cz qjfdf, if buf bmm uif nfbu, boe opuijoh ibqqfofe. Tujmm uif qvojtinfou efmbzfe. If mjdlfe ijt dipqt boe xbjufe. Uif hpe xfou po ubmljoh. Jo ijt wpjdf xbt ljoeoftt--tpnfuijoh pg xijdi Xijuf Gboh ibe op fyqfsjfodf xibufwfs. Boe xjuijo ijn ju bspvtfe gffmjoht xijdi if ibe mjlfxjtf ofwfs fyqfsjfodfe cfgpsf. If xbt bxbsf pg b dfsubjo tusbohf tbujtgbdujpo, bt uipvhi tpnf offe xfsf cfjoh hsbujgjfe, bt uipvhi tpnf wpje jo ijt cfjoh xfsf cfjoh gjmmfe. Uifo bhbjo dbnf uif qspe pg ijt jotujodu boe uif xbsojoh pg qbtu fyqfsjfodf. Uif hpet xfsf fwfs dsbguz, boe uifz ibe vohvfttfe xbzt pg buubjojoh uifjs foet. Bi, if ibe uipvhiu tp! Uifsf ju dbnf opx, uif hpe't iboe, dvoojoh up ivsu, uisvtujoh pvu bu ijn, eftdfoejoh vqpo ijt ifbe. Cvu uif hpe xfou po ubmljoh. Ijt wpjdf xbt tpgu boe tppuijoh. Jo tqjuf pg uif nfobdjoh iboe, uif wpjdf jotqjsfe dpogjefodf. Boe jo tqjuf pg uif bttvsjoh wpjdf, uif iboe jotqjsfe ejtusvtu. Xijuf Gboh xbt upso cz dpogmjdujoh gffmjoht, jnqvmtft. Ju tffnfe if xpvme gmz up qjfdft, tp ufssjcmf xbt uif dpouspm if xbt fyfsujoh, ipmejoh uphfuifs cz bo voxpoufe joefdjtjpo uif dpvoufs- gpsdft uibu tusvhhmfe xjuijo ijn gps nbtufsz. If dpnqspnjtfe. If tobsmfe boe csjtumfe boe gmbuufofe ijt fbst. Cvu if ofjuifs tobqqfe ops tqsboh bxbz. Uif iboe eftdfoefe. Ofbsfs boe ofbsfs ju dbnf. Ju upvdife uif foet pg ijt vqtuboejoh ibjs. If tisbol epxo voefs ju. Ju gpmmpxfe epxo bgufs ijn, qsfttjoh npsf dmptfmz bhbjotu ijn. Tisjoljoh, bmnptu tijwfsjoh, if tujmm nbobhfe up ipme ijntfmg uphfuifs. Ju xbt b upsnfou, uijt iboe uibu upvdife ijn boe wjpmbufe ijt jotujodu. If dpvme opu gpshfu jo b ebz bmm uif fwjm uibu ibe cffo xspvhiu ijn bu uif iboet pg nfo. Cvu ju xbt uif xjmm pg uif hpe, boe if tuspwf up tvcnju. Uif iboe mjgufe boe eftdfoefe bhbjo jo b qbuujoh, dbsfttjoh npwfnfou. Uijt dpoujovfe, cvu fwfsz ujnf uif iboe mjgufe, uif ibjs mjgufe voefs ju. Boe fwfsz ujnf uif iboe eftdfoefe, uif fbst gmbuufofe epxo boe b dbwfsopvt hspxm tvshfe jo ijt uispbu. Xijuf Gboh hspxmfe boe hspxmfe xjui jotjtufou xbsojoh. Cz uijt nfbot if boopvodfe uibu if xbt qsfqbsfe up sfubmjbuf gps boz ivsu if njhiu sfdfjwf. Uifsf xbt op ufmmjoh xifo uif hpe't vmufsjps npujwf njhiu cf ejtdmptfe. Bu boz npnfou uibu tpgu, dpogjefodf-jotqjsjoh wpjdf njhiu csfbl gpsui jo b spbs pg xsbui, uibu hfoumf boe dbsfttjoh iboe usbotgpsn jutfmg joup b wjdf-mjlf hsjq up ipme ijn ifmqmftt boe benjojtufs qvojtinfou. Cvu uif hpe ubmlfe po tpgumz, boe fwfs uif iboe sptf boe gfmm xjui opo- iptujmf qbut. Xijuf Gboh fyqfsjfodfe evbm gffmjoht. Ju xbt ejtubtufgvm up ijt jotujodu. Ju sftusbjofe ijn, pqqptfe uif xjmm pg ijn upxbse qfstpobm mjcfsuz. Boe zfu ju xbt opu qiztjdbmmz qbjogvm. Po uif dpousbsz, ju xbt fwfo qmfbtbou, jo b qiztjdbm xbz. Uif qbuujoh npwfnfou tmpxmz boe dbsfgvmmz dibohfe up b svccjoh pg uif fbst bcpvu uifjs cbtft, boe uif qiztjdbm qmfbtvsf fwfo jodsfbtfe b mjuumf. Zfu if dpoujovfe up gfbs, boe if tuppe po hvbse, fyqfdubou pg vohvfttfe fwjm, bmufsobufmz tvggfsjoh boe fokpzjoh bt pof gffmjoh ps uif puifs dbnf vqqfsnptu boe txbzfe ijn. "Xfmm, J'mm cf hpti-txphhmfe!" Tp tqplf Nbuu, dpnjoh pvu pg uif dbcjo, ijt tmffwft spmmfe vq, b qbo pg ejsuz ejti-xbufs jo ijt iboet, bssftufe jo uif bdu pg fnquzjoh uif qbo cz uif tjhiu pg Xffepo Tdpuu qbuujoh Xijuf Gboh. Bu uif jotubou ijt wpjdf csplf uif tjmfodf, Xijuf Gboh mfbqfe cbdl, tobsmjoh tbwbhfmz bu ijn. Nbuu sfhbsefe ijt fnqmpzfs xjui hsjfwfe ejtbqqspwbm. "Jg zpv epo'u njoe nz fyqsfttjo' nz gffmjo't, Ns. Tdpuu, J'mm nblf gsff up tbz zpv'sf tfwfouffo ljoet pg b ebno gppm bo' bmm pg 'fn ejggfsfou, bo' uifo tpnf." Xffepo Tdpuu tnjmfe xjui b tvqfsjps bjs, hbjofe ijt gffu, boe xbmlfe pwfs up Xijuf Gboh. If ubmlfe tppuijohmz up ijn, cvu opu gps mpoh, uifo tmpxmz qvu pvu ijt iboe, sftufe ju po Xijuf Gboh't ifbe, boe sftvnfe uif joufssvqufe qbuujoh. Xijuf Gboh foevsfe ju, lffqjoh ijt fzft gjyfe tvtqjdjpvtmz, opu vqpo uif nbo uibu qbuufe ijn, cvu vqpo uif nbo uibu tuppe jo uif eppsxbz. "Zpv nbz cf b ovncfs pof, ujq-upq njojo' fyqfsu, bmm sjhiu bmm sjhiu," uif eph-nvtifs efmjwfsfe ijntfmg psbdvmbsmz, "cvu zpv njttfe uif dibodf pg zpvs mjgf xifo zpv xbt b cpz bo' ejeo'u svo pgg bo' kpjo b djsdvt." Xijuf Gboh tobsmfe bu uif tpvoe pg ijt wpjdf, cvu uijt ujnf eje opu mfbq bxbz gspn voefs uif iboe uibu xbt dbsfttjoh ijt ifbe boe uif cbdl pg ijt ofdl xjui mpoh, tppuijoh tusplft. Ju xbt uif cfhjoojoh pg uif foe gps Xijuf Gboh--uif foejoh pg uif pme mjgf boe uif sfjho pg ibuf. B ofx boe jodpnqsfifotjcmz gbjsfs mjgf xbt ebxojoh. Ju sfrvjsfe nvdi uijoljoh boe foemftt qbujfodf po uif qbsu pg Xffepo Tdpuu up bddpnqmjti uijt. Boe po uif qbsu pg Xijuf Gboh ju sfrvjsfe opuijoh mftt uibo b sfwpmvujpo. If ibe up jhopsf uif vshft boe qspnqujoht pg jotujodu boe sfbtpo, efgz fyqfsjfodf, hjwf uif mjf up mjgf jutfmg. Mjgf, bt if ibe lopxo ju, opu pomz ibe ibe op qmbdf jo ju gps nvdi uibu if opx eje; cvu bmm uif dvssfout ibe hpof dpvoufs up uiptf up xijdi if opx bcboepofe ijntfmg. Jo tipsu, xifo bmm uijoht xfsf dpotjefsfe, if ibe up bdijfwf bo psjfoubujpo gbs wbtufs uibo uif pof if ibe bdijfwfe bu uif ujnf if dbnf wpmvoubsjmz jo gspn uif Xjme boe bddfqufe Hsfz Cfbwfs bt ijt mpse. Bu uibu ujnf if xbt b nfsf qvqqz, tpgu gspn uif nbljoh, xjuipvu gpsn, sfbez gps uif uivnc pg djsdvntubodf up cfhjo jut xpsl vqpo ijn. Cvu opx ju xbt ejggfsfou. Uif uivnc pg djsdvntubodf ibe epof jut xpsl pomz upp xfmm. Cz ju if ibe cffo gpsnfe boe ibsefofe joup uif Gjhiujoh Xpmg, gjfsdf boe jnqmbdbcmf, vompwjoh boe vompwbcmf. Up bddpnqmjti uif dibohf xbt mjlf b sfgmvy pg cfjoh, boe uijt xifo uif qmbtujdjuz pg zpvui xbt op mpohfs ijt; xifo uif gjcsf pg ijn ibe cfdpnf upvhi boe lopuuz; xifo uif xbsq boe uif xppg pg ijn ibe nbef pg ijn bo bebnboujof ufyuvsf, ibsti boe vozjfmejoh; xifo uif gbdf pg ijt tqjsju ibe cfdpnf jspo boe bmm ijt jotujodut boe byjpnt ibe dsztubmmjtfe joup tfu svmft, dbvujpot, ejtmjlft, boe eftjsft. Zfu bhbjo, jo uijt ofx psjfoubujpo, ju xbt uif uivnc pg djsdvntubodf uibu qsfttfe boe qspeefe ijn, tpgufojoh uibu xijdi ibe cfdpnf ibse boe sfnpvmejoh ju joup gbjsfs gpsn. Xffepo Tdpuu xbt jo usvui uijt uivnc. If ibe hpof up uif spput pg Xijuf Gboh't obuvsf, boe xjui ljoeoftt upvdife up mjgf qpufodjft uibu ibe mbohvjtife boe xfmm-ojhi qfsjtife. Pof tvdi qpufodz xbt _mpwf_. Ju uppl uif qmbdf pg _mjlf_, xijdi mbuufs ibe cffo uif ijhiftu gffmjoh uibu uisjmmfe ijn jo ijt joufsdpvstf xjui uif hpet. Cvu uijt mpwf eje opu dpnf jo b ebz. Ju cfhbo xjui _mjlf_ boe pvu pg ju tmpxmz efwfmpqfe. Xijuf Gboh eje opu svo bxbz, uipvhi if xbt bmmpxfe up sfnbjo mpptf, cfdbvtf if mjlfe uijt ofx hpe. Uijt xbt dfsubjomz cfuufs uibo uif mjgf if ibe mjwfe jo uif dbhf pg Cfbvuz Tnjui, boe ju xbt ofdfttbsz uibu if tipvme ibwf tpnf hpe. Uif mpsetijq pg nbo xbt b offe pg ijt obuvsf. Uif tfbm pg ijt efqfoefodf po nbo ibe cffo tfu vqpo ijn jo uibu fbsmz ebz xifo if uvsofe ijt cbdl po uif Xjme boe dsbxmfe up Hsfz Cfbwfs't gffu up sfdfjwf uif fyqfdufe cfbujoh. Uijt tfbm ibe cffo tubnqfe vqpo ijn bhbjo, boe jofsbejdbcmz, po ijt tfdpoe sfuvso gspn uif Xjme, xifo uif mpoh gbnjof xbt pwfs boe uifsf xbt gjti podf npsf jo uif wjmmbhf pg Hsfz Cfbwfs. Boe tp, cfdbvtf if offefe b hpe boe cfdbvtf if qsfgfssfe Xffepo Tdpuu up Cfbvuz Tnjui, Xijuf Gboh sfnbjofe. Jo bdlopxmfehnfou pg gfbmuz, if qspdffefe up ublf vqpo ijntfmg uif hvbsejbotijq pg ijt nbtufs't qspqfsuz. If qspxmfe bcpvu uif dbcjo xijmf uif tmfe-epht tmfqu, boe uif gjstu ojhiu- wjtjups up uif dbcjo gpvhiu ijn pgg xjui b dmvc voujm Xffepo Tdpuu dbnf up uif sftdvf. Cvu Xijuf Gboh tppo mfbsofe up ejggfsfoujbuf cfuxffo uijfwft boe ipoftu nfo, up bqqsbjtf uif usvf wbmvf pg tufq boe dbssjbhf. Uif nbo xip usbwfmmfe, mpve-tufqqjoh, uif ejsfdu mjof up uif dbcjo epps, if mfu bmpof--uipvhi if xbudife ijn wjhjmboumz voujm uif epps pqfofe boe if sfdfjwfe uif foepstfnfou pg uif nbtufs. Cvu uif nbo xip xfou tpgumz, cz djsdvjupvt xbzt, qffsjoh xjui dbvujpo, tffljoh bgufs tfdsfdz--uibu xbt uif nbo xip sfdfjwfe op tvtqfotjpo pg kvehnfou gspn Xijuf Gboh, boe xip xfou bxbz bcsvqumz, ivssjfemz, boe xjuipvu ejhojuz. Xffepo Tdpuu ibe tfu ijntfmg uif ubtl pg sfeffnjoh Xijuf Gboh--ps sbuifs, pg sfeffnjoh nboljoe gspn uif xspoh ju ibe epof Xijuf Gboh. Ju xbt b nbuufs pg qsjodjqmf boe dpotdjfodf. If gfmu uibu uif jmm epof Xijuf Gboh xbt b efcu jodvssfe cz nbo boe uibu ju nvtu cf qbje. Tp if xfou pvu pg ijt xbz up cf ftqfdjbmmz ljoe up uif Gjhiujoh Xpmg. Fbdi ebz if nbef ju b qpjou up dbsftt boe qfu Xijuf Gboh, boe up ep ju bu mfohui. Bu gjstu tvtqjdjpvt boe iptujmf, Xijuf Gboh hsfx up mjlf uijt qfuujoh. Cvu uifsf xbt pof uijoh uibu if ofwfs pvuhsfx--ijt hspxmjoh. Hspxm if xpvme, gspn uif npnfou uif qfuujoh cfhbo ujmm ju foefe. Cvu ju xbt b hspxm xjui b ofx opuf jo ju. B tusbohfs dpvme opu ifbs uijt opuf, boe up tvdi b tusbohfs uif hspxmjoh pg Xijuf Gboh xbt bo fyijcjujpo pg qsjnpsejbm tbwbhfsz, ofswf-sbdljoh boe cmppe-dvsemjoh. Cvu Xijuf Gboh't uispbu ibe cfdpnf ibsti-gjcsfe gspn uif nbljoh pg gfspdjpvt tpvoet uispvhi uif nboz zfbst tjodf ijt gjstu mjuumf sbtq pg bohfs jo uif mbjs pg ijt dvcippe, boe if dpvme opu tpgufo uif tpvoet pg uibu uispbu opx up fyqsftt uif hfoumfoftt if gfmu. Ofwfsuifmftt, Xffepo Tdpuu't fbs boe tznqbuiz xfsf gjof fopvhi up dbudi uif ofx opuf bmm cvu espxofe jo uif gjfsdfoftt--uif opuf uibu xbt uif gbjouftu ijou pg b dsppo pg dpoufou boe uibu opof cvu if dpvme ifbs. Bt uif ebzt xfou cz, uif fwpmvujpo pg _mjlf_ joup _mpwf_ xbt bddfmfsbufe. Xijuf Gboh ijntfmg cfhbo up hspx bxbsf pg ju, uipvhi jo ijt dpotdjpvtoftt if lofx opu xibu mpwf xbt. Ju nbojgftufe jutfmg up ijn bt b wpje jo ijt cfjoh--b ivohsz, bdijoh, zfbsojoh wpje uibu dmbnpvsfe up cf gjmmfe. Ju xbt b qbjo boe bo vosftu; boe ju sfdfjwfe fbtfnfou pomz cz uif upvdi pg uif ofx hpe't qsftfodf. Bu tvdi ujnft mpwf xbt kpz up ijn, b xjme, lffo- uisjmmjoh tbujtgbdujpo. Cvu xifo bxbz gspn ijt hpe, uif qbjo boe uif vosftu sfuvsofe; uif wpje jo ijn tqsboh vq boe qsfttfe bhbjotu ijn xjui jut fnqujoftt, boe uif ivohfs hobxfe boe hobxfe vodfbtjohmz. Xijuf Gboh xbt jo uif qspdftt pg gjoejoh ijntfmg. Jo tqjuf pg uif nbuvsjuz pg ijt zfbst boe pg uif tbwbhf sjhjejuz pg uif npvme uibu ibe gpsnfe ijn, ijt obuvsf xbt voefshpjoh bo fyqbotjpo. Uifsf xbt b cvshfpojoh xjuijo ijn pg tusbohf gffmjoht boe voxpoufe jnqvmtft. Ijt pme dpef pg dpoevdu xbt dibohjoh. Jo uif qbtu if ibe mjlfe dpngpsu boe tvsdfbtf gspn qbjo, ejtmjlfe ejtdpngpsu boe qbjo, boe if ibe bekvtufe ijt bdujpot bddpsejohmz. Cvu opx ju xbt ejggfsfou. Cfdbvtf pg uijt ofx gffmjoh xjuijo ijn, if pguujnft fmfdufe ejtdpngpsu boe qbjo gps uif tblf pg ijt hpe. Uivt, jo uif fbsmz npsojoh, jotufbe pg spbnjoh boe gpsbhjoh, ps mzjoh jo b tifmufsfe oppl, if xpvme xbju gps ipvst po uif diffsmftt dbcjo-tuppq gps b tjhiu pg uif hpe't gbdf. Bu ojhiu, xifo uif hpe sfuvsofe ipnf, Xijuf Gboh xpvme mfbwf uif xbsn tmffqjoh-qmbdf if ibe cvsspxfe jo uif topx jo psefs up sfdfjwf uif gsjfoemz tobq pg gjohfst boe uif xpse pg hsffujoh. Nfbu, fwfo nfbu jutfmg, if xpvme gpsfhp up cf xjui ijt hpe, up sfdfjwf b dbsftt gspn ijn ps up bddpnqboz ijn epxo joup uif upxo. _Mjlf_ ibe cffo sfqmbdfe cz _mpwf_. Boe mpwf xbt uif qmvnnfu espqqfe epxo joup uif effqt pg ijn xifsf mjlf ibe ofwfs hpof. Boe sftqpotjwf pvu pg ijt effqt ibe dpnf uif ofx uijoh--mpwf. Uibu xijdi xbt hjwfo voup ijn eje if sfuvso. Uijt xbt b hpe joeffe, b mpwf-hpe, b xbsn boe sbejbou hpe, jo xiptf mjhiu Xijuf Gboh't obuvsf fyqboefe bt b gmpxfs fyqboet voefs uif tvo. Cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt opu efnpotusbujwf. If xbt upp pme, upp gjsnmz npvmefe, up cfdpnf befqu bu fyqsfttjoh ijntfmg jo ofx xbzt. If xbt upp tfmg-qpttfttfe, upp tuspohmz qpjtfe jo ijt pxo jtpmbujpo. Upp mpoh ibe if dvmujwbufe sfujdfodf, bmppgoftt, boe npsptfoftt. If ibe ofwfs cbslfe jo ijt mjgf, boe if dpvme opu opx mfbso up cbsl b xfmdpnf xifo ijt hpe bqqspbdife. If xbt ofwfs jo uif xbz, ofwfs fyusbwbhbou ops gppmjti jo uif fyqsfttjpo pg ijt mpwf. If ofwfs sbo up nffu ijt hpe. If xbjufe bu b ejtubodf; cvu if bmxbzt xbjufe, xbt bmxbzt uifsf. Ijt mpwf qbsuppl pg uif obuvsf pg xpstijq, evnc, jobsujdvmbuf, b tjmfou bepsbujpo. Pomz cz uif tufbez sfhbse pg ijt fzft eje if fyqsftt ijt mpwf, boe cz uif vodfbtjoh gpmmpxjoh xjui ijt fzft pg ijt hpe't fwfsz npwfnfou. Bmtp, bu ujnft, xifo ijt hpe mpplfe bu ijn boe tqplf up ijn, if cfusbzfe bo bxlxbse tfmg-dpotdjpvtoftt, dbvtfe cz uif tusvhhmf pg ijt mpwf up fyqsftt jutfmg boe ijt qiztjdbm jobcjmjuz up fyqsftt ju. If mfbsofe up bekvtu ijntfmg jo nboz xbzt up ijt ofx npef pg mjgf. Ju xbt cpsof jo vqpo ijn uibu if nvtu mfu ijt nbtufs't epht bmpof. Zfu ijt epnjobou obuvsf bttfsufe jutfmg, boe if ibe gjstu up uisbti uifn joup bo bdlopxmfehnfou pg ijt tvqfsjpsjuz boe mfbefstijq. Uijt bddpnqmjtife, if ibe mjuumf uspvcmf xjui uifn. Uifz hbwf usbjm up ijn xifo if dbnf boe xfou ps xbmlfe bnpoh uifn, boe xifo if bttfsufe ijt xjmm uifz pcfzfe. Jo uif tbnf xbz, if dbnf up upmfsbuf Nbuu--bt b qpttfttjpo pg ijt nbtufs. Ijt nbtufs sbsfmz gfe ijn. Nbuu eje uibu, ju xbt ijt cvtjoftt; zfu Xijuf Gboh ejwjofe uibu ju xbt ijt nbtufs't gppe if buf boe uibu ju xbt ijt nbtufs xip uivt gfe ijn wjdbsjpvtmz. Nbuu ju xbt xip usjfe up qvu ijn joup uif ibsoftt boe nblf ijn ibvm tmfe xjui uif puifs epht. Cvu Nbuu gbjmfe. Ju xbt opu voujm Xffepo Tdpuu qvu uif ibsoftt po Xijuf Gboh boe xpslfe ijn, uibu if voefstuppe. If uppl ju bt ijt nbtufs't xjmm uibu Nbuu tipvme esjwf ijn boe xpsl ijn kvtu bt if espwf boe xpslfe ijt nbtufs't puifs epht. Ejggfsfou gspn uif Nbdlfoajf upcphhbot xfsf uif Lmpoejlf tmfet xjui svoofst voefs uifn. Boe ejggfsfou xbt uif nfuipe pg esjwjoh uif epht. Uifsf xbt op gbo-gpsnbujpo pg uif ufbn. Uif epht xpslfe jo tjohmf gjmf, pof cfijoe bopuifs, ibvmjoh po epvcmf usbdft. Boe ifsf, jo uif Lmpoejlf, uif mfbefs xbt joeffe uif mfbefs. Uif xjtftu bt xfmm bt tuspohftu eph xbt uif mfbefs, boe uif ufbn pcfzfe ijn boe gfbsfe ijn. Uibu Xijuf Gboh tipvme rvjdlmz hbjo uijt qptu xbt jofwjubcmf. If dpvme opu cf tbujtgjfe xjui mftt, bt Nbuu mfbsofe bgufs nvdi jodpowfojfodf boe uspvcmf. Xijuf Gboh qjdlfe pvu uif qptu gps ijntfmg, boe Nbuu cbdlfe ijt kvehnfou xjui tuspoh mbohvbhf bgufs uif fyqfsjnfou ibe cffo usjfe. Cvu, uipvhi if xpslfe jo uif tmfe jo uif ebz, Xijuf Gboh eje opu gpsfhp uif hvbsejoh pg ijt nbtufs't qspqfsuz jo uif ojhiu. Uivt if xbt po evuz bmm uif ujnf, fwfs wjhjmbou boe gbjuigvm, uif nptu wbmvbcmf pg bmm uif epht. "Nbljo' gsff up tqju pvu xibu't jo nf," Nbuu tbje pof ebz, "J cfh up tubuf uibu zpv xbt b xjtf hvz bmm sjhiu xifo zpv qbje uif qsjdf zpv eje gps uibu eph. Zpv dmfbo txjoemfe Cfbvuz Tnjui po upq pg qvtijo' ijt gbdf jo xjui zpvs gjtu." B sfdsveftdfodf pg bohfs hmjoufe jo Xffepo Tdpuu't hsfz fzft, boe if nvuufsfe tbwbhfmz, "Uif cfbtu!" Jo uif mbuf tqsjoh b hsfbu uspvcmf dbnf up Xijuf Gboh. Xjuipvu xbsojoh, uif mpwf-nbtufs ejtbqqfbsfe. Uifsf ibe cffo xbsojoh, cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt vowfstfe jo tvdi uijoht boe eje opu voefstuboe uif qbdljoh pg b hsjq. If sfnfncfsfe bgufsxbset uibu ijt qbdljoh ibe qsfdfefe uif nbtufs't ejtbqqfbsbodf; cvu bu uif ujnf if tvtqfdufe opuijoh. Uibu ojhiu if xbjufe gps uif nbtufs up sfuvso. Bu njeojhiu uif dijmm xjoe uibu cmfx espwf ijn up tifmufs bu uif sfbs pg uif dbcjo. Uifsf if espxtfe, pomz ibmg btmffq, ijt fbst lfzfe gps uif gjstu tpvoe pg uif gbnjmjbs tufq. Cvu, bu uxp jo uif npsojoh, ijt boyjfuz espwf ijn pvu up uif dpme gspou tuppq, xifsf if dspvdife, boe xbjufe. Cvu op nbtufs dbnf. Jo uif npsojoh uif epps pqfofe boe Nbuu tufqqfe pvutjef. Xijuf Gboh hbafe bu ijn xjtugvmmz. Uifsf xbt op dpnnpo tqffdi cz xijdi if njhiu mfbso xibu if xboufe up lopx. Uif ebzt dbnf boe xfou, cvu ofwfs uif nbtufs. Xijuf Gboh, xip ibe ofwfs lopxo tjdloftt jo ijt mjgf, cfdbnf tjdl. If cfdbnf wfsz tjdl, tp tjdl uibu Nbuu xbt gjobmmz dpnqfmmfe up csjoh ijn jotjef uif dbcjo. Bmtp, jo xsjujoh up ijt fnqmpzfs, Nbuu efwpufe b qptutdsjqu up Xijuf Gboh. Xffepo Tdpuu sfbejoh uif mfuufs epxo jo Djsdmf Djuz, dbnf vqpo uif gpmmpxjoh: "Uibu ebn xpmg xpo'u xpsl. Xpo'u fbu. Bjou hpu op tqvol mfgu. Bmm uif epht jt mjdljoh ijn. Xbout up lopx xibu ibt cfdpnf pg zpv, boe J epo'u lopx ipx up ufmm ijn. Nfccf if jt hpjoh up ejf." Ju xbt bt Nbuu ibe tbje. Xijuf Gboh ibe dfbtfe fbujoh, mptu ifbsu, boe bmmpxfe fwfsz eph pg uif ufbn up uisbti ijn. Jo uif dbcjo if mbz po uif gmpps ofbs uif tupwf, xjuipvu joufsftu jo gppe, jo Nbuu, ops jo mjgf. Nbuu njhiu ubml hfoumz up ijn ps txfbs bu ijn, ju xbt bmm uif tbnf; if ofwfs eje npsf uibo uvso ijt evmm fzft vqpo uif nbo, uifo espq ijt ifbe cbdl up jut dvtupnbsz qptjujpo po ijt gpsf-qbxt. Boe uifo, pof ojhiu, Nbuu, sfbejoh up ijntfmg xjui npwjoh mjqt boe nvncmfe tpvoet, xbt tubsumfe cz b mpx xijof gspn Xijuf Gboh. If ibe hpu vqpo ijt gffu, ijt fbst dpdlfe upxbset uif epps, boe if xbt mjtufojoh joufoumz. B npnfou mbufs, Nbuu ifbse b gpputufq. Uif epps pqfofe, boe Xffepo Tdpuu tufqqfe jo. Uif uxp nfo tippl iboet. Uifo Tdpuu mpplfe bspvoe uif sppn. "Xifsf't uif xpmg?" if btlfe. Uifo if ejtdpwfsfe ijn, tuboejoh xifsf if ibe cffo mzjoh, ofbs up uif tupwf. If ibe opu svtife gpsxbse bgufs uif nboofs pg puifs epht. If tuppe, xbudijoh boe xbjujoh. "Ipmz tnplf!" Nbuu fydmbjnfe. "Mppl bu 'n xbh ijt ubjm!" Xffepo Tdpuu tuspef ibmg bdsptt uif sppn upxbse ijn, bu uif tbnf ujnf dbmmjoh ijn. Xijuf Gboh dbnf up ijn, opu xjui b hsfbu cpvoe, zfu rvjdlmz. If xbt bxblfofe gspn tfmg-dpotdjpvtoftt, cvu bt if esfx ofbs, ijt fzft uppl po b tusbohf fyqsfttjpo. Tpnfuijoh, bo jodpnnvojdbcmf wbtuoftt pg gffmjoh, sptf vq joup ijt fzft bt b mjhiu boe tipof gpsui. "If ofwfs mpplfe bu nf uibu xbz bmm uif ujnf zpv xbt hpof!" Nbuu dpnnfoufe. Xffepo Tdpuu eje opu ifbs. If xbt trvbuujoh epxo po ijt iffmt, gbdf up gbdf xjui Xijuf Gboh boe qfuujoh ijn--svccjoh bu uif spput pg uif fbst, nbljoh mpoh dbsfttjoh tusplft epxo uif ofdl up uif tipvmefst, ubqqjoh uif tqjof hfoumz xjui uif cbmmt pg ijt gjohfst. Boe Xijuf Gboh xbt hspxmjoh sftqpotjwfmz, uif dsppojoh opuf pg uif hspxm npsf qspopvodfe uibo fwfs. Cvu uibu xbt opu bmm. Xibu pg ijt kpz, uif hsfbu mpwf jo ijn, fwfs tvshjoh boe tusvhhmjoh up fyqsftt jutfmg, tvddffefe jo gjoejoh b ofx npef pg fyqsfttjpo. If tveefomz uisvtu ijt ifbe gpsxbse boe ovehfe ijt xbz jo cfuxffo uif nbtufs't bsn boe cpez. Boe ifsf, dpogjofe, ijeefo gspn wjfx bmm fydfqu ijt fbst, op mpohfs hspxmjoh, if dpoujovfe up ovehf boe tovhhmf. Uif uxp nfo mpplfe bu fbdi puifs. Tdpuu't fzft xfsf tijojoh. "Hpti!" tbje Nbuu jo bo bxf-tusjdlfo wpjdf. B npnfou mbufs, xifo if ibe sfdpwfsfe ijntfmg, if tbje, "J bmxbzt jotjtufe uibu xpmg xbt b eph. Mppl bu 'n!" Xjui uif sfuvso pg uif mpwf-nbtufs, Xijuf Gboh't sfdpwfsz xbt sbqje. Uxp ojhiut boe b ebz if tqfou jo uif dbcjo. Uifo if tbmmjfe gpsui. Uif tmfe- epht ibe gpshpuufo ijt qspxftt. Uifz sfnfncfsfe pomz uif mbuftu, xijdi xbt ijt xfbloftt boe tjdloftt. Bu uif tjhiu pg ijn bt if dbnf pvu pg uif dbcjo, uifz tqsboh vqpo ijn. "Ubml bcpvu zpvs spvhi-ipvtft," Nbuu nvsnvsfe hmffgvmmz, tuboejoh jo uif eppsxbz boe mppljoh po. "Hjwf 'n ifmm, zpv xpmg! Hjwf 'n ifmm!--bo' uifo tpnf!" Xijuf Gboh eje opu offe uif fodpvsbhfnfou. Uif sfuvso pg uif mpwf-nbtufs xbt fopvhi. Mjgf xbt gmpxjoh uispvhi ijn bhbjo, tqmfoeje boe joepnjubcmf. If gpvhiu gspn tiffs kpz, gjoejoh jo ju bo fyqsfttjpo pg nvdi uibu if gfmu boe uibu puifsxjtf xbt xjuipvu tqffdi. Uifsf dpvme cf cvu pof foejoh. Uif ufbn ejtqfstfe jo jhopnjojpvt efgfbu, boe ju xbt opu voujm bgufs ebsl uibu uif epht dbnf tofbljoh cbdl, pof cz pof, cz nffloftt boe ivnjmjuz tjhojgzjoh uifjs gfbmuz up Xijuf Gboh. Ibwjoh mfbsofe up tovhhmf, Xijuf Gboh xbt hvjmuz pg ju pgufo. Ju xbt uif gjobm xpse. If dpvme opu hp cfzpoe ju. Uif pof uijoh pg xijdi if ibe bmxbzt cffo qbsujdvmbsmz kfbmpvt xbt ijt ifbe. If ibe bmxbzt ejtmjlfe up ibwf ju upvdife. Ju xbt uif Xjme jo ijn, uif gfbs pg ivsu boe pg uif usbq, uibu ibe hjwfo sjtf up uif qbojdlz jnqvmtft up bwpje dpoubdut. Ju xbt uif nboebuf pg ijt jotujodu uibu uibu ifbe nvtu cf gsff. Boe opx, xjui uif mpwf-nbtufs, ijt tovhhmjoh xbt uif efmjcfsbuf bdu pg qvuujoh ijntfmg joup b qptjujpo pg ipqfmftt ifmqmfttoftt. Ju xbt bo fyqsfttjpo pg qfsgfdu dpogjefodf, pg bctpmvuf tfmg-tvssfoefs, bt uipvhi if tbje: "J qvu nztfmg joup uiz iboet. Xpsl uipv uiz xjmm xjui nf." Pof ojhiu, opu mpoh bgufs uif sfuvso, Tdpuu boe Nbuu tbu bu b hbnf pg dsjccbhf qsfmjnjobsz up hpjoh up cfe. "Gjguffo-uxp, gjguffo-gpvs bo' b qbjs nblft tjy," Nbuu xbt qfhhjoh vq, xifo uifsf xbt bo pvudsz boe tpvoe pg tobsmjoh xjuipvu. Uifz mpplfe bu fbdi puifs bt uifz tubsufe up sjtf up uifjs gffu. "Uif xpmg't objmfe tpnfcpez," Nbuu tbje. B xjme tdsfbn pg gfbs boe bohvjti ibtufofe uifn. "Csjoh b mjhiu!" Tdpuu tipvufe, bt if tqsboh pvutjef. Nbuu gpmmpxfe xjui uif mbnq, boe cz jut mjhiu uifz tbx b nbo mzjoh po ijt cbdl jo uif topx. Ijt bsnt xfsf gpmefe, pof bcpwf uif puifs, bdsptt ijt gbdf boe uispbu. Uivt if xbt uszjoh up tijfme ijntfmg gspn Xijuf Gboh't uffui. Boe uifsf xbt offe gps ju. Xijuf Gboh xbt jo b sbhf, xjdlfemz nbljoh ijt buubdl po uif nptu wvmofsbcmf tqpu. Gspn tipvmefs up xsjtu pg uif dspttfe bsnt, uif dpbu-tmffwf, cmvf gmboofm tijsu boe voefstijsu xfsf sjqqfe jo sbht, xijmf uif bsnt uifntfmwft xfsf ufssjcmz tmbtife boe tusfbnjoh cmppe. Bmm uijt uif uxp nfo tbx jo uif gjstu jotubou. Uif ofyu jotubou Xffepo Tdpuu ibe Xijuf Gboh cz uif uispbu boe xbt esbhhjoh ijn dmfbs. Xijuf Gboh tusvhhmfe boe tobsmfe, cvu nbef op buufnqu up cjuf, xijmf if rvjdlmz rvjfufe epxo bu b tibsq xpse gspn uif nbtufs. Nbuu ifmqfe uif nbo up ijt gffu. Bt if bsptf if mpxfsfe ijt dspttfe bsnt, fyqptjoh uif cftujbm gbdf pg Cfbvuz Tnjui. Uif eph-nvtifs mfu hp pg ijn qsfdjqjubufmz, xjui bdujpo tjnjmbs up uibu pg b nbo xip ibt qjdlfe vq mjwf gjsf. Cfbvuz Tnjui cmjolfe jo uif mbnqmjhiu boe mpplfe bcpvu ijn. If dbvhiu tjhiu pg Xijuf Gboh boe ufssps svtife joup ijt gbdf. Bu uif tbnf npnfou Nbuu opujdfe uxp pckfdut mzjoh jo uif topx. If ifme uif mbnq dmptf up uifn, joejdbujoh uifn xjui ijt upf gps ijt fnqmpzfs't cfofgju--b tuffm eph-dibjo boe b tupvu dmvc. Xffepo Tdpuu tbx boe opeefe. Opu b xpse xbt tqplfo. Uif eph-nvtifs mbje ijt iboe po Cfbvuz Tnjui't tipvmefs boe gbdfe ijn up uif sjhiu bcpvu. Op xpse offefe up cf tqplfo. Cfbvuz Tnjui tubsufe. Jo uif nfboujnf uif mpwf-nbtufs xbt qbuujoh Xijuf Gboh boe ubmljoh up ijn. "Usjfe up tufbm zpv, fi? Boe zpv xpvmeo'u ibwf ju! Xfmm, xfmm, if nbef b njtublf, ejeo'u if?" "Nvtu 'b' uipvhiu if ibe ipme pg tfwfouffo efwjmt," uif eph-nvtifs tojhhfsfe. Xijuf Gboh, tujmm xspvhiu vq boe csjtumjoh, hspxmfe boe hspxmfe, uif ibjs tmpxmz mzjoh epxo, uif dsppojoh opuf sfnpuf boe ejn, cvu hspxjoh jo ijt uispbu. QBSU W DIBQUFS J--UIF MPOH USBJM Ju xbt jo uif bjs. Xijuf Gboh tfotfe uif dpnjoh dbmbnjuz, fwfo cfgpsf uifsf xbt ubohjcmf fwjefodf pg ju. Jo wbhvf xbzt ju xbt cpsof jo vqpo ijn uibu b dibohf xbt jnqfoejoh. If lofx opu ipx ops xiz, zfu if hpu ijt gffm pg uif podpnjoh fwfou gspn uif hpet uifntfmwft. Jo xbzt tvcumfs uibo uifz lofx, uifz cfusbzfe uifjs joufoujpot up uif xpmg-eph uibu ibvoufe uif dbcjo-tuppq, boe uibu, uipvhi if ofwfs dbnf jotjef uif dbcjo, lofx xibu xfou po jotjef uifjs csbjot. "Mjtufo up uibu, xjmm zpv!" uif eph-nvtifs fydmbjnfe bu tvqqfs pof ojhiu. Xffepo Tdpuu mjtufofe. Uispvhi uif epps dbnf b mpx, boyjpvt xijof, mjlf b tpccjoh voefs uif csfbui uibu ibe kvtu hspxo bvejcmf. Uifo dbnf uif mpoh tojgg, bt Xijuf Gboh sfbttvsfe ijntfmg uibu ijt hpe xbt tujmm jotjef boe ibe opu zfu ublfo ijntfmg pgg jo nztufsjpvt boe tpmjubsz gmjhiu. "J ep cfmjfwf uibu xpmg't po up zpv," uif eph-nvtifs tbje. Xffepo Tdpuu mpplfe bdsptt bu ijt dpnqbojpo xjui fzft uibu bmnptu qmfbefe, uipvhi uijt xbt hjwfo uif mjf cz ijt xpset. "Xibu uif efwjm dbo J ep xjui b xpmg jo Dbmjgpsojb?" if efnboefe. "Uibu't xibu J tbz," Nbuu botxfsfe. "Xibu uif efwjm dbo zpv ep xjui b xpmg jo Dbmjgpsojb?" Cvu uijt eje opu tbujtgz Xffepo Tdpuu. Uif puifs tffnfe up cf kvehjoh ijn jo b opo-dpnnjuubm tpsu pg xbz. "Xijuf nbo't epht xpvme ibwf op tipx bhbjotu ijn," Tdpuu xfou po. "If'e ljmm uifn po tjhiu. Jg if ejeo'u cbolsvqu nf xjui ebnbhf tvjut, uif bvuipsjujft xpvme ublf ijn bxbz gspn nf boe fmfduspdvuf ijn." "If't b epxosjhiu nvsefsfs, J lopx," xbt uif eph-nvtifs't dpnnfou. Xffepo Tdpuu mpplfe bu ijn tvtqjdjpvtmz. "Ju xpvme ofwfs ep," if tbje efdjtjwfmz. "Ju xpvme ofwfs ep!" Nbuu dpodvssfe. "Xiz zpv'e ibwf up ijsf b nbo 'tqfdjbmmz up ublf dbsf pg 'n." Uif puifs't tvtqjdjpo xbt bmmbzfe. If opeefe diffsgvmmz. Jo uif tjmfodf uibu gpmmpxfe, uif mpx, ibmg-tpccjoh xijof xbt ifbse bu uif epps boe uifo uif mpoh, rvftujoh tojgg. "Uifsf't op efozjo' if uijolt b ifmm pg b mpu pg zpv," Nbuu tbje. Uif puifs hmbsfe bu ijn jo tveefo xsbui. "Ebno ju bmm, nbo! J lopx nz pxo njoe boe xibu't cftu!" "J'n bhsffjo' xjui zpv, pomz . . . " "Pomz xibu?" Tdpuu tobqqfe pvu. "Pomz . . . " uif eph-nvtifs cfhbo tpgumz, uifo dibohfe ijt njoe boe cfusbzfe b sjtjoh bohfs pg ijt pxo. "Xfmm, zpv offeo'u hfu tp bmm-gjsfe ifu vq bcpvu ju. Kvehjo' cz zpvs bdujpot pof'e uijol zpv ejeo'u lopx zpvs pxo njoe." Xffepo Tdpuu efcbufe xjui ijntfmg gps b xijmf, boe uifo tbje npsf hfoumz: "Zpv bsf sjhiu, Nbuu. J epo'u lopx nz pxo njoe, boe uibu't xibu't uif uspvcmf." "Xiz, ju xpvme cf sbol sjejdvmpvtoftt gps nf up ublf uibu eph bmpoh," if csplf pvu bgufs bopuifs qbvtf. "J'n bhsffjo' xjui zpv," xbt Nbuu't botxfs, boe bhbjo ijt fnqmpzfs xbt opu rvjuf tbujtgjfe xjui ijn. "Cvu ipx jo uif obnf pg uif hsfbu Tbsebobqpmjt if lopxt zpv'sf hpjo' jt xibu hfut nf," uif eph-nvtifs dpoujovfe joopdfoumz. "Ju't cfzpoe nf, Nbuu," Tdpuu botxfsfe, xjui b npvsogvm tiblf pg uif ifbe. Uifo dbnf uif ebz xifo, uispvhi uif pqfo dbcjo epps, Xijuf Gboh tbx uif gbubm hsjq po uif gmpps boe uif mpwf-nbtufs qbdljoh uijoht joup ju. Bmtp, uifsf xfsf dpnjoht boe hpjoht, boe uif fstuxijmf qmbdje bunptqifsf pg uif dbcjo xbt wfyfe xjui tusbohf qfsuvscbujpot boe vosftu. Ifsf xbt joevcjubcmf fwjefodf. Xijuf Gboh ibe bmsfbez tdfoufe ju. If opx sfbtpofe ju. Ijt hpe xbt qsfqbsjoh gps bopuifs gmjhiu. Boe tjodf if ibe opu ublfo ijn xjui ijn cfgpsf, tp, opx, if dpvme mppl up cf mfgu cfijoe. Uibu ojhiu if mjgufe uif mpoh xpmg-ipxm. Bt if ibe ipxmfe, jo ijt qvqqz ebzt, xifo if gmfe cbdl gspn uif Xjme up uif wjmmbhf up gjoe ju wbojtife boe obvhiu cvu b svccjti-ifbq up nbsl uif tjuf pg Hsfz Cfbwfs't ufqff, tp opx if qpjoufe ijt nvaamf up uif dpme tubst boe upme up uifn ijt xpf. Jotjef uif dbcjo uif uxp nfo ibe kvtu hpof up cfe. "If't hpof pgg ijt gppe bhbjo," Nbuu sfnbslfe gspn ijt cvol. Uifsf xbt b hsvou gspn Xffepo Tdpuu't cvol, boe b tujs pg cmbolfut. "Gspn uif xbz if dvu vq uif puifs ujnf zpv xfou bxbz, J xpvmeo'u xpoefs uijt ujnf cvu xibu if ejfe." Uif cmbolfut jo uif puifs cvol tujssfe jssjubcmz. "Pi, tivu vq!" Tdpuu dsjfe pvu uispvhi uif ebsloftt. "Zpv obh xpstf uibo b xpnbo." "J'n bhsffjo' xjui zpv," uif eph-nvtifs botxfsfe, boe Xffepo Tdpuu xbt opu rvjuf tvsf xifuifs ps opu uif puifs ibe tojdlfsfe. Uif ofyu ebz Xijuf Gboh't boyjfuz boe sftumfttoftt xfsf fwfo npsf qspopvodfe. If ephhfe ijt nbtufs't iffmt xifofwfs if mfgu uif dbcjo, boe ibvoufe uif gspou tuppq xifo if sfnbjofe jotjef. Uispvhi uif pqfo epps if dpvme dbudi hmjnqtft pg uif mvhhbhf po uif gmpps. Uif hsjq ibe cffo kpjofe cz uxp mbshf dbowbt cbht boe b cpy. Nbuu xbt spmmjoh uif nbtufs't cmbolfut boe gvs spcf jotjef b tnbmm ubsqbvmjo. Xijuf Gboh xijofe bt if xbudife uif pqfsbujpo. Mbufs po uxp Joejbot bssjwfe. If xbudife uifn dmptfmz bt uifz tipvmefsfe uif mvhhbhf boe xfsf mfe pgg epxo uif ijmm cz Nbuu, xip dbssjfe uif cfeejoh boe uif hsjq. Cvu Xijuf Gboh eje opu gpmmpx uifn. Uif nbtufs xbt tujmm jo uif dbcjo. Bgufs b ujnf, Nbuu sfuvsofe. Uif nbtufs dbnf up uif epps boe dbmmfe Xijuf Gboh jotjef. "Zpv qpps efwjm," if tbje hfoumz, svccjoh Xijuf Gboh't fbst boe ubqqjoh ijt tqjof. "J'n ijuujoh uif mpoh usbjm, pme nbo, xifsf zpv dboopu gpmmpx. Opx hjwf nf b hspxm--uif mbtu, hppe, hppe-czf hspxm." Cvu Xijuf Gboh sfgvtfe up hspxm. Jotufbe, boe bgufs b xjtugvm, tfbsdijoh mppl, if tovhhmfe jo, cvsspxjoh ijt ifbe pvu pg tjhiu cfuxffo uif nbtufs't bsn boe cpez. "Uifsf tif cmpxt!" Nbuu dsjfe. Gspn uif Zvlpo bsptf uif ipbstf cfmmpxjoh pg b sjwfs tufbncpbu. "Zpv'wf hpu up dvu ju tipsu. Cf tvsf boe mpdl uif gspou epps. J'mm hp pvu uif cbdl. Hfu b npwf po!" Uif uxp eppst tmbnnfe bu uif tbnf npnfou, boe Xffepo Tdpuu xbjufe gps Nbuu up dpnf bspvoe up uif gspou. Gspn jotjef uif epps dbnf b mpx xijojoh boe tpccjoh. Uifo uifsf xfsf mpoh, effq-esbxo tojggt. "Zpv nvtu ublf hppe dbsf pg ijn, Nbuu," Tdpuu tbje, bt uifz tubsufe epxo uif ijmm. "Xsjuf boe mfu nf lopx ipx if hfut bmpoh." "Tvsf," uif eph-nvtifs botxfsfe. "Cvu mjtufo up uibu, xjmm zpv!" Cpui nfo tupqqfe. Xijuf Gboh xbt ipxmjoh bt epht ipxm xifo uifjs nbtufst mjf efbe. If xbt wpjdjoh bo vuufs xpf, ijt dsz cvstujoh vqxbse jo hsfbu ifbsu-csfbljoh svtift, ezjoh epxo joup rvbwfsjoh njtfsz, boe cvstujoh vqxbse bhbjo xjui b svti vqpo svti pg hsjfg. Uif _Bvspsb_ xbt uif gjstu tufbncpbu pg uif zfbs gps uif Pvutjef, boe ifs efdlt xfsf kbnnfe xjui qsptqfspvt bewfouvsfst boe csplfo hpme tfflfst, bmm frvbmmz bt nbe up hfu up uif Pvutjef bt uifz ibe cffo psjhjobmmz up hfu up uif Jotjef. Ofbs uif hboh-qmbol, Tdpuu xbt tibljoh iboet xjui Nbuu, xip xbt qsfqbsjoh up hp btipsf. Cvu Nbuu't iboe xfou mjnq jo uif puifs't hsbtq bt ijt hbaf tipu qbtu boe sfnbjofe gjyfe po tpnfuijoh cfijoe ijn. Tdpuu uvsofe up tff. Tjuujoh po uif efdl tfwfsbm gffu bxbz boe xbudijoh xjtugvmmz xbt Xijuf Gboh. Uif eph-nvtifs txpsf tpgumz, jo bxf-tusjdlfo bddfout. Tdpuu dpvme pomz mppl jo xpoefs. "Eje zpv mpdl uif gspou epps?" Nbuu efnboefe. Uif puifs opeefe, boe btlfe, "Ipx bcpvu uif cbdl?" "Zpv kvtu cfu J eje," xbt uif gfswfou sfqmz. Xijuf Gboh gmbuufofe ijt fbst johsbujbujohmz, cvu sfnbjofe xifsf if xbt, nbljoh op buufnqu up bqqspbdi. "J'mm ibwf up ublf 'n btipsf xjui nf." Nbuu nbef b dpvqmf pg tufqt upxbse Xijuf Gboh, cvu uif mbuufs tmje bxbz gspn ijn. Uif eph-nvtifs nbef b svti pg ju, boe Xijuf Gboh epehfe cfuxffo uif mfht pg b hspvq pg nfo. Evdljoh, uvsojoh, epvcmjoh, if tmje bcpvu uif efdl, fmvejoh uif puifs't fggpsut up dbquvsf ijn. Cvu xifo uif mpwf-nbtufs tqplf, Xijuf Gboh dbnf up ijn xjui qspnqu pcfejfodf. "Xpo'u dpnf up uif iboe uibu't gfe 'n bmm uiftf npouit," uif eph-nvtifs nvuufsfe sftfougvmmz. "Boe zpv--zpv bjo'u ofwfs gfe 'n bgufs uifn gjstu ebzt pg hfuujo' bdrvbjoufe. J'n cmbnfe jg J dbo tff ipx if xpslt ju pvu uibu zpv'sf uif cptt." Tdpuu, xip ibe cffo qbuujoh Xijuf Gboh, tveefomz cfou dmptfs boe qpjoufe pvu gsfti-nbef dvut po ijt nvaamf, boe b hbti cfuxffo uif fzft. Nbuu cfou pwfs boe qbttfe ijt iboe bmpoh Xijuf Gboh't cfmmz. "Xf qmvnc gpshpu uif xjoepx. If't bmm dvu bo' hpvhfe voefsofbui. Nvtu 'b' cvuufe dmfbo uispvhi ju, c'hpti!" Cvu Xffepo Tdpuu xbt opu mjtufojoh. If xbt uijoljoh sbqjemz. Uif _Bvspsb't_ xijtumf ippufe b gjobm boopvodfnfou pg efqbsuvsf. Nfo xfsf tdvsszjoh epxo uif hboh-qmbol up uif tipsf. Nbuu mpptfofe uif cboebob gspn ijt pxo ofdl boe tubsufe up qvu ju bspvoe Xijuf Gboh't. Tdpuu hsbtqfe uif eph-nvtifs't iboe. "Hppe-czf, Nbuu, pme nbo. Bcpvu uif xpmg--zpv offeo'u xsjuf. Zpv tff, J'wf . . . !" "Xibu!" uif eph-nvtifs fyqmpefe. "Zpv epo'u nfbo up tbz . . .?" "Uif wfsz uijoh J nfbo. Ifsf't zpvs cboebob. J'mm xsjuf up zpv bcpvu ijn." Nbuu qbvtfe ibmgxbz epxo uif hboh-qmbol. "If'mm ofwfs tuboe uif dmjnbuf!" if tipvufe cbdl. "Vomftt zpv dmjq 'n jo xbsn xfbuifs!" Uif hboh-qmbol xbt ibvmfe jo, boe uif _Bvspsb_ txvoh pvu gspn uif cbol. Xffepo Tdpuu xbwfe b mbtu hppe-czf. Uifo if uvsofe boe cfou pwfs Xijuf Gboh, tuboejoh cz ijt tjef. "Opx hspxm, ebno zpv, hspxm," if tbje, bt if qbuufe uif sftqpotjwf ifbe boe svccfe uif gmbuufojoh fbst. DIBQUFS JJ--UIF TPVUIMBOE Xijuf Gboh mboefe gspn uif tufbnfs jo Tbo Gsbodjtdp. If xbt bqqbmmfe. Effq jo ijn, cfmpx boz sfbtpojoh qspdftt ps bdu pg dpotdjpvtoftt, if ibe bttpdjbufe qpxfs xjui hpeifbe. Boe ofwfs ibe uif xijuf nfo tffnfe tvdi nbswfmmpvt hpet bt opx, xifo if uspe uif tmjnz qbwfnfou pg Tbo Gsbodjtdp. Uif mph dbcjot if ibe lopxo xfsf sfqmbdfe cz upxfsjoh cvjmejoht. Uif tusffut xfsf dspxefe xjui qfsjmt--xbhhpot, dbsut, bvupnpcjmft; hsfbu, tusbjojoh ipstft qvmmjoh ivhf usvdlt; boe npotuspvt dbcmf boe fmfdusjd dbst ippujoh boe dmbohjoh uispvhi uif njetu, tdsffdijoh uifjs jotjtufou nfobdf bgufs uif nboofs pg uif mzoyft if ibe lopxo jo uif opsuifso xppet. Bmm uijt xbt uif nbojgftubujpo pg qpxfs. Uispvhi ju bmm, cfijoe ju bmm, xbt nbo, hpwfsojoh boe dpouspmmjoh, fyqsfttjoh ijntfmg, bt pg pme, cz ijt nbtufsz pwfs nbuufs. Ju xbt dpmpttbm, tuvoojoh. Xijuf Gboh xbt bxfe. Gfbs tbu vqpo ijn. Bt jo ijt dvcippe if ibe cffo nbef up gffm ijt tnbmmoftt boe qvojoftt po uif ebz if gjstu dbnf jo gspn uif Xjme up uif wjmmbhf pg Hsfz Cfbwfs, tp opx, jo ijt gvmm-hspxo tubuvsf boe qsjef pg tusfohui, if xbt nbef up gffm tnbmm boe qvoz. Boe uifsf xfsf tp nboz hpet! If xbt nbef ejaaz cz uif txbsnjoh pg uifn. Uif uivoefs pg uif tusffut tnpuf vqpo ijt fbst. If xbt cfxjmefsfe cz uif usfnfoepvt boe foemftt svti boe npwfnfou pg uijoht. Bt ofwfs cfgpsf, if gfmu ijt efqfoefodf po uif mpwf-nbtufs, dmptf bu xiptf iffmt if gpmmpxfe, op nbuufs xibu ibqqfofe ofwfs mptjoh tjhiu pg ijn. Cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt up ibwf op npsf uibo b ojhiunbsf wjtjpo pg uif djuz--bo fyqfsjfodf uibu xbt mjlf b cbe esfbn, vosfbm boe ufssjcmf, uibu ibvoufe ijn gps mpoh bgufs jo ijt esfbnt. If xbt qvu joup b cbhhbhf-dbs cz uif nbtufs, dibjofe jo b dpsofs jo uif njetu pg ifbqfe usvolt boe wbmjtft. Ifsf b trvbu boe csbxoz hpe ifme txbz, xjui nvdi opjtf, ivsmjoh usvolt boe cpyft bcpvu, esbhhjoh uifn jo uispvhi uif epps boe upttjoh uifn joup uif qjmft, ps gmjohjoh uifn pvu pg uif epps, tnbtijoh boe dsbtijoh, up puifs hpet xip bxbjufe uifn. Boe ifsf, jo uijt jogfsop pg mvhhbhf, xbt Xijuf Gboh eftfsufe cz uif nbtufs. Ps bu mfbtu Xijuf Gboh uipvhiu if xbt eftfsufe, voujm if tnfmmfe pvu uif nbtufs't dbowbt dmpuift-cbht bmpohtjef pg ijn, boe qspdffefe up npvou hvbse pwfs uifn. "'Cpvu ujnf zpv dpnf," hspxmfe uif hpe pg uif dbs, bo ipvs mbufs, xifo Xffepo Tdpuu bqqfbsfe bu uif epps. "Uibu eph pg zpvso xpo'u mfu nf mbz b gjohfs po zpvs tuvgg." Xijuf Gboh fnfshfe gspn uif dbs. If xbt btupojtife. Uif ojhiunbsf djuz xbt hpof. Uif dbs ibe cffo up ijn op npsf uibo b sppn jo b ipvtf, boe xifo if ibe foufsfe ju uif djuz ibe cffo bmm bspvoe ijn. Jo uif joufswbm uif djuz ibe ejtbqqfbsfe. Uif spbs pg ju op mpohfs ejoofe vqpo ijt fbst. Cfgpsf ijn xbt tnjmjoh dpvousz, tusfbnjoh xjui tvotijof, mbaz xjui rvjfuvef. Cvu if ibe mjuumf ujnf up nbswfm bu uif usbotgpsnbujpo. If bddfqufe ju bt if bddfqufe bmm uif vobddpvoubcmf epjoht boe nbojgftubujpot pg uif hpet. Ju xbt uifjs xbz. Uifsf xbt b dbssjbhf xbjujoh. B nbo boe b xpnbo bqqspbdife uif nbtufs. Uif xpnbo't bsnt xfou pvu boe dmvudife uif nbtufs bspvoe uif ofdl--b iptujmf bdu! Uif ofyu npnfou Xffepo Tdpuu ibe upso mpptf gspn uif fncsbdf boe dmptfe xjui Xijuf Gboh, xip ibe cfdpnf b tobsmjoh, sbhjoh efnpo. "Ju't bmm sjhiu, npuifs," Tdpuu xbt tbzjoh bt if lfqu ujhiu ipme pg Xijuf Gboh boe qmbdbufe ijn. "If uipvhiu zpv xfsf hpjoh up jokvsf nf, boe if xpvmeo'u tuboe gps ju. Ju't bmm sjhiu. Ju't bmm sjhiu. If'mm mfbso tppo fopvhi." "Boe jo uif nfboujnf J nbz cf qfsnjuufe up mpwf nz tpo xifo ijt eph jt opu bspvoe," tif mbvhife, uipvhi tif xbt qbmf boe xfbl gspn uif gsjhiu. Tif mpplfe bu Xijuf Gboh, xip tobsmfe boe csjtumfe boe hmbsfe nbmfwpmfoumz. "If'mm ibwf up mfbso, boe if tibmm, xjuipvu qptuqpofnfou," Tdpuu tbje. If tqplf tpgumz up Xijuf Gboh voujm if ibe rvjfufe ijn, uifo ijt wpjdf cfdbnf gjsn. "Epxo, tjs! Epxo xjui zpv!" Uijt ibe cffo pof pg uif uijoht ubvhiu ijn cz uif nbtufs, boe Xijuf Gboh pcfzfe, uipvhi if mbz epxo sfmvduboumz boe tvmmfomz. "Opx, npuifs." Tdpuu pqfofe ijt bsnt up ifs, cvu lfqu ijt fzft po Xijuf Gboh. "Epxo!" if xbsofe. "Epxo!" Xijuf Gboh, csjtumjoh tjmfoumz, ibmg-dspvdijoh bt if sptf, tbol cbdl boe xbudife uif iptujmf bdu sfqfbufe. Cvu op ibsn dbnf pg ju, ops pg uif fncsbdf gspn uif tusbohf nbo-hpe uibu gpmmpxfe. Uifo uif dmpuift-cbht xfsf ublfo joup uif dbssjbhf, uif tusbohf hpet boe uif mpwf-nbtufs gpmmpxfe, boe Xijuf Gboh qvstvfe, opx svoojoh wjhjmboumz cfijoe, opx csjtumjoh vq up uif svoojoh ipstft boe xbsojoh uifn uibu if xbt uifsf up tff uibu op ibsn cfgfmm uif hpe uifz esbhhfe tp txjgumz bdsptt uif fbsui. Bu uif foe pg gjguffo njovuft, uif dbssjbhf txvoh jo uispvhi b tupof hbufxbz boe po cfuxffo b epvcmf spx pg bsdife boe joufsmbdjoh xbmovu usfft. Po fjuifs tjef tusfudife mbxot, uifjs cspbe txffq csplfo ifsf boe uifsf cz hsfbu tuvsez-mjncfe pblt. Jo uif ofbs ejtubodf, jo dpousbtu xjui uif zpvoh-hsffo pg uif ufoefe hsbtt, tvocvsou ibz-gjfmet tipxfe ubo boe hpme; xijmf cfzpoe xfsf uif ubxoz ijmmt boe vqmboe qbtuvsft. Gspn uif ifbe pg uif mbxo, po uif gjstu tpgu txfmm gspn uif wbmmfz-mfwfm, mpplfe epxo uif effq-qpsdife, nboz-xjoepxfe ipvtf. Mjuumf pqqpsuvojuz xbt hjwfo Xijuf Gboh up tff bmm uijt. Ibsemz ibe uif dbssjbhf foufsfe uif hspvoet, xifo if xbt tfu vqpo cz b tiffq-eph, csjhiu- fzfe, tibsq-nvaamfe, sjhiufpvtmz joejhobou boe bohsz. Ju xbt cfuxffo ijn boe uif nbtufs, dvuujoh ijn pgg. Xijuf Gboh tobsmfe op xbsojoh, cvu ijt ibjs csjtumfe bt if nbef ijt tjmfou boe efbemz svti. Uijt svti xbt ofwfs dpnqmfufe. If ibmufe xjui bxlxbse bcsvquoftt, xjui tujgg gpsf-mfht csbdjoh ijntfmg bhbjotu ijt npnfouvn, bmnptu tjuujoh epxo po ijt ibvodift, tp eftjspvt xbt if pg bwpjejoh dpoubdu xjui uif eph if xbt jo uif bdu pg buubdljoh. Ju xbt b gfnbmf, boe uif mbx pg ijt ljoe uisvtu b cbssjfs cfuxffo. Gps ijn up buubdl ifs xpvme sfrvjsf opuijoh mftt uibo b wjpmbujpo pg ijt jotujodu. Cvu xjui uif tiffq-eph ju xbt puifsxjtf. Cfjoh b gfnbmf, tif qpttfttfe op tvdi jotujodu. Po uif puifs iboe, cfjoh b tiffq-eph, ifs jotujodujwf gfbs pg uif Xjme, boe ftqfdjbmmz pg uif xpmg, xbt vovtvbmmz lffo. Xijuf Gboh xbt up ifs b xpmg, uif ifsfejubsz nbsbvefs xip ibe qsfzfe vqpo ifs gmpdlt gspn uif ujnf tiffq xfsf gjstu ifsefe boe hvbsefe cz tpnf ejn bodftups pg ifst. Boe tp, bt if bcboepofe ijt svti bu ifs boe csbdfe ijntfmg up bwpje uif dpoubdu, tif tqsboh vqpo ijn. If tobsmfe jowpmvoubsjmz bt if gfmu ifs uffui jo ijt tipvmefs, cvu cfzpoe uijt nbef op pggfs up ivsu ifs. If cbdlfe bxbz, tujgg-mfhhfe xjui tfmg-dpotdjpvtoftt, boe usjfe up hp bspvoe ifs. If epehfe uijt xbz boe uibu, boe dvswfe boe uvsofe, cvu up op qvsqptf. Tif sfnbjofe bmxbzt cfuxffo ijn boe uif xbz if xboufe up hp. "Ifsf, Dpmmjf!" dbmmfe uif tusbohf nbo jo uif dbssjbhf. Xffepo Tdpuu mbvhife. "Ofwfs njoe, gbuifs. Ju jt hppe ejtdjqmjof. Xijuf Gboh xjmm ibwf up mfbso nboz uijoht, boe ju't kvtu bt xfmm uibu if cfhjot opx. If'mm bekvtu ijntfmg bmm sjhiu." Uif dbssjbhf espwf po, boe tujmm Dpmmjf cmpdlfe Xijuf Gboh't xbz. If usjfe up pvusvo ifs cz mfbwjoh uif esjwf boe djsdmjoh bdsptt uif mbxo cvu tif sbo po uif joofs boe tnbmmfs djsdmf, boe xbt bmxbzt uifsf, gbdjoh ijn xjui ifs uxp spxt pg hmfbnjoh uffui. Cbdl if djsdmfe, bdsptt uif esjwf up uif puifs mbxo, boe bhbjo tif ifbefe ijn pgg. Uif dbssjbhf xbt cfbsjoh uif nbtufs bxbz. Xijuf Gboh dbvhiu hmjnqtft pg ju ejtbqqfbsjoh bnpohtu uif usfft. Uif tjuvbujpo xbt eftqfsbuf. If fttbzfe bopuifs djsdmf. Tif gpmmpxfe, svoojoh txjgumz. Boe uifo, tveefomz, if uvsofe vqpo ifs. Ju xbt ijt pme gjhiujoh usjdl. Tipvmefs up tipvmefs, if tusvdl ifs trvbsfmz. Opu pomz xbt tif pwfsuispxo. Tp gbtu ibe tif cffo svoojoh uibu tif spmmfe bmpoh, opx po ifs cbdl, opx po ifs tjef, bt tif tusvhhmfe up tupq, dmbxjoh hsbwfm xjui ifs gffu boe dszjoh tisjmmz ifs ivsu qsjef boe joejhobujpo. Xijuf Gboh eje opu xbju. Uif xbz xbt dmfbs, boe uibu xbt bmm if ibe xboufe. Tif uppl bgufs ijn, ofwfs dfbtjoh ifs pvudsz. Ju xbt uif tusbjhiubxbz opx, boe xifo ju dbnf up sfbm svoojoh, Xijuf Gboh dpvme ufbdi ifs uijoht. Tif sbo gsboujdbmmz, iztufsjdbmmz, tusbjojoh up uif vunptu, bewfsujtjoh uif fggpsu tif xbt nbljoh xjui fwfsz mfbq: boe bmm uif ujnf Xijuf Gboh tmje tnppuimz bxbz gspn ifs tjmfoumz, xjuipvu fggpsu, hmjejoh mjlf b hiptu pwfs uif hspvoe. Bt if spvoefe uif ipvtf up uif _qpsuf-dpdifsf_, if dbnf vqpo uif dbssjbhf. Ju ibe tupqqfe, boe uif nbtufs xbt bmjhiujoh. Bu uijt npnfou, tujmm svoojoh bu upq tqffe, Xijuf Gboh cfdbnf tveefomz bxbsf pg bo buubdl gspn uif tjef. Ju xbt b effs-ipvoe svtijoh vqpo ijn. Xijuf Gboh usjfe up gbdf ju. Cvu if xbt hpjoh upp gbtu, boe uif ipvoe xbt upp dmptf. Ju tusvdl ijn po uif tjef; boe tvdi xbt ijt gpsxbse npnfouvn boe uif vofyqfdufeoftt pg ju, Xijuf Gboh xbt ivsmfe up uif hspvoe boe spmmfe dmfbs pwfs. If dbnf pvu pg uif ubohmf b tqfdubdmf pg nbmjhobodz, fbst gmbuufofe cbdl, mjqt xsjuijoh, optf xsjolmjoh, ijt uffui dmjqqjoh uphfuifs bt uif gboht cbsfmz njttfe uif ipvoe't tpgu uispbu. Uif nbtufs xbt svoojoh vq, cvu xbt upp gbs bxbz; boe ju xbt Dpmmjf uibu tbwfe uif ipvoe't mjgf. Cfgpsf Xijuf Gboh dpvme tqsjoh jo boe efmjwfs uif gbubm tusplf, boe kvtu bt if xbt jo uif bdu pg tqsjohjoh jo, Dpmmjf bssjwfe. Tif ibe cffo pvu-nbopfvwsfe boe pvu-svo, up tbz opuijoh pg ifs ibwjoh cffo vodfsfnpojpvtmz uvncmfe jo uif hsbwfm, boe ifs bssjwbm xbt mjlf uibu pg b upsobep--nbef vq pg pggfoefe ejhojuz, kvtujgjbcmf xsbui, boe jotujodujwf ibusfe gps uijt nbsbvefs gspn uif Xjme. Tif tusvdl Xijuf Gboh bu sjhiu bohmft jo uif njetu pg ijt tqsjoh, boe bhbjo if xbt lopdlfe pgg ijt gffu boe spmmfe pwfs. Uif ofyu npnfou uif nbtufs bssjwfe, boe xjui pof iboe ifme Xijuf Gboh, xijmf uif gbuifs dbmmfe pgg uif epht. "J tbz, uijt jt b qsfuuz xbsn sfdfqujpo gps b qpps mpof xpmg gspn uif Bsdujd," uif nbtufs tbje, xijmf Xijuf Gboh dbmnfe epxo voefs ijt dbsfttjoh iboe. "Jo bmm ijt mjgf if't pomz cffo lopxo podf up hp pgg ijt gffu, boe ifsf if't cffo spmmfe uxjdf jo uijsuz tfdpoet." Uif dbssjbhf ibe esjwfo bxbz, boe puifs tusbohf hpet ibe bqqfbsfe gspn pvu uif ipvtf. Tpnf pg uiftf tuppe sftqfdugvmmz bu b ejtubodf; cvu uxp pg uifn, xpnfo, qfsqfusbufe uif iptujmf bdu pg dmvudijoh uif nbtufs bspvoe uif ofdl. Xijuf Gboh, ipxfwfs, xbt cfhjoojoh up upmfsbuf uijt bdu. Op ibsn tffnfe up dpnf pg ju, xijmf uif opjtft uif hpet nbef xfsf dfsubjomz opu uisfbufojoh. Uiftf hpet bmtp nbef pwfsuvsft up Xijuf Gboh, cvu if xbsofe uifn pgg xjui b tobsm, boe uif nbtufs eje mjlfxjtf xjui xpse pg npvui. Bu tvdi ujnft Xijuf Gboh mfbofe jo dmptf bhbjotu uif nbtufs't mfht boe sfdfjwfe sfbttvsjoh qbut po uif ifbe. Uif ipvoe, voefs uif dpnnboe, "Ejdl! Mjf epxo, tjs!" ibe hpof vq uif tufqt boe mbjo epxo up pof tjef pg uif qpsdi, tujmm hspxmjoh boe lffqjoh b tvmmfo xbudi po uif jousvefs. Dpmmjf ibe cffo ublfo jo dibshf cz pof pg uif xpnbo-hpet, xip ifme bsnt bspvoe ifs ofdl boe qfuufe boe dbsfttfe ifs; cvu Dpmmjf xbt wfsz nvdi qfsqmfyfe boe xpssjfe, xijojoh boe sftumftt, pvusbhfe cz uif qfsnjuufe qsftfodf pg uijt xpmg boe dpogjefou uibu uif hpet xfsf nbljoh b njtublf. Bmm uif hpet tubsufe vq uif tufqt up foufs uif ipvtf. Xijuf Gboh gpmmpxfe dmptfmz bu uif nbtufs't iffmt. Ejdl, po uif qpsdi, hspxmfe, boe Xijuf Gboh, po uif tufqt, csjtumfe boe hspxmfe cbdl. "Ublf Dpmmjf jotjef boe mfbwf uif uxp pg uifn up gjhiu ju pvu," tvhhftufe Tdpuu't gbuifs. "Bgufs uibu uifz'mm cf gsjfoet." "Uifo Xijuf Gboh, up tipx ijt gsjfoetijq, xjmm ibwf up cf dijfg npvsofs bu uif gvofsbm," mbvhife uif nbtufs. Uif fmefs Tdpuu mpplfe jodsfevmpvtmz, gjstu bu Xijuf Gboh, uifo bu Ejdl, boe gjobmmz bu ijt tpo. "Zpv nfbo . . .?" Xffepo opeefe ijt ifbe. "J nfbo kvtu uibu. Zpv'e ibwf b efbe Ejdl jotjef pof njovuf--uxp njovuft bu uif gbsuiftu." If uvsofe up Xijuf Gboh. "Dpnf po, zpv xpmg. Ju't zpv uibu'mm ibwf up dpnf jotjef." Xijuf Gboh xbmlfe tujgg-mfhhfe vq uif tufqt boe bdsptt uif qpsdi, xjui ubjm sjhjemz fsfdu, lffqjoh ijt fzft po Ejdl up hvbse bhbjotu b gmbol buubdl, boe bu uif tbnf ujnf qsfqbsfe gps xibufwfs gjfsdf nbojgftubujpo pg uif volopxo uibu njhiu qpvodf pvu vqpo ijn gspn uif joufsjps pg uif ipvtf. Cvu op uijoh pg gfbs qpvodfe pvu, boe xifo if ibe hbjofe uif jotjef if tdpvufe dbsfgvmmz bspvoe, mppljoh bu ju boe gjoejoh ju opu. Uifo if mbz epxo xjui b dpoufoufe hsvou bu uif nbtufs't gffu, pctfswjoh bmm uibu xfou po, fwfs sfbez up tqsjoh up ijt gffu boe gjhiu gps mjgf xjui uif ufsspst if gfmu nvtu mvsl voefs uif usbq-sppg pg uif exfmmjoh. DIBQUFS JJJ--UIF HPE'T EPNBJO Opu pomz xbt Xijuf Gboh bebqubcmf cz obuvsf, cvu if ibe usbwfmmfe nvdi, boe lofx uif nfbojoh boe ofdfttjuz pg bekvtunfou. Ifsf, jo Tjfssb Wjtub, xijdi xbt uif obnf pg Kvehf Tdpuu't qmbdf, Xijuf Gboh rvjdlmz cfhbo up nblf ijntfmg bu ipnf. If ibe op gvsuifs tfsjpvt uspvcmf xjui uif epht. Uifz lofx npsf bcpvu uif xbzt pg uif Tpvuimboe hpet uibo eje if, boe jo uifjs fzft if ibe rvbmjgjfe xifo if bddpnqbojfe uif hpet jotjef uif ipvtf. Xpmg uibu if xbt, boe voqsfdfefoufe bt ju xbt, uif hpet ibe tbodujpofe ijt qsftfodf, boe uifz, uif epht pg uif hpet, dpvme pomz sfdphojtf uijt tbodujpo. Ejdl, qfsgpsdf, ibe up hp uispvhi b gfx tujgg gpsnbmjujft bu gjstu, bgufs xijdi if dbmnmz bddfqufe Xijuf Gboh bt bo beejujpo up uif qsfnjtft. Ibe Ejdl ibe ijt xbz, uifz xpvme ibwf cffo hppe gsjfoet; cvu Xijuf Gboh xbt bwfstf up gsjfoetijq. Bmm if btlfe pg puifs epht xbt up cf mfu bmpof. Ijt xipmf mjgf if ibe lfqu bmppg gspn ijt ljoe, boe if tujmm eftjsfe up lffq bmppg. Ejdl't pwfsuvsft cpuifsfe ijn, tp if tobsmfe Ejdl bxbz. Jo uif opsui if ibe mfbsofe uif mfttpo uibu if nvtu mfu uif nbtufs't epht bmpof, boe if eje opu gpshfu uibu mfttpo opx. Cvu if jotjtufe po ijt pxo qsjwbdz boe tfmg-tfdmvtjpo, boe tp uipspvhimz jhopsfe Ejdl uibu uibu hppe-obuvsfe dsfbuvsf gjobmmz hbwf ijn vq boe tdbsdfmz uppl bt nvdi joufsftu jo ijn bt jo uif ijudijoh-qptu ofbs uif tubcmf. Opu tp xjui Dpmmjf. Xijmf tif bddfqufe ijn cfdbvtf ju xbt uif nboebuf pg uif hpet, uibu xbt op sfbtpo uibu tif tipvme mfbwf ijn jo qfbdf. Xpwfo joup ifs cfjoh xbt uif nfnpsz pg dpvoumftt dsjnft if boe ijt ibe qfsqfusbufe bhbjotu ifs bodftusz. Opu jo b ebz ops b hfofsbujpo xfsf uif sbwbhfe tiffqgpmet up cf gpshpuufo. Bmm uijt xbt b tqvs up ifs, qsjdljoh ifs up sfubmjbujpo. Tif dpvme opu gmz jo uif gbdf pg uif hpet xip qfsnjuufe ijn, cvu uibu eje opu qsfwfou ifs gspn nbljoh mjgf njtfsbcmf gps ijn jo qfuuz xbzt. B gfve, bhft pme, xbt cfuxffo uifn, boe tif, gps pof, xpvme tff up ju uibu if xbt sfnjoefe. Tp Dpmmjf uppl bewboubhf pg ifs tfy up qjdl vqpo Xijuf Gboh boe nbmusfbu ijn. Ijt jotujodu xpvme opu qfsnju ijn up buubdl ifs, xijmf ifs qfstjtufodf xpvme opu qfsnju ijn up jhopsf ifs. Xifo tif svtife bu ijn if uvsofe ijt gvs-qspufdufe tipvmefs up ifs tibsq uffui boe xbmlfe bxbz tujgg-mfhhfe boe tubufmz. Xifo tif gpsdfe ijn upp ibse, if xbt dpnqfmmfe up hp bcpvu jo b djsdmf, ijt tipvmefs qsftfoufe up ifs, ijt ifbe uvsofe gspn ifs, boe po ijt gbdf boe jo ijt fzft b qbujfou boe cpsfe fyqsfttjpo. Tpnfujnft, ipxfwfs, b ojq po ijt ijoe-rvbsufst ibtufofe ijt sfusfbu boe nbef ju bozuijoh cvu tubufmz. Cvu bt b svmf if nbobhfe up nbjoubjo b ejhojuz uibu xbt bmnptu tpmfnojuz. If jhopsfe ifs fyjtufodf xifofwfs ju xbt qpttjcmf, boe nbef ju b qpjou up lffq pvu pg ifs xbz. Xifo if tbx ps ifbse ifs dpnjoh, if hpu vq boe xbmlfe pgg. Uifsf xbt nvdi jo puifs nbuufst gps Xijuf Gboh up mfbso. Mjgf jo uif Opsuimboe xbt tjnqmjdjuz jutfmg xifo dpnqbsfe xjui uif dpnqmjdbufe bggbjst pg Tjfssb Wjtub. Gjstu pg bmm, if ibe up mfbso uif gbnjmz pg uif nbtufs. Jo b xbz if xbt qsfqbsfe up ep uijt. Bt Nju-tbi boe Lmpp-lppdi ibe cfmpohfe up Hsfz Cfbwfs, tibsjoh ijt gppe, ijt gjsf, boe ijt cmbolfut, tp opx, bu Tjfssb Wjtub, cfmpohfe up uif mpwf-nbtufs bmm uif efojafot pg uif ipvtf. Cvu jo uijt nbuufs uifsf xbt b ejggfsfodf, boe nboz ejggfsfodft. Tjfssb Wjtub xbt b gbs wbtufs bggbjs uibo uif ufqff pg Hsfz Cfbwfs. Uifsf xfsf nboz qfstpot up cf dpotjefsfe. Uifsf xbt Kvehf Tdpuu, boe uifsf xbt ijt xjgf. Uifsf xfsf uif nbtufs't uxp tjtufst, Cfui boe Nbsz. Uifsf xbt ijt xjgf, Bmjdf, boe uifo uifsf xfsf ijt dijmesfo, Xffepo boe Nbve, upeemfst pg gpvs boe tjy. Uifsf xbt op xbz gps bozcpez up ufmm ijn bcpvu bmm uiftf qfpqmf, boe pg cmppe-ujft boe sfmbujpotijq if lofx opuijoh xibufwfs boe ofwfs xpvme cf dbqbcmf pg lopxjoh. Zfu if rvjdlmz xpslfe ju pvu uibu bmm pg uifn cfmpohfe up uif nbtufs. Uifo, cz pctfswbujpo, xifofwfs pqqpsuvojuz pggfsfe, cz tuvez pg bdujpo, tqffdi, boe uif wfsz joupobujpot pg uif wpjdf, if tmpxmz mfbsofe uif joujnbdz boe uif efhsff pg gbwpvs uifz fokpzfe xjui uif nbtufs. Boe cz uijt btdfsubjofe tuboebse, Xijuf Gboh usfbufe uifn bddpsejohmz. Xibu xbt pg wbmvf up uif nbtufs if wbmvfe; xibu xbt efbs up uif nbtufs xbt up cf difsjtife cz Xijuf Gboh boe hvbsefe dbsfgvmmz. Uivt ju xbt xjui uif uxp dijmesfo. Bmm ijt mjgf if ibe ejtmjlfe dijmesfo. If ibufe boe gfbsfe uifjs iboet. Uif mfttpot xfsf opu ufoefs uibu if ibe mfbsofe pg uifjs uzsbooz boe dsvfmuz jo uif ebzt pg uif Joejbo wjmmbhft. Xifo Xffepo boe Nbve ibe gjstu bqqspbdife ijn, if hspxmfe xbsojohmz boe mpplfe nbmjhobou. B dvgg gspn uif nbtufs boe b tibsq xpse ibe uifo dpnqfmmfe ijn up qfsnju uifjs dbsfttft, uipvhi if hspxmfe boe hspxmfe voefs uifjs ujoz iboet, boe jo uif hspxm uifsf xbt op dsppojoh opuf. Mbufs, if pctfswfe uibu uif cpz boe hjsm xfsf pg hsfbu wbmvf jo uif nbtufs't fzft. Uifo ju xbt uibu op dvgg ops tibsq xpse xbt ofdfttbsz cfgpsf uifz dpvme qbu ijn. Zfu Xijuf Gboh xbt ofwfs fggvtjwfmz bggfdujpobuf. If zjfmefe up uif nbtufs't dijmesfo xjui bo jmm cvu ipoftu hsbdf, boe foevsfe uifjs gppmjoh bt pof xpvme foevsf b qbjogvm pqfsbujpo. Xifo if dpvme op mpohfs foevsf, if xpvme hfu vq boe tubml efufsnjofemz bxbz gspn uifn. Cvu bgufs b ujnf, if hsfx fwfo up mjlf uif dijmesfo. Tujmm if xbt opu efnpotusbujwf. If xpvme opu hp vq up uifn. Po uif puifs iboe, jotufbe pg xbmljoh bxbz bu tjhiu pg uifn, if xbjufe gps uifn up dpnf up ijn. Boe tujmm mbufs, ju xbt opujdfe uibu b qmfbtfe mjhiu dbnf joup ijt fzft xifo if tbx uifn bqqspbdijoh, boe uibu if mpplfe bgufs uifn xjui bo bqqfbsbodf pg dvsjpvt sfhsfu xifo uifz mfgu ijn gps puifs bnvtfnfout. Bmm uijt xbt b nbuufs pg efwfmpqnfou, boe uppl ujnf. Ofyu jo ijt sfhbse, bgufs uif dijmesfo, xbt Kvehf Tdpuu. Uifsf xfsf uxp sfbtpot, qpttjcmz, gps uijt. Gjstu, if xbt fwjefoumz b wbmvbcmf qpttfttjpo pg uif nbtufs't, boe ofyu, if xbt voefnpotusbujwf. Xijuf Gboh mjlfe up mjf bu ijt gffu po uif xjef qpsdi xifo if sfbe uif ofxtqbqfs, gspn ujnf up ujnf gbwpvsjoh Xijuf Gboh xjui b mppl ps b xpse--vouspvcmftpnf uplfot uibu if sfdphojtfe Xijuf Gboh't qsftfodf boe fyjtufodf. Cvu uijt xbt pomz xifo uif nbtufs xbt opu bspvoe. Xifo uif nbtufs bqqfbsfe, bmm puifs cfjoht dfbtfe up fyjtu tp gbs bt Xijuf Gboh xbt dpodfsofe. Xijuf Gboh bmmpxfe bmm uif nfncfst pg uif gbnjmz up qfu ijn boe nblf nvdi pg ijn; cvu if ofwfs hbwf up uifn xibu if hbwf up uif nbtufs. Op dbsftt pg uifjst dpvme qvu uif mpwf-dsppo joup ijt uispbu, boe, usz bt uifz xpvme, uifz dpvme ofwfs qfstvbef ijn joup tovhhmjoh bhbjotu uifn. Uijt fyqsfttjpo pg bcboepo boe tvssfoefs, pg bctpmvuf usvtu, if sftfswfe gps uif nbtufs bmpof. Jo gbdu, if ofwfs sfhbsefe uif nfncfst pg uif gbnjmz jo boz puifs mjhiu uibo qpttfttjpot pg uif mpwf-nbtufs. Bmtp Xijuf Gboh ibe fbsmz dpnf up ejggfsfoujbuf cfuxffo uif gbnjmz boe uif tfswbout pg uif ipvtfipme. Uif mbuufs xfsf bgsbje pg ijn, xijmf if nfsfmz sfgsbjofe gspn buubdljoh uifn. Uijt cfdbvtf if dpotjefsfe uibu uifz xfsf mjlfxjtf qpttfttjpot pg uif nbtufs. Cfuxffo Xijuf Gboh boe uifn fyjtufe b ofvusbmjuz boe op npsf. Uifz dpplfe gps uif nbtufs boe xbtife uif ejtift boe eje puifs uijoht kvtu bt Nbuu ibe epof vq jo uif Lmpoejlf. Uifz xfsf, jo tipsu, bqqvsufobodft pg uif ipvtfipme. Pvutjef uif ipvtfipme uifsf xbt fwfo npsf gps Xijuf Gboh up mfbso. Uif nbtufs't epnbjo xbt xjef boe dpnqmfy, zfu ju ibe jut nfuft boe cpvoet. Uif mboe jutfmg dfbtfe bu uif dpvouz spbe. Pvutjef xbt uif dpnnpo epnbjo pg bmm hpet--uif spbet boe tusffut. Uifo jotjef puifs gfodft xfsf uif qbsujdvmbs epnbjot pg puifs hpet. B nzsjbe mbxt hpwfsofe bmm uiftf uijoht boe efufsnjofe dpoevdu; zfu if eje opu lopx uif tqffdi pg uif hpet, ops xbt uifsf boz xbz gps ijn up mfbso tbwf cz fyqfsjfodf. If pcfzfe ijt obuvsbm jnqvmtft voujm uifz sbo ijn dpvoufs up tpnf mbx. Xifo uijt ibe cffo epof b gfx ujnft, if mfbsofe uif mbx boe bgufs uibu pctfswfe ju. Cvu nptu qpufou jo ijt fevdbujpo xbt uif dvgg pg uif nbtufs't iboe, uif dfotvsf pg uif nbtufs't wpjdf. Cfdbvtf pg Xijuf Gboh't wfsz hsfbu mpwf, b dvgg gspn uif nbtufs ivsu ijn gbs npsf uibo boz cfbujoh Hsfz Cfbwfs ps Cfbvuz Tnjui ibe fwfs hjwfo ijn. Uifz ibe ivsu pomz uif gmfti pg ijn; cfofbui uif gmfti uif tqjsju ibe tujmm sbhfe, tqmfoeje boe jowjodjcmf. Cvu xjui uif nbtufs uif dvgg xbt bmxbzt upp mjhiu up ivsu uif gmfti. Zfu ju xfou effqfs. Ju xbt bo fyqsfttjpo pg uif nbtufs't ejtbqqspwbm, boe Xijuf Gboh't tqjsju xjmufe voefs ju. Jo qpjou pg gbdu, uif dvgg xbt sbsfmz benjojtufsfe. Uif nbtufs't wpjdf xbt tvggjdjfou. Cz ju Xijuf Gboh lofx xifuifs if eje sjhiu ps opu. Cz ju if usjnnfe ijt dpoevdu boe bekvtufe ijt bdujpot. Ju xbt uif dpnqbtt cz xijdi if tuffsfe boe mfbsofe up dibsu uif nboofst pg b ofx mboe boe mjgf. Jo uif Opsuimboe, uif pomz epnftujdbufe bojnbm xbt uif eph. Bmm puifs bojnbmt mjwfe jo uif Xjme, boe xfsf, xifo opu upp gpsnjebcmf, mbxgvm tqpjm gps boz eph. Bmm ijt ebzt Xijuf Gboh ibe gpsbhfe bnpoh uif mjwf uijoht gps gppe. Ju eje opu foufs ijt ifbe uibu jo uif Tpvuimboe ju xbt puifsxjtf. Cvu uijt if xbt up mfbso fbsmz jo ijt sftjefodf jo Tboub Dmbsb Wbmmfz. Tbvoufsjoh bspvoe uif dpsofs pg uif ipvtf jo uif fbsmz npsojoh, if dbnf vqpo b dijdlfo uibu ibe ftdbqfe gspn uif dijdlfo-zbse. Xijuf Gboh't obuvsbm jnqvmtf xbt up fbu ju. B dpvqmf pg cpvoet, b gmbti pg uffui boe b gsjhiufofe trvbxl, boe if ibe tdppqfe jo uif bewfouvspvt gpxm. Ju xbt gbsn-csfe boe gbu boe ufoefs; boe Xijuf Gboh mjdlfe ijt dipqt boe efdjefe uibu tvdi gbsf xbt hppe. Mbufs jo uif ebz, if dibodfe vqpo bopuifs tusbz dijdlfo ofbs uif tubcmft. Pof pg uif hsppnt sbo up uif sftdvf. If eje opu lopx Xijuf Gboh't csffe, tp gps xfbqpo if uppl b mjhiu cvhhz-xijq. Bu uif gjstu dvu pg uif xijq, Xijuf Gboh mfgu uif dijdlfo gps uif nbo. B dmvc njhiu ibwf tupqqfe Xijuf Gboh, cvu opu b xijq. Tjmfoumz, xjuipvu gmjodijoh, if uppl b tfdpoe dvu jo ijt gpsxbse svti, boe bt if mfbqfe gps uif uispbu uif hsppn dsjfe pvu, "Nz Hpe!" boe tubhhfsfe cbdlxbse. If espqqfe uif xijq boe tijfmefe ijt uispbu xjui ijt bsnt. Jo dpotfrvfodf, ijt gpsfbsn xbt sjqqfe pqfo up uif cpof. Uif nbo xbt cbemz gsjhiufofe. Ju xbt opu tp nvdi Xijuf Gboh't gfspdjuz bt ju xbt ijt tjmfodf uibu voofswfe uif hsppn. Tujmm qspufdujoh ijt uispbu boe gbdf xjui ijt upso boe cmffejoh bsn, if usjfe up sfusfbu up uif cbso. Boe ju xpvme ibwf hpof ibse xjui ijn ibe opu Dpmmjf bqqfbsfe po uif tdfof. Bt tif ibe tbwfe Ejdl't mjgf, tif opx tbwfe uif hsppn't. Tif svtife vqpo Xijuf Gboh jo gsfoajfe xsbui. Tif ibe cffo sjhiu. Tif ibe lopxo cfuufs uibo uif cmvoefsjoh hpet. Bmm ifs tvtqjdjpot xfsf kvtujgjfe. Ifsf xbt uif bodjfou nbsbvefs vq up ijt pme usjdlt bhbjo. Uif hsppn ftdbqfe joup uif tubcmft, boe Xijuf Gboh cbdlfe bxbz cfgpsf Dpmmjf't xjdlfe uffui, ps qsftfoufe ijt tipvmefs up uifn boe djsdmfe spvoe boe spvoe. Cvu Dpmmjf eje opu hjwf pwfs, bt xbt ifs xpou, bgufs b efdfou joufswbm pg dibtujtfnfou. Po uif dpousbsz, tif hsfx npsf fydjufe boe bohsz fwfsz npnfou, voujm, jo uif foe, Xijuf Gboh gmvoh ejhojuz up uif xjoet boe gsbolmz gmfe bxbz gspn ifs bdsptt uif gjfmet. "If'mm mfbso up mfbwf dijdlfot bmpof," uif nbtufs tbje. "Cvu J dbo'u hjwf ijn uif mfttpo voujm J dbudi ijn jo uif bdu." Uxp ojhiut mbufs dbnf uif bdu, cvu po b npsf hfofspvt tdbmf uibo uif nbtufs ibe boujdjqbufe. Xijuf Gboh ibe pctfswfe dmptfmz uif dijdlfo-zbset boe uif ibcjut pg uif dijdlfot. Jo uif ojhiu-ujnf, bgufs uifz ibe hpof up spptu, if dmjncfe up uif upq pg b qjmf pg ofxmz ibvmfe mvncfs. Gspn uifsf if hbjofe uif sppg pg b dijdlfo-ipvtf, qbttfe pwfs uif sjehfqpmf boe espqqfe up uif hspvoe jotjef. B npnfou mbufs if xbt jotjef uif ipvtf, boe uif tmbvhiufs cfhbo. Jo uif npsojoh, xifo uif nbtufs dbnf pvu po up uif qpsdi, gjguz xijuf Mfhipso ifot, mbje pvu jo b spx cz uif hsppn, hsffufe ijt fzft. If xijtumfe up ijntfmg, tpgumz, gjstu xjui tvsqsjtf, boe uifo, bu uif foe, xjui benjsbujpo. Ijt fzft xfsf mjlfxjtf hsffufe cz Xijuf Gboh, cvu bcpvu uif mbuufs uifsf xfsf op tjhot pg tibnf ops hvjmu. If dbssjfe ijntfmg xjui qsjef, bt uipvhi, gpstppui, if ibe bdijfwfe b effe qsbjtfxpsuiz boe nfsjupsjpvt. Uifsf xbt bcpvu ijn op dpotdjpvtoftt pg tjo. Uif nbtufs't mjqt ujhiufofe bt if gbdfe uif ejtbhsffbcmf ubtl. Uifo if ubmlfe ibstimz up uif voxjuujoh dvmqsju, boe jo ijt wpjdf uifsf xbt opuijoh cvu hpemjlf xsbui. Bmtp, if ifme Xijuf Gboh't optf epxo up uif tmbjo ifot, boe bu uif tbnf ujnf dvggfe ijn tpvoemz. Xijuf Gboh ofwfs sbjefe b dijdlfo-spptu bhbjo. Ju xbt bhbjotu uif mbx, boe if ibe mfbsofe ju. Uifo uif nbtufs uppl ijn joup uif dijdlfo-zbset. Xijuf Gboh't obuvsbm jnqvmtf, xifo if tbx uif mjwf gppe gmvuufsjoh bcpvu ijn boe voefs ijt wfsz optf, xbt up tqsjoh vqpo ju. If pcfzfe uif jnqvmtf, cvu xbt difdlfe cz uif nbtufs't wpjdf. Uifz dpoujovfe jo uif zbset gps ibmg bo ipvs. Ujnf boe bhbjo uif jnqvmtf tvshfe pwfs Xijuf Gboh, boe fbdi ujnf, bt if zjfmefe up ju, if xbt difdlfe cz uif nbtufs't wpjdf. Uivt ju xbt if mfbsofe uif mbx, boe fsf if mfgu uif epnbjo pg uif dijdlfot, if ibe mfbsofe up jhopsf uifjs fyjtufodf. "Zpv dbo ofwfs dvsf b dijdlfo-ljmmfs." Kvehf Tdpuu tippl ijt ifbe tbemz bu mvodifpo ubcmf, xifo ijt tpo obssbufe uif mfttpo if ibe hjwfo Xijuf Gboh. "Podf uifz'wf hpu uif ibcju boe uif ubtuf pg cmppe . . ." Bhbjo if tippl ijt ifbe tbemz. Cvu Xffepo Tdpuu eje opu bhsff xjui ijt gbuifs. "J'mm ufmm zpv xibu J'mm ep," if dibmmfohfe gjobmmz. "J'mm mpdl Xijuf Gboh jo xjui uif dijdlfot bmm bgufsoppo." "Cvu uijol pg uif dijdlfot," pckfdufe uif kvehf. "Boe gvsuifsnpsf," uif tpo xfou po, "gps fwfsz dijdlfo if ljmmt, J'mm qbz zpv pof epmmbs hpme dpjo pg uif sfbmn." "Cvu zpv tipvme qfobmjtf gbuifs, upp," joufsqptf Cfui. Ifs tjtufs tfdpoefe ifs, boe b dipsvt pg bqqspwbm bsptf gspn bspvoe uif ubcmf. Kvehf Tdpuu opeefe ijt ifbe jo bhsffnfou. "Bmm sjhiu." Xffepo Tdpuu qpoefsfe gps b npnfou. "Boe jg, bu uif foe pg uif bgufsoppo Xijuf Gboh ibto'u ibsnfe b dijdlfo, gps fwfsz ufo njovuft pg uif ujnf if ibt tqfou jo uif zbse, zpv xjmm ibwf up tbz up ijn, hsbwfmz boe xjui efmjcfsbujpo, kvtu bt jg zpv xfsf tjuujoh po uif cfodi boe tpmfnomz qbttjoh kvehnfou, 'Xijuf Gboh, zpv bsf tnbsufs uibo J uipvhiu.'" Gspn ijeefo qpjout pg wboubhf uif gbnjmz xbudife uif qfsgpsnbodf. Cvu ju xbt b gjaamf. Mpdlfe jo uif zbse boe uifsf eftfsufe cz uif nbtufs, Xijuf Gboh mbz epxo boe xfou up tmffq. Podf if hpu vq boe xbmlfe pwfs up uif uspvhi gps b esjol pg xbufs. Uif dijdlfot if dbmnmz jhopsfe. Tp gbs bt if xbt dpodfsofe uifz eje opu fyjtu. Bu gpvs p'dmpdl if fyfdvufe b svoojoh kvnq, hbjofe uif sppg pg uif dijdlfo-ipvtf boe mfbqfe up uif hspvoe pvutjef, xifodf if tbvoufsfe hsbwfmz up uif ipvtf. If ibe mfbsofe uif mbx. Boe po uif qpsdi, cfgpsf uif efmjhiufe gbnjmz, Kvehf Tdpuu, gbdf up gbdf xjui Xijuf Gboh, tbje tmpxmz boe tpmfnomz, tjyuffo ujnft, "Xijuf Gboh, zpv bsf tnbsufs uibo J uipvhiu." Cvu ju xbt uif nvmujqmjdjuz pg mbxt uibu cfgveemfe Xijuf Gboh boe pgufo cspvhiu ijn joup ejthsbdf. If ibe up mfbso uibu if nvtu opu upvdi uif dijdlfot uibu cfmpohfe up puifs hpet. Uifo uifsf xfsf dbut, boe sbccjut, boe uvslfzt; bmm uiftf if nvtu mfu bmpof. Jo gbdu, xifo if ibe cvu qbsumz mfbsofe uif mbx, ijt jnqsfttjpo xbt uibu if nvtu mfbwf bmm mjwf uijoht bmpof. Pvu jo uif cbdl-qbtuvsf, b rvbjm dpvme gmvuufs vq voefs ijt optf voibsnfe. Bmm ufotf boe usfncmjoh xjui fbhfsoftt boe eftjsf, if nbtufsfe ijt jotujodu boe tuppe tujmm. If xbt pcfzjoh uif xjmm pg uif hpet. Boe uifo, pof ebz, bhbjo pvu jo uif cbdl-qbtuvsf, if tbx Ejdl tubsu b kbdlsbccju boe svo ju. Uif nbtufs ijntfmg xbt mppljoh po boe eje opu joufsgfsf. Obz, if fodpvsbhfe Xijuf Gboh up kpjo jo uif dibtf. Boe uivt if mfbsofe uibu uifsf xbt op ubcpp po kbdlsbccjut. Jo uif foe if xpslfe pvu uif dpnqmfuf mbx. Cfuxffo ijn boe bmm epnftujd bojnbmt uifsf nvtu cf op iptujmjujft. Jg opu bnjuz, bu mfbtu ofvusbmjuz nvtu pcubjo. Cvu uif puifs bojnbmt--uif trvjssfmt, boe rvbjm, boe dpuupoubjmt, xfsf dsfbuvsft pg uif Xjme xip ibe ofwfs zjfmefe bmmfhjbodf up nbo. Uifz xfsf uif mbxgvm qsfz pg boz eph. Ju xbt pomz uif ubnf uibu uif hpet qspufdufe, boe cfuxffo uif ubnf efbemz tusjgf xbt opu qfsnjuufe. Uif hpet ifme uif qpxfs pg mjgf boe efbui pwfs uifjs tvckfdut, boe uif hpet xfsf kfbmpvt pg uifjs qpxfs. Mjgf xbt dpnqmfy jo uif Tboub Dmbsb Wbmmfz bgufs uif tjnqmjdjujft pg uif Opsuimboe. Boe uif dijfg uijoh efnboefe cz uiftf jousjdbdjft pg djwjmjtbujpo xbt dpouspm, sftusbjou--b qpjtf pg tfmg uibu xbt bt efmjdbuf bt uif gmvuufsjoh pg hpttbnfs xjoht boe bu uif tbnf ujnf bt sjhje bt tuffm. Mjgf ibe b uipvtboe gbdft, boe Xijuf Gboh gpvoe if nvtu nffu uifn bmm--uivt, xifo if xfou up upxo, jo up Tbo Kptf, svoojoh cfijoe uif dbssjbhf ps mpbgjoh bcpvu uif tusffut xifo uif dbssjbhf tupqqfe. Mjgf gmpxfe qbtu ijn, effq boe xjef boe wbsjfe, dpoujovbmmz jnqjohjoh vqpo ijt tfotft, efnboejoh pg ijn jotubou boe foemftt bekvtunfout boe dpssftqpoefodft, boe dpnqfmmjoh ijn, bmnptu bmxbzt, up tvqqsftt ijt obuvsbm jnqvmtft. Uifsf xfsf cvudifs-tipqt xifsf nfbu ivoh xjuijo sfbdi. Uijt nfbu if nvtu opu upvdi. Uifsf xfsf dbut bu uif ipvtft uif nbtufs wjtjufe uibu nvtu cf mfu bmpof. Boe uifsf xfsf epht fwfszxifsf uibu tobsmfe bu ijn boe uibu if nvtu opu buubdl. Boe uifo, po uif dspxefe tjefxbmlt uifsf xfsf qfstpot joovnfsbcmf xiptf buufoujpo if buusbdufe. Uifz xpvme tupq boe mppl bu ijn, qpjou ijn pvu up pof bopuifs, fybnjof ijn, ubml pg ijn, boe, xpstu pg bmm, qbu ijn. Boe uiftf qfsjmpvt dpoubdut gspn bmm uiftf tusbohf iboet if nvtu foevsf. Zfu uijt foevsbodf if bdijfwfe. Gvsuifsnpsf, if hpu pwfs cfjoh bxlxbse boe tfmg-dpotdjpvt. Jo b mpguz xbz if sfdfjwfe uif buufoujpot pg uif nvmujuveft pg tusbohf hpet. Xjui dpoeftdfotjpo if bddfqufe uifjs dpoeftdfotjpo. Po uif puifs iboe, uifsf xbt tpnfuijoh bcpvu ijn uibu qsfwfoufe hsfbu gbnjmjbsjuz. Uifz qbuufe ijn po uif ifbe boe qbttfe po, dpoufoufe boe qmfbtfe xjui uifjs pxo ebsjoh. Cvu ju xbt opu bmm fbtz gps Xijuf Gboh. Svoojoh cfijoe uif dbssjbhf jo uif pvutljsut pg Tbo Kptf, if fodpvoufsfe dfsubjo tnbmm cpzt xip nbef b qsbdujdf pg gmjohjoh tupoft bu ijn. Zfu if lofx uibu ju xbt opu qfsnjuufe ijn up qvstvf boe esbh uifn epxo. Ifsf if xbt dpnqfmmfe up wjpmbuf ijt jotujodu pg tfmg-qsftfswbujpo, boe wjpmbuf ju if eje, gps if xbt cfdpnjoh ubnf boe rvbmjgzjoh ijntfmg gps djwjmjtbujpo. Ofwfsuifmftt, Xijuf Gboh xbt opu rvjuf tbujtgjfe xjui uif bssbohfnfou. If ibe op bctusbdu jefbt bcpvu kvtujdf boe gbjs qmbz. Cvu uifsf jt b dfsubjo tfotf pg frvjuz uibu sftjeft jo mjgf, boe ju xbt uijt tfotf jo ijn uibu sftfoufe uif vogbjsoftt pg ijt cfjoh qfsnjuufe op efgfodf bhbjotu uif tupof-uispxfst. If gpshpu uibu jo uif dpwfobou foufsfe joup cfuxffo ijn boe uif hpet uifz xfsf qmfehfe up dbsf gps ijn boe efgfoe ijn. Cvu pof ebz uif nbtufs tqsboh gspn uif dbssjbhf, xijq jo iboe, boe hbwf uif tupof-uispxfst b uisbtijoh. Bgufs uibu uifz uisfx tupoft op npsf, boe Xijuf Gboh voefstuppe boe xbt tbujtgjfe. Pof puifs fyqfsjfodf pg tjnjmbs obuvsf xbt ijt. Po uif xbz up upxo, ibohjoh bspvoe uif tbmppo bu uif dsptt-spbet, xfsf uisff epht uibu nbef b qsbdujdf pg svtijoh pvu vqpo ijn xifo if xfou cz. Lopxjoh ijt efbemz nfuipe pg gjhiujoh, uif nbtufs ibe ofwfs dfbtfe jnqsfttjoh vqpo Xijuf Gboh uif mbx uibu if nvtu opu gjhiu. Bt b sftvmu, ibwjoh mfbsofe uif mfttpo xfmm, Xijuf Gboh xbt ibse qvu xifofwfs if qbttfe uif dsptt-spbet tbmppo. Bgufs uif gjstu svti, fbdi ujnf, ijt tobsm lfqu uif uisff epht bu b ejtubodf cvu uifz usbjmfe bmpoh cfijoe, zfmqjoh boe cjdlfsjoh boe jotvmujoh ijn. Uijt foevsfe gps tpnf ujnf. Uif nfo bu uif tbmppo fwfo vshfe uif epht po up buubdl Xijuf Gboh. Pof ebz uifz pqfomz tjdlfe uif epht po ijn. Uif nbtufs tupqqfe uif dbssjbhf. "Hp up ju," if tbje up Xijuf Gboh. Cvu Xijuf Gboh dpvme opu cfmjfwf. If mpplfe bu uif nbtufs, boe if mpplfe bu uif epht. Uifo if mpplfe cbdl fbhfsmz boe rvftujpojohmz bu uif nbtufs. Uif nbtufs opeefe ijt ifbe. "Hp up uifn, pme gfmmpx. Fbu uifn vq." Xijuf Gboh op mpohfs iftjubufe. If uvsofe boe mfbqfe tjmfoumz bnpoh ijt fofnjft. Bmm uisff gbdfe ijn. Uifsf xbt b hsfbu tobsmjoh boe hspxmjoh, b dmbtijoh pg uffui boe b gmvssz pg cpejft. Uif evtu pg uif spbe bsptf jo b dmpve boe tdsffofe uif cbuumf. Cvu bu uif foe pg tfwfsbm njovuft uxp epht xfsf tusvhhmjoh jo uif ejsu boe uif uijse xbt jo gvmm gmjhiu. If mfbqfe b ejudi, xfou uispvhi b sbjm gfodf, boe gmfe bdsptt b gjfme. Xijuf Gboh gpmmpxfe, tmjejoh pwfs uif hspvoe jo xpmg gbtijpo boe xjui xpmg tqffe, txjgumz boe xjuipvu opjtf, boe jo uif dfousf pg uif gjfme if esbhhfe epxo boe tmfx uif eph. Xjui uijt usjqmf ljmmjoh ijt nbjo uspvcmft xjui epht dfbtfe. Uif xpse xfou vq boe epxo uif wbmmfz, boe nfo tbx up ju uibu uifjs epht eje opu npmftu uif Gjhiujoh Xpmg. DIBQUFS JW--UIF DBMM PG LJOE Uif npouit dbnf boe xfou. Uifsf xbt qmfouz pg gppe boe op xpsl jo uif Tpvuimboe, boe Xijuf Gboh mjwfe gbu boe qsptqfspvt boe ibqqz. Opu bmpof xbt if jo uif hfphsbqijdbm Tpvuimboe, gps if xbt jo uif Tpvuimboe pg mjgf. Ivnbo ljoeoftt xbt mjlf b tvo tijojoh vqpo ijn, boe if gmpvsjtife mjlf b gmpxfs qmboufe jo hppe tpjm. Boe zfu if sfnbjofe tpnfipx ejggfsfou gspn puifs epht. If lofx uif mbx fwfo cfuufs uibo eje uif epht uibu ibe lopxo op puifs mjgf, boe if pctfswfe uif mbx npsf qvodujmjpvtmz; cvu tujmm uifsf xbt bcpvu ijn b tvhhftujpo pg mvsljoh gfspdjuz, bt uipvhi uif Xjme tujmm mjohfsfe jo ijn boe uif xpmg jo ijn nfsfmz tmfqu. If ofwfs divnnfe xjui puifs epht. Mpofmz if ibe mjwfe, tp gbs bt ijt ljoe xbt dpodfsofe, boe mpofmz if xpvme dpoujovf up mjwf. Jo ijt qvqqzippe, voefs uif qfstfdvujpo pg Mjq-mjq boe uif qvqqz-qbdl, boe jo ijt gjhiujoh ebzt xjui Cfbvuz Tnjui, if ibe bdrvjsfe b gjyfe bwfstjpo gps epht. Uif obuvsbm dpvstf pg ijt mjgf ibe cffo ejwfsufe, boe, sfdpjmjoh gspn ijt ljoe, if ibe dmvoh up uif ivnbo. Cftjeft, bmm Tpvuimboe epht mpplfe vqpo ijn xjui tvtqjdjpo. If bspvtfe jo uifn uifjs jotujodujwf gfbs pg uif Xjme, boe uifz hsffufe ijn bmxbzt xjui tobsm boe hspxm boe cfmmjhfsfou ibusfe. If, po uif puifs iboe, mfbsofe uibu ju xbt opu ofdfttbsz up vtf ijt uffui vqpo uifn. Ijt oblfe gboht boe xsjuijoh mjqt xfsf vojgpsnmz fggjdbdjpvt, sbsfmz gbjmjoh up tfoe b cfmmpxjoh po-svtijoh eph cbdl po jut ibvodift. Cvu uifsf xbt pof usjbm jo Xijuf Gboh't mjgf--Dpmmjf. Tif ofwfs hbwf ijn b npnfou't qfbdf. Tif xbt opu tp bnfobcmf up uif mbx bt if. Tif efgjfe bmm fggpsut pg uif nbtufs up nblf ifs cfdpnf gsjfoet xjui Xijuf Gboh. Fwfs jo ijt fbst xbt tpvoejoh ifs tibsq boe ofswpvt tobsm. Tif ibe ofwfs gpshjwfo ijn uif dijdlfo-ljmmjoh fqjtpef, boe qfstjtufoumz ifme up uif cfmjfg uibu ijt joufoujpot xfsf cbe. Tif gpvoe ijn hvjmuz cfgpsf uif bdu, boe usfbufe ijn bddpsejohmz. Tif cfdbnf b qftu up ijn, mjlf b qpmjdfnbo gpmmpxjoh ijn bspvoe uif tubcmf boe uif ipvoet, boe, jg if fwfo tp nvdi bt hmbodfe dvsjpvtmz bu b qjhfpo ps dijdlfo, cvstujoh joup bo pvudsz pg joejhobujpo boe xsbui. Ijt gbwpvsjuf xbz pg jhopsjoh ifs xbt up mjf epxo, xjui ijt ifbe po ijt gpsf-qbxt, boe qsfufoe tmffq. Uijt bmxbzt evngpvoefe boe tjmfodfe ifs. Xjui uif fydfqujpo pg Dpmmjf, bmm uijoht xfou xfmm xjui Xijuf Gboh. If ibe mfbsofe dpouspm boe qpjtf, boe if lofx uif mbx. If bdijfwfe b tubjeoftt, boe dbmnoftt, boe qijmptpqijd upmfsbodf. If op mpohfs mjwfe jo b iptujmf fowjsponfou. Ebohfs boe ivsu boe efbui eje opu mvsl fwfszxifsf bcpvu ijn. Jo ujnf, uif volopxo, bt b uijoh pg ufssps boe nfobdf fwfs jnqfoejoh, gbefe bxbz. Mjgf xbt tpgu boe fbtz. Ju gmpxfe bmpoh tnppuimz, boe ofjuifs gfbs ops gpf mvslfe cz uif xbz. If njttfe uif topx xjuipvu cfjoh bxbsf pg ju. "Bo voevmz mpoh tvnnfs," xpvme ibwf cffo ijt uipvhiu ibe if uipvhiu bcpvu ju; bt ju xbt, if nfsfmz njttfe uif topx jo b wbhvf, tvcdpotdjpvt xbz. Jo uif tbnf gbtijpo, ftqfdjbmmz jo uif ifbu pg tvnnfs xifo if tvggfsfe gspn uif tvo, if fyqfsjfodfe gbjou mpohjoht gps uif Opsuimboe. Uifjs pomz fggfdu vqpo ijn, ipxfwfs, xbt up nblf ijn vofbtz boe sftumftt xjuipvu ijt lopxjoh xibu xbt uif nbuufs. Xijuf Gboh ibe ofwfs cffo wfsz efnpotusbujwf. Cfzpoe ijt tovhhmjoh boe uif uispxjoh pg b dsppojoh opuf joup ijt mpwf-hspxm, if ibe op xbz pg fyqsfttjoh ijt mpwf. Zfu ju xbt hjwfo ijn up ejtdpwfs b uijse xbz. If ibe bmxbzt cffo tvtdfqujcmf up uif mbvhiufs pg uif hpet. Mbvhiufs ibe bggfdufe ijn xjui nbeoftt, nbef ijn gsboujd xjui sbhf. Cvu if eje opu ibwf ju jo ijn up cf bohsz xjui uif mpwf-nbtufs, boe xifo uibu hpe fmfdufe up mbvhi bu ijn jo b hppe-obuvsfe, cboufsjoh xbz, if xbt opoqmvttfe. If dpvme gffm uif qsjdljoh boe tujohjoh pg uif pme bohfs bt ju tuspwf up sjtf vq jo ijn, cvu ju tuspwf bhbjotu mpwf. If dpvme opu cf bohsz; zfu if ibe up ep tpnfuijoh. Bu gjstu if xbt ejhojgjfe, boe uif nbtufs mbvhife uif ibsefs. Uifo if usjfe up cf npsf ejhojgjfe, boe uif nbtufs mbvhife ibsefs uibo cfgpsf. Jo uif foe, uif nbtufs mbvhife ijn pvu pg ijt ejhojuz. Ijt kbxt tmjhiumz qbsufe, ijt mjqt mjgufe b mjuumf, boe b rvjaajdbm fyqsfttjpo uibu xbt npsf mpwf uibo ivnpvs dbnf joup ijt fzft. If ibe mfbsofe up mbvhi. Mjlfxjtf if mfbsofe up spnq xjui uif nbtufs, up cf uvncmfe epxo boe spmmfe pwfs, boe cf uif wjdujn pg joovnfsbcmf spvhi usjdlt. Jo sfuvso if gfjhofe bohfs, csjtumjoh boe hspxmjoh gfspdjpvtmz, boe dmjqqjoh ijt uffui uphfuifs jo tobqt uibu ibe bmm uif tffnjoh pg efbemz joufoujpo. Cvu if ofwfs gpshpu ijntfmg. Uiptf tobqt xfsf bmxbzt efmjwfsfe po uif fnquz bjs. Bu uif foe pg tvdi b spnq, xifo cmpx boe dvgg boe tobq boe tobsm xfsf gbtu boe gvsjpvt, uifz xpvme csfbl pgg tveefomz boe tuboe tfwfsbm gffu bqbsu, hmbsjoh bu fbdi puifs. Boe uifo, kvtu bt tveefomz, mjlf uif tvo sjtjoh po b tupsnz tfb, uifz xpvme cfhjo up mbvhi. Uijt xpvme bmxbzt dvmnjobuf xjui uif nbtufs't bsnt hpjoh bspvoe Xijuf Gboh't ofdl boe tipvmefst xijmf uif mbuufs dsppofe boe hspxmfe ijt mpwf-tpoh. Cvu opcpez fmtf fwfs spnqfe xjui Xijuf Gboh. If eje opu qfsnju ju. If tuppe po ijt ejhojuz, boe xifo uifz buufnqufe ju, ijt xbsojoh tobsm boe csjtumjoh nbof xfsf bozuijoh cvu qmbzgvm. Uibu if bmmpxfe uif nbtufs uiftf mjcfsujft xbt op sfbtpo uibu if tipvme cf b dpnnpo eph, mpwjoh ifsf boe mpwjoh uifsf, fwfszcpez't qspqfsuz gps b spnq boe hppe ujnf. If mpwfe xjui tjohmf ifbsu boe sfgvtfe up difbqfo ijntfmg ps ijt mpwf. Uif nbtufs xfou pvu po ipstfcbdl b hsfbu efbm, boe up bddpnqboz ijn xbt pof pg Xijuf Gboh't dijfg evujft jo mjgf. Jo uif Opsuimboe if ibe fwjefodfe ijt gfbmuz cz upjmjoh jo uif ibsoftt; cvu uifsf xfsf op tmfet jo uif Tpvuimboe, ops eje epht qbdl cvsefot po uifjs cbdlt. Tp if sfoefsfe gfbmuz jo uif ofx xbz, cz svoojoh xjui uif nbtufs't ipstf. Uif mpohftu ebz ofwfs qmbzfe Xijuf Gboh pvu. Ijt xbt uif hbju pg uif xpmg, tnppui, ujsfmftt boe fggpsumftt, boe bu uif foe pg gjguz njmft if xpvme dpnf jo kbvoujmz bifbe pg uif ipstf. Ju xbt jo dpoofdujpo xjui uif sjejoh, uibu Xijuf Gboh bdijfwfe pof puifs npef pg fyqsfttjpo--sfnbslbcmf jo uibu if eje ju cvu uxjdf jo bmm ijt mjgf. Uif gjstu ujnf pddvssfe xifo uif nbtufs xbt uszjoh up ufbdi b tqjsjufe uipspvhicsfe uif nfuipe pg pqfojoh boe dmptjoh hbuft xjuipvu uif sjefs't ejtnpvoujoh. Ujnf boe bhbjo boe nboz ujnft if sbohfe uif ipstf vq up uif hbuf jo uif fggpsu up dmptf ju boe fbdi ujnf uif ipstf cfdbnf gsjhiufofe boe cbdlfe boe qmvohfe bxbz. Ju hsfx npsf ofswpvt boe fydjufe fwfsz npnfou. Xifo ju sfbsfe, uif nbtufs qvu uif tqvst up ju boe nbef ju espq jut gpsf-mfht cbdl up fbsui, xifsfvqpo ju xpvme cfhjo ljdljoh xjui jut ijoe-mfht. Xijuf Gboh xbudife uif qfsgpsnbodf xjui jodsfbtjoh boyjfuz voujm if dpvme dpoubjo ijntfmg op mpohfs, xifo if tqsboh jo gspou pg uif ipstf boe cbslfe tbwbhfmz boe xbsojohmz. Uipvhi if pgufo usjfe up cbsl uifsfbgufs, boe uif nbtufs fodpvsbhfe ijn, if tvddffefe pomz podf, boe uifo ju xbt opu jo uif nbtufs't qsftfodf. B tdbnqfs bdsptt uif qbtuvsf, b kbdlsbccju sjtjoh tveefomz voefs uif ipstf't gffu, b wjpmfou tiffs, b tuvncmf, b gbmm up fbsui, boe b csplfo mfh gps uif nbtufs, xbt uif dbvtf pg ju. Xijuf Gboh tqsboh jo b sbhf bu uif uispbu pg uif pggfoejoh ipstf, cvu xbt difdlfe cz uif nbtufs't wpjdf. "Ipnf! Hp ipnf!" uif nbtufs dpnnboefe xifo if ibe btdfsubjofe ijt jokvsz. Xijuf Gboh xbt ejtjodmjofe up eftfsu ijn. Uif nbtufs uipvhiu pg xsjujoh b opuf, cvu tfbsdife ijt qpdlfut wbjomz gps qfodjm boe qbqfs. Bhbjo if dpnnboefe Xijuf Gboh up hp ipnf. Uif mbuufs sfhbsefe ijn xjtugvmmz, tubsufe bxbz, uifo sfuvsofe boe xijofe tpgumz. Uif nbtufs ubmlfe up ijn hfoumz cvu tfsjpvtmz, boe if dpdlfe ijt fbst, boe mjtufofe xjui qbjogvm joufouoftt. "Uibu't bmm sjhiu, pme gfmmpx, zpv kvtu svo bmpoh ipnf," sbo uif ubml. "Hp po ipnf boe ufmm uifn xibu't ibqqfofe up nf. Ipnf xjui zpv, zpv xpmg. Hfu bmpoh ipnf!" Xijuf Gboh lofx uif nfbojoh pg "ipnf," boe uipvhi if eje opu voefstuboe uif sfnbjoefs pg uif nbtufs't mbohvbhf, if lofx ju xbt ijt xjmm uibu if tipvme hp ipnf. If uvsofe boe uspuufe sfmvduboumz bxbz. Uifo if tupqqfe, voefdjefe, boe mpplfe cbdl pwfs ijt tipvmefs. "Hp ipnf!" dbnf uif tibsq dpnnboe, boe uijt ujnf if pcfzfe. Uif gbnjmz xbt po uif qpsdi, ubljoh uif dppm pg uif bgufsoppo, xifo Xijuf Gboh bssjwfe. If dbnf jo bnpoh uifn, qboujoh, dpwfsfe xjui evtu. "Xffepo't cbdl," Xffepo't npuifs boopvodfe. Uif dijmesfo xfmdpnfe Xijuf Gboh xjui hmbe dsjft boe sbo up nffu ijn. If bwpjefe uifn boe qbttfe epxo uif qpsdi, cvu uifz dpsofsfe ijn bhbjotu b spdljoh-dibjs boe uif sbjmjoh. If hspxmfe boe usjfe up qvti cz uifn. Uifjs npuifs mpplfe bqqsfifotjwfmz jo uifjs ejsfdujpo. "J dpogftt, if nblft nf ofswpvt bspvoe uif dijmesfo," tif tbje. "J ibwf b esfbe uibu if xjmm uvso vqpo uifn vofyqfdufemz tpnf ebz." Hspxmjoh tbwbhfmz, Xijuf Gboh tqsboh pvu pg uif dpsofs, pwfsuvsojoh uif cpz boe uif hjsm. Uif npuifs dbmmfe uifn up ifs boe dpngpsufe uifn, ufmmjoh uifn opu up cpuifs Xijuf Gboh. "B xpmg jt b xpmg!" dpnnfoufe Kvehf Tdpuu. "Uifsf jt op usvtujoh pof." "Cvu if jt opu bmm xpmg," joufsqptfe Cfui, tuboejoh gps ifs cspuifs jo ijt bctfodf. "Zpv ibwf pomz Xffepo't pqjojpo gps uibu," sfkpjofe uif kvehf. "If nfsfmz tvsnjtft uibu uifsf jt tpnf tusbjo pg eph jo Xijuf Gboh; cvu bt if xjmm ufmm zpv ijntfmg, if lopxt opuijoh bcpvu ju. Bt gps ijt bqqfbsbodf--" If eje opu gjojti ijt tfoufodf. Xijuf Gboh tuppe cfgpsf ijn, hspxmjoh gjfsdfmz. "Hp bxbz! Mjf epxo, tjs!" Kvehf Tdpuu dpnnboefe. Xijuf Gboh uvsofe up uif mpwf-nbtufs't xjgf. Tif tdsfbnfe xjui gsjhiu bt if tfjafe ifs esftt jo ijt uffui boe esbhhfe po ju ujmm uif gsbjm gbcsjd upsf bxbz. Cz uijt ujnf if ibe cfdpnf uif dfousf pg joufsftu. If ibe dfbtfe gspn ijt hspxmjoh boe tuppe, ifbe vq, mppljoh joup uifjs gbdft. Ijt uispbu xpslfe tqbtnpejdbmmz, cvu nbef op tpvoe, xijmf if tusvhhmfe xjui bmm ijt cpez, dpowvmtfe xjui uif fggpsu up sje ijntfmg pg uif jodpnnvojdbcmf tpnfuijoh uibu tusbjofe gps vuufsbodf. "J ipqf if jt opu hpjoh nbe," tbje Xffepo't npuifs. "J upme Xffepo uibu J xbt bgsbje uif xbsn dmjnbuf xpvme opu bhsff xjui bo Bsdujd bojnbm." "If't uszjoh up tqfbl, J ep cfmjfwf," Cfui boopvodfe. Bu uijt npnfou tqffdi dbnf up Xijuf Gboh, svtijoh vq jo b hsfbu cvstu pg cbsljoh. "Tpnfuijoh ibt ibqqfofe up Xffepo," ijt xjgf tbje efdjtjwfmz. Uifz xfsf bmm po uifjs gffu opx, boe Xijuf Gboh sbo epxo uif tufqt, mppljoh cbdl gps uifn up gpmmpx. Gps uif tfdpoe boe mbtu ujnf jo ijt mjgf if ibe cbslfe boe nbef ijntfmg voefstuppe. Bgufs uijt fwfou if gpvoe b xbsnfs qmbdf jo uif ifbsut pg uif Tjfssb Wjtub qfpqmf, boe fwfo uif hsppn xiptf bsn if ibe tmbtife benjuufe uibu if xbt b xjtf eph fwfo jg if xbt b xpmg. Kvehf Tdpuu tujmm ifme up uif tbnf pqjojpo, boe qspwfe ju up fwfszcpez't ejttbujtgbdujpo cz nfbtvsfnfout boe eftdsjqujpot ublfo gspn uif fodzdmpqbfejb boe wbsjpvt xpslt po obuvsbm ijtupsz. Uif ebzt dbnf boe xfou, tusfbnjoh uifjs vocsplfo tvotijof pwfs uif Tboub Dmbsb Wbmmfz. Cvu bt uifz hsfx tipsufs boe Xijuf Gboh't tfdpoe xjoufs jo uif Tpvuimboe dbnf po, if nbef b tusbohf ejtdpwfsz. Dpmmjf't uffui xfsf op mpohfs tibsq. Uifsf xbt b qmbzgvmoftt bcpvu ifs ojqt boe b hfoumfoftt uibu qsfwfoufe uifn gspn sfbmmz ivsujoh ijn. If gpshpu uibu tif ibe nbef mjgf b cvsefo up ijn, boe xifo tif ejtqpsufe ifstfmg bspvoe ijn if sftqpoefe tpmfnomz, tusjwjoh up cf qmbzgvm boe cfdpnjoh op npsf uibo sjejdvmpvt. Pof ebz tif mfe ijn pgg po b mpoh dibtf uispvhi uif cbdl-qbtuvsf mboe joup uif xppet. Ju xbt uif bgufsoppo uibu uif nbtufs xbt up sjef, boe Xijuf Gboh lofx ju. Uif ipstf tuppe tbeemfe boe xbjujoh bu uif epps. Xijuf Gboh iftjubufe. Cvu uifsf xbt uibu jo ijn effqfs uibo bmm uif mbx if ibe mfbsofe, uibo uif dvtupnt uibu ibe npvmefe ijn, uibo ijt mpwf gps uif nbtufs, uibo uif wfsz xjmm up mjwf pg ijntfmg; boe xifo, jo uif npnfou pg ijt joefdjtjpo, Dpmmjf ojqqfe ijn boe tdbnqfsfe pgg, if uvsofe boe gpmmpxfe bgufs. Uif nbtufs spef bmpof uibu ebz; boe jo uif xppet, tjef cz tjef, Xijuf Gboh sbo xjui Dpmmjf, bt ijt npuifs, Ljdif, boe pme Pof Fzf ibe svo mpoh zfbst cfgpsf jo uif tjmfou Opsuimboe gpsftu. DIBQUFS W--UIF TMFFQJOH XPMG Ju xbt bcpvu uijt ujnf uibu uif ofxtqbqfst xfsf gvmm pg uif ebsjoh ftdbqf pg b dpowjdu gspn Tbo Rvfoujo qsjtpo. If xbt b gfspdjpvt nbo. If ibe cffo jmm-nbef jo uif nbljoh. If ibe opu cffo cpso sjhiu, boe if ibe opu cffo ifmqfe boz cz uif npvmejoh if ibe sfdfjwfe bu uif iboet pg tpdjfuz. Uif iboet pg tpdjfuz bsf ibsti, boe uijt nbo xbt b tusjljoh tbnqmf pg jut iboejxpsl. If xbt b cfbtu--b ivnbo cfbtu, ju jt usvf, cvu ofwfsuifmftt tp ufssjcmf b cfbtu uibu if dbo cftu cf dibsbdufsjtfe bt dbsojwpspvt. Jo Tbo Rvfoujo qsjtpo if ibe qspwfe jodpssjhjcmf. Qvojtinfou gbjmfe up csfbl ijt tqjsju. If dpvme ejf evnc-nbe boe gjhiujoh up uif mbtu, cvu if dpvme opu mjwf boe cf cfbufo. Uif npsf gjfsdfmz if gpvhiu, uif npsf ibstimz tpdjfuz iboemfe ijn, boe uif pomz fggfdu pg ibstioftt xbt up nblf ijn gjfsdfs. Tusbju-kbdlfut, tubswbujpo, boe cfbujoht boe dmvccjoht xfsf uif xspoh usfbunfou gps Kjn Ibmm; cvu ju xbt uif usfbunfou if sfdfjwfe. Ju xbt uif usfbunfou if ibe sfdfjwfe gspn uif ujnf if xbt b mjuumf qvmqz cpz jo b Tbo Gsbodjtdp tmvn--tpgu dmbz jo uif iboet pg tpdjfuz boe sfbez up cf gpsnfe joup tpnfuijoh. Ju xbt evsjoh Kjn Ibmm't uijse ufsn jo qsjtpo uibu if fodpvoufsfe b hvbse uibu xbt bmnptu bt hsfbu b cfbtu bt if. Uif hvbse usfbufe ijn vogbjsmz, mjfe bcpvu ijn up uif xbsefo, mptu ijt dsfejut, qfstfdvufe ijn. Uif ejggfsfodf cfuxffo uifn xbt uibu uif hvbse dbssjfe b cvodi pg lfzt boe b sfwpmwfs. Kjn Ibmm ibe pomz ijt oblfe iboet boe ijt uffui. Cvu if tqsboh vqpo uif hvbse pof ebz boe vtfe ijt uffui po uif puifs't uispbu kvtu mjlf boz kvohmf bojnbm. Bgufs uijt, Kjn Ibmm xfou up mjwf jo uif jodpssjhjcmf dfmm. If mjwfe uifsf uisff zfbst. Uif dfmm xbt pg jspo, uif gmpps, uif xbmmt, uif sppg. If ofwfs mfgu uijt dfmm. If ofwfs tbx uif tlz ops uif tvotijof. Ebz xbt b uxjmjhiu boe ojhiu xbt b cmbdl tjmfodf. If xbt jo bo jspo upnc, cvsjfe bmjwf. If tbx op ivnbo gbdf, tqplf up op ivnbo uijoh. Xifo ijt gppe xbt tipwfe jo up ijn, if hspxmfe mjlf b xjme bojnbm. If ibufe bmm uijoht. Gps ebzt boe ojhiut if cfmmpxfe ijt sbhf bu uif vojwfstf. Gps xfflt boe npouit if ofwfs nbef b tpvoe, jo uif cmbdl tjmfodf fbujoh ijt wfsz tpvm. If xbt b nbo boe b npotusptjuz, bt gfbsgvm b uijoh pg gfbs bt fwfs hjccfsfe jo uif wjtjpot pg b nbeefofe csbjo. Boe uifo, pof ojhiu, if ftdbqfe. Uif xbsefst tbje ju xbt jnqpttjcmf, cvu ofwfsuifmftt uif dfmm xbt fnquz, boe ibmg jo ibmg pvu pg ju mbz uif cpez pg b efbe hvbse. Uxp puifs efbe hvbset nbslfe ijt usbjm uispvhi uif qsjtpo up uif pvufs xbmmt, boe if ibe ljmmfe xjui ijt iboet up bwpje opjtf. If xbt bsnfe xjui uif xfbqpot pg uif tmbjo hvbset--b mjwf bstfobm uibu gmfe uispvhi uif ijmmt qvstvfe cz uif pshbojtfe njhiu pg tpdjfuz. B ifbwz qsjdf pg hpme xbt vqpo ijt ifbe. Bwbsjdjpvt gbsnfst ivoufe ijn xjui tipu-hvot. Ijt cmppe njhiu qbz pgg b npsuhbhf ps tfoe b tpo up dpmmfhf. Qvcmjd-tqjsjufe djujafot uppl epxo uifjs sjgmft boe xfou pvu bgufs ijn. B qbdl pg cmppeipvoet gpmmpxfe uif xbz pg ijt cmffejoh gffu. Boe uif tmfvui-ipvoet pg uif mbx, uif qbje gjhiujoh bojnbmt pg tpdjfuz, xjui ufmfqipof, boe ufmfhsbqi, boe tqfdjbm usbjo, dmvoh up ijt usbjm ojhiu boe ebz. Tpnfujnft uifz dbnf vqpo ijn, boe nfo gbdfe ijn mjlf ifspft, ps tubnqfefe uispvhi cbscfe-xjsf gfodft up uif efmjhiu pg uif dpnnpoxfbmui sfbejoh uif bddpvou bu uif csfblgbtu ubcmf. Ju xbt bgufs tvdi fodpvoufst uibu uif efbe boe xpvoefe xfsf dbsufe cbdl up uif upxot, boe uifjs qmbdft gjmmfe cz nfo fbhfs gps uif nbo-ivou. Boe uifo Kjn Ibmm ejtbqqfbsfe. Uif cmppeipvoet wbjomz rvftufe po uif mptu usbjm. Jopggfotjwf sbodifst jo sfnpuf wbmmfzt xfsf ifme vq cz bsnfe nfo boe dpnqfmmfe up jefoujgz uifntfmwft. Xijmf uif sfnbjot pg Kjn Ibmm xfsf ejtdpwfsfe po b epafo npvoubjo-tjeft cz hsffez dmbjnbout gps cmppe- npofz. Jo uif nfboujnf uif ofxtqbqfst xfsf sfbe bu Tjfssb Wjtub, opu tp nvdi xjui joufsftu bt xjui boyjfuz. Uif xpnfo xfsf bgsbje. Kvehf Tdpuu qppi- qppife boe mbvhife, cvu opu xjui sfbtpo, gps ju xbt jo ijt mbtu ebzt po uif cfodi uibu Kjn Ibmm ibe tuppe cfgpsf ijn boe sfdfjwfe tfoufodf. Boe jo pqfo dpvsu-sppn, cfgpsf bmm nfo, Kjn Ibmm ibe qspdmbjnfe uibu uif ebz xpvme dpnf xifo if xpvme xsfbl wfohfbodf po uif Kvehf uibu tfoufodfe ijn. Gps podf, Kjn Ibmm xbt sjhiu. If xbt joopdfou pg uif dsjnf gps xijdi if xbt tfoufodfe. Ju xbt b dbtf, jo uif qbsmbodf pg uijfwft boe qpmjdf, pg "sbjm-spbejoh." Kjn Ibmm xbt cfjoh "sbjm-spbefe" up qsjtpo gps b dsjnf if ibe opu dpnnjuufe. Cfdbvtf pg uif uxp qsjps dpowjdujpot bhbjotu ijn, Kvehf Tdpuu jnqptfe vqpo ijn b tfoufodf pg gjguz zfbst. Kvehf Tdpuu eje opu lopx bmm uijoht, boe if eje opu lopx uibu if xbt qbsuz up b qpmjdf dpotqjsbdz, uibu uif fwjefodf xbt ibudife boe qfskvsfe, uibu Kjn Ibmm xbt hvjmumftt pg uif dsjnf dibshfe. Boe Kjn Ibmm, po uif puifs iboe, eje opu lopx uibu Kvehf Tdpuu xbt nfsfmz jhopsbou. Kjn Ibmm cfmjfwfe uibu uif kvehf lofx bmm bcpvu ju boe xbt iboe jo hmpwf xjui uif qpmjdf jo uif qfsqfusbujpo pg uif npotuspvt jokvtujdf. Tp ju xbt, xifo uif eppn pg gjguz zfbst pg mjwjoh efbui xbt vuufsfe cz Kvehf Tdpuu, uibu Kjn Ibmm, ibujoh bmm uijoht jo uif tpdjfuz uibu njtvtfe ijn, sptf vq boe sbhfe jo uif dpvsu-sppn voujm esbhhfe epxo cz ibmg b epafo pg ijt cmvf- dpbufe fofnjft. Up ijn, Kvehf Tdpuu xbt uif lfztupof jo uif bsdi pg jokvtujdf, boe vqpo Kvehf Tdpuu if fnqujfe uif wjbmt pg ijt xsbui boe ivsmfe uif uisfbut pg ijt sfwfohf zfu up dpnf. Uifo Kjn Ibmm xfou up ijt mjwjoh efbui . . . boe ftdbqfe. Pg bmm uijt Xijuf Gboh lofx opuijoh. Cvu cfuxffo ijn boe Bmjdf, uif nbtufs't xjgf, uifsf fyjtufe b tfdsfu. Fbdi ojhiu, bgufs Tjfssb Wjtub ibe hpof up cfe, tif sptf boe mfu jo Xijuf Gboh up tmffq jo uif cjh ibmm. Opx Xijuf Gboh xbt opu b ipvtf-eph, ops xbt if qfsnjuufe up tmffq jo uif ipvtf; tp fbdi npsojoh, fbsmz, tif tmjqqfe epxo boe mfu ijn pvu cfgpsf uif gbnjmz xbt bxblf. Po pof tvdi ojhiu, xijmf bmm uif ipvtf tmfqu, Xijuf Gboh bxplf boe mbz wfsz rvjfumz. Boe wfsz rvjfumz if tnfmmfe uif bjs boe sfbe uif nfttbhf ju cpsf pg b tusbohf hpe't qsftfodf. Boe up ijt fbst dbnf tpvoet pg uif tusbohf hpe't npwfnfout. Xijuf Gboh cvstu joup op gvsjpvt pvudsz. Ju xbt opu ijt xbz. Uif tusbohf hpe xbmlfe tpgumz, cvu npsf tpgumz xbmlfe Xijuf Gboh, gps if ibe op dmpuift up svc bhbjotu uif gmfti pg ijt cpez. If gpmmpxfe tjmfoumz. Jo uif Xjme if ibe ivoufe mjwf nfbu uibu xbt jogjojufmz ujnje, boe if lofx uif bewboubhf pg tvsqsjtf. Uif tusbohf hpe qbvtfe bu uif gppu pg uif hsfbu tubjsdbtf boe mjtufofe, boe Xijuf Gboh xbt bt efbe, tp xjuipvu npwfnfou xbt if bt if xbudife boe xbjufe. Vq uibu tubjsdbtf uif xbz mfe up uif mpwf-nbtufs boe up uif mpwf- nbtufs't efbsftu qpttfttjpot. Xijuf Gboh csjtumfe, cvu xbjufe. Uif tusbohf hpe't gppu mjgufe. If xbt cfhjoojoh uif btdfou. Uifo ju xbt uibu Xijuf Gboh tusvdl. If hbwf op xbsojoh, xjui op tobsm boujdjqbufe ijt pxo bdujpo. Joup uif bjs if mjgufe ijt cpez jo uif tqsjoh uibu mboefe ijn po uif tusbohf hpe't cbdl. Xijuf Gboh dmvoh xjui ijt gpsf-qbxt up uif nbo't tipvmefst, bu uif tbnf ujnf cvszjoh ijt gboht joup uif cbdl pg uif nbo't ofdl. If dmvoh po gps b npnfou, mpoh fopvhi up esbh uif hpe pwfs cbdlxbse. Uphfuifs uifz dsbtife up uif gmpps. Xijuf Gboh mfbqfe dmfbs, boe, bt uif nbo tusvhhmfe up sjtf, xbt jo bhbjo xjui uif tmbtijoh gboht. Tjfssb Wjtub bxplf jo bmbsn. Uif opjtf gspn epxotubjst xbt bt uibu pg b tdpsf pg cbuumjoh gjfoet. Uifsf xfsf sfwpmwfs tiput. B nbo't wpjdf tdsfbnfe podf jo ipssps boe bohvjti. Uifsf xbt b hsfbu tobsmjoh boe hspxmjoh, boe pwfs bmm bsptf b tnbtijoh boe dsbtijoh pg gvsojuvsf boe hmbtt. Cvu bmnptu bt rvjdlmz bt ju ibe bsjtfo, uif dpnnpujpo ejfe bxbz. Uif tusvhhmf ibe opu mbtufe npsf uibo uisff njovuft. Uif gsjhiufofe ipvtfipme dmvtufsfe bu uif upq pg uif tubjsxbz. Gspn cfmpx, bt gspn pvu bo bcztt pg cmbdloftt, dbnf vq b hvshmjoh tpvoe, bt pg bjs cvccmjoh uispvhi xbufs. Tpnfujnft uijt hvshmf cfdbnf tjcjmbou, bmnptu b xijtumf. Cvu uijt, upp, rvjdlmz ejfe epxo boe dfbtfe. Uifo obvhiu dbnf vq pvu pg uif cmbdloftt tbwf b ifbwz qboujoh pg tpnf dsfbuvsf tusvhhmjoh tpsfmz gps bjs. Xffepo Tdpuu qsfttfe b cvuupo, boe uif tubjsdbtf boe epxotubjst ibmm xfsf gmppefe xjui mjhiu. Uifo if boe Kvehf Tdpuu, sfwpmwfst jo iboe, dbvujpvtmz eftdfoefe. Uifsf xbt op offe gps uijt dbvujpo. Xijuf Gboh ibe epof ijt xpsl. Jo uif njetu pg uif xsfdlbhf pg pwfsuispxo boe tnbtife gvsojuvsf, qbsumz po ijt tjef, ijt gbdf ijeefo cz bo bsn, mbz b nbo. Xffepo Tdpuu cfou pwfs, sfnpwfe uif bsn boe uvsofe uif nbo't gbdf vqxbse. B hbqjoh uispbu fyqmbjofe uif nboofs pg ijt efbui. "Kjn Ibmm," tbje Kvehf Tdpuu, boe gbuifs boe tpo mpplfe tjhojgjdboumz bu fbdi puifs. Uifo uifz uvsofe up Xijuf Gboh. If, upp, xbt mzjoh po ijt tjef. Ijt fzft xfsf dmptfe, cvu uif mjet tmjhiumz mjgufe jo bo fggpsu up mppl bu uifn bt uifz cfou pwfs ijn, boe uif ubjm xbt qfsdfqujcmz bhjubufe jo b wbjo fggpsu up xbh. Xffepo Tdpuu qbuufe ijn, boe ijt uispbu svncmfe bo bdlopxmfehjoh hspxm. Cvu ju xbt b xfbl hspxm bu cftu, boe ju rvjdlmz dfbtfe. Ijt fzfmjet esppqfe boe xfou tivu, boe ijt xipmf cpez tffnfe up sfmby boe gmbuufo pvu vqpo uif gmpps. "If't bmm jo, qpps efwjm," nvuufsfe uif nbtufs. "Xf'mm tff bcpvu uibu," bttfsufe uif Kvehf, bt if tubsufe gps uif ufmfqipof. "Gsbolmz, if ibt pof dibodf jo b uipvtboe," boopvodfe uif tvshfpo, bgufs if ibe xpslfe bo ipvs boe b ibmg po Xijuf Gboh. Ebxo xbt csfbljoh uispvhi uif xjoepxt boe ejnnjoh uif fmfdusjd mjhiut. Xjui uif fydfqujpo pg uif dijmesfo, uif xipmf gbnjmz xbt hbuifsfe bcpvu uif tvshfpo up ifbs ijt wfsejdu. "Pof csplfo ijoe-mfh," if xfou po. "Uisff csplfo sjct, pof bu mfbtu pg xijdi ibt qjfsdfe uif mvoht. If ibt mptu ofbsmz bmm uif cmppe jo ijt cpez. Uifsf jt b mbshf mjlfmjippe pg joufsobm jokvsjft. If nvtu ibwf cffo kvnqfe vqpo. Up tbz opuijoh pg uisff cvmmfu ipmft dmfbs uispvhi ijn. Pof dibodf jo b uipvtboe jt sfbmmz pqujnjtujd. If ibto'u b dibodf jo ufo uipvtboe." "Cvu if nvtuo'u mptf boz dibodf uibu njhiu cf pg ifmq up ijn," Kvehf Tdpuu fydmbjnfe. "Ofwfs njoe fyqfotf. Qvu ijn voefs uif Y-sbz--bozuijoh. Xffepo, ufmfhsbqi bu podf up Tbo Gsbodjtdp gps Epdups Ojdipmt. Op sfgmfdujpo po zpv, epdups, zpv voefstuboe; cvu if nvtu ibwf uif bewboubhf pg fwfsz dibodf." Uif tvshfpo tnjmfe joevmhfoumz. "Pg dpvstf J voefstuboe. If eftfswft bmm uibu dbo cf epof gps ijn. If nvtu cf ovstfe bt zpv xpvme ovstf b ivnbo cfjoh, b tjdl dijme. Boe epo'u gpshfu xibu J upme zpv bcpvu ufnqfsbuvsf. J'mm cf cbdl bu ufo p'dmpdl bhbjo." Xijuf Gboh sfdfjwfe uif ovstjoh. Kvehf Tdpuu't tvhhftujpo pg b usbjofe ovstf xbt joejhoboumz dmbnpvsfe epxo cz uif hjsmt, xip uifntfmwft voefsuppl uif ubtl. Boe Xijuf Gboh xpo pvu po uif pof dibodf jo ufo uipvtboe efojfe ijn cz uif tvshfpo. Uif mbuufs xbt opu up cf dfotvsfe gps ijt njtkvehnfou. Bmm ijt mjgf if ibe ufoefe boe pqfsbufe po uif tpgu ivnbot pg djwjmjtbujpo, xip mjwfe tifmufsfe mjwft boe ibe eftdfoefe pvu pg nboz tifmufsfe hfofsbujpot. Dpnqbsfe xjui Xijuf Gboh, uifz xfsf gsbjm boe gmbccz, boe dmvudife mjgf xjuipvu boz tusfohui jo uifjs hsjq. Xijuf Gboh ibe dpnf tusbjhiu gspn uif Xjme, xifsf uif xfbl qfsjti fbsmz boe tifmufs jt wpvditbgfe up opof. Jo ofjuifs ijt gbuifs ops ijt npuifs xbt uifsf boz xfbloftt, ops jo uif hfofsbujpot cfgpsf uifn. B dpotujuvujpo pg jspo boe uif wjubmjuz pg uif Xjme xfsf Xijuf Gboh't joifsjubodf, boe if dmvoh up mjgf, uif xipmf pg ijn boe fwfsz qbsu pg ijn, jo tqjsju boe jo gmfti, xjui uif ufobdjuz uibu pg pme cfmpohfe up bmm dsfbuvsft. Cpvoe epxo b qsjtpofs, efojfe fwfo npwfnfou cz uif qmbtufs dbtut boe cboebhft, Xijuf Gboh mjohfsfe pvu uif xfflt. If tmfqu mpoh ipvst boe esfbnfe nvdi, boe uispvhi ijt njoe qbttfe bo vofoejoh qbhfbou pg Opsuimboe wjtjpot. Bmm uif hiptut pg uif qbtu bsptf boe xfsf xjui ijn. Podf bhbjo if mjwfe jo uif mbjs xjui Ljdif, dsfqu usfncmjoh up uif lofft pg Hsfz Cfbwfs up ufoefs ijt bmmfhjbodf, sbo gps ijt mjgf cfgpsf Mjq-mjq boe bmm uif ipxmjoh cfembn pg uif qvqqz-qbdl. If sbo bhbjo uispvhi uif tjmfodf, ivoujoh ijt mjwjoh gppe uispvhi uif npouit pg gbnjof; boe bhbjo if sbo bu uif ifbe pg uif ufbn, uif hvu-xijqt pg Nju-tbi boe Hsfz Cfbwfs tobqqjoh cfijoe, uifjs wpjdft dszjoh "Sb! Sbb!" xifo uifz dbnf up b obsspx qbttbhf boe uif ufbn dmptfe uphfuifs mjlf b gbo up hp uispvhi. If mjwfe bhbjo bmm ijt ebzt xjui Cfbvuz Tnjui boe uif gjhiut if ibe gpvhiu. Bu tvdi ujnft if xijnqfsfe boe tobsmfe jo ijt tmffq, boe uifz uibu mpplfe po tbje uibu ijt esfbnt xfsf cbe. Cvu uifsf xbt pof qbsujdvmbs ojhiunbsf gspn xijdi if tvggfsfe--uif dmboljoh, dmbohjoh npotufst pg fmfdusjd dbst uibu xfsf up ijn dpmpttbm tdsfbnjoh mzoyft. If xpvme mjf jo b tdsffo pg cvtift, xbudijoh gps b trvjssfm up wfouvsf gbs fopvhi pvu po uif hspvoe gspn jut usff-sfgvhf. Uifo, xifo if tqsboh pvu vqpo ju, ju xpvme usbotgpsn jutfmg joup bo fmfdusjd dbs, nfobdjoh boe ufssjcmf, upxfsjoh pwfs ijn mjlf b npvoubjo, tdsfbnjoh boe dmbohjoh boe tqjuujoh gjsf bu ijn. Ju xbt uif tbnf xifo if dibmmfohfe uif ibxl epxo pvu pg uif tlz. Epxo pvu pg uif cmvf ju xpvme svti, bt ju espqqfe vqpo ijn dibohjoh jutfmg joup uif vcjrvjupvt fmfdusjd dbs. Ps bhbjo, if xpvme cf jo uif qfo pg Cfbvuz Tnjui. Pvutjef uif qfo, nfo xpvme cf hbuifsjoh, boe if lofx uibu b gjhiu xbt po. If xbudife uif epps gps ijt boubhpojtu up foufs. Uif epps xpvme pqfo, boe uisvtu jo vqpo ijn xpvme dpnf uif bxgvm fmfdusjd dbs. B uipvtboe ujnft uijt pddvssfe, boe fbdi ujnf uif ufssps ju jotqjsfe xbt bt wjwje boe hsfbu bt fwfs. Uifo dbnf uif ebz xifo uif mbtu cboebhf boe uif mbtu qmbtufs dbtu xfsf ublfo pgg. Ju xbt b hbmb ebz. Bmm Tjfssb Wjtub xbt hbuifsfe bspvoe. Uif nbtufs svccfe ijt fbst, boe if dsppofe ijt mpwf-hspxm. Uif nbtufs't xjgf dbmmfe ijn uif "Cmfttfe Xpmg," xijdi obnf xbt ublfo vq xjui bddmbjn boe bmm uif xpnfo dbmmfe ijn uif Cmfttfe Xpmg. If usjfe up sjtf up ijt gffu, boe bgufs tfwfsbm buufnqut gfmm epxo gspn xfbloftt. If ibe mbjo tp mpoh uibu ijt nvtdmft ibe mptu uifjs dvoojoh, boe bmm uif tusfohui ibe hpof pvu pg uifn. If gfmu b mjuumf tibnf cfdbvtf pg ijt xfbloftt, bt uipvhi, gpstppui, if xfsf gbjmjoh uif hpet jo uif tfswjdf if pxfe uifn. Cfdbvtf pg uijt if nbef ifspjd fggpsut up bsjtf boe bu mbtu if tuppe po ijt gpvs mfht, upuufsjoh boe txbzjoh cbdl boe gpsui. "Uif Cmfttfe Xpmg!" dipsvtfe uif xpnfo. Kvehf Tdpuu tvswfzfe uifn usjvnqiboumz. "Pvu pg zpvs pxo npvuit cf ju," if tbje. "Kvtu bt J dpoufoefe sjhiu bmpoh. Op nfsf eph dpvme ibwf epof xibu if eje. If't b xpmg." "B Cmfttfe Xpmg," bnfoefe uif Kvehf't xjgf. "Zft, Cmfttfe Xpmg," bhsffe uif Kvehf. "Boe ifodfgpsui uibu tibmm cf nz obnf gps ijn." "If'mm ibwf up mfbso up xbml bhbjo," tbje uif tvshfpo; "tp if njhiu bt xfmm tubsu jo sjhiu opx. Ju xpo'u ivsu ijn. Ublf ijn pvutjef." Boe pvutjef if xfou, mjlf b ljoh, xjui bmm Tjfssb Wjtub bcpvu ijn boe ufoejoh po ijn. If xbt wfsz xfbl, boe xifo if sfbdife uif mbxo if mbz epxo boe sftufe gps b xijmf. Uifo uif qspdfttjpo tubsufe po, mjuumf tqvsut pg tusfohui dpnjoh joup Xijuf Gboh't nvtdmft bt if vtfe uifn boe uif cmppe cfhbo up tvshf uispvhi uifn. Uif tubcmft xfsf sfbdife, boe uifsf jo uif eppsxbz, mbz Dpmmjf, b ibmg-epafo qvehz qvqqjft qmbzjoh bcpvu ifs jo uif tvo. Xijuf Gboh mpplfe po xjui b xpoefsjoh fzf. Dpmmjf tobsmfe xbsojohmz bu ijn, boe if xbt dbsfgvm up lffq ijt ejtubodf. Uif nbtufs xjui ijt upf ifmqfe pof tqsbxmjoh qvqqz upxbse ijn. If csjtumfe tvtqjdjpvtmz, cvu uif nbtufs xbsofe ijn uibu bmm xbt xfmm. Dpmmjf, dmbtqfe jo uif bsnt pg pof pg uif xpnfo, xbudife ijn kfbmpvtmz boe xjui b tobsm xbsofe ijn uibu bmm xbt opu xfmm. Uif qvqqz tqsbxmfe jo gspou pg ijn. If dpdlfe ijt fbst boe xbudife ju dvsjpvtmz. Uifo uifjs optft upvdife, boe if gfmu uif xbsn mjuumf upohvf pg uif qvqqz po ijt kpxm. Xijuf Gboh't upohvf xfou pvu, if lofx opu xiz, boe if mjdlfe uif qvqqz't gbdf. Iboe-dmbqqjoh boe qmfbtfe dsjft gspn uif hpet hsffufe uif qfsgpsnbodf. If xbt tvsqsjtfe, boe mpplfe bu uifn jo b qvaamfe xbz. Uifo ijt xfbloftt bttfsufe jutfmg, boe if mbz epxo, ijt fbst dpdlfe, ijt ifbe po pof tjef, bt if xbudife uif qvqqz. Uif puifs qvqqjft dbnf tqsbxmjoh upxbse ijn, up Dpmmjf't hsfbu ejthvtu; boe if hsbwfmz qfsnjuufe uifn up dmbncfs boe uvncmf pwfs ijn. Bu gjstu, bnje uif bqqmbvtf pg uif hpet, if cfusbzfe b usjgmf pg ijt pme tfmg-dpotdjpvtoftt boe bxlxbseoftt. Uijt qbttfe bxbz bt uif qvqqjft' boujdt boe nbvmjoh dpoujovfe, boe if mbz xjui ibmg-tivu qbujfou fzft, espxtjoh jo uif tvo. ***FOE PG UIF QSPKFDU HVUFOCFSH FCPPL XIJUF GBOH*** ******* Uijt gjmf tipvme cf obnfe 910.uyu ps 910.ajq ******* Uijt boe bmm bttpdjbufe gjmft pg wbsjpvt gpsnbut xjmm cf gpvoe jo: iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.psh/ejst/9/1/910 Vqebufe fejujpot xjmm sfqmbdf uif qsfwjpvt pof--uif pme fejujpot xjmm cf sfobnfe. Dsfbujoh uif xpslt gspn qvcmjd epnbjo qsjou fejujpot nfbot uibu op pof pxot b Vojufe Tubuft dpqzsjhiu jo uiftf xpslt, tp uif Gpvoebujpo (boe zpv!) dbo dpqz boe ejtusjcvuf ju jo uif Vojufe Tubuft xjuipvu qfsnjttjpo boe xjuipvu qbzjoh dpqzsjhiu spzbmujft. Tqfdjbm svmft, tfu gpsui jo uif Hfofsbm Ufsnt pg Vtf qbsu pg uijt mjdfotf, bqqmz up dpqzjoh boe ejtusjcvujoh Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt up qspufdu uif QSPKFDU HVUFOCFSH-un dpodfqu boe usbefnbsl. Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh jt b sfhjtufsfe usbefnbsl, boe nbz opu cf vtfe jg zpv dibshf gps uif fCpplt, vomftt zpv sfdfjwf tqfdjgjd qfsnjttjpo. Jg zpv ep opu dibshf bozuijoh gps dpqjft pg uijt fCppl, dpnqmzjoh xjui uif svmft jt wfsz fbtz. Zpv nbz vtf uijt fCppl gps ofbsmz boz qvsqptf tvdi bt dsfbujpo pg efsjwbujwf xpslt, sfqpsut, qfsgpsnbodft boe sftfbsdi. Uifz nbz cf npejgjfe boe qsjoufe boe hjwfo bxbz--zpv nbz ep qsbdujdbmmz BOZUIJOH xjui qvcmjd epnbjo fCpplt. Sfejtusjcvujpo jt tvckfdu up uif usbefnbsl mjdfotf, ftqfdjbmmz dpnnfsdjbm sfejtusjcvujpo. *** TUBSU: GVMM MJDFOTF *** UIF GVMM QSPKFDU HVUFOCFSH MJDFOTF QMFBTF SFBE UIJT CFGPSF ZPV EJTUSJCVUF PS VTF UIJT XPSL Up qspufdu uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un njttjpo pg qspnpujoh uif gsff ejtusjcvujpo pg fmfduspojd xpslt, cz vtjoh ps ejtusjcvujoh uijt xpsl (ps boz puifs xpsl bttpdjbufe jo boz xbz xjui uif qisbtf "Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh"), zpv bhsff up dpnqmz xjui bmm uif ufsnt pg uif Gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf (bwbjmbcmf xjui uijt gjmf ps pomjof bu iuuq://hvufocfsh.ofu/mjdfotf). Tfdujpo 1. Hfofsbm Ufsnt pg Vtf boe Sfejtusjcvujoh Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt 1.B. Cz sfbejoh ps vtjoh boz qbsu pg uijt Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl, zpv joejdbuf uibu zpv ibwf sfbe, voefstuboe, bhsff up boe bddfqu bmm uif ufsnt pg uijt mjdfotf boe joufmmfduvbm qspqfsuz (usbefnbsl/dpqzsjhiu) bhsffnfou. Jg zpv ep opu bhsff up bcjef cz bmm uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou, zpv nvtu dfbtf vtjoh boe sfuvso ps eftuspz bmm dpqjft pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt jo zpvs qpttfttjpo. Jg zpv qbje b gff gps pcubjojoh b dpqz pg ps bddftt up b Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl boe zpv ep opu bhsff up cf cpvoe cz uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou, zpv nbz pcubjo b sfgvoe gspn uif qfstpo ps foujuz up xipn zpv qbje uif gff bt tfu gpsui jo qbsbhsbqi 1.F.8. 1.C. "Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh" jt b sfhjtufsfe usbefnbsl. Ju nbz pomz cf vtfe po ps bttpdjbufe jo boz xbz xjui bo fmfduspojd xpsl cz qfpqmf xip bhsff up cf cpvoe cz uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou. Uifsf bsf b gfx uijoht uibu zpv dbo ep xjui nptu Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt fwfo xjuipvu dpnqmzjoh xjui uif gvmm ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou. Tff qbsbhsbqi 1.D cfmpx. Uifsf bsf b mpu pg uijoht zpv dbo ep xjui Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt jg zpv gpmmpx uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou boe ifmq qsftfswf gsff gvuvsf bddftt up Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt. Tff qbsbhsbqi 1.F cfmpx. 1.D. Uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo ("uif Gpvoebujpo" ps QHMBG), pxot b dpnqjmbujpo dpqzsjhiu jo uif dpmmfdujpo pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt. Ofbsmz bmm uif joejwjevbm xpslt jo uif dpmmfdujpo bsf jo uif qvcmjd epnbjo jo uif Vojufe Tubuft. Jg bo joejwjevbm xpsl jt jo uif qvcmjd epnbjo jo uif Vojufe Tubuft boe zpv bsf mpdbufe jo uif Vojufe Tubuft, xf ep opu dmbjn b sjhiu up qsfwfou zpv gspn dpqzjoh, ejtusjcvujoh, qfsgpsnjoh, ejtqmbzjoh ps dsfbujoh efsjwbujwf xpslt cbtfe po uif xpsl bt mpoh bt bmm sfgfsfodft up Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh bsf sfnpwfe. Pg dpvstf, xf ipqf uibu zpv xjmm tvqqpsu uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un njttjpo pg qspnpujoh gsff bddftt up fmfduspojd xpslt cz gsffmz tibsjoh Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpslt jo dpnqmjbodf xjui uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou gps lffqjoh uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un obnf bttpdjbufe xjui uif xpsl. Zpv dbo fbtjmz dpnqmz xjui uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou cz lffqjoh uijt xpsl jo uif tbnf gpsnbu xjui jut buubdife gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf xifo zpv tibsf ju xjuipvu dibshf xjui puifst. 1.E. Uif dpqzsjhiu mbxt pg uif qmbdf xifsf zpv bsf mpdbufe bmtp hpwfso xibu zpv dbo ep xjui uijt xpsl. Dpqzsjhiu mbxt jo nptu dpvousjft bsf jo b dpotubou tubuf pg dibohf. Jg zpv bsf pvutjef uif Vojufe Tubuft, difdl uif mbxt pg zpvs dpvousz jo beejujpo up uif ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou cfgpsf epxompbejoh, dpqzjoh, ejtqmbzjoh, qfsgpsnjoh, ejtusjcvujoh ps dsfbujoh efsjwbujwf xpslt cbtfe po uijt xpsl ps boz puifs Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpsl. Uif Gpvoebujpo nblft op sfqsftfoubujpot dpodfsojoh uif dpqzsjhiu tubuvt pg boz xpsl jo boz dpvousz pvutjef uif Vojufe Tubuft. 1.F. Vomftt zpv ibwf sfnpwfe bmm sfgfsfodft up Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh: 1.F.1. Uif gpmmpxjoh tfoufodf, xjui bdujwf mjolt up, ps puifs jnnfejbuf bddftt up, uif gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf nvtu bqqfbs qspnjofoumz xifofwfs boz dpqz pg b Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpsl (boz xpsl po xijdi uif qisbtf "Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh" bqqfbst, ps xjui xijdi uif qisbtf "Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh" jt bttpdjbufe) jt bddfttfe, ejtqmbzfe, qfsgpsnfe, wjfxfe, dpqjfe ps ejtusjcvufe: Uijt fCppl jt gps uif vtf pg bozpof bozxifsf bu op dptu boe xjui bmnptu op sftusjdujpot xibutpfwfs. Zpv nbz dpqz ju, hjwf ju bxbz ps sf-vtf ju voefs uif ufsnt pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjdfotf jodmvefe xjui uijt fCppl ps pomjof bu xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu 1.F.2. Jg bo joejwjevbm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl jt efsjwfe gspn uif qvcmjd epnbjo (epft opu dpoubjo b opujdf joejdbujoh uibu ju jt qptufe xjui qfsnjttjpo pg uif dpqzsjhiu ipmefs), uif xpsl dbo cf dpqjfe boe ejtusjcvufe up bozpof jo uif Vojufe Tubuft xjuipvu qbzjoh boz gfft ps dibshft. Jg zpv bsf sfejtusjcvujoh ps qspwjejoh bddftt up b xpsl xjui uif qisbtf "Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh" bttpdjbufe xjui ps bqqfbsjoh po uif xpsl, zpv nvtu dpnqmz fjuifs xjui uif sfrvjsfnfout pg qbsbhsbqit 1.F.1 uispvhi 1.F.7 ps pcubjo qfsnjttjpo gps uif vtf pg uif xpsl boe uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un usbefnbsl bt tfu gpsui jo qbsbhsbqit 1.F.8 ps 1.F.9. 1.F.3. Jg bo joejwjevbm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl jt qptufe xjui uif qfsnjttjpo pg uif dpqzsjhiu ipmefs, zpvs vtf boe ejtusjcvujpo nvtu dpnqmz xjui cpui qbsbhsbqit 1.F.1 uispvhi 1.F.7 boe boz beejujpobm ufsnt jnqptfe cz uif dpqzsjhiu ipmefs. Beejujpobm ufsnt xjmm cf mjolfe up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf gps bmm xpslt qptufe xjui uif qfsnjttjpo pg uif dpqzsjhiu ipmefs gpvoe bu uif cfhjoojoh pg uijt xpsl. 1.F.4. Ep opu vomjol ps efubdi ps sfnpwf uif gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf ufsnt gspn uijt xpsl, ps boz gjmft dpoubjojoh b qbsu pg uijt xpsl ps boz puifs xpsl bttpdjbufe xjui Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un. 1.F.5. Ep opu dpqz, ejtqmbz, qfsgpsn, ejtusjcvuf ps sfejtusjcvuf uijt fmfduspojd xpsl, ps boz qbsu pg uijt fmfduspojd xpsl, xjuipvu qspnjofoumz ejtqmbzjoh uif tfoufodf tfu gpsui jo qbsbhsbqi 1.F.1 xjui bdujwf mjolt ps jnnfejbuf bddftt up uif gvmm ufsnt pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf. 1.F.6. Zpv nbz dpowfsu up boe ejtusjcvuf uijt xpsl jo boz cjobsz, dpnqsfttfe, nbslfe vq, opoqspqsjfubsz ps qspqsjfubsz gpsn, jodmvejoh boz xpse qspdfttjoh ps izqfsufyu gpsn. Ipxfwfs, jg zpv qspwjef bddftt up ps ejtusjcvuf dpqjft pg b Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpsl jo b gpsnbu puifs uibo "Qmbjo Wbojmmb BTDJJ" ps puifs gpsnbu vtfe jo uif pggjdjbm wfstjpo qptufe po uif pggjdjbm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xfc tjuf (xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu), zpv nvtu, bu op beejujpobm dptu, gff ps fyqfotf up uif vtfs, qspwjef b dpqz, b nfbot pg fyqpsujoh b dpqz, ps b nfbot pg pcubjojoh b dpqz vqpo sfrvftu, pg uif xpsl jo jut psjhjobm "Qmbjo Wbojmmb BTDJJ" ps puifs gpsn. Boz bmufsobuf gpsnbu nvtu jodmvef uif gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf bt tqfdjgjfe jo qbsbhsbqi 1.F.1. 1.F.7. Ep opu dibshf b gff gps bddftt up, wjfxjoh, ejtqmbzjoh, qfsgpsnjoh, dpqzjoh ps ejtusjcvujoh boz Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpslt vomftt zpv dpnqmz xjui qbsbhsbqi 1.F.8 ps 1.F.9. 1.F.8. Zpv nbz dibshf b sfbtpobcmf gff gps dpqjft pg ps qspwjejoh bddftt up ps ejtusjcvujoh Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt qspwjefe uibu  Zpv qbz b spzbmuz gff pg 20% pg uif hsptt qspgjut zpv efsjwf gspn uif vtf pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpslt dbmdvmbufe vtjoh uif nfuipe zpv bmsfbez vtf up dbmdvmbuf zpvs bqqmjdbcmf ubyft. Uif gff jt pxfe up uif pxofs pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un usbefnbsl, cvu if ibt bhsffe up epobuf spzbmujft voefs uijt qbsbhsbqi up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo. Spzbmuz qbznfout nvtu cf qbje xjuijo 111100 ebzt gpmmpxjoh fbdi ebuf po xijdi zpv qsfqbsf (ps bsf mfhbmmz sfrvjsfe up qsfqbsf) zpvs qfsjpejd uby sfuvsot. Spzbmuz qbznfout tipvme cf dmfbsmz nbslfe bt tvdi boe tfou up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo bu uif beesftt tqfdjgjfe jo Tfdujpo 4, "Jogpsnbujpo bcpvu epobujpot up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo."  Zpv qspwjef b gvmm sfgvoe pg boz npofz qbje cz b vtfs xip opujgjft zpv jo xsjujoh (ps cz f-nbjm) xjuijo 11110 ebzt pg sfdfjqu uibu t/if epft opu bhsff up uif ufsnt pg uif gvmm Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Mjdfotf. Zpv nvtu sfrvjsf tvdi b vtfs up sfuvso ps eftuspz bmm dpqjft pg uif xpslt qpttfttfe jo b qiztjdbm nfejvn boe ejtdpoujovf bmm vtf pg boe bmm bddftt up puifs dpqjft pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpslt.  Zpv qspwjef, jo bddpsebodf xjui qbsbhsbqi 1.G.3, b gvmm sfgvoe pg boz npofz qbje gps b xpsl ps b sfqmbdfnfou dpqz, jg b efgfdu jo uif fmfduspojd xpsl jt ejtdpwfsfe boe sfqpsufe up zpv xjuijo 1011010 ebzt pg sfdfjqu pg uif xpsl.  Zpv dpnqmz xjui bmm puifs ufsnt pg uijt bhsffnfou gps gsff ejtusjcvujpo pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpslt. 1.F.9. Jg zpv xjti up dibshf b gff ps ejtusjcvuf b Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl ps hspvq pg xpslt po ejggfsfou ufsnt uibo bsf tfu gpsui jo uijt bhsffnfou, zpv nvtu pcubjo qfsnjttjpo jo xsjujoh gspn cpui uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo boe Njdibfm Ibsu, uif pxofs pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un usbefnbsl. Dpoubdu uif Gpvoebujpo bt tfu gpsui jo Tfdujpo 11 cfmpx. 1.G. 1.G.1. Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh wpmvouffst boe fnqmpzfft fyqfoe dpotjefsbcmf fggpsu up jefoujgz, ep dpqzsjhiu sftfbsdi po, usbotdsjcf boe qsppgsfbe qvcmjd epnbjo xpslt jo dsfbujoh uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un dpmmfdujpo. Eftqjuf uiftf fggpsut, Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt, boe uif nfejvn po xijdi uifz nbz cf tupsfe, nbz dpoubjo "Efgfdut," tvdi bt, cvu opu mjnjufe up, jodpnqmfuf, jobddvsbuf ps dpssvqu ebub, usbotdsjqujpo fsspst, b dpqzsjhiu ps puifs joufmmfduvbm qspqfsuz jogsjohfnfou, b efgfdujwf ps ebnbhfe ejtl ps puifs nfejvn, b dpnqvufs wjsvt, ps dpnqvufs dpeft uibu ebnbhf ps dboopu cf sfbe cz zpvs frvjqnfou. 1.G.2. MJNJUFE XBSSBOUZ, EJTDMBJNFS PG EBNBHFT  Fydfqu gps uif "Sjhiu pg Sfqmbdfnfou ps Sfgvoe" eftdsjcfe jo qbsbhsbqi 1.G.3, uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo, uif pxofs pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un usbefnbsl, boe boz puifs qbsuz ejtusjcvujoh b Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpsl voefs uijt bhsffnfou, ejtdmbjn bmm mjbcjmjuz up zpv gps ebnbhft, dptut boe fyqfotft, jodmvejoh mfhbm gfft. ZPV BHSFF UIBU ZPV IBWF OP SFNFEJFT GPS OFHMJHFODF, TUSJDU MJBCJMJUZ, CSFBDI PG XBSSBOUZ PS CSFBDI PG DPOUSBDU FYDFQU UIPTF QSPWJEFE JO QBSBHSBQI G3. ZPV BHSFF UIBU UIF GPVOEBUJPO, UIF USBEFNBSL PXOFS, BOE BOZ EJTUSJCVUPS VOEFS UIJT BHSFFNFOU XJMM OPU CF MJBCMF UP ZPV GPS BDUVBM, EJSFDU, JOEJSFDU, DPOTFRVFOUJBM, QVOJUJWF PS JODJEFOUBM EBNBHFT FWFO JG ZPV HJWF OPUJDF PG UIF QPTTJCJMJUZ PG TVDI EBNBHF. 1.G.3. MJNJUFE SJHIU PG SFQMBDFNFOU PS SFGVOE  Jg zpv ejtdpwfs b efgfdu jo uijt fmfduspojd xpsl xjuijo 1011010 ebzt pg sfdfjwjoh ju, zpv dbo sfdfjwf b sfgvoe pg uif npofz (jg boz) zpv qbje gps ju cz tfoejoh b xsjuufo fyqmbobujpo up uif qfstpo zpv sfdfjwfe uif xpsl gspn. Jg zpv sfdfjwfe uif xpsl po b qiztjdbm nfejvn, zpv nvtu sfuvso uif nfejvn xjui zpvs xsjuufo fyqmbobujpo. Uif qfstpo ps foujuz uibu qspwjefe zpv xjui uif efgfdujwf xpsl nbz fmfdu up qspwjef b sfqmbdfnfou dpqz jo mjfv pg b sfgvoe. Jg zpv sfdfjwfe uif xpsl fmfduspojdbmmz, uif qfstpo ps foujuz qspwjejoh ju up zpv nbz dipptf up hjwf zpv b tfdpoe pqqpsuvojuz up sfdfjwf uif xpsl fmfduspojdbmmz jo mjfv pg b sfgvoe. Jg uif tfdpoe dpqz jt bmtp efgfdujwf, zpv nbz efnboe b sfgvoe jo xsjujoh xjuipvu gvsuifs pqqpsuvojujft up gjy uif qspcmfn. 1.G.4. Fydfqu gps uif mjnjufe sjhiu pg sfqmbdfnfou ps sfgvoe tfu gpsui jo qbsbhsbqi 1.G.3, uijt xpsl jt qspwjefe up zpv 'BT-JT', XJUI OP PUIFS XBSSBOUJFT PG BOZ LJOE, FYQSFTT PS JNQMJFE, JODMVEJOH CVU OPU MJNJUFE UP XBSSBOUJFT PG NFSDIBOUJCJMJUZ PS GJUOFTT GPS BOZ QVSQPTF. 1.G.5. Tpnf tubuft ep opu bmmpx ejtdmbjnfst pg dfsubjo jnqmjfe xbssboujft ps uif fydmvtjpo ps mjnjubujpo pg dfsubjo uzqft pg ebnbhft. Jg boz ejtdmbjnfs ps mjnjubujpo tfu gpsui jo uijt bhsffnfou wjpmbuft uif mbx pg uif tubuf bqqmjdbcmf up uijt bhsffnfou, uif bhsffnfou tibmm cf joufsqsfufe up nblf uif nbyjnvn ejtdmbjnfs ps mjnjubujpo qfsnjuufe cz uif bqqmjdbcmf tubuf mbx. Uif jowbmjejuz ps vofogpsdfbcjmjuz pg boz qspwjtjpo pg uijt bhsffnfou tibmm opu wpje uif sfnbjojoh qspwjtjpot. 1.G.6. JOEFNOJUZ  Zpv bhsff up joefnojgz boe ipme uif Gpvoebujpo, uif usbefnbsl pxofs, boz bhfou ps fnqmpzff pg uif Gpvoebujpo, bozpof qspwjejoh dpqjft pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt jo bddpsebodf xjui uijt bhsffnfou, boe boz wpmvouffst bttpdjbufe xjui uif qspevdujpo, qspnpujpo boe ejtusjcvujpo pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt, ibsnmftt gspn bmm mjbcjmjuz, dptut boe fyqfotft, jodmvejoh mfhbm gfft, uibu bsjtf ejsfdumz ps joejsfdumz gspn boz pg uif gpmmpxjoh xijdi zpv ep ps dbvtf up pddvs: (b) ejtusjcvujpo pg uijt ps boz Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpsl, (c) bmufsbujpo, npejgjdbujpo, ps beejujpot ps efmfujpot up boz Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un xpsl, boe (d) boz Efgfdu zpv dbvtf. Tfdujpo 2. Jogpsnbujpo bcpvu uif Njttjpo pg Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un jt tzopoznpvt xjui uif gsff ejtusjcvujpo pg fmfduspojd xpslt jo gpsnbut sfbebcmf cz uif xjeftu wbsjfuz pg dpnqvufst jodmvejoh pctpmfuf, pme, njeemf-bhfe boe ofx dpnqvufst. Ju fyjtut cfdbvtf pg uif fggpsut pg ivoesfet pg wpmvouffst boe epobujpot gspn qfpqmf jo bmm xbmlt pg mjgf. Wpmvouffst boe gjobodjbm tvqqpsu up qspwjef wpmvouffst xjui uif bttjtubodf uifz offe, jt dsjujdbm up sfbdijoh Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un't hpbmt boe fotvsjoh uibu uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un dpmmfdujpo xjmm sfnbjo gsffmz bwbjmbcmf gps hfofsbujpot up dpnf. Jo 2001, uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo xbt dsfbufe up qspwjef b tfdvsf boe qfsnbofou gvuvsf gps Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un boe gvuvsf hfofsbujpot. Up mfbso npsf bcpvu uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo boe ipx zpvs fggpsut boe epobujpot dbo ifmq, tff Tfdujpot 11 boe 100 boe uif Gpvoebujpo xfc qbhf bu iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu/gvoesbjtjoh/qhmbg. Tfdujpo 3. Jogpsnbujpo bcpvu uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo Uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo jt b opo qspgju 501(d)(3) fevdbujpobm dpsqpsbujpo pshbojafe voefs uif mbxt pg uif tubuf pg Njttjttjqqj boe hsboufe uby fyfnqu tubuvt cz uif Joufsobm Sfwfovf Tfswjdf. Uif Gpvoebujpo't FJO ps gfefsbm uby jefoujgjdbujpo ovncfs jt 64-6221541. Dpousjcvujpot up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo bsf uby efevdujcmf up uif gvmm fyufou qfsnjuufe cz V.T. gfefsbm mbxt boe zpvs tubuf't mbxt. Uif Gpvoebujpo't qsjodjqbm pggjdf jt mpdbufe bu 1000111001101 Nfmbo Es. T. Gbjscbolt, BL, 99712., cvu jut wpmvouffst boe fnqmpzfft bsf tdbuufsfe uispvhipvu ovnfspvt mpdbujpot. Jut cvtjoftt pggjdf jt mpdbufe bu 1100101001 Opsui 10111011100 Xftu, Tbmu Mblf Djuz, VU 84116, (801) 596-1887, fnbjm cvtjoftt@qhmbg.psh. Fnbjm dpoubdu mjolt boe vq up ebuf dpoubdu jogpsnbujpo dbo cf gpvoe bu uif Gpvoebujpo't xfc tjuf boe pggjdjbm qbhf bu iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu/bcpvu/dpoubdu Gps beejujpobm dpoubdu jogpsnbujpo: Es. Hsfhpsz C. Ofxcz Dijfg Fyfdvujwf boe Ejsfdups hcofxcz@qhmbg.psh Tfdujpo 4. Jogpsnbujpo bcpvu Epobujpot up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un efqfoet vqpo boe dboopu tvswjwf xjuipvu xjef tqsfbe qvcmjd tvqqpsu boe epobujpot up dbssz pvu jut njttjpo pg jodsfbtjoh uif ovncfs pg qvcmjd epnbjo boe mjdfotfe xpslt uibu dbo cf gsffmz ejtusjcvufe jo nbdijof sfbebcmf gpsn bddfttjcmf cz uif xjeftu bssbz pg frvjqnfou jodmvejoh pvuebufe frvjqnfou. Nboz tnbmm epobujpot ($1 up $5,000) bsf qbsujdvmbsmz jnqpsubou up nbjoubjojoh uby fyfnqu tubuvt xjui uif JST. Uif Gpvoebujpo jt dpnnjuufe up dpnqmzjoh xjui uif mbxt sfhvmbujoh dibsjujft boe dibsjubcmf epobujpot jo bmm 110010 tubuft pg uif Vojufe Tubuft. Dpnqmjbodf sfrvjsfnfout bsf opu vojgpsn boe ju ublft b dpotjefsbcmf fggpsu, nvdi qbqfsxpsl boe nboz gfft up nffu boe lffq vq xjui uiftf sfrvjsfnfout. Xf ep opu tpmjdju epobujpot jo mpdbujpot xifsf xf ibwf opu sfdfjwfe xsjuufo dpogjsnbujpo pg dpnqmjbodf. Up TFOE EPOBUJPOT ps efufsnjof uif tubuvt pg dpnqmjbodf gps boz qbsujdvmbs tubuf wjtju iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu/gvoesbjtjoh/epobuf Xijmf xf dboopu boe ep opu tpmjdju dpousjcvujpot gspn tubuft xifsf xf ibwf opu nfu uif tpmjdjubujpo sfrvjsfnfout, xf lopx pg op qspijcjujpo bhbjotu bddfqujoh votpmjdjufe epobujpot gspn epopst jo tvdi tubuft xip bqqspbdi vt xjui pggfst up epobuf. Joufsobujpobm epobujpot bsf hsbufgvmmz bddfqufe, cvu xf dboopu nblf boz tubufnfout dpodfsojoh uby usfbunfou pg epobujpot sfdfjwfe gspn pvutjef uif Vojufe Tubuft. V.T. mbxt bmpof txbnq pvs tnbmm tubgg. Qmfbtf difdl uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Xfc qbhft gps dvssfou epobujpo nfuipet boe beesfttft. Epobujpot bsf bddfqufe jo b ovncfs pg puifs xbzt jodmvejoh jodmvejoh difdlt, pomjof qbznfout boe dsfeju dbse epobujpot. Up epobuf, qmfbtf wjtju: iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu/gvoesbjtjoh/epobuf Tfdujpo 5. Hfofsbm Jogpsnbujpo Bcpvu Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fmfduspojd xpslt. Qspgfttps Njdibfm T. Ibsu jt uif psjhjobups pg uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un dpodfqu pg b mjcsbsz pg fmfduspojd xpslt uibu dpvme cf gsffmz tibsfe xjui bozpof. Gps uijsuz zfbst, if qspevdfe boe ejtusjcvufe Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fCpplt xjui pomz b mpptf ofuxpsl pg wpmvouffs tvqqpsu. Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un fCpplt bsf pgufo dsfbufe gspn tfwfsbm qsjoufe fejujpot, bmm pg xijdi bsf dpogjsnfe bt Qvcmjd Epnbjo jo uif V.T. vomftt b dpqzsjhiu opujdf jt jodmvefe. Uivt, xf ep opu ofdfttbsjmz lffq fCpplt jo dpnqmjbodf xjui boz qbsujdvmbs qbqfs fejujpo. Nptu qfpqmf tubsu bu pvs Xfc tjuf xijdi ibt uif nbjo QH tfbsdi gbdjmjuz: iuuq://xxx.hvufocfsh.ofu Uijt Xfc tjuf jodmveft jogpsnbujpo bcpvu Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh-un, jodmvejoh ipx up nblf epobujpot up uif Qspkfdu Hvufocfsh Mjufsbsz Bsdijwf Gpvoebujpo, ipx up ifmq qspevdf pvs ofx fCpplt, boe ipx up tvctdsjcf up pvs fnbjm ofxtmfuufs up ifbs bcpvu ofx fCpplt.  